he edition of the work that Monseigneur de Montault
mentioned to you.



62. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Dear Maestra,

No one knows better than you how to relieve the virtue of
obligingness by the most cordial kindness. You make a point of
persuading your friends that you are in their debt for the
services you render them. In so far as they give you the
opportunity of exercising your fine qualities you are perfectly
right, but further than that you are not; and for my part I beg
you to be as fully assured of my sincere gratitude as of my
entire devotion.

I am not going to set about pitying you much for the difficulties
and contradictions that your artistic zeal encounters. The world
is so formed that the practice of the Good and the search for the
Better is not made agreeable to any one; not in the things of
Art, which appear the most inoffensive, any more than in other
things. In order to deserve well one must learn to endure well.
The best specific for the prejudice, malice, imbroglios and
injustice of others is not to trouble oneself about them. It
seems that such and such people find their pleasure where we
should not in the least look for it: so be it, reserving to
ourselves to find ours in nobler sources. Besides, how could we
dare to lament over difficulties that run counter to our good
pleasure? Have not the worthiest and most illustrious servants of
Art had to suffer far more than we?...This consolation has its
melancholy side, I know; nevertheless it confirms the active
conscience in the right road.

This a propos of the prelude extra muros of your last concerts.
Let us pass on to the programmes of them, dear and victorious
Maestra.

The "Panis Angelicus," [By Palestrina.] the Schumann Quintet and
the sublime Prelude to "Lohengrin" are works which a well-
brought-up public ought to know by heart. You will do well
therefore to reproduce them often. There is no criticism
admissible on this subject; and, if you absolutely exact it that
I should make one at all, it would only be on the adjective
"celebrated," appended to the Schumann Quintet, which would do
without it without disadvantage. Pardon me this hairsplitting.-

As to the "Beatitudes" I entirely approve of your not having
exhibited them a second time. You know, moreover, that I usually
dissuade my friends from encumbering concert programmes with my
compositions. For the little they have to lose they will not lose
it by waiting. Let us then administer them in homoeopathic doses-
-and rarely.

I am delighted with what you tell me of Wilhelmj. Please assure
him of my best regard and of the pleasure I shall have in showing
it to him with more consequence. The Concerto for which he asks
has already been begged for several times from me by Sivori and
Remenyi. I don't know when I shall find time to write it. There
is not the least hurry for it, as long as criticism constrains
violin-virtuosi to limit themselves to a repertoire of four or
five pieces, very beautiful doubtless, and no less well known.
Joachim naively confessed to me that after he had played the
Beethoven and Mendelssohn Concertos and the Bach Chaconne he did
not know what to do with himself in a town unless it were to go
on playing indefinitely the same two Concertos and the same
Chaconne.

Sgambati and Pinelli announce six matinees of Chamber Music every
Wednesday, beginning the day after tomorrow. The audience will be
more numerous this year than formerly. People are beginning to
talk about these matinees in the aristocratic salons in which it
is often de bon ton not to listen to good music.--

Towards spring Sgambati will bring you his new laurels, and will
also tell you about his future prospects. The deciding of his
marriage will influence all the rest: it might almost be
regretted that our friend should abandon himself to an excess of
honorable feeling!

Without offending any one, the famous saying about the Chassepot
rifle may be applied to the Chickering Piano; it is doing wonders
at Rome. Everybody talks to me of it, and wants to see and hear
it. One of my archeological friends calls it "the Coliseum of
Pianos"!

My affectionate respects to your mother;--sympathetic
remembrances to Miss Williams; a friendly shake of the hand to
Callander;--admiring chirps to Bocage;--warmest compliments to
the Pearsolls, and

Very cordially yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, January 13th, 1868



63. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

My hearty congratulations upon our Falcon-colleagueship [Brendel
had received the Weimar Order of the Falcon of Watchfulness
(Falkenorden der Wachsamkeit)] and henceforth always, "Vigilando
ascendimus."

As I was expecting parcels and news from Leipzig I delayed
answering your friendly letter. I have not yet received either
the Almanack, or the corrected proofs of the "Elizabeth". How did
the performance in the Pauliner Church [Riedel had arranged a
performance of the "Elizabeth" in Leipzig.] go off? Ask Kahnt to
let me have one or two of the notices of it--especially the
unfavorable ones. Remind him also to write to Otto Roquette about
the translation of the Latin chorus at the end, to which I
referred in my last letter to him.

Berlioz's "Requiem" is the corner-stone of the programme for the
Altenburg Tonkunstler-Versammlung. I have often speculated about
the possibility of having this colossal work produced.
Unfortunately the Weimar churches were not sufficiently spacious,
and in Brunswick, where the Egidien church would be a magnificent
place for musical festivals of any kind, other difficulties stood
in the way. Probably Altenburg also does not possess any building
sufficiently large to hold an orchestra for the "Dies Irae", and
Riedel will have to reduce the 16 drums, 12 horns, 8 trumpets and
8 trombones to a minimum. But, even though it should not be
possible to give a performance of the whole work, still there are
portions of it--such as the "Requiem Aeternam," the "Lacrymosa
and Sanctus"--that are extremely well worth hearing and
appreciating.

The sketch of the programme furnishes an excellent antidote to
Berlioz's Requiem, in Handel's "Acis and Galatea"; and some
smaller things of Draseke, Lassen and my humble self might be
introduced in between.

Sgambati's co-operation will depend upon my journey. I am unable
as yet to say anything definite about it. Not till June can I
decide whether I can come or not. To speak frankly it will be
difficult for me to leave Rome at all this year.

With regard to your personal affairs I can but again assure you
that I take the liveliest interest in them. The modesty of your
claims, dear friend, is very much out of proportion with the
importance of the services you have rendered. One rarely meets
with demands that are as just and as unpretending as yours. Be
assured of my sincere readiness to promote your interest in
higher quarters, and to do what I can to satisfy you.

With warmest thanks and kindest greetings yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, January 26th, 1868

Sgambati's matinees for Chamber-music are better attended than
ever this winter. They include all that is musically interesting
as regards Rome.



64. To Walter Bache

Dear Mr. Bache,

I thank you cordially for your kind letter, and beg you to rely
always on my feelings of sincere affection and esteem.

It would certainly be a great pleasure to me to see you again in
London this summer, yet I could not venture to promise or to keep
my promise, and must abstain from either.

Please therefore to make my excuses to the Secretary of the
Philharmonic Society, and to thank him for his kind intentions
towards me. If an opportunity of realising them should occur
later on,--without disappointment or disagreeableness to any
one,--I should be much pleased. As regards the present time it is
superfluous to give any thought to the proposition you transmit
to me, in view of the obligations which will retain me elsewhere.
I am even doubtful whether it will be possible for me to accept
the invitation of my German friends to the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung at Altenburg in July.--

The good news you give me of Klindworth is very pleasant to me.
May he remember me sufficiently well to know how much I
appreciate him and what an affection I have for him.

Sgambati is very much in fashion this winter, and the fashion is
perfectly right in this. He sends you a thousand affectionate
greetings, and Lippi, [A Roman pupil of Liszt's] Mdlle. Giuli
[Liszt's best lady-pupil in Rome] and the other patients of the
"Scuola" [School] hold you in warm remembrance.

Accept also, dear Mr. Bache, the assurance of my very sincere
devotion.

F. Liszt

Rome, January 30th, 1868

The performance of my symphonic works in London must, like the
concert of the Phil. Society, be postponed. Your zeal in this
matter touches me much. I would not wish tosuppress it, and only
beg you to moderate it so that it may be all the more fruitful.



65. To Dr. Franz Brendel

Dear Friend,

I have nothing to find fault with in the sketch of the Altenburg
programme except that my name occurs too often in it. I am afraid
of appearing obtrusive if several works of mine are produced at
every Tonkunstler-Versammlung. Certainly the repetition of the
13th Psalm might be permissible and even advantageous to myself,
as you kindly remark; also I should not care to raise any protest
against the chorus "An die Kunstler," and simply because it has
hitherto been more screamed at than heard, for it has been
accounted one of my most culpable heresies to have set these
words of Schiller's to music after Mendelssohn, and indeed
without copying Mendelssohn and without humoring the customary
taste of Vocal Societies. Parenthetically be it said that
Schiller and "Manhood's dignity" forbade me to make this
composition any pleasanter. I dreamt a temple and not a kiosk!--

If you run the risk of giving this Artists' Chorus in Altenburg I
must beg the conductor to take all possible care in rehearsing
it--and to aim at the most dignified composure in the
performance. Like reverberating marble-pillars must be the effect
of the singing!--

Please thank Stade [Director of the Court orchestra, and Court
organist in Altenburg (born 1817); he was a friend of Liszt's for
many years.] most warmly for his friendly intention to play one
of my Organ pieces. He will probably choose either the Variations
on the Basso continuo of Bach's Cantata "Weinen, sorgen, seufzen,
klagen" ("Weeping, grieving, sighing, lamenting")--or the BACH-
Fugue.

Discuss the matter again with Riedel and Stade, as to whether 3
items by Liszt on the programme are not too much. I will gladly
yield to your decision, and wish only there were more prospect of
my being able to attend this Tonkunstler-Versammlung. However I
cannot say anything definite about it till June.

Sgambati gives a concert next week in Florence. On his return at
the end of April it will be decided whether he can undertake the
journey to Altenburg or will have to remain here all summer.

Sgambati is decidedly not an artist for a watering-place,
although as a virtuoso his talent is extraordinary and
undoubtedly effective. He plays Bach, Beethoven, Chopin,
Schumann, and my most troublesome things with perfect
independence and in a masterly style. His artistic tendencies and
sympathies are altogether "new-German." This winter we heard two
of his larger works: a Pianoforte-Quintet and a Nonet for
strings. Both of these deserve to be brought out by our Musik-
Verein.

Ad vocem of the dedication of Seifritz's Overture, you have come
to the right resolution in dedicating the 2nd year's issue of the
Almanack to Prince Hohenzollern. I likewise approve of the
following numbers being dedicated to the Princes in whose
capitals the Tonkunstler-Versammlungen are held.

The first number of the Almanack seems to me very successful. But
the historical Calendar might gain in interest by omissions and
additions. Mediocre local celebrities such as "H.S. in E., T.D.
in B., L.A. in L.," etc., etc., do not need to figure as
historical. As little do a couple of first performances that were
given in Weimar under my conductorship. See to it, dear friend,
that more important data are collected in good time, and that
superfluous data are rejected.

As I told you in Leipzig, the Grand Duke has determined to have
me in Weimar for a couple of months during the winter (towards
the beginning of '69). Perhaps I may go somewhat sooner.

With the next sending of proofs please ask Kahnt to enclose the
manuscript of the 18th Psalm ("The Heavens declare the glory of
God") for male voices. It is written on very large sheets of
music-paper and bound in boards. But in order that the parcel may
be made a more convenient size let the boards be removed and the
manuscript paper doubled up. Kahnt will remember that I left him
this manuscript seven years ago.

With hearty greetings, yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

March 3lst, 1868



66. To Johann von Herbeck

Dear Friend,

My cousin Eduard will bring you the score of the 18th Psalm
intended for the Mannergesang-Verein [Vocal Society for Men's
Voices] in Vienna. Allow me at this opportunity again to offer
you my sincerest thanks for the kindly feelings you have always
entertained for me. The further fate of the Psalm forwarded to
you I leave wholly in your hands. You will have to decide whether
it is suitable for being performed at the Jubilee Festival of the
Mannergesang-Verein. If you think it is I shall be glad; still I
beg you not to make it any special consideration, and if you
think it more advisable not to burden the Festival-programme with
it, I shall be quite content, feeling convinced, dear friend,
that you will know best what is most to my advantage.

Otherwise the study of it would give no trouble. The Psalm is
very simple and massive--like a monolith. And, as in the case of
other works of mine, the conductor has the chief part to play.
He, as the chief virtuoso and artifex, is called upon to see that
the whole is harmoniously articulated and that it receives a
living form. In the rhythmical and dynamical climax, from letters
B to E (repeated from H to L), as also in some of the ritenuti;
especially in the passage:

"The law of the Lord is perfect,
Converting the soul;
The testimony of the Lord is sure,
Making wise the simple, etc.,"

you will find substance to prove your excellence as a conductor.

Well, dear friend, you know what it is brilliantly to arouse a
flaming spirit out of dead notes.

Accept the assurance of my sincere esteem and affection.

F. Liszt

Rome, June 9th, 1868



67. To Dr. Franz Brendel

[This is the last of the many letters Liszt addressed to Brendel,
who died a few months afterwards.]

Dear friend,

As might have been foreseen, I must unfortunately give up all
thought of paying you and my friends of the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung a visit this year. Were it possible for me to get
away from here, I should today start for Munich, in honor of the
"Meistersinger" which is to be performed next Sunday--and thence
I should go to Weimar and Altenburg. In place of this I have to
remain here till the end of the month. After that I mean to go to
the neighborhood of Ancona for some sea baths. Please send me at
once, in a wrapper, the notices of the Altenburg Musical Festival
that have appeared in the Neue Zeitschrift.

Sgambati asks me to send you his kindest excuses. He would have
much liked to wander to Germany, but he too is nailed here for
this summer. His concerts in Florence with Wilhemj a few weeks
ago were very successful. Sgambati is quite a phenomenal pianist
for Italy, and is certain to do himself credit elsewhere on
account of his sterling qualities, and his rare excellence as a
virtuoso is combined with a personality of the greatest
amiability and reliable artistic feeling. There is some talk of
his getting an appointment in St. Petersburg.

A fortnight ago I heard from Paris that Berlioz was failing in
health and suffering greatly. When I saw him last (in the spring
of '66) he was then already physically and mentally broken down.
Our personal relations always remained friendly, it is true, but
on his side there was somewhat of a gloomy, cramped tone mixed
with them...

Neither Schumann nor Berlioz could rest satisfied at seeing the
steady advance of Wagner's works. Both of them suffered from a
suppressed enthusiasm for the music of the future.

I shall not be able to decide about my proposed stay in Weimar
till the end of the year. Till then I shall keep quiet here or in
the neighborhood, the extreme boundary to which is indicated by
the sea baths of Ancona. Several other invitations have had to be
courteously declined. But next year a considerable change may
take place in my outward circumstances, and may again draw me
closer to Germany. How this last chapter of my life will shape
itself I cannot yet foresee.

The Vienna Mannergesang-Verein have kindly asked me to provide a
composition for their Jubilee Festival. This is the reason why I
asked Kahnt for the score of the 18th Psalm ("The Heavens declare
the glory of God"), which has at last come, and was despatched to
Vienna the day before yesterday [published by Schuberth,
Leipzig]. Kahnt has no doubt also received the corrected
pianoforte score of the "Elizabeth." And there happily remains
only the full score to do, the proofs of which I am expecting
now.

During the winter my innumerable social duties rendered it
absolutely impossible for me to write any longer compositions.
This enforced idleness vexes me extremely--and I intend to assume
an air of rudeness to rid myself of a great many people. It is
more especially intrusive correspondents who are a vexatious
waste of time to me. Since the "Coronation Mass," I have in fact
only written one solitary work: a "Requiem" for male voices with
simple organ accompaniment [published by Kahnt, Leipzig].

How much I should like to hear Berlioz's colossal Requiem in
Altenburg!--Think, when there, in all friendliness of

Your sincerely attached

F. Liszt

Rome, June 17th, 1868

Again I beg you to send me regularly the programmes and the
notices of the Altenburg T.K.V. in the Neue Zeitung.



68. To E. Repos

Dear Sir,

As you are kind enough still to remember about the "Ave Maris
Stella" it would be inexcusable of me to forget it. My first
manuscript having gone astray I spent the whole of yesterday in
rewriting this very simple song, of which you will receive two
versions at once by the next possible occasion; one for
mezzosoprano voice with Piano or Harmonium accompaniment, the
other for 4 male voices with a little Organ accompaniment. In
this latter please excuse my very bad writing, over and above
whatever there may be defective in the composition. I cannot,
here, have several copyists at my disposal as in Germany. The
only one whom I can employ is ill--and I have not time to wait
till he gets well, for from tomorrow I undertake my pilgrimage to
Assisi and Loretto--after which I shall make a villeggiatura of
at least six weeks at Grotta-mare (near Ancona, on the shores of
the Adriatic).

I depend on your kindness to send me the final proofs of the "Ave
Maris Stella" to the address which I will give you shortly.

How shall I manage to get you my biographical notice published in
1843 in the voluminous collection of the Biographae Pascallet? I
really do not know. This notice is both the most exact, the best
edited, and the kindest of all that have appeared about me in
French. Mr. Fetis quotes it in my article of the Biographie univ.
des Musiciens, and I have asked Mr. le Chanoine Barbier de
Montault to look for it at Angot the editor's.--The entire
collection of the Biographaie Pascallet must be, amongst others,
in the library of Mr. Emile de Girardin, but the illustrious
publicist has so many great matters to attend to that I should
scruple to trouble him about such a trifle.

In any case it will be easy to unearth our unhappy little Opus in
question in the Bibliotheque imperiale, where, if necessary, it
can be copied for the use of Mr. le Ch. de Montault.

Please, dear sir, count on my very sincerely affectionate and
devoted sentiments.

F. Liszt

Rome, July 1st, 1868

A thousand thanks for your kind sending of the Repertoire of St.
Sulpice, which is this moment come.



69. To Prof. Carl Riedel in Leipzig

[1827-88, founder and director of the celebrated Riedel Verein in
Leipzig, and after Brendel's death President of the Allgemeine
Deutsche Musikverein.]

Dear Friend,

My sincere congratulation upon your glorious accomplishment--the
performance of Berlioz's Requiem in Altenburg, and also my
kindest thanks for all the trouble and care you have bestowed
upon the "Elizabeth" and the "13th Psalm." I hope to hear
Berlioz's "Requiem" next winter in Leipzig, and also some of
Bach's contrapuntal "feste Burgen." My ears thirst for them!

Meanwhile let me ask Frau Professor Riedel kindly to accept me
herewith in effigy as an inmate.

With sincere esteem, I remain, dear friend,

Your gratefully attached

F. Liszt

Grotta Mare, August 12th [1868]



70. To E. Repos

Dear Sir,

By the same post I return you the proofs of the "Ave Maris
Stella," which reached me yesterday. Will you be kind enough to
have the various errors of these first proofs corrected on the
plates. Exactitude in editions is a duty of the profession, too
often neglected.

I will send you, by the first opportunity, a short "Offertoire"
(of some 40 bars) for men's voices. The text forms part of the
service of St. Francis--"Mihi autem adhoerere Deo bonum est," and
I composed it lately at Assisi.--In about a week's time I shall
be back in Rome, where I left my manuscripts; amongst others a
"Requiem" for men's voices with Organ accompaniment. The style of
it is very simple, and whatever goodwill one brings to it the
execution will also be very simple. If it would suit you to
publish this "Requiem" (of about some thirty small pages of
print) I will send it you with the "Offertoire" of St. Francis.

Accept, dear sir, the expression of my distinguished and devoted
sentiments.

F. Liszt

Grotta Mare, August 26th, 1868

Address Rome.--I have not received any letter from you for
several months.



71. To Prof. Dr. Siegmund Lebert in Stuttgart

[The addressee was a distinguished pianoforte teacher (1822-
1884), co-founder of the Stuttgart Conservatoire, co-editor of
the Grosse Clavierschule (Lebert and Stark), and of the
instructive edition of Classical pianoforte--works published by
Cotta, in which Liszt, Bulow and Faisst took part. It is to these
last-mentioned works that the letters here given refer.]

Dear Friend,

To satisfy rational and righteous people is the better part of my
life. I am very glad that you approve of the letter to the French
edition of your Method, and that you find it appropriate. I have
simply said what I think. I pledge myself always to be true in
speech and action, however many annoyances and misinterpretations
may be hurled at me in return. In confidence I will tell you what
is the rule of my whole existence; it consists of the daily
prayer: "O veritas Deus, fac me unum tecum in perpetua
caritate!"--

Excuse the delay in the return of the 3rd part of the Method. I
thought of making use of some favorable opportunity of sending it
to Stuttgart to save you the expense of postage; but no such
opportunity has presented itself, and so this concluding volume
of the Method was despatched to you through the agency of Herr
Kolb (Wurtemberg consul in Rome). The added notes are very
unimportant, because, in fact, I had no other weightier remarks
to make. While playing through the Etudes I found myself put into
a thorough good humor, and this must be my excuse for the few bad
jokes which my mischievous pencil scribbled down. Please do not
let them go further; such jests must be kept quietly to
ourselves.

In Grotta mare I wrote about 20 pages of the technical exercises.
Unfortunately a host of correspondence prevents my making
progress with the work I have already begun and which is finished
in my head. The Italians say: Give time, time ("dar tempo al
tempo"), which often provokes me utterly!--

First of all I shall set to work at the Weber and Schubert
edition, which I hope to send you by the beginning of November.

Please present my best thanks to Baron Reischach for his kind
letter. The business point of it (the Weber and Schubert edition)
I herewith answer; that I shall redeem my promise by the
beginning of November; and that with an easy conscience I shall
then give proof of my gratitude by writing to Baron R. myself.

In sincere and friendly collaboratorship, I am

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, September l0th, 1868



72. To E. Repos

Dear Chevalier and Friend,

Your last letter interests me much, and I thank you very
sincerely for the confidence you show me. Certainly I should ask
nothing better than to reply to it as you wish; but there is the
difficulty. Shall you reproach me with "claudicare in duas
partes"? No, I do not think you will, for I do not intend to have
any hitch; it is simply that the small influence which, in
certain given circumstances, I could exercise, is paralysed by
other circumstances that now predominate. I should be obliged to
explain various things to make you understand my extrinsic
inaptitude, and consequently my obligatory abstention on some
points which touch me closely. I prefer not to enter into these
details in writing; perhaps we shall have an opportunity of
speaking about them: as to the present time the following is my
reply, reduced to the most concise terms:

I entirely approve of your two projects of the competition of
sacred Music, and of the definitive, normal and really Catholic
edition of the Plain-Song of the Church. These two enterprises
are opportune and desirable, and may be carried out to your honor
and advantage. All the same I am not in a position to serve you
efficaciously utraque. Therefore I ought not to be mixed up with
it,...unless any contingency as unforeseen as decisive should
supervene.

You will have read in the Correspondance de Rome that the work of
M. Sre. Alfieri has remained in suspense. It is not a posthumous
obstacle with which your edition would have to contend, but
another, which might also be called Legion.

The "Requiem" and the "Offertoire of St. Francis" shall be sent
to you in a fortnight. Before sending them to you I want
carefully to look through the copy, so as to save the engraver as
many corrections as possible.

I shall not leave Rome till Christmas; from January till the end
of March I shall be at Weimar.--

Pray accept, dear Chevalier and friend, the assurance of my
affectionate devotion.

F. Liszt

September 19th, 1868

When will the 1st volume of your publication of the History of
the Popes and Cardinals come out? I shall be much obliged if you
will send it me.



73. To C.F. Kahnt, the Musical Publisher

[Facsimiles of this and No. 99 appeared in the Neue Zeitschrift
fur Musik, June 18th, 1890.]

Dear Sir and Friend,

The delay in the receipt of your letter did not in any way lessen
the very welcome news it contained, for which I thank you
cordially. Herewith also my warm congratulations in regard to the
little red-colored Altenburg volume.

Of the gracious acceptance accorded to the dedication copy of the
"Elizabeth" I have already received a full report, which is
altogether satisfactory. The second copy de luxe please to keep
for the present. I should like to present it to our Grand Duke ad
honorem of the Wartburg Library.

Your intention of sending the third copy next Easter to the
Exhibition of the German Products of the Printing Press, I, as
the author, consider both very appropriate and a pleasant piece
of news.

As I am expecting corrected proofs of the "Elizabeth" score, I
beg you to enclose Wieseneder's "Kindergarten Lieder-Buchlein"
[Book of Kindergarten Songs]. Probably this will be your last
sending to Rome for the year '68, as I shall be in Weimar again
by the beginning of January. I shall, therefore, leave all
further discussions in extenso till then. Meanwhile there is
scarcely anything positive or to the point to write about.

My friendly greetings to Brendel; he knows how much it is my wish
to obtain reliable support and some profitable advantage for the
endeavors of the A. D. Musik-Verein. Rest assured of this, dear
friend, and count upon my sincere and unalterable attachment.

F. Liszt

Rome, September 20th [1868]

Be quick with and out with the 69th Almanack!--



74. To E. Repos

Dear Monsieur Repos,

Here is the Requiem. If you think it would be well to publish the
five parts separately (Requiem, Dies irae, Offertoire, etc.) in
the 5 numbers of the Revue de Musique sacree, I have not the
slightest objection to it; and will only ask you to announce the
complete edition, to be had by itself, at the same time as the
detached pages appear.

The copy is very distinct and correct; please beg the engraver
not to add any wrong notes of his own composition, and send me
the proofs to Rome.

I should be glad if the "Offertoire" of St. Francis (added to the
book of the Requiem) could come out at once. The manuscript is
only two pages,--and I do not think I shall be infringing too
much St. Francis's rule of poverty by reserving to myself, for
this Offertoire as well as for all my compositions that you
publish, author's rights for Germany and Italy, in order to keep
my promise to several publishers.

Accept, dear Monsieur Repos, the expression of my very
distinguished and devoted sentiments.

F. Liszt

Rome, September 22nd, 1868



75. To Prof. Dr. S. Lebert

Dear Friend,

Today I deserve a little praise. The Weber task is finished, and
hence I have kept my promise a few weeks in advance.

How I have understood my task you will see from the short Preface
on the first page of the various readings to the "Conzertstuck."
The printer will have to act in strict conformity with what is
there stated, and to give the necessary letters and signs.
Unfortunately I cannot help giving this unusual trouble, for two
kinds of letters and signs are positively indispensable.

My responsibility with regard to Cotta's edition of Weber and
Schubert I hold to be: fully and carefully to retain the original
text together with provisory suggestions of my way of rendering
it, by means of distinguishing letters, notes and signs,--and
these I beg you will again have fully explained to the printer.

In the various readings you will probably find some things not
inappropriate;--I flatter myself that I have thus given
performers greater licence, and have increased the effect without
damaging or overloading Weber's style. Get Pruckner, who is
acquainted with my bad musical handwriting, to play the various
readings to you.

N.B.--They must be printed in small notes throughout the whole
edition.

The parcel containing the "Conzertstuck," "Momento capriccioso,"
4 Sonatas of W[eberj (and the 2 Beethoven ones of the Bulow
edition) will be despatched to you tomorrow by Kolb. Send me, at
your early convenience, Weber's 2 Polonaises (Hartel's last
edition), which must not be omitted in Cotta's edition; also let
me have all Schubert's Dances (Valses, Landler, Eccossaises, in
Holle's edition revised by Markull). And as I have now got into
the way of revising, I should like at once to prepare the
Schubert volume and submit to you, before the end of November,
the result of many years of most delightful communion with
Weber's and Schubert's pianoforte compositions, with fingering,
marks for pedal and expression, and various readings.

The Schubert volume I shall limit to 3 or 4 Sonatas, the great
Fantasia, some 8 Impromptus, the Moments Musicals, and all his
Dances. A few other pieces as duets may follow later, more
especially his Marches and the Hungarian Divertissement.

Let me hope that my work may prove intelligible, temperate and
satisfactory, and also of some service to ordinary pianists.

Any remarks and objections you may have to make in connection
with these, I shall be quite willing to consider.

With friendly greetings and thanks,

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, October 19th, 1868

P.S.--Let me hear from you at once, as soon as you receive the
parcel.



76. To Richard Pohl at Baden-Baden.

Rome, November 7th, 1868

.--. My very kind biographer La Mara writes me a few charming
lines telling me that she is shortly sending me her volume
"Studienkopfe" ["Studies of heads"]. "Das junge Volk hat Muth,"
["Young folk have pluck"] as you say, and I quite approve of
their not letting themselves be intimidated. Courage is the vital
nerve of our best qualities; they fade away when it is wanting,
and unless one is courageous one is not even sufficiently
prudent. To examine, reflect calculate and weigh are assuredly
necessary operations But after that one must determine and act
without troubling too much about which way the wind blows and
what clouds are passing. .--.



77. To Johann von Verbeck

Much esteemed Friend,

I have just answered the invitation of the "Musikfreunde," and
trust you will agree with what I have written. I am quite aware
that the performance of the "Elizabeth" in Vienna--which is
considered a mark of honorable distinction to me--I owe to you.
My not having complied with your offer before was mainly due to
my desire to spare you any embarrassments in connection with the
performance, embarrassments which I, owing to my peculiar
position and my distance from active circles of the Press, can
readily ignore without the slightest "bitterness of feeling."

Well, let us hope that your favorable augury will prove true.
Your earlier letter I have not received. But I was heartily
delighted with your last. Shortly before receiving it I had been
hearing a number of excellent things about the composer,
conductor and friend Herbeck, all of which tallied perfectly with
what I remembered and of what I myself feel convinced. You will
guess who communicated all this to me.

To return to the "Elizabeth" performance in Vienna; I should like
to be present. The Committee of the Musikfreunde name two days in
March; the last mentioned would be the most convenient one for
me. I must tell you beforehand, in confidence, that on this
occasion I should not be able to remain in Vienna beyond a couple
of days, and that I wish especially to keep quiet while there,
and to meet as few people as possible. It is no longer in any way
appropriate that I should appear anywhere in person; [Liszt had
been requested to conduct his "Elizabeth", a request he declined
(probably in consideration of his having taken holy orders).] it
suits me much better, when necessary, to be trodden down an
effigy by all the different chatter. And as you, much esteemed
friend, are the one and only person who shall conduct the
"Elizabeth" in Vienna, I wish to leave the distribution of the
vocal parts entirely to your care. I would merely remind you that
my two compatriots Bignio and Fraulein Rabatinsky (now in Vienna)
sang splendidly in the parts of the Landgrave Ludwig and the
spiteful Landgravine Sophie, at the first performances of the
Oratorio in Pest. Hence, if no categorical objections are raised
against them by the worthy theatrical potentates, it would seem
advisable and well to secure these singers for parts for which
they have already proved themselves competent.

As an unnecessary remark let me add that the small Magyar
Cantilena of the Magnate (in the first number) requires a
powerful voice.

In sincere esteem, I remain yours in all friendliness,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, December 1st, 1868

P.S.--I am expecting the promised manuscript of the
"Tanzmomente." [Composed by Herbeck for orchestra; transcribed by
Liszt for the pianoforte]  By the beginning of January I hope to
be in Weimar.



78. To Prof. Dr. S. Lebert

Dear friend,

The annotations to Schubert's Sonatas demanded more time than I
had anticipated. For some weeks past I have been working
industriously at them--now they are finished ad unguem.

Our pianists scarcely realise what a glorious treasure they have
in Schubert's pianoforte compositions. Most pianists play them
over en passant, notice here and there repetitions,
lengthinesses, apparent carelessnesses, and then lay them aside.
It is true that Schubert himself is somewhat to blame for the
very unsatisfactory manner in which his admirable piano-forte
pieces are treated. He was too immoderately productive, wrote
incessantly, mixing insignificant with important things, grand
things with mediocre work, paid no heed to criticism, and always
soared on his wings. Like a bird in the air, he lived in music
and sang in angelic fashion.

O never-resting, ever-welling genius, full of tenderness! O my
cherished Hero of the Heaven of Youth! Harmony, freshness, power,
grace, dreamings, passion, soothings, tears and flames pour forth
from the depths and heights of thy soul, and thou makest us
almost forget the greatness of thine excellence in the
fascination of thy spirit!----

Let us limit our edition of Schubert's pianoforte compositions to
2 Sonatas, the G major Fantasia (a Virgilian poem!), the splendid
"Wanderer"-dithyramb (C major Fantasia), 2 books of Impromptus,
Moments Musicals and all his Valses (among which there are gems
of the first water). All this will be sent to you forthwith; and
in addition Weber's Polonaises.

In the Sonatas you will find some various readings, which appear
to me tolerably appropriate. Several passages, and the whole of
the conclusion of the C major Fantasia, I have re-written in
modern pianoforte form, and I flatter myself that Schubert would
not be displeased with it.

The pianoforte Duets of Schubert (Holle's edition) please address
to Weimar, as I have no time left for revisings in Rome. Send me
also a copy of the "Aufforderung zum Tanz" ["Invitation to the
Dance"] that is so drummed at everywhere. You forgot to let me
have this piece of salon-fireworks with the other music, and I
too did not remember it at the time; years ago I had to play this
"Invitation" over and over again, times innumerable--without the
smallest "invitation" on my part--and it became a detestable
nuisance to me. However, such a show-piece must not be omitted in
Cotta's edition of Weber.

Your visit to Weimar, dear friend, will be very welcome and
agreeable to me. When there we shall be able to discuss, weigh
and settle a number of things very conveniently.

With sincere thanks, I remain

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, December 2nd, 1868

P.S.--I have not received the French translation of your Method.



79. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

Your promotion [Eduard von Liszt had been appointed
Oberstaatsanwalt (Chief State attorney) in Vienna.] is a real and
great joy to me. It does my heart good to see your continual
services receive recognition, and to know you about to enter a
more promising sphere. Your new position does not, indeed, free
you from all effort and exertion, but you have long since become
accustomed to bear the yoke on work-days like a man, and although
the yoke may not appear altogether enviable, still it is always
the most honorable and most secure.

I wish only that you may ever remain true to yourself, and by
perfectly satisfying your own conscience you may deeply feel
God's unfailing promise "Dominus non privabit bonis eos qui
ambulant in innocentia."--

.--. From the President and the Vice-President of the Society of
Musikfreunde, Drs. Egger and Dumba, I received a very friendly
letter inviting me to fix upon one of the three day--2lst
February, 7th or 23rd March--for the performance of the
"Elizabeth" in Vienna, and to undertake to conduct the work. To
do the latter is absolutely impossible to me, for reasons that
you know; hence I shall decline to fix upon a date. My answer
conveys to the above-named gentlemen my thanks for this
distinguishing mark of their good-will, and, at the same time, I
express my wish to attend the performance, and mention that the
end of March would be the most convenient time for me.

I also wrote to Herbeck pretty fully, saying that he, and he
alone, should conduct this performance; it is to be hoped that
under his direction the whole thing will run a successful course.

Hearty greetings to all yours, and I look forward to seeing you
again soon.

F.L.

December 6th, 1868 [Villa d'Este]



80. To Johann von Herbeck

Very dear Friend,

Although I feel absolutely sure that you will conduct the
"Elizabeth"-performance in a perfect and brilliant style, I
gladly comply with your wish that I should be in Vienna a few
days beforehand. As I have already said, it would be more
convenient to me to leave here towards the end of March.
Meanwhile present my most gracious thanks to the Committee of the
"Musikfreunde," with the request that they will in future regard
me as quite inadmissible as a conductor. Your question whether I
attach "any special importance" as to how the different parts
should be filled, I answer simply thus: arrange things wholly and
entirely as you think best. The few indefinite suggestions in my
last letter are of importance only in so far as they agree with
your competent arrangement, otherwise in no way. One point only I
should like adhered to in the Vienna performance, namely that no
foreign singers be engaged for it. To have one's own house in
good order is always the wisest and safest plan.

I have heard much in praise of Fraulein Ehnn [A singer at the
Royal Opera House in Vienna]; and should feel specially indebted
to her if she would undertake the Elizabeth: the part does not go
against the grain, and should Fraulein Ehnn wish any alterations
I should be quite willing to consider them.

With warm thanks, yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 29th, 1868

The "Tanzmomente" are still dancing on their way here, for they
have not yet come.



81. To Edvard Grieg

[Published in Gronvold "Norwegische Musiker" (Norwegian
Musicians, Warmuth, Christiania).--The addressee was the clever
leader of the Young School of Northern Composers. He was born at
Bergen in 1843, and educated at Leipzig.]

Sir,

I am very glad to tell you what pleasure it has given me to read
your Sonata (Op. 8). It bears testimony to a talent of vigorous,
reflective and inventive composition of excellent quality,--which
has only to follow its natural bent in order to rise to a high
rank. I am pleased to think that in your own country you are
meeting with the success and encouragement that you deserve:
these will not be wanting elsewhere either; and if you come to
Germany this winter I cordially invite you to stay a little at
Weimar, in order that we may thoroughly get to know each other.

Pray receive, sir, the assurance of my sentiments of esteem and
very distinguished regard.

F. Liszt

Rome, December 29th, 1868



NEXT SECTION: WEIMAR.--PEST.--ROME.



82. To Commerzienrath Carl Bechstein in Berlin

[Head of the famous pianoforte-manufactory; our "Beflugler," as
Bulow and Tausig called him (A play on the word Flugel, which
means both a "grand piano" and "wings.")]

Very Dear Sir,

Accept a seven-octaved chromatic scale of thanks for your
kindness in sending your magnificent piano for the Grand-Ducal
Hofgartnerei in Weimar. I hope you will on some occasion allow me
to have the pleasure of convincing you, de visu et audaitu, how
glorious the instrument looks and sounds here.

According to report we are shortly to see Tausig again in Weimar.
Tell him he may be sure of a hearty welcome from me.

With sincere esteem and grateful thanks I remain

Yours most sincerely

F. Liszt

Weimar, January 19th, 1869

P.S.--Enclosed are a few lines for Tausig, which kindly forward
to him.



83. To Johann von Herbeck

Very Dear Friend,

Fraulein Ehnn's amiable readiness to undertake the part has
greatly pleased me, and I beg you to convey my sincerest thanks
to our "Elizabeth." The part will not cost her any immoderate
effort; all possible alterations, pauses, dotted notes,
ornamentations, shall be left ad libitum and entirely to the
pleasure of the gracious singer. Do not write to me further on
this subject, and endeavor merely to get Fraulein Ehnn to feel
herself comfortably and pleasantly at home with my poor tone-
melodies.

Friend Remenyi, whom I do not need now to introduce to you, will
be the bearer of these lines to you. He has delighted and
captivated every one here, the Court as well as the public, and
this is verily no small matter, for in Weimar we are accustomed
to the most distinguished violin-virtuosos. I requested him to
tell you how grateful I feel to you for your idea of a concert of
Liszt's compositions.

But, in order to avoid every appearance of indiscretion or
forwardness, I consider it well and advisable to keep exclusively
to the Elizbeth on this occasion.

Hold fast, therefore, to two points:

a. all parts of the Elizabeth to be filled by native talent.
b. Critics to be worried only with this one work.

[At the performance of the Elizabeth in the "ausserordentlichen
Gesellschafts-Concert" (Company's special concert) on April 4th,
1869, Liszt met with a genuine triumph. Herbeck writes: "After
every number, and at the end of every part, there was no end to
the calls for Liszt." The performance was repeated on April 11th,
and received with even greater enthusiasm.]

I have also requested Remenyi to ask you about the apartments I
shall require. My stay in Vienna will be limited to eight or ten
days, which I should like to spend in as quiet and peaceable a
way as possible, and not within the circle of disturbing
visitors.

With sincere esteem and friendly attachment yours,

F. Liszt

Weimar, January 27th, 1869



84. To E. Repos

Dear Sir and Friend,

A thousand sincere thanks for the kind zeal and love that you
bestow upon the publication of my poor works. In order that the
edition of the "Requiem" may be entirely correct, I will beg you
to send me again proofs of the "Offertoire," "Sanctus" and "Agnus
Dei," either to Weimar before the 18th March, or to Vienna from
the 25th March to the 12th April. My address in Vienna is c/o Mr.
Herbeck, Court conductor, etc., etc. Graben, Trattnerhof. Vienna.
Austria.

I shall spend two or three days at Ratisbon towards the middle of
April, in order to hear the Cathedral choir there, which has a
great reputation in Germany. There also I shall find a manuscript
of the highest interest, and one which up to now has been almost
unknown: it is the opus musicum magnum of Orlandus Lassus. It is
composed of more than five hundred pieces of music.

Are you in touch with Mr. Pustet, the most considerable publisher
of religious music at Ratisbon?--

Your visit to Rome will be extremely agreeable to me. I expect to
be back at the end of April and to pass the summer at Santa
Francesca Romana.

Your very affectionately devoted

F. Liszt

Weimar, March 3rd, 1869

Probably I shall profit by your kind proposition, and shall send
you shortly a Mass (for 4 voices, with a simple Organ
accompaniment).



85. To Laura Kahrer, in Vienna

[Now married to Concertmeister Rappoldi in Dresden, and one of
the lady-professors at the Conservatoire there. The above note,
which was accompanied by a silver pen for composing, Liszt sent
her after having been present at her first public appearance at a
charity-concert in the Royal Opera House in Vienna. In 1870 she
became a pupil of his in Weimar, and was soon considered one of
the most distinguished lady-pianists; since 1879 she has enjoyed
the title of Kammervirtuosin (Court pianist) of Saxony.]

Dear and astounding Artiste,

Accept this small remembrance of the hour when your extraordinary
talent so joyfully surprised me, and be assured of the sincere
and friendly devotion of yours,

F. Liszt

Vienna, April 15th, 1869



86. To Franz Servais

[Composer; conducted the Wagner performances in the Theater de la
Monnaie, Brussels, in 1890-91.]

Dear Monsieur Franz,

The sincere pleasure caused me by your letter, which reached me
at Pest at the end of April, is completed by the one you have
addressed to me here. I am delighted to hear that my prophecy has
been realised and that you enjoyed yourself at Munich. At this
time you would not find anywhere else an ensemble of ideas,
works, acts and instruction so suited to your artist-nature, and,
consequently, so favorable to the full development of your fine
powers. Thanks to M. de Bulow and his prodigious activity, on a
par with his intelligence, Munich is becoming the new musical
capital of Germany. You will therefore do well to stay some time
there, in order vigorously to prepare yourself for the task which
has devolved on you elsewhere.

Perhaps I may see you again this summer, for if, as announced,
"Rheingold" is performed there on the 25th August I shall come to
it.

Meanwhile I thank you for having so well listened to the
"Elizabeth"; that is a presage to me that we shall meet more than
once on the same path, in which I wish you the most complete
success. .--.

Believe, dear Monsieur Franz, in my very devoted affection.

F. Liszt

Rome May 21st, 1869



87. To William Mason

Rome, May 26th, 1869

Dear Mr. Mason,

Mr. Seward has given me your kind letter and several of your
compositions. These give me a double pleasure in that they prove
that you have not lost your time at Weimar, and that you continue
to make good use of it elsewhere.

The Etude de Concert (Op. 9) and the Valse Caprice (Op. 17) are
of a distinguished style and make a good effect. I shall also
sincerely praise the 3 Preludes (Op. 8) and the two Ballades, but
with some reservation. The first Ballade appears to me somewhat
cut short; it wants I know not what at the beginning and towards
the middle (page 7) of something needed to make the melody stand
out; and the pastorale of the 2nd Ballade (page 7) figures like a
too-cheap piece of "padding."... And, since I am in the vein for
criticising, let me ask why you call your "Ah! vous dirai-je,
Maman"--"Caprice grotesque?" Apart from the fact that the
grotesque style should not intrude into music, that title is
unjust to the clever imitations and harmonies of the piece, very
charming by the way, and which it would be more suitable to
entitle "Divertissement" or "Variazione scherzose."--

As to the Methode, you won't expect me to make a deep study of
that. I am much too old for such a thing, and it is only in self-
defence that I still work sometimes at the piano in view of the
incessant botherations and indiscretions of a heap of people who
imagine that nothing would be more flattering to me than to amuse
them!--

Nevertheless, in looking through your Methode I find some
exercises much to be recommended, namely, the "interlocking
passages" page 136 to 142;--and all the "accentual treatment" of
Exercises. [The italics (here in quotations) in this sentence are
written in English and in italics by Liszt.]

May your pupils and the editor obtain from them all the profit
that I wish them!

A thousand thanks, dear Mr. Mason, and count on my very
affectionate and devoted sentiments of old.

F. Liszt



88. To the Composer Heinrich Schulz-Beuthen

[Printed in Gottschalg's "Chorgesang," 1890.--Schulz-Beuthen was
born in 1838.]

Very dear Sir,

That you have dedicated your 42nd and 43rd Psalms to me I feel to
be an honor in the artistic sense, for which I am sincerely
grateful. It is long since any new composition has given me the
impression of intellectual strength and musical completeness such
as I find in yours. And this work stands even above eminent
compositions of the kind. It appears to me even more fully
rounded, pregnant and powerful than your 29th Psalm, which I
justly recognised as a distinguished work upon first reading it
through. The grand impression produced by your 29th Psalm on the
occasion of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Dessau confirmed my
predictions, and I am convinced that wherever the 42nd and 43rd
Psalms are heard every person with any depth of soul will feel
their sublime beauty, and offer you something more valuable than
mere ordinary applause. Do not look for word-making from me; I
never knew much about it, and I can still less try my hand at it
now in my old age. But allow me, very dear sir, to tell you quite
frankly and briefly this:--

You must not hold yourself aloof and at a distance; your splendid
works must be performed, printed and circulated. And although--
owing to the idle and impudent chatter of many leaders of the
press--my influence in musical matters has been reduced to a
minimum, still I hope shortly to arrange a performance of your
Psalms in one or two places.

With sincere esteem I remain yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 18th, 1869



89. To Franz Servais

Dear Monsieur Franz,

.--. Although older than you, yet my enthusiasm for "Tristan" is
not second to yours.--I am delighted that the performance has
come off so well, but I should not wish this marvellous chef-
d'oeuvre to become for you a sort of upas tree under the shadow
of which you would go to sleep.--Great manifestations of genius
ought to do the part of the sun,--to illuminate and fertilise.

Believe in my sentiments of devoted affection.

F. Liszt

Rome, July 4th, 1869



90. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Dear Maestra,

I do not know why the name of Boccherini always recalls to me the
valley of Tempe. There could be nothing more flattering and more
salutary for me than to be admitted into so fortunate an abode,
and you have certainly made the stroke of a Maestra in
introducing me there (a little bit in a contraband way!).--I hope
Mr. Delatre will be kind enough to send me under cover the first
number of the paper containing La Mara's article [The Liszt-
sketch from the first vol. of the "Musakalischen Studienkopfe,"
which the authoress had translated into Italian.]; directly
afterwards I will subscribe to the Boccherini, so that I may get
the whole of the biography regularly.

A thousand thanks for your intelligent solicitude; I entirely
approve of the word tedesco being left out on the title-page;
"tradotto dall' Autore" is evidently the better indication, and I
guarantee you that the authoress will be perfectly satisfied and
will add her thanks to mine, without thinking of making the
slightest observation or difficulty about anything whatever. When
you are passing through Leipzig I will make you acquainted with
my very amiable panegyrist.

I am certainly intending to be present at the first performance
of "Rheingold," announced for the 25th August; but I doubt
whether they will be in a position to give this work so soon. Mr.
de Bulow absolutely must take some rest after the Conservatoire
examinations; the Servais are pressing him much to settle down
with them for the months of August and September at Hal (in
Belgium); I want him to accept their invitation, and he will, I
hope, decide to do so. Now without him "Rheingold" at Munich
seems to me at least problematical. I will let you have positive
tidings, which I myself shall receive shortly. Please tell me
where to address you.

I have set to work again, and with the exception of the fortnight
at Munich, in honor of "Rheingold," I shall remain here, or else
in the neighborhood, until next spring.

Sgambati kisses your hands. Pinelli is at the baths of Lucca,
where Buonamici [Giuseppe Buonamici, pupil of Liszt and Bulow,
now one of the most celebrated pianists of Italy. Lives at
Florence] will probably join him.

Very cordially yours,

F. L.

I will write two words of thanks to Delatre and beg you to give
me his address.

In your walks at St. Gall make my salutations to the concert room
in which were heard, some 10 or 12 years ago, the "Symphonie
Heroique" conducted by Wagner, and two Symphonie Poems, conducted
by your very humble servant. Szadrowski was at that time
conductor at St. Gall; since then he is settled in the Grisons
(at Graubunden); if you should go that way do not fail to see
him; I recommend him to you as one of our friends.

Rome, July 16th, 1869



91. To Camille Saint-Saens in Paris.

[The celebrated French composer, pianist and organist (born in
Paris 1835) was, as is well known, in sympathy with the New
German School, and fosters, amongst others, the genre of
"Symphonic Poems" made known by Liszt.]

Very honored Friend,

Your kind letter promised me several of your compositions; I have
been expecting them, and, while waiting, I want to thank you
again for your second Concerto, which I greatly applaud. The form
of it is new and very happy; the interest of the three portions
goes on increasing, and you take into just account the effect of
the pianist without sacrificing anything of the ideas of the
composer, which is an essential rule in this class of work.

At the very outset the prelude on the pedal G is striking and
imposing: after a very happy inspiration you do wisely to
reproduce it at the end of the first movement and to accompany it
this time with some chords. Among the things which particularly
please me I note: the chromatic progression (last line of the
prelude) and that which alternates between the piano and
orchestra (from the last bar of page 5--repeated then by the
piano alone, page 15); the arrangement of thirds and sixths in
demisemiquavers, charmingly sonorous, pages 8 and 9, which opens
superbly on the entry of the subject fortissimo; the piquant
rhythm

[Figure: Musical score excerpt of the rhythm in 6/8]

of the second subject of the Allegro scherzando, page 25.
Possibly this would have gained somewhat by more combination and
development, either of the principal subject or of some secondary
subject; for instance, a little anodyne counterpoint, it seems to
me, would not be out of place on pages 26, 27. etc., etc., and so
on. Item for pages 50 to 54, in which the simple breadth of the
period with the holding on of the accompaniment chords leaves
rather a void; I should like there to be some incidence and
polyphonic entanglement, as the Germanic Polyphemuses say. Pardon
me this detailed remark, dear Monsieur Saint-Saens, which I only
venture to make while assuring you in all sincerity that the
total of your work pleases me singularly. I played it again the
day before yesterday to Sgambati, of whom Plante [Francis Plante
(born 1839), the exquisitely refined Pianist] will speak to you,
as of an artist above the common run and even more than
ordinarily distingue. He will let the public hear your Concerto
next winter, which ought to meet with success in every country.

When is the performance of the "Timbre" ["Le timbre d'argent"
(the silver bell), an Opera] to be? I wish it to give you
abundantly all the satisfaction that you deserve, and shall only
regret that I cannot be present at the performance of it. At my
age the role of young composer is no longer suitable--and there
would not be any other for me at Paris, as I cannot continue
indefinitely that of an old disabled pianist. Thus I have
judiciously made up my mind not to trouble myself about my
compositions any further than the writing of them, without in the
least thinking of spreading them. Supposing that they have any
value it will always be found out soon enough either during my
life or afterwards. The sympathy of my friends (a very well
chosen sympathy, I flatter myself) amply suffices me; the rest of
the world may talk in its own way. As to the "Elizabeth" I do not
think it is adapted to the Parisian taste. I am moreover very
tired of that score through the performances at the Wartburg,
Pest and Vienna; and the difficult task of a suitable French
translation, plus the rehearsals with a set of artists little
disposed to take trouble, frightens me. I much prefer to employ
my time in a manner less ungrateful and more agreeable;
consequently I shall not put out anybody in Paris, which I shall
not visit; and invite you to come and see me in Rome. Here, dear
Monsieur St. Saens, we can talk and musiquer [make music] at our
ease. Try and procure me this great pleasure soon, and believe
fully in my sentiments of high esteem and devoted affection.

F. Liszt

Rome, July 19th, 1869



92. To Camille Saint-Saens

Very honored Friend,

At last your compositions have come, and I spent all yesterday in
their amiable society.

Let us speak first of the Mass: this is a capital, grand,
beautiful, admirable work--so good that, among contemporary works
of the same kind, I know perhaps of none so striking by the
elevation of the sentiment, the religious character, the
sustained, adequate, vigorous style and consummate mastery. It is
like a magnificent Gothic Cathedral in which Bach would conduct
his orchestra!

After having read your score three times I am so thoroughly
imbued with it that I venture to risk a few remarks.

In the Gloria one should, I think, preserve the literal text
entire: "Gratias agimus tibi propter magnam gloriam tuam."--
Consequently add four or five bars.

At the beginning of the Sanctus it would be better to continue
the voices, and to complete by them the sense of the orchestra;
similarly it would be advantageous to interlace, by means of an
alto solo, the text of the Benedictus (which you have omitted) to
the Organ melody, pages 77 and 78 after the Hosanna, as well as
to add the chorus to the final phrase of the "Dona nobis pacem,"
pages 88 and 89.

You will find all these small matters carefully noted down on
your score, which I will venture to return to you, begging you to
let me have it back again soon, for I must possess this
extraordinary work, which has its place between Bach and
Beethoven.

Bear with one more liturgical question, and, in addition, a
proposition boldly practical in the Kyrie, the spire of your
Cathedral. The inspiration and structure of it are certainly
admirable..."omnia excelsa tua et fluctus tui super me
transierunt." Nevertheless, during these 300 bars, about, of a
slow and almost continuous movement, do you not lose sight of the
celebrant, who is obliged to remain standing motionless at the
altar? Do you not expose him to commit the sin of impatience
directly after he has said the confiteor?...Will not the composer
be reproached with having given way to his genius rather than to
the requirements of the worship?

In order to obviate these unpleasant conjunctures it would be
necessary for you to resign yourself to an enormous sacrifice as
an artist, namely, to cut out 18 pages! (for church performance
only, for these 18 pages should be preserved in the edition to
your greater honor as a musician, and it would suffice to
indicate the "cut" ad libitum, as I have done in several places
in the score of the Gran Mass).

Sacrifice, then, 18 pages as I said, and put the "Christe
eleison" on page 6, instead of the "Kyrie eleison,"

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a 3-bar musical excerpt at the
point where the words "Chri-------------ste e-le------" are
sung.]

concluding pp on page l0.  From the musical point of view
exclusively, I should blush to make such a proposition; but it is
necessary to keep peace, especially in the Church, where one must
learn to subordinate one's self in mind and deed. Art, there,
should be only a correlative matter, and should tend to the most
perfect concomitance possible with the rite.

Be assured, dear Monsieur Saint-Saens, of the sentiments of high
esteem and great sympathy which I entertain towards you.

Your very devoted

F. Liszt

Rome, August 4th, 1869



93. To Madame Jessie Laussot

I have had to write a great many notes this last week. Pardon me
for being so late in thanking you for your friendly lines, and
kindly tell Mademoiselle Alexandrine Ritter how sincerely I feel
for her in her affliction. Her mother expressed in a rare degree
and in her whole personality the high and sweet dignity of the
human soul. Respect attached itself to her naturally,--and she
inspired the noble serenity of it.

In a few days a little surprise will reach you in the form of an
"Ave Maria" written for the Cherubim Society, and dedicated to
the society's dear Maestra. However simple these few bars may be
(in which there is not a single repetition of a word, nor
ornamenting of any kind) I hope they will not be unpleasing to
you, and I beg you to play them in the form of a prayer for

Your very affectionate

F. Liszt

Rome, October 7th, 1869

In acknowledging the receipt of the "Ave Maria" tell me when you
expect Bulow, of whom I have had no tidings since Munich.

Sgambati returned here last week.



94. To Dr. Ludwig Nohl

[The well-known writer on musical subjects (1831-1885)]

Dear Friend,

Let my best thanks for your letter be, to take it to heart--and
to comply with it. Meanwhile this much is certain--that we shall
see each other in Weimar next May, and that at the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung there you will officiate as the worthy biographer of
Beethoven.

In spite of too modest a remark in your letter I am convinced
that you are peculiarly well qualified for thoroughly grasping,
and making others comprehend, the question of the "more modern
style of Art." Proofs of this have been gathered recently from
all the admirable things you have said in your brochure on
Wagner; for instance, in regard to the "refined, firm and proud
position held by Music," its "most expressive physiognomy," and
"that spirit of love which Music has created for itself"--and
also, if you will allow me such presumption in contrast to your
modesty, on p. 63, where you say, "The logos alone regulates the
thought and gives life to the risings and fallings of the poetic
idea"--

Sic vos non vobis--

Innumerable interruptions prevent my beginning the Beethoven
Cantata today. But I have at last secured quiet: I shall remain
all the winter at the Villa d'Este (3 or 4 hours out of Rome),
and take care that I do not lose an immoderate amount of time.

With sincerest thanks and in all friendliness yours,

Villa d'Este, November 17th, 1869

F. Liszt



95. To the Princess Caroline Sayn-Wittgenstein

[According to the Weimarer Zeitung it was printed as follows,
fragmentarily, in the Leipziger Tageblatt of December 6th, 1888.]

November 27th, 1869.

.--. The death of Overbeck reminds me of my own. I wish, and
urgently entreat and command, that my burial may take place
without show, and be as simple and economical as possible. I
protest against a burial such as Rossini's was, and even against
any sort of invitation for friends and acquaintances to assemble
as was done at Overbeck's interment. Let there be no pomp, no
music, no procession in my honor, no superfluous illuminations,
or any kind of oration. Let my body be buried, not in a church,
but in some cemetery, and let it not be removed from that grave
to any other. I will not have any other place for my body than
the cemetery in use in the place where I die, nor any other
religious ceremony than a quiet Mass in the Parish Church (not
any kind of Requiem to be sung). The inscription on my tomb might
be: "Et habitabunt recti cum vultu suo.".--.



96. To Franz Servais

Your kind letter has given me very sincere pleasure, dear
Monsieur Franz. I hope your health is quite re-established, and
that you are plunging into Bach to your heart's content,--that
admirable chalybeate spring! I will bear you company, and have
given myself, for a Christmas present, the little 8vo edition of
Peters of the two "Passions," Masses and Cantatas of Bach, whom
one might designate as the St. Thomas Aquinas of music. Kahnt,
who sends me these scores, tells me of his earnest desire to get
Cornelius settled at Leipzig, in the position of editor-in-chief
of the Neue Zeitschrift, founded, as you know, by Schumann, and
bravely carried on by Brendel. It is the sole paper which has,
for thirty years past, sustained with steadfastness, knowledge
and consistency the works and the men of musical progress. If, as
I wish, Cornelius undertakes Brendel's task, I think you would do
well to follow out your project of staying again in Leipzig.--In
any case I hope to see you again this spring at Weimar; I shall
arrive there towards the middle of April, and shall stay till the
end of June. During the winter I shall abstain from all
travelling, and shall not leave my retreat at the Villa d'Este
except to stay a few days in Rome. Many people have very kindly
invited me to go to Paris; I have excused myself from doing so
for reasons of expediency which you know. Henceforth it is not
myself that I have to bring forward, but simply to continue to
write in perfect tranquillity and with a free mind. To do this
obliges me to seclude myself, to avoid the salons, the half-
opened pianos and the society drudgery imposed by the large
towns, where I very easily feel myself out of place.

Thank you cordially for your propaganda of the "Missa Choralis;"
I shall be much obliged if you will write me a couple of words
after the performance. Will you also please tell M. Brassin that
I thank him much for not having been afraid of compromising his
success as a virtuoso by choosing my Concerto? Up to the present
time all the best-known French pianists--with the exception of
Saint-Saens--have not ventured to play anything of mine except
transcriptions, my own compositions being necessarily considered
absurd and insupportable. People know pretty well what to think
by what they hear said, without any need of hearing the works.

How did the orchestra go with the piano in the Concerto? Had they
taken care to have enough rehearsals? There are several passages
that require minute care; the modulations are abrupt, and the
variety of the movements is somewhat disconcerting for the
conductor. And, in addition to this, the traitor triangle (proh
pudor!) [Oh shame!], however excited he may be to strike strong
with his cunning little rhythm, marked pianissimo, provokes the
most scandalous catastrophe...

Notwithstanding all the regrettable parleying, for in such a
matter all sensible people ought to be of the same opinion, I
presume that Mr. Godebski's bust of Chopin will shortly be placed
in the lobby of the theater at Warsaw. Certainly Chopin well
merits this mark of honor, which moreover need in no wise prevent
people from busying themselves about a larger monument to
Lemberg, and from collecting a sufficient sum for that purpose.

At Weimar we will talk of Hal and the pleasure it will be to me
to pay you a visit there. Pray present my respectful thanks to
your mother, and my affectionate remembrances to Madame
Godebski,--and believe me, dear Monsieur Franz, your sincere
friend,

F. Liszt

Villa d'este, December 20th, 1869

(Address always Rome.)



97. To Dr. Franz Witt in Ratisbon

[Like all the subsequent letters to Dr. Witt, this letter is
without date or ending, as printed in Walter's biography of Witt
(Ratisbon, Pustet, 1889).--Dr. Witt (1834-80) was a distinguished
musical scholar, also a composer, the founder and first general
president of the Cacilien-Verein [St. Cecilia Society], and died
as a clergyman in Landshut.]

[Rome, towards the end of 1869.]

Very Dear Sir and Friend,

Before I had the honor of knowing you personally the manuscript
of your "Litaniae lauretanae" aroused in me sincere interest and
religious sympathy towards you. This first impression is now
increased by my deeper knowledge of the substantial value of your
compositions and my fuller appreciation of the great services you
have rendered to Church Music. That you act as admirably in
practice as in precept is evident in other of your works, but
especially in the Mass and the Te Deum which were performed here
on the Emperor of Austria's name-day in the Church of the Anima
under the leadership of our dear friend Haberl [On the 4th
October, 1869] Both of these works are of rare value--and, what
is still more rare, both are equally devoted to Art and the
Church. The "Litaniae lauretanae" breathes also a spirit of
nobility of soul, and diffuses its pleasant aroma notwithstanding
the necessary musical limitation. The collective character of the
invocations shows uniformity; and yet the lines of melody are
very finely drawn; especially touching to me is

[Here, Liszt writes a 2-bar musical excerpt where the words "Sa--
lus infirmo---rum Refugium peccatorum, Conso-la-trix afllicto---
rum" are sung]

My hearty thanks for the dedication, my very dear friend; it
brings me justifiable and joyful pride, which your own
exaggerated modesty should dispel.--Next summer I will again come
to you for a few days on my way to Szegzard (Hungary), where my
Mass for male voices (2nd very much corrected edition,--now
published by Repos, Paris) is to be performed. A few months after
my visit you will I hope receive most satisfactory news (through
Haberl) about the Cacilien-Verein [Haberl had endeavored, through
the intervention of the Bishops assembled in Council in Rome, to
obtain the Pope's approbation of the Cacilien-Verein, and his
efforts met with success.], to which, in fullest conviction, I
remain firmly attached--as well as to its much esteemed
President.



98. To Prof. Dr. Siegmund Lebert

Dear Friend,

The proofs of Weber's and Schubert's Sonatas were despatched to
Stuttgart in two parcels by rail the day before yesterday. This
is the cheapest and quickest way of sending things, and I beg of
you in future to send parcels in this way, as packages sent by
spediteur come slowly and cost a great deal. N.B.--The parcels
must not be too thick, and must have the address written on the
wrapper. As soon as you send me the D minor Sonata, that is still
wanting, and Weber's Conzertstuck, I will revise them at once;
ere long you will receive Schubert's Impromptus, Valses, etc.

My endeavor with this work is to avoid all quibbling and
pretentiousness, and to make the edition a practical one for
teachers and players. And for this reason at the very last I
added a goodly amount of fingering and pedal marks; kindly get
the printers to excuse this, and I trust that the trouble it
causes will not prove superfluous.--With regard to the deceptive
Termpo rubato, I have settled the matter provisionally in a brief
note (in the finale of Weber's A flat major Sonata); other
occurrences of the rubato may be left to the taste and momentary
feeling of gifted players. A metronomical performance is
certainly tiresome and nonsensical; time and rhythm must be
adapted to and identified with the melody, the harmony, the
accent and the poetry...But how indicate all this? I shudder at
the thought of it.

Also kindly excuse me from writing a preface, and write it
yourself, dear friend. For you know exactly what I should wish to
say, and you would say it much more clearly than I could, for my
very small amount of pedagogism is, for the most part, confined
to the words of St. Paul: Littera occidit, spiritus vivificat!

Your success delights without surprising me. It is only what
ought to be, that Lebert and Stark's Pianoforte Method should
meet with general acceptance, and that the Stuttgart
Conservatoire should continue to prosper. Both of these points of
merit I took the opportunity of mentioning with due honor to H.M.
the Queen of Wurtemberg--on the occasion of her visit to the
Villa d'Este here.

Best thanks for sending the Bach Fugue, the 2 Etudes (separate
edition) and the last volume of the Method, which I found to
contain many, to me, new and praiseworthy items, among others the
Etudes of Hiller and Brahms.

Ever, in all friendship, yours

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, January l0th, 1870

I shall remain here till the end of April, and then go direct to
Weimar.



99. To C. F. Kahnt, the Music Publisher

Dear Friend,

The life's object of the Neue Zeitschrift remains firmly to stand
by the colors of Rheingold and the Nibelungen, and unfailingly to
represent the interests of the Deutsche Musikverein. This
embraces all essential consequences for us.

At the end of next week I will send you the piano-forte score of
the Beethoven Cantata, and write full particulars to Riedel.

By the middle of April I hope to reach Weimar. Best thanks for
sending the Ave maris stella--and in all friendliness I remain
yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, February 14th, 1870



100. To Herr Gille, councillor of justice

Dear Friend,

The best thing I have to tell you today is that we shall soon see
each other again. At the beginning of April I shall visit Bulow
in Florence, and then go direct to Weimar.

Last week I had a correspondence with Riedel about matters of the
Tonkunstler-Versammhung. The most important points are as
follows:--The utmost economy that is possible to making a
perfectly suitable orchestra and chorus. The spaces at our
disposal in Weimar (churches, theater and refreshment room) will
not allow of any great expenditure as regards the personnel. It
is to be hoped that Muller-Hartung can obtain a respectable
contingent for the Beethoven Mass, which will lessen the number
of outside co-operators; and I in like manner reckon chiefly on
the Weimar Vocal Union for the more important numbers of the
concert programme-Psalm by Schulz-Beuthen, Prometheus by Saint-
Saens, my Beethoven Cantata, etc. The arrangement of the
orchestra is to be as it was at the Carl August Festival and at
the Tonkunstler-Versammlung of '61--10 first violins, 6 to 7
double basses, etc. Riedel conducts Beethoven's Mass; Lassen the
concerts in the theater; and Muller-Hartung my Cantata.
Conzertmeister David and Director Hellmesberger will preside over
the 1st violins. Both gentlemen will also determine about the
performance of the Beethoven Quartet. Any other special violin
virtuoso would be superfluous this time. Riedel must arrange the
distribution of the solo parts of the Beethoven Mass according as
he thinks best. Milde only requires, in my Cantata,

"Dieser Brave sei verpflichtet
Das zu thun, was wir gedichtet."

["May this brave one be constrained
That to do which we ordained."]

(Schober, 49. Goethe-Feier.)

I flatter myself, by-the-bye, that Milde will also find a
pleasure in the "Sternen-Cantabile"--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt where the
words "Viel tau-send hal-ten nach-tig" ("Vide the accompanying
page") are sung. It contained the Cantabile in question for Milde
from Liszt's Beethoven Cantata.]

Riedel asks me who shall play the pianoforte?

If our meeting were at Jena I should decidedly invite Bulow to do
it; he is the veritable Beethoven player and interpreter, the one
who knows and who can do [Kenner und Konner]; but unfortunately
the shades of Dingelstedt and Gutzkow warn him from Weimar's
doors...

Meanwhile there is no hurry about the choice of a pianist (he or
she). Only arrange the principal things in a suitable manner, the
chorus, orchestra, solo singers and the Beethoven Quartet; all
the rest will soon be arranged after my arrival at Weimar in the
middle of April.

Yours most faithfully,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, February 26th, 1870

The piano arrangement of my Cantata must be written out again,
and cannot therefore be sent off for 8 or 10 days. The entire
work lasts about three-quarters of an hour. I am so far ready
with it, that there are only two or three more passages to be
instrumented.



101. To the Baroness E. M. Schwartz in Crete

[Autograph in the Liszt Museum at Weimar.--The addressee was
widely known as the writer Elpis Melena.]

My winter villeggiatura at the Villa d'Este is drawing to its
close; the day after tomorrow I return to Rome, and when you
receive these lines I shall be at Weimar. Address to me there
till the middle of June.

When will your Cretan volume, crowned [Untranslatable pun on the
words "cretois" and "crete."] with erudition and philhellenism,
be finished? Shall you return this summer for its publication? I
hope you will, and I will confess to you without any compliments
that you are among the very small number of my friends whose
absence I feel to be a privation. Now, to accustom one's self to
this kind of privation does not become easier with age.

You doubtless know the novel of your great historical friend,
published now by the "Gaulois" (if I am not mistaken) under the
title "La Domination du Moine" (or "Clelia.") I question whether
another of your friends--less historical although very
distinguished--M. St. Rene Taillandier, recently appointed
Secretary General to the Minister of Public Instruction, would
subscribe to many copies of G.'s novel for the Imperial
libraries; but he will have a fine opportunity of ministerial
revenge when the biographer of the hero of l'unita italiana (not
the "cattolica," relegated to Turin) brings out "la Crete," in
which the Cretans will at last be relieved from the anathema of
their Epimenides narrated in St. Paul's Epistle to Titus,--
"Cretenses semper mendaces, malae bestiae, ventres pigri."--In
the matter of "mendaces" and "ventres pagri" there would be a
tremendous competition with the rest of Europe.

My plans for the spring and summer remain always the same.
Weimar--from the 10th April till the 20th June--with the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung (which has the honor of counting you
amongst its illustrious members); then in the last week of May I
should be very much tempted to be present at the famous "Passion
Play" at Ober-Ammergau; at the end of August I shall go to my odd
friend August at Szegzard (Hungary), who is anxious that a new
Mass of mine should be performed on the day of the dedication of
a church (29th September); and in October I shall return to Rome.

I suppose you receive the Allgemeine Zeitung. It gives but too
much news, and little edifying, about serious things here by its
"Roman Letters," no less widespread than badly put together. If
you want to obtain complete information on these difficult
questions you must read l' Univers and the letters of Veuillot,
or at least l'Unita cattolica; but it would be exacting too much
from your impartiality. Moreover you have better things to do
than to read; your chief duty is to make yourself read,
consequently to write and to write again;--in a secondary manner
occupy yourself a little with your beautiful vines, and, above
all, don't forget to bring soon some samples of their excellent
product, which will enliven our material and intellectual
"substantials," at which, hoping to participate again in the year
of grace 1870, I am,

Your very affectionate and very devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, March 15th, 1870

As handy gossip I send you the following: they say that Odo
Russet [sic] will shortly go to England for his wife's
confinement, and will not return to his post in Rome. It is also
said that Schlozer will pay a visit here in the spring;--and that
the daughter of Countess Garcia is to marry a nephew of Cardinal
Antonelli, and will bring a fortune of ten thousand pounds
sterling.

Tarnowski will return to his Penates in Gallicia at Easter, and
will write to you. Wider continues to be president of the German
circle. Next door to one another, there are many concerts given
at the Sala Dante, and our friend Sgambati is acquiring more and
more the reputation of a great artist, which he merits. Remenyi
spent the winter in Hungary. I should very much like to invite
him to come to the Tonkunstler-Versammlung at Weimar; but our
programme is already over-full. In any case I shall meet Rem.
again at Szegzard.



102. To Camille Saint-Saens

Dear Friend,

The rehearsals of your "Noces de Promethee" (Marriage of
Prometheus) are proceeding well at Weimar and Jena; we shall pay
particular attention to the 4 harps, the saxophones, etc. But
what is of the greatest consequence is yourself. I have announced
your coming at the Court and in the town. A revoir then! Try to
be here on the 24th, [Saint-Saens came to Weimar for the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung of the "Allgemeine Deutsche Musik-
Verein," with which the Beethoven Centenary was simultaneously
celebrated; and for the first time, on the 27th May, 1870, Saint-
Saens' name appeared on the programme of these concerts. He also
appeared as a pianist, and Liszt played with him at a Matinee on
two grand pianos.]--and believe me yours ever in sincere
friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 12th, 1870



103. To Johann von Herbeck

Very dear friend,

Being perfectly convinced of your genuine friendship I am quite
willing to follow the instructions you will briefly give me
concerning the Beethoven Festival [For the benefit of the
Beethoven Memorial. It took place in Vienna on the 18th March,
1877. Liszt played the E-major Concerto and the pianoforte
Fantasia (with chorus), and accompanied the Scotch songs sung by
Caroline Bettelheim.] in Vienna. Whether, and in what way, I may
be able to take part in it will be decided when we have discussed
the subject. Meanwhile I most modestly determine to consider
myself unusable. [There is here a play on the word bescheiden,
the German being ich bescheide mich bescheidenst, which is
untranslatable.]

About the beginning of August I shall pay you a visit in Vienna,
whence my road leads onwards to Szegzard. My earlier halting
points will be: 3rd July, Leipzig--performance of my Missa
choralis; 13th and 17th July, "Rheingold" and the "Walkure" in
Munich; and after that the Passion Play at Oberammergau.

The favorable reception accorded to the Coronation Mass [By
Liszt] is essentially due to your having conducted it. My best
thanks for this. The score is to be printed shortly, and I must
ask you to hand over to the publisher Schuberth the manuscript
which I gave you in Munich last summer. Schuberth is going to
Vienna in a few weeks.

With sincerest esteem, I remain your ever gratefully devoted

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 20th, 1870



104. To Sophie Menter

[The favorite and most distinguished of Liszt's lady-pupils, of
whom he wrote to Navratil on 29th September, 1881, that he had
"for many years past regarded her as the most brilliant and
accomplished of the lady-pianists of the day." Since 1874 she has
held the appointment of Court pianist at the Imperial Court of
Austria.]

Dear and Very Honored One,

A telegram from Abranyi informs me that an invitation, addressed
to Capellmeister O.B. in Salzburg, has already been sent to you
to ask you to take part in the Sangerfest in Pest. Hence, after
having triumphantly played in the Mozarteum on the 18th, your
triumphs are to be continued forthwith in Pest on the 20th. Baron
Augusz and your humble servant expect you there from the 19th.
Kindly let me know (per telegram) by which train you will arrive,
and--a few days afterwards--my rigidly adhered-to plan of
carrying you off to Szegzard shall be brilliantly fulfilled.
Here in this house you will find rest, comfort, friendly sympathy
and harmless affability, and, in addition, music too, and that
not of the worst kind, for we shall arrange it ourselves.

Your sincerely attached and devoted

F. Liszt

Szegzard, August 11th, 1870



105. To Sophie Menter

Your hearty and humorous little note closes delightfully with the
promise that you are soon coming to Szegzard. You will not find
here any vestige of all the artistic enjoyments and glories of
the Mozarteum; the whole symphonic contingent of Szegzard is
limited to half a dozen gypsies with instruments out of tune and
harmonising in pell mell fashion one with the other; the choruses
are free and performed in the open air, namely: soprano and alto-
-flocks of geese; tenor and bass--cattle;--so that a conductor
like O.B. would have nothing further to do than to pose as a
mythological figure...

Nevertheless I promise you, dear kind patroness, many pleasant
and befitting things in this restful, genial and refined home of
our mutual friend Baron Augusz.

You will be most heartily welcome to us all--especially to your
most sincerely attached

F. Liszt

Szegzard, August 29th, 1870

Between the middle and the end of September Remenyi, Mosonyi and
Mihalovich will be staying here.



106. To Kornel von Abranyi in Budapest

[Autograph in the possession of Herr E. von Mihalovich in
Budapest.--The addressee was a musician, writer and critic
there.]

Dear Friend,

The death of Mosonyi puts our hearts in mourning. [Michael
Mosonyi, the friend of Liszt, and to whose sudden death the
latter here refers, was famous in Hungary as a composer, teacher
and author.] It makes us sorrow also for Music in Hungary, of
which Mosonyi was one of the noblest, most valiant and
praiseworthy representatives. One might be proud of walking side
by side with him in the right road. In truth his name had not its
due eclat and renown abroad; but he did not trouble himself the
least about that, and possibly he did not even take enough
trouble about it,--as much by wisdom as by contempt of equivocal
and vulgar means, which were repugnant to the elevated rectitude
of his soul. He felt what esteem was due to him, and thought of
nothing but real glory; that which is attained by conscientious
perseverance in the Good and the Beautiful.

Let us honor his memory by setting ourselves to make his examples
and teaching bear further fruit!--

Many of the published compositions of Mosonyi deserve to be more
and better known; others, still in manuscript,--his last great
dramatic work "Almos" in particular--will soon be spread abroad,
I hope.

We will talk about this shortly at Pest. For today I wish merely
to share with some friend, such as yourself, dear Abranyi, the
grief at the loss which we have sustained. Yours from my heart,

F. Liszt

Szegzard, November 2nd, 1870



107. To Sophie Menter

Dear Patroness,

Your dear little notes joyfully alarm the whole household. All
beg you urgently to come as soon as possible, and I all the more
urgently as I have to go to Vienna at the end of April.

Your bewitching description of the "Ambrosia-Concerto" makes me
most inquisitive: be sure not to forget to bring the tremendous
manuscript with you; we will arrange an historically memorable
performance of it in the salon of the Town-Vicarage.

Hearty greetings, and in all friendliness yours,

F. Listz

Pest, March 22nd, 1871.

In musical matters as follows: this evening and Friday concerts
by Remenyi; next Sunday and on the Wednesday before Easter
Philharmonic concerts;--in between a grand concert at the Musik
Academie of Ofen, and on Good Friday a performance of the Stabat
Mater, etc., etc.

Our programme shall be arranged here, forthwith, by word of
mouth, at any quarter of an hour that my dear patroness Sophie
may feel disposed to appoint.



108. To Edmund von Mihalovich in Budapest

[Composer of several operas and large orchestral works (born
1842), now director of the Music Academy in Budapest.]

.--. Augusz, in his last letter, speaks of fresh proposals on the
subject of my settling in Hungary. I answer him, as before, that
I am quite disposed to show myself accommodating, devoted,
useful, obedient and grateful. The only condition that I make
relative to my return to Pest next winter is--a place to live in;
for, on the one hand, the modesty of my income forbids me to
increase my expenses, and, on the other hand, politeness demands,
as it seems to me, that if they seriously want me they will also
show me that they do, by sparing me the onerous trouble of having
to find a home. On the four occasions on which I have stayed at
Pest since 1865 Schwendtner has shown me the utmost and most
cordial hospitality. I feel a most true gratitude to him, but
should be afraid of showing it ill by taking too great advantage
of his kindness to me.

.--. Mme. de Moukhanoft [The cultivated musical friend of Liszt
and Wagner, to whom the latter dedicated his "Judenthum in der
Musik," whilst Liszt dedicated an Elegic to her memory] writes,
"Has Mihalovich received my letter of tender invectives and
entreaties to make him come to Weimar?"

It will be difficult to persuade her that walks on the shore at
Ostend ought to be preferable to the charm of the talks on the
"Goethe Platz," and even at the "Erb-Prinz," which she will again
favor with her presence towards the middle of June, I hope.
Tausig also promises me to spend a fortnight here.

Mlle. Brandt sang several songs admirably yesterday morning at
the "Hofgartnerei" I shall accompany her in yours tomorrow.

Yours in cordial friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 29th, 1871

Till the end of June address--Weimar.



109. To Marie Lipsius

Dear and kindest Biographer,

Again an excellent suggestion; follow it without hesitation and
present us ere long with a pleasantly powerful and characteristic
portrait of Tausig. [Liszt's great pupil (born in 1841) had died
in Leipzig on the 17th July, 187l.] In what year of the fifties
his father brought him to Weimar, I do not now recollect; but I
do remember how greatly astonished I was at his extraordinary
talent when I first heard him play. The intellectual claws and
pinions were already giving signs of mighty power in the youth
who was scarcely 14 years of age, and somewhat delicate in
appearance. I felt some compunction in undertaking to give him
further instruction, determined not to undertake the task, and
therefore informed the father that in the case of such a
stupendous organisation the wisest plan was to leave it free,
independent development without a teacher. However Tausig
insisted upon remaining with me. He studied immoderately; as a
rule kept very much to himself while in Weimar, and got into
various little scrapes in consequence of his quick, ironical
humor. I was accused of being over-indulgent with him, and of
thus spoiling him; but I really could not have acted otherwise,
and I loved him with all my heart. On various occasions when I
had to undertake short journeys in connection with the
performances of my works he accompanied me; among other places to
Dresden, Prague and Vienna. Subsequently he lived in Vienna for
some length of time, and got up some concerts there with the view
of having some Symphonic Poems performed which he himself
conducted--but he was unable to get a proper start. He had to
struggle on and to endure many privations before attaining the
success he deserved. His brilliant vocation did not become firmly
established till a few years ago, in Berlin, Leipzig, etc.

In the spring of '69 I met Tausig in Paris (after the
"Tannhauser" scandal), and returned with him to Weimar for the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung. Bulow conducted the Faust Symphony by
heart (at the rehearsals most accurately mentioning the
letters!), and Tausig played the A major Concerto marvellously.
Since then I have seen him only twice: last May at the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Weimar (where he played Beethoven's E-
flat major Concerto) and now...

Countess Krokow could give you the most reliable information
about him, and our friend R. Pohl may also be of use to you in
your work. As far as I know, no one has understood Tausig's
genius, his demoniacally ideal nature, with so quick a
perception, so refined and--I might say--with such womanly
intuition, as Frau von Moukhanoff (nee Countess Nesselrode).
Unfortunately the two letters in which she wrote me full
particulars about Tausig are in Rome. Tausig dedicated his two
lately published Etudes, Op. 1, to her, and she was ever a highly
appreciative and kindly patroness of his. Remember to mention her
specially in your delineation of his character.

Of Tausig's publications those chiefly deserving the highest
praise are his masterly transcriptions of the Beethoven Quartets,
the Toccata and Fugue of Bach (D minor), Schubert's March; the
three pieces from "Tristan and Isolde," the pianoforte score of
the "Meistersinger," of the Kaisermarsch, the "Nouvelles Soirees
de Vienne" and his two last original Etudes. Recommend also, for
the good of pianists, and as a very saleable work, an early
publication of his very admirable and well-sustained arrangement
of Chopin's first Concerto (E Minor).

Accept the expression of my sincere esteem and gratitude.

F. Listz

Schloss Wilhelmsthal, Sunday, July 23rd, 1871.

In the middle of this week I return to Weimar and remain there
till the 5th-10th of August.



110. To Franz Servais

Dear Franz,

In spite of the proverb "Every road leads to Rome" I shall not be
able to return there by way of Hal this time. Will you give my
very affectionate respects to your mother and tell her how much I
regret to be unable to be present, except in thought, at the
beautiful family fete at the time of the inauguration of the
monument to your father, on the 10th September.--Shall you not
invite the Prince de Chimay (the present governor of Mons, I
believe)? He would have a right there owing to his sincere
interest for Art and his very distinguished musical talent.

I am persuaded that Lassen will express in noble music the
inspiration of this fete intended to perpetuate the memory of an
illustrious and sympathetic artist. But however successful may be
his composition, it does not absolve you from yours, which filial
affection demands of you and will dictate to you. Write it
without delay, and afterwards take advantage of your leisure at
Hal to fulfil the praiseworthy programme indicated in your
letter:

a. To work hard at the Piano.

b. To help towards your independence by making yourself capable
of cutting a good figure as conductor.

c. To venture on the performance of your "Macbeth" sorceries and
other of your compositions, with the reservation of not hearing
yourself immediately proclaimed king by the sorcerers of
criticism.

Shall you make your appearance at the composition competition
next year? I invite you to do so.

You know that H. Richter has been appointed conductor to the
National Theater of Pest, and will conduct "Lohengrin" there at
the end of September. He will find, I trust, honor and
satisfaction in more firmly implanting in his country the sublime
works of Wagner, and in making the orchestra, the stage and the
public profit by the exemplary rules and practices of M. de Bulow
at Munich. Needless to say that I shall endeavor to make
Richter's task as easy as possible to him.

Count Tyszkiewicz, in passing lately through Weimar, was kind
enough to explain to me his new system of musical mathematics,
and to show me his tables of figures honored with commendatory
letters from Mr. Gevaert and several notabilities. If, by means
of his figures and measures, Tysz. succeeds, as you claim for
him, in demonstrating that X...is a "pyramid," this will be a
more pyramidal glory even than the system.

Next Thursday I go to Eichstatt (Bavaria), where the (German) St.
Cecilia Society meets. Its founder and president F. Witt--a much
respected ecclesiastic, conductor of the Cathedral, composer and
editor of two newspapers of sacred music published by Pustet at
Ratisbon--gives evidence of a great capacity and a persevering
zeal in endeavoring seriously to improve the uses and customs of
Church music, and, by continuous publications, to propagate the
old works of repute as well as the new ones of this class that
are deserving of recommendation.--A pamphlet by Witt, which
appeared in the spring, "uber das Dirigiren der Kirchenmusik"
["about the conducting of Church music"], corrects some grievous
errors and furnishes much profitable instruction.

I shall be much obliged if you will send me a printed account of
your fete of the 10th September; on that day I shall be in Rome,
and shall not return thence till toward the end of October, to
settle at Pest for the winter.

Remember me most kindly to your brother Joseph, [The excellent
Violoncellist Joseph Servais, who died in 1885 at the age of 35]
to Godebski and his wife, and believe, dear Franz, in my
steadfast feelings of devoted affection.

F. Liszt

Wilhelmsthal, August 25th, 1871

Address Rome, Santa Francesca Romana, Campo Vaccino.

What are Joseph's and your plans for the winter?



111. To Walter Bache

Dear Mr. Bache,

Your kind remembrance of the 22nd October has given me sincere
pleasure, for which I thank you cordially. Please excuse me for
not telling you oftener by letter my constant feelings of
affection for you; the hindrance of occupations and cares drives
me, alas! into an extreme parsimony as regards letter writing
with my best friends, but I think that is my only omission
towards them. To see M. de Bulow again was a real joy to me. His
health is improving, and his prodigious maestria at its height.
He is going to make a concert tour this winter in Vienna, Pest,
Prague, Berlin, etc., and will come to London in May. I hope that
the people there will be able to appreciate his superiority in
its entirety. Bulow, more than any contemporary artist, takes the
lead in celebrity. He is not only a very great virtuoso and
musician, but also a veritable sovereign of music. Mme. Laussot,
who has the genius of nobility of the heart, also came to fete me
on Sunday. I shall see her again at Florence in a fortnight, on
my way to Pest, where, as you know, I am henceforth fixed, by
royal and national favor. Whether there or at Weimar, I hope we
shall meet again next summer, dear Bache, in perfect harmony.

Your very cordially affectionate and devoted

F. Liszt

Rome, October 25th, 1871

Bravo and thanks for your concert programmes, which I beg you to
continue sending me.



112. To Marie Lipsius

Dear Patroness,

To your .--. sketch of Tausig only a single objection could be
raised; namely, that you bestow too high praise upon me. Pardon
me if I cannot argue about it, and accept my cordial thanks for
this new tribute of your generous kindness.

Last Sunday (22nd October) I had the great pleasure of a visit
from Bulow. He is going to remain in Florence till the New Year,
and he then begins a categorical concert tour in Vienna, Pest,
Prague, Berlin, Leipzig, and at the end of April goes to London.
His perfect mastery as a virtuoso--in the finest sense of the
word--is in its zenith. To him one might apply Dante's words: "A
master to those who know."

Again my hearty thanks, and wishing you an increase of La Mara's
.--. writings, I remain with much esteem,

Yours very sincerely,

F. Listz

Rome, October 25th, 1871.

In a fortnight's time I travel to Pest.



113. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Dear Sirs,

In order justly to decide the question of plagiarism between
Messrs. Altschul and Joseffy, [Both were pupils of Liszt; the
former is now in Buda-Pest, the latter in New York.] one would
need first of all to compare the manuscripts of the two
disputants. Altschul was kind enough last winter to play me his
version in thirds and sixths of Chopin's "Valse" (in D-flat
major); the other, questionable, version by Joseffy I do not
know. If you think it advisable to send me both versions I am
quite ready to let you have my opinion on the subject. Meanwhile
I will only remark that the multifarious forms of passages in
thirds and sixths--upwards, downwards, to the right, to the left,
or crossing, split up, etc., etc.--admit of a variety of forms of
transcription in thirds and sixths of the Chopin Valse, and hence
Herr Joseffy might quite innocently, in his love of sport as a
virtuoso, have shot down his own bird even within Herr Altschul's
range.

But whether two birds existed must be proved by the "corpus
delicti."

With highest esteem I remain, dear sirs,

Most truly yours,

F. Liszt

Buda-Pest, November 22nd, 1871. (Palatingasse 20.)

P.S.--Herewith is my yearly contribution to the "Bach-
Gesellschaft."--

Allow me to reply, later on, to your kind inquiry in regard to a
pianoforte piece.



114. To Madame A. Rubinstein in St. Petersburg

Madame,

Your talent of observation is as incontestable as your very
charming amiability. With a sagacious eye you observed my
predilection for the silent "compatriot," apparently rather
sombre, but of excellent composition at bottom. [A box of
caviare, which Madame Rubinstein had sent to Liszt.] Doubtless
the advantages which appertain to it in its own right were
peculiarly enhanced by the charm of your salon, where I hope to
see it again and often. Meanwhile, since you are good enough to
favor me with its uninterrupted company, I beg to assure you that
I shall appreciate it even beyond its specific merits, which are
moreover very real. Will you be so good as to renew to Rubinstein
the expression of my old and admiring friendship, and accept,
Madame, the most affectionate thanks and respects of your very
devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Pest, Tuesday, January 9th, 1872



115. To Edmund von Mihalovich

Very Dear Friend,

Your new Song "Du bist wie eine Blume" ["Thou'rt like a tender
flower"] is most welcome, and you have succeeded perfectly with
it. It only remains to add a ninth to this No. 8, so that the
volume may contain the number of the Muses. I hope that you will
shortly bring me this No. 9 yourself, for we want you at the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung (also the ninth), which will be held at
Cassel from the 26th to the 30th June. Your "Geisterschiff"
figures on the programme of the first concert, and Riedel (our
President) will write to you officially to invite you to fill the
post of pilot and captain of your "phantom ship," in other words,
to conduct the orchestra. At the same concert Volkmann's Overture
"Richard III.," Raff's "Waldsymphonie," Rubinstein's Overture to
"Faust" and a new Violin Concerto of Raff will be performed.
Wilhelmj will play the violin part, and I hope that other
soloists of renown will also lend us their assistance. The
programme of this year's Tonkunstler-Versammlung contains,
besides these, a new old piece of goods--the "Elizabeth;" and an
antiquated new one--"The Seven Words of O[ur]. S[aviour].,
composed by Schutz at the end of the sixteenth century, and the
manuscript of which was recently discovered at Cassel itself.

The "Elizabeth" will be given at Erfurt on the 2nd May, and on
the 8th Riedel gives Berlioz's "Requiem" at Leipzig, for the
benefit of our "Beethoven Scholarship." It goes without saying
that I shall be present at these two performances.

.--. Schuberth has been very ill at New York, and is not yet
sufficiently well to set out on his journey. I am expecting him
here towards the middle of June: he will come to Cassel, where we
will settle the little matter of your manuscripts in five
minutes.

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 18th, 1872

My most affectionate thanks to Count Albert Apponyi for his kind
remembrance, with the assurance of my cordial reciprocity.

P.S.--Augusz would give me great pleasure if he would send me a
small provision of Hungarian tobacco (to smoke), for my old
Weimar friend Grosse, the celebrated Trombonist.

Shall you not go to Bayreuth for the 22nd May? I shall invite you
to do so.



116. To Johanna Wenzel

[The lady here addressed was a pupil of Liszt's at the time, and
subsequently married Jules Zarembski, and is at present one of
the teachers of the pianoforte at the Brussels Conservatoire.]

My Dear Young Lady,

In reply to your friendly lines I beg of you earnestly no longer
to think of having the barbarous operation performed upon your
fingers; rather all your life long play every octave and chord
wrong than commit such a mad attack upon your hands.

With best thanks, I subscribe myself yours respectfully,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June l0th, 1872



117. To Wilhelm von Lenz

Very Honored Friend,

I owe you thanks in the 24 major and minor keys for the
remembrance you keep of me, and the ardent style in which you
publish it to the world. Your pamphlet ["Die grossen Pianoforte-
Virtuosen unsrer Zeit" The Great Pianoforte Players of our Day.]
draws down upon itself a capital reproach; it is that you make me
out too grand and too fine. I am far from deserving it, and I
confess it without any false modesty; but since you have been
pleased thus to overwhelm me I can but bow in silence,--and press
your hand.

No one possesses less than myself the talent of talking with the
pen, and the necessity of receiving more than a hundred letters a
month (not counting bills, and the numerous sendings of
manuscript or printed works which I have to read) makes
correspondence again more than difficult for me. It is all I can
do to get through the necessary epistolary work imposed upon
me...Moreover the greater part of the things which are easily
said is indifferent to me, and those that I wish to say resist
ordinary language. On this subject some one well said to me:

"Words seem to me to intercept feeling rather than to express it;
and actions, alas! seem to me sometimes like a thick veil thrown
over our soul: looks even seem to be trammelled by phantom
barriers, and souls which seek one another across the sufferings
of life only find one another--such is my belief--in prayer and
in music."--

What wit, what sallies and what brilliant sparks in your "Quartet
of Pianist Virtuosi!"--Don't let us forget the etymology of the
word "Virtuoso," how it comes from the "Cicerone" in Rome--and
let us reascend to Chopin, the enchanting aristocrat, the most
refined in his magic. Pascal's epigraph, "One must not get one's
nourishment from it, but use it as one would an essence," is only
appropriate to a certain extent. Let us inhale the essence, and
leave it to the druggists to make use of it. You also, I think,
exaggerate the influence which the Parisian salons exercised on
Chopin. His soul was not in the least affected by them, and his
work as an artist remains transparent, marvellous, ethereal, and
of an incomparable genius--quite outside the errors of a school
and the silly trifling of a salon. He is akin to the angel and
the fairy; more than this, he sets in motion the heroic string
which has nowhere else vibrated with so much grandeur, passion
and fresh energy as in his "Polonaises," which you brilliantly
designate as "Pindaric Hymns of Victory."

No need to tell you that I fully share in your admiration and
sympathy for Tausig and Henselt. Do you know Wagner's epigraph
"Fur Carl Tausig's Grab"?

"Reif sein zum Sterben, Des Lebens zogernd spriessende Frucht
Fruh reif sic erwerben, In Lenzes jaherbluhender Flucht--War es
dein Loos, war es dein Wagen: Wir mussen dein Loos wie dein Wagen
beklagen."

[For Carl Tausig's Grave:--"Ripe for Death's harvest, The fruits
of life long tarrying, Full early to pluck them In the fleeting
bloom of spring--Was it thy lot, was it thy bourn? Thy lot and
thy destiny both must we mourn."]

Allow me to be particularly grateful to you for one very
comprehensive expression in your pamphlet (page 4)--"es war
thematisch" [it was thematic]--and accept, dear Lenz, the
expression of my old and very cordial devotion.

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 20th, 1872

In three weeks I return to Hungary, and shall stay there for the
winter. The remainder of my existence will be divided henceforth
between Pest and Weimar. When you return to Berlin (in the
summer) I invite you to come this way.  Are you in touch with the
musical young Russia and its very notable leaders--Messrs.
Balakireff, Cui, and Rimski-Korsakoff? I have lately read several
of their works; they deserve attention, praise and propagation.



118. To Otto Lessmann in Charlottenburg

[Lessmann, a pupil of Bulow's and F. Kiel's, was at one time a
teacher in Tausig's School for the Higher Instruction in
Pianoforte Playing, and is now well known as editor of the
Allgemeine (deutsche) Musikseitung, representing the party of
musical progress with energy and success.]

Very Dear Sir and Friend,

My best thanks for presenting me with your admirable edition of
Bach's "Preludes." Such works are among the pleasant signs of the
musical Present; inasmuch as they will drive away the old jog-
trot style of pianoforte playing. Bulow's edition of Beethoven
outweighs in the matter of instruction a dozen Conservatoires.
And the editions by Kroll and Lebert also deserve praise and
ought to be widely circulated; and to your Bach Preludes I wish
plentiful successors in the "Suites," "Inventions" and
"Variations" (especially the 30 in G major) of grand old Herr
Johann Sebastian--of Eisenach.

Allow me also to add that reading over your Songs enables me more
and more thoroughly to enjoy them when I hear them--intelligent
singers shall be found for them--and accept, dear friend, the
expression of my sincere esteem and affection.

F. Liszt

Eisenach, September 26th, 1872



119. To Eduard von Liszt

Horpacs, November 6th, 1872

Dearest Eduard,

My stay here has been somewhat prolonged, and I shall not reach
Pest till next Sunday.

Szechenyi's [Count Szechenyi was Austrian ambassador in Berlin up
to 1892.] residence here is most decidedly pleasant and
convenient, without noise. In the chapel attached to the house,
the house-chaplain (a cultured and estimable priest) daily reads
Mass. At table an old house-physician, Dr. M., contributes a good
deal to the entertainment. Among other amusing things he said one
day: "As to the cholera, no one knows anything definite about it
yet except myself, for I have fathomed its nature. And its nature
consists solely and wholly...of nothing but cholera!"

The day before yesterday we drove with Szechenyi and Mihalovich
to Raiding, [Liszt's birthplace.] in less than two hours. A Herr
Wittgenstein (probably an Israelite), who lives in Vienna, now
rents this Esterhazy estate, and sublets it again. I found no
perceptible changes in the house where I was born since my last
visit there 24 years ago. The peasants recognised me at once,
came to pay me their respects at the inn, and rang the church
bell as we drove away.

.--. I wrote to Kahnt from here that he was to send you
immediately the 9 "Kirchen-Chorgesange" and my Mass for men's
voices ("Editio nova").

The three Patronatsscheine [tickets of membership] for the
Nibelung performance in Bayreuth (Bayern. N.B.--The King has
commanded that henceforth Baiern [Bavaria] shall be spelt with a
y), and your letter to Herr Feustel, please attend to without
delay.

All cordial greetings to you and yours--from your faithfully
attached

F. Liszt

Augusz I shall meet in Pest-Ofen.

Give Bosendorfer my friendly greetings, and at the same time tell
him how I praise the excellent piano upon which I have been
practising a little here.

If Zumbusch goes to Vienna, commission him--as we arranged--to
make a bust of me in marble and a pedestal for Bosendorfer.



120. To Princess Caroline Sayn-Wittgenstein

[Printed by "order" in the Signale, 1873 (after the death of
Napoleon), in which form the letter is reproduced here, as the
original could not be procured. This letter does not indeed show
us Liszt as a far-sighted politician, but simply as a man of
noble impulses.]

Pest, January 10th, 1873

Napoleon III. is dead! A great soul, an all-embracing
intelligence, experienced in the wisdom of life, a gentle and
noble character--with a disastrous fate! He was a bound and
gagged Caesar, but still closely related to the Divine Caesar who
was the ideal embodiment of earthly power. In the year 1861, when
I had a pretty long interview with Napoleon, he said, "Sometimes
it seems to me as if I were over a hundred years old." I replied,
"You are the century yourself, Sire!"--And, in fact, I honestly
believed at the time, and do so still, that Napoleon's reign was
the one most in keeping with the requirements and advances of our
era. He has set noble examples, and accomplished or undertaken
great deeds: amnesties which were more complete under him than
under other governments; the protection of the Church in Rome and
in other countries; the rejuvenescence of Paris and other great
cities in France; the Crimean war and the Italian war; the great
Paris Exhibition, and the rise of local exhibitions; the earnest
attention paid to the lot and to the interests of the country
people, and of the working classes; the generosity and
encouragement to scholars and artists,--all these things are
historical facts, and are things in which the Emperor took the
initiative, and which he carried out in spite of all the
difficulties that stood in his way.

These things will not be eclipsed by the misfortunes that befell
him, however terrible these may have been, and, on the day of
judgment, France will fetch the coffin of Napoleon III. and place
it in all honor beside that of Napoleon I. It can be affirmed
without adulation that throughout life the Emperor unswervingly
practised those great virtues which are in reality one and the
same thing and are known by the names of benevolence, goodness,
generosity, nobility of mind, love of splendor and munificence.
One of the fine traits of his character that he is acknowledged
to have possessed, was his never-failing kindheartedness and his
deep gratitude towards those persons who had ever done him a
service. In all humility and lowliness of spirit I will imitate
him in this, and begin with himself by blessing his memory and
addressing my prayers for him to the God of Mercy who has so
ordered things that nations may-recover from their wounds. .--.



121. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

Long since you ought to have heard from me...However, I have not
been altogether idle, and during the last weeks have been busy
blackening some sheets of music paper which you shall see in
print and hear me play. Bosendorfer heard some of it last night,
and will bring you word about it to Pest. Be good enough to pay
Zumbusch a visit, and beg him to have my bust done in good
marble, and to have it finished and ready by the 2nd April
(Franciscus di Paula). I intend to spend this name-day of mine
with you quietly, [This was an established custom of Liszt's for
many years, and one to which--even after his cousin's death--he
adhered, and spent the day with the family up to the time of his
death.] and to take the bust to Bosendorfer "in persona."

I am told that the Gran Mass is to be performed on Easter Sunday
in Pressburg. If so, we will go there together to hear it, with
your wife, Marie [Eduard von Liszt's daughter, now Baroness Saar
in Vienna.] and Franz.

As to the Bayreuth affair, I have already told you what my wish
and will is. It must remain thus. .--.

Probably Cosima will be going to Vienna in February.

God's blessing abide with you and yours. Thine, with all my
heart,

F. Liszt

Pest, January 13th, 1873



122. To Dr. Emil Thewrewk von Ponor, Professor at the University
of Budapest.

[A classical philologist who published a little Hungarian work
entitled "Die ungarische Rhythmik," the German edition of which
was to be dedicated to Liszt. The two men differed in their
opinion respecting the origin of Hungarian music; however, in
consequence of Von Ponor's contribution to the subject, Liszt did
in the end agree with the proof Von Ponor brought forward--with
this reservation, that "the gypsies did bring harmony into
Hungarian music," a point which--Ponor thinks--"may readily be
conceded."]

Much-Esteemed and Dear Herr Professor,

I regret that my reply to your request about the Elizabeth-motive
can only be somewhat unsatisfactory. It was sent to me together
with some others--referring to Saint Elizabeth--about 13 years
ago, by Mosonyi and Baron Augusz, and the Hungarian text is
published in the concluding notice to the score of my Oratorio. A
copy of the "Lyra Coelestis" I did not need; probably this (to me
unknown) printed work will be readily found here, and is sure to
be in the Library of the Martinsberg monastery.

If not inconvenient to you I should be glad to receive the honor
of a visit from you; it would interest me greatly to hear of and
to become acquainted with your researches concerning Hungarian
rhythmic forms.

Meanwhile I thank you warmly for your friendly lines, and for
communicating the Volkslied in the 5/4 time:--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt]

Yours with much esteem and sincerely,

F. Liszt

Pest, January 14th, 1873



123. To Dr. Franz Witt

January 20th, 1873

Much-Esteemed Friend,

At New Year I sent you a copy of the Stabat Mater by Palestrina
"for the lecture arranged by R. Wagner." The inaccuracies and
errors of this copy I have carefully corrected, for in such a
masterly and exemplary arrangement every iota is of importance.
Wagner gave me his manuscript 18 years ago in Zurich, and forgot
afterwards where it was. As regards its publication, which is
much to be desired, it is not for me to interfere in the matter
in any way, and I beg you to come to some understanding with
Wagner about it. If he should wish to correct his old manuscript
(the paper of which has become rather yellowish) I will gladly
place it at his service.



124. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

Having considered the matter about the certificate of death which
Rothschild wished to have, I shall not make use of Belloni in
connection with it. If Emile Ollivier were still in Paris it
would be his place to procure the certificate. My dear good
mother died in his house (Rue St. Guillaume, Faubourg St.
Germain) at the beginning of January 1866. He looked after her
and took tender care of her for several years; and finally had
her body taken to the Church of St. Thomas d'Aquin for the
funeral service, and followed it thence to its last resting-place
in the cemetery of Montparnasse. This noble conduct and his
speech at the grave I cherish in my innermost heart.

Since the winter of 1866 I have never been back in Paris, and my
relations with trustworthy persons there are as good as entirely
broken off. Hence I yesterday went and got good advice from
friend Augusz, and have accepted his proposal, namely, to address
a request to Count Alexander Apponyi--son of and Secretary to the
Austrian ambassador in Paris--to procure the certificate of death
of my mother and to send it to you. Let Rothschild know of this
matter, which, let us hope, will soon be satisfactorily settled.

Many thanks for the trouble you are taking about the bust by
Zumbusch, and which I very much wish personally to present to
Bosendorfer in Vienna as an Easter egg. I know I can rely wholly
upon your ever faithful and incomparable readiness to do me a
favor.

Allow me one other request, which will cost you only half an
hour's time and a visit. The visit is to an extremely
interesting, learned and distinguished man--Dr. Ambros, formerly
Imperial Solicitor-General in Prague, now professor and
referendary to the Officielle Zeitung in Vienna, always an
eminent writer on aesthetics, history, the history of music, a
polygraphist, composer--in fact, a good friend of mine. Be kind
enough to tell him that I am awaiting his answer in the
affirmative, respecting a lecture by him on Robert Franz at the
extra Soiree arranged in honor of and for the benefit of Robert
Franz; Dr. Ambros was at my request respectfully invited by Herr
Dunkl ("Firma Roszavolgyi") to give us his assistance. I take
part too as pianist, collector and arranger of the Soiree, and
hope that Dr. Ambros--who is so specially competent for the task,
owing to his eloquent and valuable treatise on Robert Franz--will
give us brilliant assistance, and give us a speech there without
talking himself out. The warmest welcome and appreciation will
await him on all sides. But obtain his kind consent as soon as
possible, together with a written yea to Dunkl (Musikverlag
Roszavolgyi, Christoph-Platz, Pest).

Heartiest greetings to your wife and children, and au revoir on
the 2nd April.

Thine,

F. Liszt

Pest, January 28th, 1873



125. To Eduard von Liszt

My Dearest Friend,

Zumbusch's letter seems to me pretty comforting, and if you would
have the kindness to write to him again I hope the bust will
reach Vienna by April 1st. Have you asked what it costs? If not
do so in your next letter. Of course I do not mean to bargain
with Zumbusch (that is a thing I do only in case of dire
necessity--and even then am a bad hand at it). We must simply pay
what he asks, and leave ourselves to his friendly feelings of
moderation, which will not fail...

In spite of all your endeavors and persuasive powers Dr. Ambros
is not coming to the Robert Franz Soiree in Pest. He wrote to
Dunkl that he is unusually busy in Vienna with urgent affairs
connected with the Zeitung--and hence cannot find any time to
prepare an address--and besides this is afraid of taking cold on
the journey...To all this we can raise no remonstrance, so I must
just accept this refusal of Ambros, much as I should have liked a
different answer. Some day I will tell you the preliminaries of
this business. Last week I received from Freiherr Suttner,
President of the Vienna Singakademie and Imperial Chamberlain, an
invitation to play a few pianoforte pieces in the concert
arranged for Robert Franz's benefit. I replied that an interval
of 25 years separated me from my last public appearance as a
pianist, andthat I considered it advisable for me to remain
within the interval. As I told you last October, it is not my
intention to officiate in any way this winter in Vienna.

Herewith I send you an extract from the sitting of the Chamber of
the day before yesterday, the result of which is almost as
unexpected as it is important. The deputies of the conservative
party and of the opposition voted almost unanimously in favor of
raising the funds for establishing a new Musik-Akademie. And an
unusual honor was conferred upon me on the occasion,--for,
although I have never come forward in the matter, it was
nevertheless brought forward in my name, and this certainly puts
rather a heavy burden upon me. I will endeavor conscientiously to
do justice to the honor as well as the burden. For the last
couple of days a stupid feverish cold in the head has kept me in
bed. Tomorrow, however, I shall be up and about again.

Faithfully thine,

F. Liszt

Pest, February 10th, [1873]



126. To Eduard von Liszt

My Dear Friend,

Bosendorfer brings you tidings of the Robert Franz Soiree of
yesterday. [At this soiree Liszt played Beethoven's A-flat major
Sonata, Op. 26, No, 4; his own "Soirees de Vienne" (after F.
Schubert); Schumann's "Wie aus der Ferne"; and R. Franz's
"Lied."] In a fortnight's time I shall have a similar work before
me as pianoforte player, at a charity concert which Countess Anna
Zichy is patronising. Then follows, further, a matinee of the
Liszt-Verein at the Stadtpfarrei [The town parsonage], and the
performance of Witt's Mass, of which I undertake the conducting
on the 25th March (in the church). At the beginning of April I
shall be with you.

Heartfelt greetings to you and yours    from your faithful

F. Liszt

[Pest] March 3rd, 1873



127. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Dear, Excellent Friend,

Your ideas are always very wise, practical and noble; I
participate in them beforehand, and esteem myself happy to have
them communicated to me direct. With regard to Robert Franz's
little capital, I presume that his zealous friends have already
taken decisive measures; on my return to Weimar (before the end
of April) I will learn whether it is possible to carry out your
idea...You know that a thousand thalers have been sent from here,
the result of a soiree arranged in Franzs honor. Perhaps I shall
find an opportunity to send him more soon.--

Walter Bache writes me word of his "Ninth Annual Concert" in
London, with my 13th Psalm. Bache behaves "eroicamente" with
regard to me, and takes rank in the very small group of my
friends who are the most determined to show the public--in spite
of the contrary opinion, much believed by influential papers--
that my music is not absolutely void of sense. I should like to
make the task of these friends a little easier, and I try not to
increase the merit of their devotion by my faults.

Enclosed is the programme of the concert of our friend Mihalovich
yesterday evening. "Romeo and Juliet" was encored, and the
"Geisterschiff" did not founder. The audience, very aristocratic,
was more select than numerous, which is a good sign for our
friend. Item the squashing of some learned articles in the
papers.

Will you kindly give my grateful acknowledgments to Mr.
Hillebrand for his friendly remembrance, and for sending me his
new volume on the French? I had read bits of it in the Augsburg
Gazette, and shall take a double pleasure in reading the entire
work. Hillebrand, like Alexander von Humboldt, has a passionate
attachment to France;--I am proud to feel that I am in accord
with him also on this point.

The day after tomorrow I shall be in Vienna, and shall spend a
fortnight with my near relative and friend Eduard Liszt. After
that I return to Weimar, and hope to see you there in the summer.
I will write to you in good time about the performance of the
Oratorio Christus...

Respectful homage and cordial friendship,

F. Liszt

Pest, March 30th, 1873



128. To Casar Cui

[Russian composer and musical critic.]

Sir,

Pray excuse my delay in thanking you for your very kind letter
that Mr. Bessel brought me with the piano score of your Opera
William Ratcliff. It is the work of a master who deserves
consideration, renown and success, as much for the wealth and
originality of the ideas as for the skilful handling of the form.
As I am persuaded that all intelligent and honest musicians will
be of this opinion, I should like to add to it some assurance on
the next performance of your Ratcliff in Germany. It should be
done at once at Weimar were I in active function at the theater
as in the preceding years (from 1848 to '59); but since my
retirement I am not any longer in a position to take definite
steps, and must confine myself to recommendations--more often
counteracted than followed.

Accept, sir, my sincere thanks, and with every expression of high
esteem I am, yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May, 1873



129. To Franz Servais.

Dear Monsieur Franz,

My best wishes accompany you "into your cage." [This usually
means "in durance vile," but the word "cage" is preserved here on
account of the context.--Trans.] You do well to put yourself
there, and, if the flight of your genius should find itself
somewhat trammelled, for the time being, before the tribunal of
counterpoint and fugue, it will soar all the more proudly
afterwards. I hope you will come out of your cage glorious and
crowned; in case of bad luck do not be too much disappointed;
more skilful and more valuable men than you and I, dear Franz,
have had to have patience, and to have patience yet again. M. de
Buffon, when he said "genius is patience," did but make the
mistake of an incomplete definition; he took a part for the
whole; but that part is absolutely necessary in the practice of
Art, as in that of earthly life.

Please remember me very affectionately to your mother; give a
shake of the hand to your brother from me,--and depend ever on my
devoted and affectionate feelings.

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 5th, 1873



130. To the Canoness Adelheid von Schorn

Dear Excellent One,

My little travelling plans have been upset by a letter from
Cosima. I did not stop either at Salzungen (where I had arranged
to meet Schuberth) or at Meiningen, and came straight here on
Saturday, in accordance with an invitation from Cosima to a
little fete of the workpeople of the theater of the Nibelungen.

Many idle and gossiping people everywhere are troubling their
heads about this theater, and are asking when and how it will be
finished building. Instead of descanting foolishly or maliciously
about it (the two things sometimes go together), it would be
better to get a "Patronats-Schein" [a receipt of membership], and
thus to join in the grandest and most sublime work of art of the
century. The glory of having created, written and published it is
Wagner's intact; his detractors have only to share the disgrace
of having thwarted it and delayed the bringing of it to the full
light of day, by performance.--

Next week I go to Schillingsfurst, and towards the middle of
August I shall be back at Weimar.

A thousand very cordially affectionate and devoted regards.

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, July 30th, 1873



131. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

After an absence of 3 weeks I returned here yesterday. I remained
first to days in Bayreuth, from August 26th to September 5th,
[The dates here ought certainly to be from July 26th to August
5th--as Liszt's letter is dated the 19th of August.] and then the
same length of time in Schillingsfurst (with Cardinal Hohenlohe)
and at Langenburg (with Prince Hermann Hohenlohe), whither I had
the honor of accompanying the Cardinal.

Cosima, Wagner and the five children are in the best of health.
The building of the Nibelungen-Theater is progressing famously;
if the necessary sum of 300,000 thalers [some 45,000 pounds] of
which as yet only about 130,000 have been forthcoming, is got
together in time, the performance of the "Festival
Drama"--"The Ring of the Nibelung"--is to take place in the
summer of '75.

.--. Simultaneously with his theater, Wagner is building a
beautiful and exquisitely situated house close to the Hofgarten.
The King of Bavaria has given him 20,000 thalers [some 3,000
pounds] for this. Next spring Wagner will take up his abode
there.

My intercourse with Cardinal Hohenlohe is always pleasant. He
leads a very retired life in Schillingsfurst, receives but few
visits and pays only a few, and occupies himself principally in
building and arranging a large schoolhouse and an institution for
girls under the superintendence of a Benedictine Sisterhood.

Great festivities are being arranged here in honor of the
marriage of the Hereditary Grand Duke. On September 6th the entry
of the bridal pair, on the 7th a Court concert, on the 8th a
Festival-play by Devrient in the theater and a performance of
Beethoven's 9th Symphony, etc., etc. I have undertaken to conduct
the Symphony and also to play a couple of pianoforte pieces at
the Court concert. A second Festival-play, entitled "The Bride's
Welcome to the Wartburg," written by Scheffel and set to music by
me, is to be given on September 2lSt in the Minnesanger Hall in
the Wartburg, where you heard the "Elizabeth" Oratorio.

A few days after this I shall travel to Rome, and remain there 3
or 4 weeks. Before the end of October I shall come to you again
for a couple of days before returning to Pest on November 1st.

The dedication-copies of the "Szoszat" and the "Hymnus" for Count
Andrassy are not yet ready, it seems. Roszavolgyi (Dunkl) has
sent me only a fete ordinary copies of the pianoforte version,
and not one of the score. I shall therefore have to wait till
November before sending or presenting it to Count Andrassy.

From the Grand Duchess I received 1,000 thalers--but these
together with your 500 have all been spent. Be so good as to send
me another 300 thalers next week! For my journey to Rome I shall
probably, towards the middle of September, again have to ask you
for a note of 500 francs. Although I do not go in for any
luxuries, money vanishes quickly and readily in my hands.

Heartiest greetings to your wife and children, and au revoir in
Vienna at the end of October.

Faithfully thine,

F. Liszt

Weimar, August l0th, 1873



132. To Franz Servais

Dear Victorious One,

Your letter had been travelling several days in Bavaria before it
reached me here yesterday morning. I thank you for letting me
take an affectionate part in the success you have obtained, and I
wish to keep that part throughout your future successes--and even
failures. The latter will not do you any great harm, provided
that you know how to keep that attachment to work, and that
perseverance in noble ideas, which are the chief heirloom of the
artist.  Lassen tells me that we are shortly to hear your "Tasso"
here: my attentive sympathy is wide awake; so fulfil your
promise, dear Franz, by coming before the end of this month, and
we will talk at our ease at the Hofgartnerei of our aims and
plans.

Please give my respects to your mother, and my cordial
remembrances to Joseph and Godebski.

Your affectionate and devoted

F. Liszt

Weimar, August 19th, 1873



133. To Walter Bache

Dear Friend,

Often I am behindhand and stop short of thanks with you, but it
is certainly not for want of sincere affection and esteem.

Your "9th Annual Concert" has again shown the worth of your
talents and the firm constancy of your character. Now in our
artistic world character is still more rare than talent.

You nobly unite the two; it is a pleasure to me to acknowledge
it, and to count you amongst the most devoted champions of
progress and of musical good sense.

At their head, by right of age and capability, walks
imperturbably and gloriously Hans de Bulow.

Will you give him the enclosed letter? and believe me ever, dear
Bache,

Your very cordially affectionate

F. Liszt

Weimar, August 20th, 1873



134. To Max Erdmannsdorfer, Hofcapellmeister in Sonderhausen

[At present Capellmeister in Bremen; he has rendered good service
to the cause of the New-German musical tendency both in Germany
and Russia.]

Very Dear Herr Capellmeister,

Your friendly invitation for me to attend the performance of your
"Schneewittchen" I am unfortunately unable to accept. Owing to
the festivities at the Wartburg it is impossible for me to get
away next week. Will you kindly convey to the Princess Elizabeth
my regrets as well as my most gracious thanks?

On Sunday, September 28th, I shall have the pleasure of thanking
you personally in Sondershausen for arranging and carrying out
the extraordinary concert programme. It is my special wish that
the two "Faust Episodes" should not be separated--even at the
risk of wearying the public for a few minutes with the
"Nachtlicher Zug." [Two Episodes from Lenau's Faust (Leipzig,
Schuberth).] But this piece does not appear to me altogether so
bad...

I beg you again to repeat my sincere praise to the Sondershausen
artists who played so admirably here last Monday in the 9th
Symphony, and remain, very dear Sir, with marked feelings of
esteem,

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 16th, 1873

Kahnt, Gille, J. Schuberth, Lassen and several other friends of
mine are going to attend the Sondershausen concerts on the 28th
and 29th September.

The Weimar presentation I will bring you.



135. To Otto Lessmann

Dear Friend,

Best thanks for sending Kiel's "Christus"--a work full of
spiritual substance, of noble and fine sentiments, and masterly
in execution. Riedel proposes to give a performance of it next
winter it Leipzig.

With such a clause as Joachim introduces for the "Novitaten-
Concerten"--"that only such composers shall be taken into
consideration in the programmes whose renown as artistic
representatives of the German nation is established"--Handel,
Bach, Mozart, nay even Beethoven, would have come off badly in
their life-time!

Whether it is appropriate for the Berlin Hochschule to act in so
specially a high and mighty manner remains to be seen. Still it
is to be expected that such procedure is likely itself to meet
with some other restricting "clauses."

Of the arrangement for 8 hands of the Pastorale and March [From
Liszt's Oratorio "Christus."] which I wish to have from you, you
will have already heard from Schuberth. Likewise from Kahnt of
the couple of pieces from the "Elizabeth."

Au revoir on Sunday, the 28th September, in Sondershausen, where
we shall have a curious (sonderliches) Programme. Receive
herewith, dear friend, a special invitation, together with the
assurance of my friendly attachment.

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 24th, 1873

I shall bring you back your copy of Kiel's Christus to
Sondershausen.



136. To Kornel von Abranyi

Dear Valiant Friend,

Your letter, and the printed paper of great fame which
accompanies it, recalls to me the saying, "La joie fait peur."
[Abranyi, who was the Secretary of the Festival Committee which
had been formed for the celebration of Liszt's Artist-Jubilee in
November 1873 at Budapest, had in their name invited Liszt to
take part in this.] Nevertheless I could not suit myself to the
role of a coward; I will therefore endeavor to surmount my fear
and to make myself worthy to share with my brave compatriots in
the joy they have prepared for me.

I beg you, in your capacity of secretary of the Festival
Committee, to present my most grateful thanks, in good Hungarian,
to the most illustrious and most reverend President, Monseigneur
Haynald, [The Archbishop of Kalocsa, afterwards Cardinal, Liszt's
friend of many years. (Being interested in the present
collection, he promised to contribute to it the letters addressed
to him "by the great artist and noble man." His death
unfortunately prevented the fulfilment of his promise, and the
Archiepiscopal Chapter of Kalocsa did not accede to the request
of the editor to be allowed to have these letters.)] and to the
members of the Committee.

Baron Augusz had written me word that he would come here in the
middle of September, to be present at the "Festspiel" [Festival
Play] at the Wartburg. He shall soon receive news from me from
Rome, where I shall arrive on Sunday.  Schuberth is sending you
the score and the piano score of the "Christ," together with the
biographical notices for which you asked me. My cousin Eduard
will send you the "postscript" immediately.

Cordial friendship and fruitful collaboration.

F. Liszt

Weimar, October 1st, 1873

Herewith the programmes of the 2 concerts at Sondershausen at
which I was present. This afternoon I start for Rome,--and on the
1st November shall be at Pest.



137. To Martha Remmert

[A pupil of Liszt's; became later Kammervirtuosin (court-pianist)
in Weimar, and lives now in Berlin.]

Pest, December 27th, 1873

Dear Fraulein,

The best "solution" in reply to the ministerial order lies in
your hands. Merely play the first page of Henselt's Concerto and
no one will doubt that I am very kindly disposed towards you. And
I shall be glad to render you further service in your zeal for
study and your ambition as a virtuosa. No matter whether I be in
Pest or in Weimar.

In all friendliness yours,

F. Liszt



138. To ?

[Autograph without address or date in the possession of Count
Albert Amadei in Vienna.--According to him the letter belongs to
the year 1873.]

Very dear Fraulein,

Please reply at once per telegram:--"Please do not come.--Liszt
does not need or wish to be heard, as he has no one for whom he
must strike up."

Tomorrow evening more by word of mouth.

Sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

Monday



139. To Countess Marie Dunhoff in Vienna

[Sketch of a letter in the possession of Herr O. A. Schulz,
bookseller in Leipzig.--The addressee, the wife of the German
ambassador Von Bulow, lives now in Bucharest.]

[Beginning of January, 1874]

Dear Countess,

You speak to me so eloquently of the merit, talent and
superiority of Madame L.B. that I am quite ashamed of not
fulfilling her wish subito. But in reality that would be more
difficult than she imagines; a "petit morceau de piano" would
only be a small part of the matter; the public is a very exacting
master, even in its days of favor; the more it gives the more it
expects...

Half a dozen such requests as that of Madame L.B. have been
addressed to me at Vienna this week. How can one suffice for such
a business, which, be it said in passing, is at once outside and
far beyond my duties?--At my age one must try to behave
reasonably, and to avoid excess; I shall therefore limit myself
in Vienna to the one concert of the "Kaiser Franz Joseph
Stiftung," [Emperor Francis Joseph Scholarship] which reasons of
great propriety, easy to understand, have led me to accept with
alacrity. I am told that it will take place on Sunday, 11th
January; so be it: I shall willingly conform to the arrangements
of the Committee and have no other wish in this matter than...not
to inconvenience anybody. [The concert for the "Emperor Francis
Joseph Scholarship" did not take place till April; and Liszt did
actually play, in the Easter week, for the Countess's protegee,
though not in the Concert Room, but in the Palais Auersperg.]

Permit me to hope, dear Countess, that you will not, under the
pretext of "discretion," inflict upon me the immense punishment
of seeing you less often this time than formerly, and that you
will not retract any of your kindness, on which I place the
greatest store.

A thousand and a thousand sincere and most respectfully devoted
expressions of homage.

F. Liszt



140. To B. Bessel, Music Publisher in St. Petersburg

Horpacs (Chez le Comte Szechenyi), February 2nd, 1874.

Dear Sir,

Pray excuse me for being so late in thanking you,--you and all
those who signed the telegram sent to Pest on the occasion of my
jubilee fete. I am deeply touched with the noble sentiments it
expresses with a chivalrous eloquence, and beg you to convey the
tribute of my most sincere gratitude to Messrs. Balakireff,
Borodine, Cui, Moussorsky, Rimski-Korsakoff, Scherbatcheff, and
Stassoff.

You were kind enough, Sir, to let me see several of their works
at Weimar; I appreciate and esteem them highly, and as far as
depends on myself I will do all I can to make them known, and
shall feel honored thus to respond to the sympathetic kindness
which brave colleagues such as these accord to

Their very devoted

F. Liszt



141. To Professor Skiwa in Vienna

[Printed in the Signale, 1874, No. 20.--Skiwa had dedicated his
"Beitrage zur Literatur des Harmoniums" ("Contribution to
Harmonium Literature") to Liszt.]

Very Dear Sir,

Kindly excuse the delay in my sending you my sincere thanks,
which I shall very shortly take the liberty of expressing to you
personally in Vienna. I shall then also ask you to do me the
favor of making me more intimately acquainted with your excellent
transcriptions. In reading them through one at once observes the
author's masterly style and his care and artistic handling of the
characteristic peculiarities of the harmonium, especially in the
management of the basses and the mid-voice parts. But still the
mere reading your transcriptions does not satisfy me, and I
should like to hear them, so as to be able fully to enjoy them.

Herr Bosendorfer will bring you the manuscript of the
"Consolation," the dedication of which is very acceptable to me.
The transcription of this small piece into A major appears to me
very appropriate, and the arrangement excellent.

With marked esteem and friendly thanks,

F. Liszt

Pest, March 2lst, 1874



142. TO C. F. Kahnt, the Music Publisher

[Published in the Neue Zeitung fur Musik, 14th September, 1892.]

Dear Friend,

The day after tomorrow I again go to Vienna, and remain there
about a week. In case the "Prometheus" proofs are ready send them
to me to my usual address ("Schottenhof bei Hofrath E. v. Liszt")
by the middle of Easter week; after that my address will be
rather uncertain, as I intend spending a few days in Pressburg
and Kalocsa (with Archbishop Haynald), and do not return here
till after April 20th. Hence, if the "Prometheus" proofs are not
ready within the next few days, do not send them till after my
return to Pest (April 21).

Please send the proofs of Mihalovich's songs as soon as possible
to the composer, addressed to

"Servitenplatz, im Teleky'schen Haus."

The Vienna concert in the "Palais Auersperg" is announced for
Easter Monday, April 6th. The following Sunday, or at latest on
Sunday the 19th April, the concert of the "Kirchenmusik-Verein"
is to be given in Pressburg, at which I take a part in piano-
playing--it is to be hoped for the last time this year!--

I think of remaining here from April 2lst to the beginning of
May, and then of wandering straightway to Rome, and to the Villa
d'Este.

I wish you in all friendliness a happy Easter, with satisfactory
business at the Easter's fair, and remain your sincerely attached

F. Liszt

Pest, March 29th, 1874

Have you sent Countess Oriolla the omitted copy of the "Wartburg
Songs"?



143. To Dr. Franz Witt

[1874?]

I look forward with eager interest to the realisation of your
scheme to found a Catholic School of Music. The numerous and
important services you have rendered as composer, conductor,
teacher, promoter and president of the Cacilien-Verein proclaim
and mark you as pre-eminently fitted to organize and direct this
highly important kind of School. I should wish that Hungary, my
fatherland, might set a good example, and might offer you, my
very dear friend, an honorable and influential post in the Musik-
Akademie that was voted for last year in the Chamber. This wish
of mine was seconded with cordiality by His Eminence the Cardinal
Primate, His Excellency the Archbishop of Kalocsa, Haynald, and
H. E. Trefort, the Minister of Public Instruction. Various
political circumstances interfered with the plan of starting a
Musik-Akademie in Pest; but the idea has by no means been given
up, and I have still the hope that you may yet at some future day
be called upon to give your powerful assistance in connection
with the teaching and practice of Church music in Hungary.



144. To Professsor Carl Riedel

Dear Friend,

As at all preceding Tonkunstler-Versammlungen, you have again
this year in Brunswick done the best that was possible. [The
Meeting took place in Halle, instead of in Brunswick.] Five
concerts sound almost alarming, but the programmes are drawn up
and arranged with so much forethought and care that your master-
hand and that indescribable "with avec" (as dear Frau Dr. Pohl
called it) are at once to be recognised. It certainly was
advisable to check the "democratic movements" of the orchestra
without interfering with the well-meant "command." That the
Sondershausen set continue to prove themselves reliable and
friendly I am delighted to hear. I wish all possible success to
Erdmannsdorfer's "Schneewittchen." The youthful and captivating
Frau Kapellmeisterin Erdmannsdorfer is especially capable of
doing justice to Raff's Trio (or Concerto) and other pianoforte
pieces. [Pauline Fichtner, who married Erdmannsdorfer, was a
pupil of Liszt's, and became court-pianist at Weimar and Hesse.]

Will Bulow be able to be present? We have not written to each
other for some time past. Do you know where to address him just
now?

In case my Faust Symphony is given at the 5th concert (as your
programme announces), I beg you to ask Bulow to be conductor.
This work has become his property since he conducted it so
magnificently at the Weimar Tonkunstler-Versammlung ('61), when
the whole orchestra was amazed and astounded at his fabulous
memory. You will remember that not only did he not use a score,
but at the rehearsal referred to the numberless letters and
double letters with unerring accuracy.

With regard to two other matters I wish: A, that Steinway may
have the kindness to lend one of his excellent harmoniums for the
Hunnenschlacht, and that the instrument may be so placed as to be
invisible to the public and yet distinctly heard. B, that the
performance of the Sanctus from the Mass for men's voices be
taken from the editio nova (published a few years ago by Hartel),
and not from the earlier edition. Here, too, Steinway's harmonium
would render excellent service, visible and placed close to the
chorus. Perhaps our friend Stade would have the kindness to play
the harmonium part of the Hunnenschlacht and of the Sanctus.--

I truly regret that I shall not be able to hear that sublime,
grand and overpowering Requiem by Berlioz, nor to attend the
Musical Festival in Brunswick. I am physically and mentally very
exhausted, and need several months' rest; besides my remaining
away from Weimar forbids me from meanwhile visiting any other
German towns.--Before the middle of May I shall go direct to
Rome, and remain there till the end of the year in my former
residence at the Villa d'Este (3-1/2 hours from Rome).

With friendly greetings to your wife, I remain, Yours ever in
esteem and sincere attachment,

F. Liszt.

Pest, April 17th, 1874

Accept my best thanks for cancelling my promise to Metzdorff (in
regard to the performance of his Symphony).

I agree perfectly, of course, with your desideria fog the Musik-
Verein, and hope next year to be able to contribute something
towards their realisation.

"In patientia vestra possidebitis animas vestras."

To Kahnt I wrote at once on my return from Pressburg on Monday.



145. To Dom-Capellmeister [Cathedral Conductor] Dr. Franz Haberl
in Ratisbon

[This letter, like the subsequent one to Haberl, is a copy of the
draft of a letter of Liszt's by Dr. Mirus in Weimar.--Haberl is a
distinguished musical scholar (born in 1840).]

[1874?]

Pardon me if I again come with claims upon your kindness. You may
know that I am working at an Oratorio on St. Stanislaus, and
perhaps might be able to give me some assistance with it by
communicating to me the liturgic hymns referring to the feast of
St. Stanislaus. The Enchyrydion and Directorium Chori designate
the Mass, Protexisti, etc., on May 7th. To receive fuller
information from you on this point would greatly oblige me.
[Haberl also gave Liszt aural communications regarding the
Stanislaus legend. "On one occasion," says Haberl, "Liszt was
specially and greatly delighted to hear of the man whom
Stanislaus summoned out of the grave as a witness that the field
had been paid for, and gave me a sketch of his proposed motives
and tone pictures."]

Pray accept, reverend Sir and friend, the expression of my marked
esteem, and believe me yours gratefully and sincerely,

F. Liszt



146. To Professsor Carl Riedel

Dear Friend,

Herzogenberg's [Formerly Director of the Leipzig Bach-Verein,
then Kiel's successor at the Berlin Hochschule, which post he
lately resigned.] "Deutsches Liederspiel pleases me very much.
The very first chorus with its mixed species of tempi 6/4-3/2 and
6/4-3/2 is fresh and pithy, and the whole work seems to me.
excellent, pleasant and effective. Hence I should much like to
recommend its being performed.

Where does Herzogenberg live? Has he any appointment anywhere?
Let me know, when you can, something of his former and present
work.

(N.B.--It would be worth while, later, carefully to arrange the
"Deutsches Liederspiel" for orchestra.)

I observe with special pleasure that Grutzmacher has chosen a
Suite of St. Saens'. St. Saens will not, however, be able to
come,--the less so as a few years ago his appearance in quite a
harmless concert in Baden-Baden brought down upon him hideous
rebukes and reproaches from the Parisian Press. And the tone in
France is not yet more temperate; still it is right that German
artists should prove themselves fair and just towards foreigners,
and, as long as Auber's and Gounod's Operas are given in all
German theaters, I see no good reason against considering and
performing other works by French composers. Among modern
composers I regard St. Saens as the ablest and most gifted.

I am much satisfied with the choice you have made of my things,
dear friend, and thank you cordially for it--at the same time I
must express my sincere regret that I am unable to attend the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung, and remain, with much esteem, yours most
sincerely,

F. Liszt

Pest, May 5th, 1874



147. To Princess Julie Waldburg at Castle Wurzach

Madame La Princesse,

I feel that I am quite inexcusable. You have been so kind as to
send me some charming Lieder, and to accompany them with the most
gracious lines in the world. How could I fail to thank you for
them immediately? What rusticity!--Deign to think of this no
longer, Princess; and permit me not to "judge" your songs,--
magisterial competency would fail me utterly,--but to tell you
that I have read them with much pleasure. The one of which the
style and impassioned accent please me particularly is dedicated
to Mme. Ehnn--"Liebeshoffnung"; but I do not mean to depreciate
the others.

The oriental interval of the augmented fourth, which I scent in
the "Mondlied," would be written, I think, more simply thus:--

[Here, Liszt writes a 2-bar musical score excerpt]

and further on

[Here, Liszt writes another musical score excerpt]

(C instead of B-sharp). And to prove to you, Princess, my
attention in reading your works, I will venture to observe to you
that in the French Romance "Comme a vingt ans" the prosody is
neglected in the third couplet. Instead of the printed version
(with two syllables omitted) it should run something like this:--

[Here, Liszt writes a 7-bar musical excerpt at the point where
the words "Je vis le len--de--main, non plus au hord de l'onde
mais as--si--se as che--min la jeune fi--le blonde" are sung.]

If I still had, as in Vienna, the honor of finding myself in your
neighborhood, I hope you would grant me a word of indulgence; and
meanwhile, Madame la Princesse, I venture to beg you to accept
the most respectful homage of

Your very humble and inexcusable servant,

F. Liszt

Pest, May 10th, 1874



148. To Peter Cornelius

Dearest Friend of my Heart,

Again a request. You alone can help me, and give me in German a
faithful poetical rendering of Lamartine's "Hymne de l'enfant a
son reveil."

Years ago I used to sing this hymn, from my inmost heart, to my
three children; you remember them...

And now the composition (what an unknown word for it!) is to
appear in print, and the publisher Taborszky in Pest will send
you my manuscript together with a copy of the poem. In case any
prosodical alterations should seem appropriate, be kind enough to
write them down distinctly in notes on a separate sheet of paper.

Tomorrow I travel direct to Rome, and shall spend the summer and
autumn in the Villa d'Este (Tivoli). There, at length, our
"Stanislaus" shall be pushed forward. [Cornelius translated the
text to the Oratorio "Stanislaus."]

With friendliest greetings to all your circle, I am, dearest
Cornelius, ever your heartily devoted

F. Liszt

Pest, May 16th, 1874



149. To A.F. Eggers in Liverpool

[From a copy of the draft of a letter by Dr. Mirus, Weimar.]

[Villa d'Este, June 21st, 1874]

Dear Sir,

Your friendly communication rests upon a harmless mistake. You do
not seem to know that for 26 years past I have altogether ceased
to be regarded as a pianist; hence I have for a long time not
given any concerts, and only very occasionally played the piano
in public, for some very special reason, to aid some charity or
to further some artistic object, and then only in Rome, Hungary
(my native country), and in Vienna--nowhere else. And on these
rare and very exceptional occasions no one has ever thought of
offering me any remuneration in money. Excuse me therefore, dear
Sir, that I cannot accept your invitation to the Liverpool
Musical Festival, inasmuch as I cannot in any way think of
wearying the public with my "whilom" piano-playing.

Respectfully yours,

F. Liszt



150. To Walter Bache

Dear and Honored Friend,

I am often with you in kindest remembrance and cordial sympathy
with your admirable efforts, but unfortunately I rarely get any
letters written to the friends I value most, for my time is
wasted with a number of wearisome and useless notes. I have just
despatched one of this sort to a Mr. E. in L. The good man
invites me to the Festival to be held there, asks me to consider
the matter, and even offers me a remuneration in money for
playing--without imagining that I have anything else or better to
do than to accept such invitations. To me concert tours would be
absolutely senseless; to fulfil my duties in Pest and Weimar
gives me trouble and interruptions enough. All the other things
need not be enumerated.

The summer and autumn (till my return to Pest in January '75) I
mean to spend here quietly and at work. Last Monday and Tuesday I
had the special pleasure of a visit from Bulow. And we thought of
you in all friendship.--Bulow is now going to Salzungen (near
Meiningen) for a couple of months, to recover from the terrible
fatigues of his concert tour, and next October goes again to
London.

Remember me most kindly to Mr. Dannreuther with assurances of
faithful attachment, and do me the favor to give the enclosed
notes of thanks to Messrs. Hueffer and Gounod.

Our very able and dear patroness, Madame Laussot, told me that
you, dear Bache, will probably soon be wandering towards Italy.

A hearty welcome, therefore, to the old place where again is
resting your old and sincere friend,

F. Liszt

June 2lst, 1874

(Villa d'Este,--Tivoli, per Roma--Italia.)



151. To Dr. Franz Witt

[Villa d'Este, Early Summer, 1874.]

Much-esteemed Sir and Friend,

The lively recollection I entertain of the truly edifying Church-
music performances in Eichstatt under your direction [On the
occasion of the 3rd General Assembly of the Cacilien-Verein in
Eichstatt, August 1871] increases my regret that I am unable to
accept your friendly invitation to the 5th General Assembly of
the Cacilien-Verein in Ratisbon (between the 1st and 7th August)
[The Assembly was held on the above-mentioned days.]. A wearisome
piece of work will keep me here till my return to Pest in January
'75. Next summer, however, I hope again to pay you a visit, and
to gather excellent precepts and examples from you. Meanwhile I
am reading your Essays with peculiar satisfaction, and more
especially your com-positions in the "Musica sacra" and the
"Fliegende Blatter." "Fliegend" [flying] must here be taken in
the higher, angelic sense; in the latter sense O salutaris hostia
sounds altogether comforting Musica angelorum, such as pleasantly
animates all your Church tone-works.



152. To Dr. Franz Haberl

[A portion of this letter is printed in Dr. Mirus' brochure, "Das
Liszt-Museum in Weimar" (1892), which contains many interesting
relics of Liszt.]

[Villa d'Este, Early Summer, 1874.]

Much-esteemed Sir and Friend

To my sincere regret I find myself prevented from attending the
Cacilien-Verein in Ratisbon.

The efforts and performances of the Verein I follow with the
deepest interest, and anticipate that its promoters--who are so
capable, careful and learned--will accomplish all that is truly
of advantage in Church music. And in this Ratisbon has for many
years past deserved to rank first, and you, my much-esteemed
friend, deserve the fullest recognition that can be offered for
the abundant services you have rendered in the cause. Accept my
grateful thanks for kindly sending Vittoria's Missa pro
defunctis, [A six-voiced Requiem given by Dr. Haberl at the 5th
General Assembly of the Cacilien-Verein in Ratisbon in 1874, and
published in the "Musica divina," Annus II., Tom. I, by Pustet]
which was brought to me by the Chaplain of the Anima Church. Will
you be so kind as to get Herr Pustet to send me also, through
Leukoch, [Perhaps ought to read Leuckart?] "Mannuale breve
canticum," etc.? [A little book of Chorales by Joh. Georg
Mettenleiter]

In spite of the grievous news of your continued sufferings I do
not give up the hope of seeing you here again soon, and of taking
all friendly care of you; and you shall not in the least degree
be troubled or wearied; merely recruit from your over-exertions
by living simply and comfortably amid quiet and congenial
surroundings.

Hence I take the liberty again of inviting your Reverence to
spend the next months with me here in the Villa d'Este, where you
will find rest, quiet and cosiness, mild air, glorious scenery,
pleasant walks, good eating, good wine, books, music, pianos to
make use of ad libitum, and a temperature mentally agreeable.

Cardinal Hohenlohe requests me to say that you will be heartily
welcome, and this message is communicated with unmixed pleasure
by your very respectful and sincerely grateful

F. Liszt



153. To Edmund von Mihalovich

Very Dear Friend,

Your Prologue to the Nibelungen in course of performance at the
Walhalla-Roszavolgyi has royally amused me. [A joke of
Mihalovich, who had nicknamed several mutually known people with
the names and characters out of the Nibelungen] I wish that
Wagner may find in Messrs. Betz, Scaria, Niemann, etc.,
interpreters as well suited to their roles as Richter-Wotan,
Dunkl-Loge, Abranyi-Thor and Gobbi-Mime.

At Bayreuth "fervet opus" The preparatory piano rehearsals are
going on; celebrated artists are growing thick on the ground,
like the suitors at Penelope's court. Joseph Rubinstein suspends
his commercial occupations, and returns from Cracow to drive the
four-in-hand accompaniment of Rheingold. The architects,
painters, decorators, machinists, costumiers and their people are
continuing their work; therefore, in spite of difficulties and
obstacles, the great work of Art of this century--Wagner's
Tetralogy of the Nabelungen--will come to pass, and I hope to be
present at the first performance with my very dear friends Mi and
Do. [Mihalovich was called Mi by Liszt, and Count Apponyi Do.]--
Meanwhile let us go on patiently at our own modest work, and
endeavor to make it as suitable as possible. Next winter we will
make an exchange of our latest sheets of music. I will bring a
pretty thick packet to Sir Hagbar. [An Opera by Mihalovich
(Hagbar and Sigurd)]

Schuberth promises me the "Geisterschiff" in the autumn; we will
then launch it at once with Sgambati, who has just composed
several Lieder, exquisite in sentiment. I have recently written,
as an Impromptu, without any forethought, an Elegie in memory of
Mme. de Moukhanoff, entitled "Schlummerlied im Grabe" [Slumber
Song in the Grave.]

Your kind wishes for my repose are being realised here. I pass my
days very peaceably, and my evenings alone, in reading, writing
or playing. Since the departure of Bulow, who gave me his most
eminent company for two days (in the middle of June), I have, so
to say, seen nobody. He is now making his villeggiatura at
Salzungen near Meiningen, returns to England in the month of
November, and will not go to America till the autumn of '75.

Pay me a visit sometimes in thought, dear Mi, and believe me ever
your very cordially devoted friend,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este (Tivoli), July 30th, 1874.

Let me hear something about Do and Horpacs. [An estate of Count
Emmerich Szechenyi, the former Austro-Hungarian ambassador in
Berlin, whom Liszt frequently visited.] I will write to them
later.



154. To Peter Cornelius

[The letter is addressed to Neuenahr, where Cornelius had gone
for a water-cure, shortly before his death. The translation of
the Cacilia-legend he did not accomplish.]

Dear and valued Friend,

You have again presented me with a marvellous gift. Your German
translation of Lamartine's "Hymne de l'enfant a son reveil" is
exquisitely successful, and retains all the fragrance and aroma
of the original poem.

"Kein Wurmlein vergissest Du...Das Zicklein an Staude und
Beere...Am Milchkrug Mucklein saugt den Saft...Und die Lerche das
Kornlein picket."...

["No worm dost Thou e'er forget...The kid amid the shrubs and
berries...The fly that sips the sweetest juice...And the lark
that pecks the blade of corn."...]

All and everything fits in so exactly with the music, syllable by
syllable, that it seems as if the poem and music had sprung up
together. Verily, dear friend, you are an extremely kind and most
perfect magician. Now do not be vexed with me if my grateful
appreciation of your skill should prove somewhat covetous, and I
again ask you to do me a favor. A little French poem of 48 short
lines, "Sainte Cecile, Legende," by Madame Emile Girardin
(Delphine Gay) is awaiting your poetic courtesy. Allow me to send
you my finished composition of this Cacilia, the musical
foundation of which is furnished by the Gregorian antiphone:
"Cantantibus organis, Caecilia Domino decantabat." It is to be
hoped that I have not spoilt it, and I trust to your friendly
kindliness to send me a German translation of it before the next
Cacilia Festival (22nd November), soon after which it shall be
printed, and a performance of it given in Pest.

The delay with the edition of your two Operas I sincerely regret.
They deserve much greater appreciation and a much wider
circulation than hundreds of others that are printed, and the
publication of the pianoforte scores is sure to effect this for
them. Meanwhile I am glad that you have made use of my suggestion
to base the Overture of the "Barber" on the pleasantly
characteristic motive--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a 4-bar musical score excerpt.]

Next summer we shall meet in Munich.--With hearty thanks, your
sincerely attached

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este (Tivoli), August 23rd, 1874

If you should see Frau Schott in Mainz, give her my kindest
remembrances. For some time past various manuscripts have been
lying ready which I should have liked to hand over to Schott's
house of business; but fear that they might arrive at an
inopportune moment. The very title, "Drei symphonische Trauer-
Oden" ["Three Symphonic Funeral Odes"] might prove alarming; and
besides, the scores--all about 20 pages in length--would have to
be published simultaneously with the pianoforte transcriptions
(for one or two performers). Well, "we can wait."...

I am working pretty industriously at the "Sanct Stanislaus." Of
this you will tomorrow receive a full report--and an urgent
request for speedy, energetaeally accentuated pains over the
essential but not lengthy alterations of the text.



155. To Ludwig Bosendorfer in Vienna

[Head of the celebrated pianoforte manufactory, now
Commerzienrath (Councillor of Commerce)]

Dear friend,

With my sincere thanks for your interesting reports of the Vienna
musical world I would gladly have given you something of the same
kind in return. But there is here nothing whatever in the way of
novelties or specialities in the way of concerts; be content,
therefore, if my letter today mentions only one, but to me a very
important artistic item--namely, the frequent use of your piano,
which, among other virtues, possesses a wondrous power of not
getting out of tune [Unverstimmtheit]. Since its despatch from
Vienna not a tuner has touched it, and yet it keeps in beautiful
tune, and steadily resists all variations and effects of
temperature.

Till the end of January I shall remain quietly at work here; then
go direct to Pest--and by the middle of April on to Weimar. My
thoughts and efforts require now only peace and seclusion. These
are things that suit me best in my old age, and uphold me in
spiritual intercourse with my dear and true friends. As such I
greet you and your wife heartily and sincerely.

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, August 28th, 1874



156. To Adelheid von Schorn in Weimar

Dear and Most excellent One,

For our grand coup you come in completely in your role of
providence, which you fill with such complete good grace, and
with an admirable mastery! I cannot tell you what immense comfort
your letter brings me, with its assurance of your speedy arrival
in Rome. Try not to delay it beyond the 25th-30th November, and
if possible come sooner. Princess Wittgenstein is still very
suffering, and has kept her bed entirely for six weeks; your
company and the inspirations of your solicitude will do her more
good than all the Allo-and Homoeopaths put together.

I beg that you will write to her speedily to announce your
coming, for she is ignorant and must be kept in complete
ignorance of the plot we have hatched with Princess Marie [The
daughter of Princess Wittgenstein.], the happy success of which
you will crown. (questions of detail will be easily settled to
your satisfaction, in such a manner that the stay in Rome will be
thoroughly pleasant to you.

It is understood that you will not mention the question of where
you will live to Princess W., who has already only too much worry
about her own rooms. In my opinion it would be best for you to go
to the Hotel d'Amerique, Via Babuino (close by the house of the
Princess and of the one where I live), and to spend some days
there, until you see where you can settle yourself comfortably,
whether at the Pension (also very near the Babuino) where your
cousin Octavie stayed, or elsewhere.

When you reach Bologna, please let me know by telegram on what
day you will arrive; I will meet you at the station, and it will
be a real joy to me to escort you to your first abode in Rome.

Thank you with all my heart, and yours ever,

F. Liszt

Rome October 12th, 1874 (Vicolo de Greci, 43.)

The Princess is living at Via Babuino 59.

Your letter was only returned to me from Tivoli yesterday
evening.

I shall remain here, or at the Villa d'Este, till the end of
January.--



157. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Very dear Sirs,

The kind reception you gave the last sending of my somewhat
cumbersome manuscripts and revisions pleased me greatly. I will
always gladly do what I can to not increase the publishers'
worries, and henceforth print only what has been carefully worked
out and will prove tolerably acceptable.

With regard to the form in which the Songs and Wagner-
transcriptions are to be published, you may act altogether as you
think best. I did certainly think that the convenient and neat
edition in small octavo would be preferable (like the last
edition of Chopin and my "Etudes transcendantes"): hence in from
5 to 6 little volumes:--

1. Beethoven (The "Adelaide" and other Songs);
2. Mendelssohn (6 Songs);
3. Robert and Clara Schumann;
4. Robert Franz;
5 to 6 (?). Wagner-transcriptions.

This would in no way prevent the songs and pieces of several
pages (such as the "Adelaide," Mendelssohn's Songs, the
"Tannhauser-March," the "Rienzi-Fantasia," etc.' being sold
singly--in the same small 8vo form which, candidly speaking, I
always like best. As long ago as the year '39 I induced Haslinger
to publish Schubert's songs in an edition of this kind--and at
that time it seemed rather a doubtful innovation. Also about
placing the words below the music. I wish this, for the sake of
the poetical delivery in all of the songs, except the "Adelaide,"
because the poem roams about rather too freely in rococo style.
Let us leave "the flow'ret at the grave" to bloom on quietly
without retouching it again.

I must unfortunately again trouble you to send me all the proofs.
It is a matter of great moment to me to have the things arranged
as accurately and as appropriately for the piano as possible. And
for this I require the last proofs, in order finally to revise
them in reading and playing them over. (For the printer's
consolation be it remarked that no new alterations shall now crop
up again; my zeal in correcting shall be confined to making some
pedal marks and fingerings.) First of all I should like to try
over Sgambati's duet arrangement of the "Ideale" with him; and
you will doubtless do me the favor of sending me the proof sheets
stitched together before I leave here (at the end of January).--

I leave the matter concerning the small honorarium confidently to
your well-known kindly disposition, and remain, very dear Sirs,

Yours respectfully and most obediently,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, November 24th, 1874



158. To Count Albert Apponyi in Budapest

[From an undated rough draft of a letter in the possession of
Herr O. A. Schulz, bookseller in Leipzig. (The date has been
ascertained from a letter to Mihalovich.)--The addressee was the
well-known Hungarian statesman.]

[Villa d'Este, December 6th, 1874]

Dear and Very Honored Friend,

Your excellent letter of the 27th November reached me here
yesterday evening. I hasten to give you my very sincere thanks,
and to add a frank reply on the question of the Academy of Music.

First of all I think the "moyen violent" [violent means] of
Huszar, which will deliver us from barren tittle-tattle, is
right; let us throw the Seeschlange [sea serpent] into the
Danube, and if he wants an epitaph here is one: "It is better to
do nothing than to do stupidities."

Now, are we the stupid ones?--The Government is much interested
in this affair; the Sovereign's decision has been obtained; I
know not what official publication has followed. You yourself,
dear Count, have brilliantly persuaded the Chamber of Deputies
that the said Academy would be of use in raising Art in Hungary;
my necessary humble reserve has been taken by the public as
consent.--Is it possible now to take no account of such
precedents, and to draw back when it is a question of advancing?
I do not think so, and I am quite of your opinion, as wise as it
is opportune.

In spite of the difficulties of a position embroiled with divers
worries, and in spite of the scantiness of the financial means,
we ought to stick to our affirmative position and not in the
least to give way.

As to my "personal convenience," which you are good enough to
take into such kind consideration, permit me to assure you anew
that I aspire to one only blessing--quiet time for work in my own
room. Orare et laborare. The point of honor, which no one
understands better than yourself, attaches me to Hungary, our
country. May I fulfil there all my duty of gratitude!--

I shall be back at Pest (Fischplatz) on the 10th February, and
shall rejoice to hear the Ballade of our valiant friend
Mihalovich, to whom I shall write tomorrow.

Yours from my heart,

F. Liszt



159. To Edmund von Mihalovich

Dear Excellent Friend,

I wrote the day before yesterday to Do, and was about to continue
with a letter to you when a telegram called me subitissimo back
to Rome. The thread of my ideas has not been broken on the
journey, and I resume our conversation, a trois, on the long
gestation--omen of abortion--of the Hungarian Academy of Music.

I trust that my very dear and honored friends will be convinced
of my perfect disinterestedness in the question; the idea of an
Academy is in no way mine if I become sponsor to it, it will be
in self-defence and without any connivance at paternity whatever;
I even refuse to help in the procreation of the marmot [brat];
and, far from making myself, before my time, in any way its
champion or propagandist, I hesitate over the difficulties which
are opposed to its birth. I have explained these many a time to
my Budapest friends, and the difficulties have increased rather
than diminished during these last three years...

1stly. The financial situation of the country appears to be such
that one must scruple to burden the budget with an expenditure
beyond urgent needs. My patriotism is sufficiently sincere and
lively to counsel me to abstention, including every renunciation
that is compatible with my strict duty.

2ndly. It would be a poor luxury to add a third music school to
the two schools already existing (meagrely) at Pest. If one
cannot emulate with honor the similar establishments of Vienna,
Leipzig, etc.--what is the good of troubling any further about
it? Now, to give a vigorous impulse to Art among us, we must
first unite and fuse into one spirit a set of professors of well-
known capability,--a very arduous and ungrateful task, the
accomplishment of which demands much intelligence, and a
sufficient amount of cleverness and of money.

Other minor, local considerations complicate the matter stilt
further; I pass them over in silence today, and will not repeat
myself any more except on one point,--my religious devotion to
our country and our art. To serve them somewhat, according to the
moderate degree of my talent, whether it be in working by myself
at my manuscripts (which is what I much prefer), or in
cooperating with my friends in public things, this is my simple
and exclusive desire, totally removed from the personal
pretensions or anxieties of vanity which are wrongly imputed to
me.

"Tiszta lelek, tiszta szandek, akar siker, akar nem." ["Pure
soul, pure intention, whether the results be favorable or not."--
Maxim of Stephan Szechenyi.]

My friends are those who haunt the Ideal; there, dear friend, we
"recognise" each other, and shall always do so,--but not "in the
mud," illustrated by a fascinating poet, too much celebrated and
tainted by the triviality of vulgar applause--Heine. Amongst
other things he had predicted that the Cathedral of Cologne would
never be finished. "In vain will Franz Liszt give his concerts,"
etc.--

You know that Wagner is coming to Pest in Lent. It is only right
that several of your compositions--especially the last, "Sello"--
should be performed in public at that time. Talk the matter over
with Richter. I on my side will ring the "Bells." Please beg
Abranyi to hurry with the Hungarian translation of Longfellow's
poem (the Prologue to the "Golden Legend"), and to follow, not
the German translation of the "Pianoforte score," which I have
sent to Engesser, but the original English text. [Liszt had set
to music the Prologue to the "Golden Legend," under the title
"Die Glocken des Strassburger Munsters"--"The Bells of Strassburg
Cathedral."]

Yours in cordial friendship,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, December 8th, 1874

I will write tomorrow to the very gracious chatelaine of Horpacs.



160. To Carl Hoffbauer in Munich

[From a copy belonging to Dir. Aug. Gollerich.--Hoffbauer, born
in 1850, became in 1872 Director of the Gesang-Verein in Munich,
went to Frankfort in 1880, and put an end to his own life. He
composed, among other things, the Operas "Cotzzata" and
"Demetrius."]

[End of 1874.]

My hearty thanks for the kindly zeal with which you have taken up
the "Christus Oratorio." But a performance of it in Munich
appears to me so doubtful, and connected with so much trouble,
expense, and difficulty, that I must for the present dissuade you
from the undertaking. Besides, it would not be possible for me to
accept your invitation for the end of February, as several
engagements will keep me in Pest till Easter. And, if ever you
give a performance of the Christus in Munich, I should much like
to be present. As yet the whole work has been only twice heard,
in Weimar and Pest (in May and last November, '73).

In reply to your inquiry, I must mention Herr and Frau von Milde
and Frau Dr. Merian as specially well acquainted with and capable
of taking the solo parts.

Accept the assurance of my utmost gratitude for your eagerness to
give a performance of the Christus in Munich.

Most respectfully and sincerely yours,

F. Liszt



101. To Edmund Von Mihalovich

Very Dear Friend,

In spite of the legion of Dessoff, calm plains or storms, go on
roaring bravely in the waters of the "Phantom Ship." Even should
we not succeed in arriving safely in port, and should we meet no
other Senta than Her Highness Madam Criticism, it matters not;
those who follow us in the same waters of the Ideal will be more
fortunate...

"Et quasi cursores vitai lampada tradunt!"--

We will talk about all this fully in February, in the Fischplatz.

Will you be so kind as to send the enclosed letter to my gracious
and admired translator of the "Chopin"--Mme. la Comtesse Ottilia
Wast? [A translation into Hungarian from the old edition of the
book.]

Further, I beg that you will recommend Taborszky to publish
before Easter my St. Francois de Paule, which our very dear
friend Albert Apponyi has been good enough to adorn with his
poetry,--and also "L'hymne de l'enfant a son reveil," which
Taborszky must have received in November (with the German words
by Cornelius and the addition of a harp part).

Schuberth has been seriously ill. I shall be after him to bring
out your Geisterschiff [Phantom Ship] without any more delay.

A revoir in six weeks, and always

Very cordially yours,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, December 29th, 1874

On the occasion of the Wagner concert in Pest I should like my
"Bells" to ring, and beg Abranyi to attune the Hungarian
Klingklang [ding-dong] of them speedily and beautifully.

[Liszt's "Glockengelaute" (Bell-ringing) consisted in this--that
he played the Beethoven E Concerto at the Wagner concert in Pest.
He allowed himself to be persuaded to do this, as people were
afraid that, on account of the high prices, the concert would not
be full.--The "Bells of Strassburg Cathedral" were not
performed.]



162. To Carl Hoffbauer in Munich.

[From the copy of a draft of a letter by Dr. Minis.]

[Probably Pest, at the beginning of 1875.]

Very Dear Sir,

Your last letter exhibits so convincing a character of truth and
noble-mindedness that I sincerely rejoice at the prospect of
becoming personally and in spirit better acquainted with you. And
first of all be assured of my special interest in your Opera
"Comata." Whatever I may be able to do as regards a
representation of it in a theater I shall not fail to do. In
Munich we will read the score over together, and discuss further
details.

Of your persistence in wishing to have the "Christus" performed I
wrote to Schuberth yesterday, and shall in full confidence leave
the whole matter to your considerate zeal. You will best know
whether and how a successful performance can be made possible,
and please therefore arrange matters altogether according as you
think fit. I beg you merely to let me know the day you fix upon
some 10 or 12 days previously, and address me to Pest (at
Easter), if earlier to Weimar, and I will then come for the full
rehearsal.

[The performance took place on the 12th April, 1875. As a result
of this King Ludwig II ordered a separate performance in the
Court theater, and this again was followed by a public one.]

Respectful greetings to the poetess of the "Comata," and believe
me, with marked esteem, yours gratefully and sincerely,

F. Liszt



163. To Professor Julius Stern in Berlin

Dear Friend,

For years past and again lately I have been very much indebted to
you. Our eminently learned and dear friend Weitzmann [Theorist
and contrapuntist in Berlin (1808-1880)] told me of the careful
rehearsals, and of the admirable manner in which you conducted
the Faust Symphony.  Owing to critical circumstances and
negativings I have, as a rule, to dissuade people everywhere from
giving performances of my scores. All the more pleasantly am I
affected by the goodwill of the few friends who carefully and
courageously march on in front.

Therefore, while offering you my sincerest thanks, I beg you to
excuse my not being just now able to accept the tempting
invitation to Berlin.

Yours most respectfully and sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, February 4th, 1875

(Next week I return to Pest, and at the beginning of April go to
Weimar, where I should be delighted to welcome you again.)



164. To Count Albert Apponyi

[From a rough copy of a letter in the possession of Herr O. A.
Schulz, bookseller in Leipzig.]

February 18th, [1875?]

This morning the Politische Volksblatt [The Political People's-
Paper] brings me your portrait, my honored and dear friend. The
notice accompanying it pleases me only in so far as it predicts a
great future for you, based on your very evident merits and great
talents. People are agreed upon your great height
("Haupteslange")--all the better, for it corresponds to the
height of your character, and I bet a hundred to one that you
will never combat "the spirit of the times" ("Herr von Zeitgeist
und Frau von offentliche Meinung," [Mr. Spirit of the Times and
Mrs. Public Opinion.] as the honorable Count Gozzi ceremoniously
said), except when you meet with stupidities and adventures on
which this spirit of the times is astride.

A friendly invitation for tomorrow evening at the house of

Your very devoted and grateful

F. Liszt



165. To Johann Von Herbeck

Very Dear Friend,

My sincere thanks for your letter; gladly would I follow your
very kind and "unselfish" request. To say "nay" to my friends
always comes hard to me. But how can I act otherwise in face of
the negativings of critics? And why should I not prefer abiding
my time in peace alone?

Now-a-days an artist is reckoning without his host if he places
honest faith in the public. For people now-a-days hear and judge
only by reading the newspapers.

I mean to take advantage of this in so far that the leading and
favorite papers of Vienna, Pest, Leipzig, Berlin, Paris, London,
etc.--which abhor my humble compositions and have declared them
worthless and objectionable--shall be relieved of all further
outward trouble concerning them. What is the good of performances
to people who only care to read newspapers?

Hence, dear good friend, let the "Gran Mass" [Herbeck, however,
did have them performed.] and the "Glocken" ["Die Glocken des
Strassburger Munsters"--"The Bells of Strassburg Cathedral"]
remain unperformed in Vienna, where (in Easter week) you shall
receive a visit from yours most warmly and gratefully,

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 3rd, 1875



166. To Eduard Von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

Give Lenbach my kindest thanks, and at the same time ask him to
send his extremely poetical portrait of Frau von Moukhanoff here
soon in honor of the noble lady and of the musical Commemoration
Festival which we have announced for the middle of May. [Liszt
dedicated an Elegie to the memory of this gifted lady.]

Tomorrow morning early I go to Hanover; my address there till May
29th [This must mean the 29th April.] will be: "at Freiherr von
Bronsart's, Intendant of the Hoftheater." On Saturday is the
performance of the "Elizabeth," and on the 29th the concert for
the benefit of the Bach monument.

My gracious Grand Duke is very urgent about my speedy return; I
shall, therefore, probably spend only 8 or 10 days at Schloss Loo
(from the 2nd to the 12th May), and then return here forthwith.

The Tonkunstler-Versammlung is to be held in Dresden at the end
of June. I long for some rest and quiet work.

Thine with all my heart,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 22nd, 1875



167. To Adelheid Von Schorn in Rome

Dear Excellent One,

I come to keep you company a little in your convalescence,--far
advanced, I hope, so as to be something like a complete cure. For
a tisane [A soothing drink] I offer you some news of your cara
patria. There are few variations at Weimar: the Grand Duke and
Grand Duchess remain there till the end of June; the Emperor of
Russia is announced for the 25th June; the Hereditary Highnesses
are going to the waters (Marienbad and Pyrmont) in a few days,
and will return before the Grand Duke's fete (24th June);
Gutschen Watzdorf is going on his own account independently to
Carlsbad, Mme. de Loen to Reme (in Westphalia).

At the theater a tempered, but lively activity; during these
latter weeks a new Drama by Otto Roquette has been given--Der
Feind im Hause. [The enemy in the house.] The subject is taken
from the quarrel of the Colonna in Rome; the success of the piece
will not occasion any fresh quarrels; nor will that of two new
Operas that I have seen--Der Widerspanstigen Bezahmung [The
subduing of the refractory ones.] by Gotz and Golo of Scholz,
which have come inopportunely into competition with Schumann's
Genoveva--a work which has been taken up again with marked
success this year (after it had been prudently ignored for twenty
years--except at Leipzig and Weimar) at Leipzig and Wiesbaden.
Other theaters will mix themselves up with it, in spite of the
non-success of Genoveva at Vienna, where it was put on the stage
in the winter of '74 with a most praiseworthy luxury of
decoration and costumes.

At the time of the performance which I conducted, and that is
some twenty years ago, I said: Genoveva is musically the sister
of Fidelio; only Leonora's pistol is wanting.

Tristan and Isolde, announced here for the 15th and 19th
May,...have remained at Munich with M. and Mme. Vogel, who have
lost a child. Loen [The Weimar Intendant] and all the public are
very much put out at this untimely mourning; possibly the Vogels
will be able to come towards the end of June; I don't reckon on
it much, but have written to them on the subject at Loen's
request. If they accept, the Commemoration Matinee of Mme.
Moukhanoff will take place between the two performances of
Tristan, and the "Tempelherrenhaus" in our park has been chosen
by us as the spot for this musical commemoration. I will send you
the programme.

Meanwhile here is that of Saturday last at the "Orchestral
School"--a very useful establishment, well adapted to our
modestly proud situation of Weimar, and which Muller-Hartung
conducts according to my wishes. [The concert "in honor of
Liszt's first visit to the School" consisted entirely of works by
him.] Bruch's Odysseus--a musical illustration of Preller's
admirable pictures in the Weimar museum--was performed last
Thursday, conducted also by Muller-Hartung.

Lassen is in the middle of composing some fine choruses for the
two "Fausts," which Devrient is intending to get up here in two
evenings, in conformity with his new scenic arrangement.

Very cordially yours,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 17th, 1875



168. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

.--. The day after tomorrow I join the Duke of Weimar's party at
Schloss Wilhelmsthal, and shall remain there several days. After
that I should have liked to wait upon Cardinal Hohenlohe in
Schillingsfurst; but His Eminence is at present at Bad Ragaz
(Switzerland) undergoing some after-cure for a foot-trouble, the
result of some accident he met with last winter. When I receive
his answer I shall so arrange things that my visit to
Schillingsfurst is paid as is agreeable in tempore opportuno.

From the 3rd to the 15th August I shall be in Bayreuth; after
that I shall this year end with Weimar (without playing
"Tannhauser" there, as a guest!) at the Carl-August Festival on
September 3rd, for which I have written a short and simple chorus
in popular style, the text of which is furnished by King David:
"The Lord preserveth the souls of His saints, and light is sown
for the righteous."

In contemplating this light in all humility,

I am, in true affection,

Thine,

F. Liszt

Weimar, July 17th, 1875

Enclosed are a few words for our Marie. If I had to choose a
cousin I should choose her. Hence I confess my innermost
elective-affinity with papa and daughter.

Lenbach's wondrously inspired portrait of Madame Moukhanoff will
tomorrow be sent back to Vienna to the Countess Coudenhoven.



169. To Louis Kohler

Very Dear Friend,

Merit and success, in your case, would seem always to stand in
perfectly delightful harmony. Best thanks for your kindly letter
and for sending your Opus 147: "Technische Kunstler-Studien"
["Technical Artist-Studies"]. And although I am more disposed to
turn away from than towards Methods and Pedagogics, still I have
read this work of yours with interest. The entrance of the pedal
after the striking of the chords as indicated by you at the
beginning of page 3, and as consistently carried through by you
almost to the utmost extreme, seems to me an ingenious idea, the
application of which is greatly to be recommended to pianoforte
players, teachers and composers--especially in slow tempi.

I regret that we are geographically so far apart; but
sympathetically I remain in sincere esteem and in all
friendliness yours,

F. Liszt

Schloss Wilhelmsthal, July 27th, 1875

My friendly greetings to your very talented pupil Alfred
Reisenauer. Perhaps you may be coming to Weimar again shortly; I
should be pleased to hear this.

One line in your friendly letter I answer herewith: proud of my
Konigsberg title of doctor, and anxious to do it credit, I
willingly refrain from giving performances of my humble
compositions anywhere.



170. To Carl Hillebrand in Florence

[The celebrated author of "Zeiten, Volker und Menschen" ["Times,
People and Mankind"] and other works; born 1820; lived, from 1870
until his death, in Florence, where a memorial tablet, in
gratitude to his memory, was erected over his house in the Lung'
Arno.]

Dear and Very Honored Friend,

Your friendly letter leaves me a good hope...for next year. I
have just transmitted your thanks and the data relative to our
concerted idea to the Grand Duke, who arrived at Ostend on
Thursday last, with his daughters, his son and his daughter-in-
law. Their Royal Highnesses return to Weimar the 1st September
for the fete of Carl August, which the Emperor and Empress of
Germany will solemnise with their presence. Monseigneur tells me
to invite you to it. I observe to him that you will probably be
detained elsewhere; nevertheless, if you should come to Germany
at that moment, be assured that you will be warmly welcomed and
received at the Court of Weimar.

The monument of Carl August will be inaugurated on the 3rd
September. The ceremony of the "Toison d'Or" ["Golden Fleece"],
at which the Emperor will be the sponsor of his brother-in-law,
our Grand Duke, will take place on the 4th. Then T.R.H. will
leave Weimar, and my poor self return to the Villa d'Este
(towards the middle of September) for as long a time as my very
dear compatriots will allow of it. They press me strongly to
return to Pest on the 1st November; before obeying them I shall
come and see you at Florence.

Please count always on the feelings of sincere and high esteem of
your very cordially devoted

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, August 2nd, 1875

The papers keep you au courant of the marvels of Wagner's theater
here. The performances (announced for the month of August '76) of
the Tetralogy, "Der Ring des Nabelungen," will be the chief event
of dramatic Art, thus royally made manifest for the first time in
this century in its ensemble and unification of Poetry, Music,
Acting, and their decorations of Painting and mise-en-scene.

There is not merely the chance, but the guarantee of a grand and
striking success, in view of the sublimity of the work itself,
and also of the enthusiasm which it already excites amongst the
numerous staff of artists chosen to interpret it. In spite of the
difficulties of this new transcendental style of Wagner, the
preparatory study and rehearsals are an enchantment for the
singers and the musicians of the orchestra.

By the 18th August I shall be back at Weimar, and shall stay
there till the 6th September.

To Madame Laussot my tender and grateful regards.



171. To Adelheid von Schorn

Dear Excellent One,

It is not without regret that I have given up the very sincere
pleasure of meeting you now at Nuremberg. If you remained there
till towards the middle of September I should come and ask you
what commissions you have for Rome, where I expect to arrive
before the 20th September.

Here we are sailing in the full tide of the marvels of art. Every
day, morning and evening, one act of the "Ring des Nibelungen" is
rehearsed in Wagner's new theater. The enthusiasm of the whole
staff of singers and orchestral players, to the number of about
150, is as sincere as it is abundant, and everything augurs for
next year some prodigious performances of the immense and sublime
work which royally dominates all contemporary Art, including the
former works of Wagner.

Cosima sends you a thousand affectionate messages, and is
expecting to see you at the time of the definite succession of
the Nibelung-Ring in the month of August 1876. You were present
at the laying of the first stone of the monument, and must not be
absent at the crowning moment. .--.

Mme. de Schleinitz is staying here a fortnight longer, and is
living at the castle. She keeps herself continually at the
highest diapason of grace and charm, without ever missing the
opportunity of effectually obliging her friends.

A revoir soon, dear and very excellent one; and ever from my
heart your devoted

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, August 7th, 1875

I shall be back at Weimar by the 18th August.



172. To Dr. Franz Witt

[Probably August or September, 1875]

Much-esteemed Friend,

While greatly regretting to hear of your indisposition and
thanking you sincerely for your last letter, I now ask you: How
are you going to answer the ministerial communication of
Trefort?--Are you willing to render important help as regards
Church music in Hungary? Superfluous words are unbecoming to me;
let us onward and act; and may your noble and stimulating
influence be granted to Hungary. Assuredly you will find there
admiration, affection, and the necessary assistance in the great
services you will render.

In a word: Come to us, and let us work together in Budapest!



173. To Lina Ramann

[Authoress of "F. Liszt als Kunstler und Mensch" ("F. Liszt as
Artist and Man"), 2 vols. (Leipzig, Breitkopf and Hartel, 1880
and 1887)]

Dear Friend,

Thanks to your care I had excellent and very inspired company
during my two days' journey from Nuremberg to Rome. Your parallel
"Bach and Handel" delighted me more than the famous landscapes of
the Brenner. Allow me specially to praise your fine insight into
and correct interpretation of the various musical forms of
culture from the Motet to the Mass and the Oratorio.

Some portions also of the "Allgemeine musikalische Erzieh-und
Unterrichtslehre" [Universal Musical Instruction] pleased me--(in
spite of my inaptitude in things pedagogical), especially the
main idea of the work:--that musical instruction should not be
separated from, but form a part in, the course of education; a
relevant thought, the practical application of which will
essentially benefit, and prove useful to, art as well as
education.

Again my cordial thanks for the hours at Nuremberg, and best
greetings to the amiable comrades in art Fraulein Ida and
Auguste.

Yours respectfully and sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, September 28th, 1875



174. To Eduard von Liszt

Rome, September 29th, 1875

Dearest Eduard,

Wherever we may be we ever remain one in heart. Probably I shall
be in Budapest as early as the middle of November, on account of
the Musik-Akademie, which it is my duty to shape in accordance
with the standard of somewhat difficult local circumstances.
Appointments have already been made by the Minister Trefort:
Franz Erkel as Director, Volkmann as Professor of Composition,
and Abranyi as Secretary. Witt and Bulow had the first offers
from Trefort: unfortunately Witt is still too ill, and Bulow
could not come till later, after his return from America. Of
course Bulow would have received the largest possible sphere of
action--somewhat the same as he occupied in Munich, where, for a
couple of years, he acted as Director of the Conservatoire in the
most successful manner...

All hearty greetings to your circle, and believe me ever your
gratefully and sincerely attached

F. Liszt Address: 43, Vicolo dei Greci, Roma (Italia). Till the
beginning of November I stay here or at the Villa d'Este, and
then travel direct to Pest.

Pray send me news of our dear and amiable Marie.



175. To Kornel von Abranyi

Dear Friend,

A thousand thanks for your letter with its weighty contents.
[Abranyi had informed Liszt that the Hungarian Landes-Musik-
Akademie--which had been called into existence by Trefort, the
Minister of Education--had already been organised and was shortly
to be opened, and that Liszt was invited to the inauguration
ceremony.] All things considered, it does not appear to me
advisable to hurry my return. As I did this year, I mean next
year also to reach Pest towards the middle of February--in time
for Lent and the concert season. By that time the work at the
Musik-Akademie ought to have fairly established itself.

I gladly undertake to conduct a pianoforte-class for virtuosi and
teachers,--first of all from the 1st March to Easter 1876. And
should the undertaking give indications of proving a success, I
would be willing to devote several months a year to this species
of instruction in the Musik-Akademie of Budapest.

I look forward to being on the best and most cordial terms with
Erkel. [Franz Erkel (born 1810), a celebrated Hungarian composer,
at that time Director of the Musik-Akademie and Capellmeister at
the National Theater in Pest. Died 15th June, 1893] Also with
Volkmann and the other professors.

As regards the very worthy Secretary, I rejoice to labor with him
as next-door neighbor (on the Fischplatz, where assuredly we
shall not dry up "like fish out of water"), and remain always

His grateful and truly attached friend,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, October 14th, 1875.

My friendly greetings, please, to Engessers, Zimay, Siposz, [All
were Hungarian musicians] and to our dear composer of the "Liszt-
Cantata," Gobbi.



176. To Walter Bache

Highly Esteemed and Dear Friend,

Hearty thanks for your kindly remembrance of the 22nd October.

With regard to the "Elizabeth" performance (at your "Twelfth
Annual Concert" on the 24th February) I am somewhat anxious on
account of the great exertions and expense which the performance
will entail upon you. Still I will not make any further objection
to your characteristically firm incorrigibleness in your
steadfast wish and endeavor to do the utmost possible for the
good of your old friend, now 64 years of age.

To Frau Blume (whom I often called upon in Rome) please give my
friendliest remembrances. If the part of Elizabeth does not
displease her she is certain to give an excellent interpretation
of it.

I am most glad to grant friend Banz the permission he desires,
and am grateful to him for his kindly sentiments.

Till the middle of February I shall stay here--and then go direct
to Budapest--and remain your faithfully attached

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, October 26th, 1875.

In case you receive direct news of Von Bulow, please let me know.



177. To Eduard von Liszt

Most Dear Friend,

Your letters are as full of heart as they are of mind. They both
comfort and exalt me. My prayers always include you. May the
"Supreme Spirit" strengthen us!

For me to appear at the opening of the Musik-Akademie in Pest on
November 7th, is, I think, neither necessary nor desirable. It
will be better that the undertaking (the official part of which I
did not call into existence!) should be more fully started before
I take any part in it. Hence till the middle of February I remain
at the Villa d'Este (quietly finishing a few compositions) and
then return direct to Pest.

Herbeck is said to have promised to conduct a concert there. I
trust we may meet in friendship on the "Fischplatz" during Lent.
How could he manage to have the Gran Mass performed in the
Burgkapelle? The dimensions of the work require rather a goodly
amount of space for chorus and orchestra...Next summer it is
proposed to give a grand concert-performance of the Gran Mass in
Dusseldorf (where they have a splendid hall, admirably adapted
for musical festivals). I shall look for your report of the
Vienna performance.

As regards the "Prometheus," I beg you to fix with Her-beck that
in Vienna the new improved edition, published by Kahnt (Leipzig),
shall be used, and get him to procure it from Kahnt: pianoforte
score, full score, and voice parts. If Herbeck should entertain
any doubt about the new edition on account of the expense, I
shall be quite ready to settle the small "difference" with a few
gulden, which you will advance me for the purpose. [Eduard von
Liszt managed Liszt's money affairs for him.]

I am very anxious that this "Prometheus"--who is ready to
"unchain" himself next summer in Dusseldorf and at the Musical
Festival at Altenburg--should not again be a failure in Vienna,
after his late want of success there.--

Give Kulke my best thanks for his excellent essay with its kindly
sentiments (in the Vaterland of September 17th); I am specially
pleased with the close: "In the same way as Sebastian Bach could
not conceive a musical thought in any other way than from a
contrapuntal point of view, Liszt cannot conceive a theme in any
other way than from a thematic point of view," etc.

Heartiest greetings to all your circle: Marie will always prove
herself noble and firm.

Your faithfully attached

F.L.

(Villa d'Este) October 31st, 1875



178. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Very Dear and Kind Friend,

Although I scarcely know how sufficiently to express my gratitude
to you for all the proofs of friendship you have constantly shown
me during twenty years, I am quite convinced that no
misunderstanding would ever be possible between us. You know my
good intentions from the outset, and in case of necessity you
divine them with the heart's most penetrating and delicate
intelligence.

I add to my thanks for your last letter a request which you will
certainly grant, by assuring our very honored friend Hillebrand
of my sincere devotedness. In addition, assure him also that my
zeal in serving my gracious master, the Grand Duke of Saxony,
will never be used to the detriment of any one, and that I
especially take into consideration the proprieties appropriate to
the merits and position of individualities that I esteem and
love.

So then we will discuss "academicamente," at your house in
Florence (after my return from Hungary, towards the middle of
February), the subject of Hillebrand's spending some months each
year at Weimar.

This could be brought about under reciprocally pleasant
conditions; I confess that I take a rather egotistical interest
in it...but without failing in the duties of friendship.

In a week's time, Mdlle. Adelheid de Schorn accompanies her aunt-
-"the Lady Abbess von Stein"-- back to Germany. She will bring
you two or three books of music from me.

Sgambati has finished a second, very remarkable Quintet (for
Piano and Strings), which will soon be heard in Rome.

Zarembski (whom I introduced to you) works valiantly, and
deserves to be reckoned as an unusually excellent pianist of the
first rank.

A revoir in February, and yours very devotedly,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, November 17th, 1875

If you should see the Jaells before their concerts in Rome, give
them my most affectionate remembrances.



179. To Eduard von Liszt

My Honored Friend,

What you felt at the performance of the Gran Mass has extremely
rejoiced me. "He who loves understands."

Give Herbeck my warmest thanks for the carefulness of the
rehearsals and performance of this work, about which I allowed
myself to make the remark (in Paris 1866), to a personage of the
very highest rank, that "it had been more criticised than heard."

On no account would I press Herbeck to give a performance of the
"Prometheus-choruses"; according to my thinking, it would be
better to wait and see how these choruses are done next spring in
Dusseldorf and at the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Altenburg before
bringing them back to Vienna. I should also like to be present at
the Vienna performance, which will not be possible tha's winter.
I shall probably only be able to stay one day with you (at the
beginning of April). I almost doubt whether the "Hunnenschlacht"
could be performed amongst the "Philharmoniker" [lovers of
harmony] without defeat to me. Nevertheless, "vincit qui
patitur."

Heartiest greetings to our Franz, who will prove himself worthy
of you.

Most faithfully thy

F. Liszt

(Villa d'Este, Tivoli) November 26th, 1875

.--. As I already told you, I shall remain here till the middle
of February, and then return direct to Budapest. From next April
I am threatened with much travelling about. My threefold
domicile, Pest, Weimar and Villa d'Este, and all that is
connected with it, makes my life very onerous. Even the well-
known consolation, "Tu l'as voulu, Georges Dandin" [it is your
own doing], fails me...Still there is hope in the proclamation
"Et in terra pax, hominibus bonae voluntatis."

Once more thanks for your kind intercession in my friend Vincenz
Kirchmayer's [Liszt's former travelling companion in Spain and
Portugal during the forties, and especially recommended by Liszt
to his cousin Eduard.] affairs. When the decision has been given
let me know it.

180. To Hans Schmitt, Professor at the Conservatorium of Music in
Vienna

[Well known as an excellent teacher of the pianoforte, also as a
writer on music]

[End of 1875]

My Dear Sir,

It is well known how much mischief is done to the piano both with
hands and feet. May your instructive pamphlet on the right use of
the pedal duly benefit pianoforte players. [Footnote: "The Pedal
of the Piano." Vienna, Doblinger (3rd ed. 1892).] With best
thanks for sending me the pamphlet, I remain

Yours respectfully,

F. Liszt



181. To Kornel von Abranyi

Dear Honored Friend,

In the affairs of the Academy of Music I had till now simply to
wait. [The opening of the Academy of Music had taken place
meanwhile in the middle of November, 1875.] Now comes the time
when a different, an active line of conduct presents itself to
me. I shall always endeavor to come up to the expectations of my
friends. First of all in the middle of February we begin our
peaceful academical conferences, and, as I have already written
to you, I willingly undertake, from the 1st March, to conduct a
pianoforte class (for virtuosi and teachers)--provided that Erkel
and you, dear friend, agree to this harmless proposal. My further
activity in the Royal Hungarian Academy of Music had better be
favored, measured and decided by the circumstances. I can only
lay claim to be the well-intentioned zealous servant of Art and
of Hungary.

Please to give Erkel my heartiest thanks for the Liszt-paragraph
in the "Inaugural Address." The kindly confidence which Erkel has
reposed in me for more than 30 years shall never be abused.

The notice "Count Geza Zichy, President, and Bartay, Director of
the Pest Conservatorium," affects me very pleasantly. Engesser's
constancy in conducting the Liszt-Verein [Engesser founded the
Liszt-Verein in Pest (for mixed voices)] particularly rejoices
me. Is Gobbi's Cantata come out? Friendly greetings to the
composer and recently "well-known composer of album-leaf
waltzes," from your old, truly attached

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, January 20th, 1876

(Before my arrival--16th February--I will telegraph to you from
Venice, where I shall visit Count Imre Szechenyi.) In case there
were anything to write to me, address, till February 5th, Rome,
Vicolo dei Greci, 43.



182. To Eduard von Liszt

(Villa d'Este,) January 23rd, 1876

My Dear Beloved Friend,

Your letter has deeply affected me. I preserve it in the secret
cell of the heart, where the last words of my dear mother remain-
-and give me consolation. I cannot thank you in words. My thanks
rise in prayer to God. May His blessing ever be with your
generosity and constancy in all that is good.

At the "Decisions of the Court of Cassation" (the 2nd October and
16th November) you spoke so forcibly and beautifully clearly
about blasphemy, and of the symbol of redemption, the crucifix--
and thus truly fulfilled the teaching of our Savior:
"Thesaurizate autem vobis thesauros in Coelo." Let us continue to
the end, dearest Eduard, in the love of Christ!

I absolutely wrote the "Hunnenschlacht" for the sake of the hymn
"Crux fidelis." Kulke in a very generous manner determined on the
production of this work in Vienna. For very many years Kulke has
always been well-affected towards me. I enclose a few lines of
thanks which I beg you to hand to him. His "Moses before Pharaoh"
I have, alas, not the power to compose. To compose philosophy and
politics in music appears to me an all-too-difficult task. I
almost doubt whether it could be accomplished.

Heartiest greetings to your family, and most truly yours,

F. Liszt

I shall arrive in Pest again in the middle of February.



183. To Dr. Eduard Kulke in Vienna

My Dear Sir,

During long years you have constantly shown me so much kindness
that I cannot sufficiently thank you for it. I am also ashamed
not to compose better works, so as to make the kindly
interpretation of them more easy and pleasanter to you.
Nevertheless all the more valuable is your insight and
indulgence.

The "feathered thief" [A comedy by the addressee, a well-known
and meritorious author, and sent by him shortly before to Liszt.]
reconciles me with the "newspaper geese." It will, without
plagiarism, win its laurels on the stage. The dialogue and action
are full of humor and wit...and the final catastrophe of the
thrashing must make an impression on the public.--

Excuse me, my dear Sir, if I do not feel myself equal to the task
of an Old-Testament Oratorio. [Kulke had sent a poem, "Moses
before Pharaoh," to Liszt in Rome, with the question whether he
would be inclined to make it the subject of an Oratorio.] Michael
Angelo represented his Moses mighty and horned (perhaps as a most
excellent ideal forerunner of Pope Julius II.?); Rossini sang
exquisitely the "preghiera di Mose," with which Europe is still
enraptured; and Marx's Oratorio Moses, less well-known, contains
many excellent parts.

"Non omnia possumus omnes." My humble self can do but little, and
remains most humbly grateful to the "Caritas Christi."

With especial regards and thanks, yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, January 23rd, 1876



184. To Marie Lipsius

My Honored Patroness,

Your kind promise to translate the "Chopin" into beautiful German
rejoices me extremely. Hearty thanks for it. I will soon send the
revised (French) copy, and I hope the work will be easy and
pleasant to you. In the 3rd edition of "Musikalische
Studienkopfe" I lately read "Berlioz"--an excellent
characterisation and recognition of this extraordinarily great
master, who perhaps hovers more in the untrodden regions of
genius than anywhere else.

The addition of the "index" is a valuable completion of this
third edition. Its success augurs well for what will follow.

With much respect and gratitude,

F. Liszt

(Villa d'Este,) February 3rd, 1876



185. To August von Trefort, The Hungarian Minister of Education
in Budapest

[Printed in the Pester Lloyd of that date.--Addressee died 1888.]

Herr Minister,

Although I scruple to weary the extraordinary good-will which the
public of Budapest has evinced towards me, I nevertheless make so
bold as to offer the assistance of my two hands for the concert
shortly to be given in aid of the sufferers by the floods, if
Your Excellency is of opinion that this could still be at all
useful. In the year 1838, when I returned for the first time to
Vienna, I gave my first concert there in aid of the sufferers by
the inundation at Pest. It will be a comfort to me if I can now
close my protracted career as virtuoso by the fulfilment of a
similar duty. [The concert in aid of the sufferers by the floods
in Budapest took place with Liszt's co-operation on the 13th
March, 1876] I remain, until death, Hungary's true and grateful
son.

Your Excellency's most obedient

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 1st, 1876



186. To Walter Bache

Honored and Dear Friend,

You, in your London "Annual Concerts," have for 12 years worked
more wonders than I was able to compose in the "Rosenwunder"
[Rose miracle] of Elizabeth. Hearty thanks for your account of
the 12th concert, and all the exertions connected with it! I beg
you to present my most respectful compliments to Mrs. Osgood
("Elizabeth"), and, before all, to Constance Bache, the kind
translator of the Legend.

Entirely approving of the use of the mute in the passage


[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt]

and during the chorus of angels, remains, in sincere esteem for
the steadfast conductor and friend Walter Bache, his faithful and
grateful

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 8th, 1876



187. To Madame Jessie Laussot,

Dear excellent Friend,

The Commander Casamorata has written to me again about the fete
of Bartolomeo Cristofori. I have replied to him that my answer
had been already received by you in the month of January '75, and
that I can only repeat the same excuses. I copy the last lines of
my letter to Casamorata that you may have the exact particulars:-
-

"Without reckoning that for more than thirty years I have not
belonged to the active lists of pianists and only desire the
honorable repose of an invalid, I permit myself to remark that
the duty of celebrating the inventor of the pianoforte in Italy
belongs by preference to Italian pianists of note, such as M.
Buonamici (in Florence) and M. Sgambati (in Rome), etc."--

In conclusion, I scarcely could leave Germany all this summer
(except for the visit to the Chateau de Loo), and I shall
probably be obliged to return to Hungary after Bayreuth, where I
hope still to find you.

Yours very devotedly,

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 18th, 1876



188. To Dr. Leopold Damrosch in New York

[Draft of a letter from a copy by Dr. Mirus in Weimar.--Addressee
(1832-1885) came to Weimar in 1855 as a violinist under Liszt,
went to Breslau in 1858, and in 1871 to New York, where he had
great success and influence as a conductor.]

April 15th, 1876

My dear honored Friend,

You have recommended our young friend Max Pinner to me. He shows
himself to be an excellent artist, and I have become much
attached to him [Pinner died young.] I beg you to accept through
him the renewed expression of my former faithful friendship.

Your beautifully conceived and nobly executed work "Ruth" I have
read with sympathetic interest and pleasure. I will not fail to
suggest its performance in Germany.

How shall I thank you for the edifying goodwill which you
manifest towards my compositions? Your intelligent enthusiastic
conducting of my scores prevents any one noticing the defects of
the composition.

A hearty greeting to your wife, and with warmest esteem ever
yours,

F. Liszt



189. To Friedrich von Bodenstedt

[From a copy by Director Aug. Gollerich in Nurnberg.--Addressee,
who died in April 1892, the poet of Mirza Schaffy]

June 8th, 1876

My very honored Friend,

Your very agreeable and genial friend, Frau Major von L., sends
the September leaflet about the concert in Hanover. A thousand
thanks for it. .--.

On the occasion of my happy 50 years' jubilee you rejoiced me
with a poem, of which Iam proud. You have admirably succeeded in
coaxing such poetical euphony from an old worn-out instrument
like my humble self.

Au revoir in Hanover, and friendly greetings to your family.

With thanks, yours sincerely,

F. Liszt



190. To the Music Publisher Bessel

Sir,

Although the music which you have been so obliging as to send me
through Mr. Kahnt has not yet reached me, I hasten to assure you
again of the strong interest which I take in the works of the new
Russian composers--Rimski-Korsakoff, Cui, Tschaikowski,
Balakireff, Borodine--which you edit. You know that lately, at
the Tonkunstler-Versammlung at Altenburg, the Ballade "Sadko" was
well performed and received. Next year I shall propose that other
works of the above-named Russian composers be produced. They are
worth serious attention in musical Europe.

When you return to Weimar in July I shall better express to you
my thanks and regards.

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 20th, 1876

Kindly give the accompanying note to Mr. Cui.



191. To Prince Carl Lichnowsky

[Communicated to the Musical Chronicle, 20th February, 1888, by
A. Gollerich.--Addressee is the brother of Liszt's intimate
friend, Prince Felix Lichnowsky, who, as a member of the
Parliament of Frankfort, fell on the Heath at Bornheim
(Bornheimer Haide), a sacrifice to the Revolution of 1848.]

Your most Serene Highness and Friend,

In old attachment I thank you heartily for your kind lines. The
most grateful recollections ever bind me to the House of
Lichnowsky. Your highly endowed father and your admirable brother
Feliz showed not less kindness to me, than Prince Carl Lichnowsky
showed before that to the young Beethoven, who dedicated his Opus
I. (3 Trios) to the Prince Lichnowsky, and felt himself quite at
home in the so-called Krzizanowitz "Palace," and in the Castle of
Gratz. [Krzizanowitz is Lichnowsky's inherited estate in Prussian
Silesia, the Castle of Gratz his dominion in Austrian Silesia.
Franz Liszt like Beethoven, was a guest in both these places.]
May it be permitted, dear Prince, to find you again there
(perhaps next year) to

Your faithful and most devoted

F. Liszt

June 21st, 1876



192. To Hofcapellmeister Max Erdmannsdorfer

Very honored Friend,

Thanking you very much for your kind invitation, I shall
willingly come next Sunday, and rejoice that I shall again hear a
special Sondershausen concert. Berlioz's "Harold-Symphony" is to
me an old, ever-fresh recollection: the Sondershausen orchestra
played it capitally at the first Festival of the "Music of the
Future" in Ballenstedt, which I conducted.

Send me soon the whole printed programme. Can you already conduct
Wagner's new "Fest Marsch?"

I beg for Bulow's "Nirwana," if possible, and in case there
should be room for anything, not long, of mine, I would most
modestly suggest the Symphonic Poem "Hamlet," which I never
heard. Most friendly greetings to your wife, and believe me
always

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 27th, 1876

I suppose the concert takes place on Sunday afternoon, so that
the visitors from Weimar can get back here again?

Which train, in the lately altered railway guide--as I was told
yesterday--will bring me in tempo (non rubato) [in time--not
broken] to Sondershausen and back?--



193. To Kornel von Abranyi

Dear honored Friend,

Best thanks for your letter. Please to make my apologies to the
mayor Herr Karoly and to the Festival Committee in Szegedin. [The
town of Szegedin and the Hungarian Vocal Society had begged
Liszt's active sympathy for the Musical and Singers' Festival
about to be held in that place. Karl Wagner was president of the
Festival Committee.] With reference to the first invitation to
Szegedin (last March) I made the observation immediately that
"During the whole month of August I belong to Bayreuth."
Consequently it is no fault to remain there,--if the principle is
correct.

Now, dear faithful friend, I invite you once again to come
hither. The "Festival-Play" is of the very most serious
historical significance...So do come at the latest from the 27th
till the 30th August for the third series of these stupendous
performances of the "Nibelung's Ring." The Montecuculi-an matters
will be gladly arranged for you here [i.e. the expenses.] by

Your old, most sincerely faithful

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, August 6th, 1876



194. To Richard Wagner

[Autograph of this curiosity in possession of Herrn
Commerzienrath Bosendorfer in Vienna.]

Incredible One,

Hast thou a moment's time for the Leipzig "affaire"? then please
come down here (where Herr Neumann now is) to thine own

F. L.

[Bayreuth, August, 1876]

[This referred to the performance of the "Nibelungen" in Leipzig,
striven for by Angelo Neumann and interceded for by Liszt, for
which purpose the former came to Bayreuth.--Wagner wrote in
pencil on Liszt's letter as follows:--

"Still more incredible One!

"I am in my shirt-sleeves and under no circumstances inclined to
give my work to Leipzig or anywhere else!

"Love me!

Thy

R. W."]



195. To the Kammersangerin [Private Concert Singer to the Court]
Marie Breidenstein in Erfurt

[Died 1892. She dedicated herself with satisfaction to the
rendering of Liszt's compositions, and was also his pupil for
piano.]

Dear honored One,

Perhaps the Schubert songs with my most modest instrumentation
would suit somewhere in your programme. Here are the printed
scores with the orchestral parts. "Gretchen" and "Erlkonig" have
been much used and are played out. This is not so much the case
with the "Young Nun"; and Mignon's wonderful song, "So lasst mich
scheinen bis ich werde" [So let me seem till I become], is
scarcely heard--or appreciated!

But if you will once more spare me an hour in Weimar, I will
accompany these 4 instrumented Schubert-Songs for you.

Next Saturday departs from here

Your sincerely devoted

F. Liszt

Weimer, Monday, September 18th, 1876

N.B.--The instrumentation compelled me to a few little different
readings in Schubert's four songs: on this account the singer
must go by my score-edition as regards the rests and the very
slight alterations.



196. To Camille Saint-Saens

Very Dear Friend

In sending you today the transcription of your "Danse macabre," I
beg you to excuse my unskilfulness in reducing the marvellous
coloring of the score to the possibilities of the piano. No one
is bound by the impossible. To play an orchestra on the piano is
not yet given to any one. Nevertheless we must always stretch
towards the deal across all the more or less dogged and
insufficient forms. It seems to me that Life and Art are only
good for that.

In sincere admiration and friendship,

Your very devoted

F. Liszt

Hanover, October 2nd, 1876



197. To Professor L. A. Zellner, General Secretary of the
Conservatoire of Music in Vienna

[From a copy of a draft by Dr. Mirus in Weimar.]

October 3lSt, 1876

Honored Friend,

Be so very kind as to convey my sincere thanks to Directors
Mosenthal and Herbeck for the friendly communication about the
Beethoven-Monument Concerts in Vienna next March. A few weeks
earlier I beg you to send me the programmes, to which Beethoven's
Concerto in E-flat major, and also as a Finale, in case the
"Hammerclavier" appears admissible, the "Choral Fantasia," will
willingly be added with his old hands by

Your faithful and most obedient

F. Liszt



198. To Hans Richter, Conductor of the Royal Opera in Vienna

[From a copy by Dr. Mirus in Weimar.-Addressee (born 1843 in
Hungary) the renowned conductor, since 1876, of the Bayreuth
Festspiel, and, in addition to his opera work in Vienna,
conductor of the Philharmonic Concerts there and of the Richter-
Concerts in London.]

November 10th, 1876

I thank you most sincerely for your friendly intention of giving
my Beethoven-Cantata in the performance at the Royal Opera House
for the benefit of the monument to Beethoven. By today's post you
will receive the whole printed score, together with a separate
edition of the orchestrated Andante (from the B-flat major Trio),
which shines, like a guiding star, above my insignificant work.
The Cantata was published by Kahnt, Leipzig, in the year 1870,
and was also first brought out in Weimar, then in Pest, on the
occasion of the Beethoven Jubilee Celebration. If, my dear Sir,
the orchestration to some extent pleases you, I should advise you
to take up this alone in your programme on the 15th December.

The remaining movements might meet with many hindrances in
Vienna...and, frankly, I have become altogether somewhat shy as
regards the performance of my compositions. Although I quietly
endure their foregone want of success with prevailing criticism,
it is my duty not to let my friends be injured by it.

Once again hearty thanks for your goodwill and meritorious
conducting of Wagner.

F. Liszt



199. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Dear Sirs,

Your communication to me of the 25th October has been very much
delayed, owing to my change of residence several times during the
past weeks. There is surely no need to assure you that I never
thought of causing any unpleasantness at all to any one--more
especially judicially [The publisher of "Tannhauser" had tried to
make out that Liszt's arrangement of the March was a "piracy."]
In particular my connection with your very honorable house for
more than 30 years has ever been most simple and honest. This is
also shown by my two quoted letters of the 17th February and 3rd
April, 1853, with reference to the publication by your firm of
the "Tannhauser and Lohengrin pieces," whose publication at that
time I was quite "the agreement" with Richard Wagner in
suggesting.

Certainly I could not, without injuring the Tannhauser March, go
all through the original, loading it with shakes, and here and
there adding arpeggios. However, if "connoisseurs" will look
through my transcription in detail, they will easily discover
that neither the variation on the principal theme, nor the
modulating of the second, nor in any manner the whole setting of
the pianoforte arrangement, could be found fault with as a
"piracy."

With much esteem,

Very sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

November 12th, 1876

Budapest (where I stay the whole winter)



200. To Constantin Sander, Music Publisher in Leipzig

[Autograph in possession of M. Alfred Bovet in Valentigney.]

Very honored Sir,

Best thanks for kindly sending me the "collected writings of
Hector Berlioz" and some novelties of your firm. The compositions
of Tschaikowsky interest me. A few of my pupils here play his
Concerto and several of his pieces really capitally. I have also
recommended Riedel to include Tschaikowsky's Symphony in the
programme of the next Tonkunstler-Versammlung.

Otto Reubke's arrangement of the Schubert Quartet [In A minor,
published by Sander (F. E. C. Leuckart).] for one performer on
the pianoforte seems to me well done, though the 3rd bar of the
first Allegro should stand thus,--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt]

because in the latter case the important E of the melody cannot
be held on, etc.--

I know the manuscript of an excellent arrangement of Schubert's D
minor Quartet for 2 hands, the author of which, a man of very
high standing, I do not today mention by name. But should you be
inclined to publish this Quartet (arranged for 2 hands on the
P.F.) I will gladly give you further particulars.--

By today's post you receive my last revision of Berlioz's
"Symphonie fantastique." I have added two remarks to the title
which I beg you to notice and adhere to. Thus "Piano Score"--not
"Arrangement."...Then it is absolutely necessary to insert the
whole programme of Berlioz, French and German, in your 2nd
edition (on the 1st page after the title-page). If necessary my
friend Richard Pohl will give you the original French text and
the translation.

With sincere regard, yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Budapest, November 15th, 1867

P.S.--I keep the copy of the Witzendosf edition for a while, and
send you today only the Paris edition, together with the last
proof copy of the "Symphonie fantastique."



201. To Breitkopf and Hartel

November 23rd, 1876

Dear Sir and Friend,

Before Herr W. Juranyi handed me your letter I had replied to the
earlier communication from your esteemed house with reference to
the same matter.

Accept once again the assurance that I lay great stress upon the
continuation of our friendly relations, which have now existed
for 36 years. As far as this depends on me it shall never cease.

Your letter contains two proposals:--

1. To recommend Wagner to sign a legal document.

This is entirely opposed to my peaceable practices.

2. To prepare an enlarged version of the transcription of the
"Tannhauser-March."

Acquiescing in this, I will send you the day after tomorrow a
couple of pages of notes [musical] for the purpose of an enlarged
edition. I cannot decide whether these acquire a legal value, but
in any case they prove to you, dear Sir, my sincere readiness.

My "Wagner-Transcriptions," by-the-by, were not in any way a
matter of speculation to me. Appearing at the beginning of the
fifties, when only the Weimar theater had the honor of performing
"Tannhauser," "Lohengrin" and the "Flying Dutchman," such
transcriptions only served as modest propaganda on the inadequate
Piano for the sublime genius of Wagner, whose radiating glory now
and henceforth belongs to the Pride of Germany.

With high esteem most sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

Budapest, November 23rd, 1876



202. To the Music Publisher Constantin Sander

Very honored Sir,

You have rightly guessed that Herr von Keudell's "excellent"
transcription of Schubert's D minor Quartet is finished. It now
only remains for you to write to His Excellency, that you may put
this work in your window.

Reubke has succeeded very well with the B minor Rondo of
Schubert, only, to my thinking, he should add the now
indispensable pedal marks to it. By the same post I send you his
manuscript together with a few remarks, and beg you to thank
Reubke for his friendly dedication, and also to compliment him
especially on the refined and beautifully effective carrying out
of the subject--

[Here appears notated four measures of the theme.]

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Budapest, November 29th, 1876



203. To Vera Timanoff

[First Tausig's pupil (also Rubinstein's for a little while),
from 1875 she studied every summer with Liszt as long as he
remained in Weimar. In 1880 she became pianist to the Court at
Weimar.]

Dear Virtuosa,

I telegraphed immediately to you at Laibach, to tell you to come
without ceremony. Your talent is such that it would convert even
the Turks, and I assure you that the audience at the Pest
concerts will be delighted to applaud you. As to the title which
you propose to take, I think it is too modest for you, but there
would be an excess of modesty on my part in saying anything
against it...so let us be reciprocally proud of it and don't let
us advertise it!

A revoir soon,--and always

Your affectionately devoted

F. Liszt

Budapest, November 29th, 1876

Be so kind as to give my most cordial regards to Monsieur and
Madame Bosendorfer.



204. To Otto Reubke at Halle-on-the-Saale

[Now Music Director at the University there]

Dear Herr Reubke,

Your Arrangement [of Schubert's B minor duet for pianoforte
alone] pleases me uncommonly. I beg you to notice the alterations
I have made on the accompanying sheet of music-paper. This
version is not quite so much like the original as yours, but, as
the great thing is to bring out a fortissimo, we may well allow
inaccuracies of this kind in favor of the performer and of
effect.

You are requested to add to your excellent Arrangement of the
Schubert Rondo much pedal and some fingering,

By your warmly attached

F. Liszt

Budapest, November, 1876



205. To Marianne Brandt, Kammersangerin in Berlin

December 3rd, 1876

Dear honored Friend,

What is always very pleasant and dear to me is your goodwill.
With my hearty thanks for it I send today the little notice.
"Jeanne d'Arc au bucher" ["Joan of Arc at the Stake"] came out a
few months ago at Schott's (Mainz). This short dramatic Scena can
be sung with either pianoforte or orchestral accompaniment. The
chorus is conspicuous by its absence. Johanna [Jeanne] alone has
to perform. N.B.--Only the second edition (published 1876) is to
be used; not the first, which also came out at Schott's 30 years
ago. Schott sent me no copy of it; it was too much trouble for
Berlin to correspond with Mainz via Budapest. Herr Capellmeister
Mannstadt [Now Capellmeister at the Court theater in Wiesbaden.]
will therefore be so kind as to order the "Johanna" (full score
and piano score) at Schott's, if you really have the goodness to
sing it. [It was done in honor of Liszt's presence in Berlin,
which was celebrated by the performance of some of his works.]
There might possibly be special feelings now in Berlin against
it, in spite of Schiller's Tragedy, "Die Jungfrau von Orleans."
Therefore think the matter over.

For years past I have been mostly obliged to dissuade people from
the performance of my large works. The general public usually
goes by what is said by the critics, whose most prominent organs
among the newspapers are hostile to me. Why should I go into
useless quarrels and thereby compromise my friends? Peace and
order are the first duties of citizens, which I have doubly to
fulfil both as honorable citizen and artist.

As for the rest, dear friend, if it suits you to sing any one of
my musical compositions, be assured of the sincerest thanks of

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt



206. To the Committee of the Beethoven Monument in Vienna

[From a copy by Dr. Mirus in Weimar]

December 10th, 1876

Honored Gentlemen,

Rejoiced to be able to help you, I will work with you with a full
heart and both hands in the concert for the Beethoven Monument.

Allow me to answer your friendly remark about the performance of
Beethoven's Choral Fantasia thus,--that I should not think of
performing any other work at this concert than one absolutely
written by Beethoven, and consequently my share in the concert
programme will consist of the E-flat major Concerto. [It did not
consist of that. Liszt did after all play the Pianoforte Part of
the Choral Fantasia, Op. 80.]

I beg you will kindly communicate to the honored Secretary of the
Committee, Herr Zellner, my hints with regard to the Beethoven
Scholarship in Leipzig.

Accept, Gentlemen, the expression of my high esteem.

F. Liszt



207. To Eduard von Liszt

Budapest, January 2nd, 1877

Dearest, Most Honored Cousin,

I always remain faithful to thee in heartiest agreement with thy
thoughts and feelings. Every year brings us nearer to the
fulfilment of our hope in Jesus Christ the Savior!

"He that endureth to the end shall be saved!"--

I am now quite recovered from my little attack. If there were
nothing worse in this world than sprained legs and physical
suffering, one could be quite satisfied. Moreover I belong to the
very favored and happy ones, even as regards physical suffering.

There is nothing particular going on here which I need mention.
Four times weekly I have a class for pianists and pianistes,
native and foreign. Half a dozen of these distinguish themselves
and will be able to grow into capable public artists.
Unfortunately there are far too many concerts and concert-
players. As Dingelstedt quite truly said, "The theater is a
necessary evil, the concert a superfluous one." I am trying to
impress this sentence on my disciples of the Hungarian Academy of
Music.

As you know, Budapest possesses three musical Institutions: the
Conservatorium (which has existed 36 years and counts several
hundred scholars), the Hungarian Theatrical School, and the new
and still small Academy of Music. An excellent younger friend of
mine, Count Geza Zichy, is president of the Conservatorium; an
older one, Count Leo Festetics, president of the Theatrical
School; and my humble self acts in the same position at the
Academy of Music, whose Director Franz Erkel and General
Secretary Abranyi proceed most zealously and judiciously. I have
only pleasant relations with them both, and the Minister Trefort
is already well-disposed towards me, because he knows that I save
him unnecessary annoyance and expense. Most likely the Academy of
Music will in two years' time be so flourishing that there will
be more to say about it; in the meantime let us study--and be
silent. .--.

Heartiest greetings to thy family, and au revoir in Schottenhof
[Eduard Liszt's home in Vienna.] in the middle of March, on the
occasion of the "Beethoven-Monument Concerts."

Thy

F. Liszt

The Christmas week has beggared me. Be so good as to send me very
quickly 500 gulden, for I have hardly 60 left.



208. To Walter Bache

Truly, dear Bache, you are a wonder-working friend. Your
persevering trouble, exertions, expenditure of time and money for
the production of my bitterly-criticised compositions in London
during the past fifteen years, are among the most uncommon
occurrences in the annals of Art. Once again heartiest thanks;
please also to thank Mr. Manns properly for his excellent
conducting of "Mazeppa." Things of that kind are awkward both for
conductors and performers. But how can one go on making music
with what is idly convenient, even when this is raised into
importance under the guise of being classical?

Hueffer's translation of Wagner's letter pleases me. Friendly
greeting to Hueffer [Musical author in London, lately deceased]
and Dannreuther [Musician in London] from

Your grateful and very devoted

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 9th, 1877

At the beginning of April I shall be back in Weimar. I am pleased
that you included the old "Loreley," with fresh orchestral
accompaniments, in your concert programme. Give my respectful
compliments to the friendly singer Mrs. Osgood.



209. To Eduard von Liszt

Weimar, July 3rd, 1877

Dearest Eduard,

For some weeks I have been much on the go and disturbed in many
ways. Several musical performances occasioned me to go about in
the neighborhood. On the 17th June some portions of the "Christus
Oratorio" were splendidly sung in the Thomaskirche (Leipzig) by
the Riedel Verein. Last Friday "Elizabeth" came brilliantly to
the fore again in Eisenach, and yesterday Gille, my untiring
friend of many years' standing, arranged a large concert of
sacred music (with several items of mine), at which I was
present.

I do indeed regret that I am not able to accept in person the
kind invitation of my beloved nephew Franz for his wedding-day.
It would be much better for me to be more with you
all!...Enclosed are a few words to Franz. Arrange for my proxy as
a witness at the marriage ceremony. Whoever is chosen by you will
be worthy and right to me: as for me I should choose my friend
Bosendorfer.

I go the day after tomorrow to Berlin for two days; then I am
bidden farther and nearer till the end of July. I shall
respectfully announce to the Frau Furstin [Princess] my arrival
in Rome--beginning of August. Please send me here on the 20th
July the money for the journey, and something over--about 1200
marks [about 60 pounds]. I must not have any other debts except
moral ones. Our name Liszt in the Hungarian language means Flour:
we will provide good wheaten meal "ex adipe frumenti" with thee,
Franz, and thy children.

Truly devoted,

F. L.

.--. I shall visit you in the middle of November on the return
journey from Rome to Pest,--where I think of spending the winter,
as formerly.

Heartiest greetings to your wife and Marie.



210. To Ludwig Bosendorfer

Honored Friend,

You have been just as much a pianoforte maker as I have been, and
still remain, alas! an almost posthumous pianoforte player.

My friend Berlioz asked: "Do you believe that I can listen to
music for my pleasure?" Nevertheless we intend to continue our
Music and Piano "for our good pleasure."

Thanks for letter and telegram.

Heartily devoted,

F. Liszt

Weimar, July 12th, 1877



211. To Edmund von Mihalovich

.--. In order to obtain this performance [Of Mihalovich's Opera
"Hagbar."] I think it necessary and indispensable (as I have
already told you) that you should lay a regular siege in person
to the Intendant, the Capellmeister, and the singers, male and
female, of the theater which you choose.

The new serious Operas are now regarded with suspicion and are in
disgrace everywhere. Several trials have been made of them here
and there of late years. In the happiest of them the public
applauded warmly during the first performances, and abstained
from attending the following ones. Consequently the coffers
remained empty: ergo, it is the receipts which prove real
success. If Wagner's marvellous chefs d'oeuvre hold their own in
the repertoire, it is because they make money and continue to
draw even a large contingent of detractors. .--.

Weimar, July 20th, 1877

Towards the middle of August I shall be in Rome, and shall stay
at the Villa d'Este until my return to Pest in November.



212. To Kornel von Abranyi

Weimar, July 28th, 1877

Honored Friend,

Dear Secretary-General of the "Zene Akademia," [i.e. Academy of
Music of the Country.] Sincere thanks for your significant
communication, which I answer immediately, point by point.
[Abranyi had informed Liszt, as President of the Academy, of the
course of instruction (1877) and concerts, and had also asked him
for his opinion on several Art questions.]

1. The conclusion of the year '77 with the examination concerts
(25 to 28 June--and the "Magyar Hangverseny" [An Hungarian
Concert.] on the 30th June) has been very gratifying. Let us
rejoice in the praiseworthy performances of Messrs. Juhasz,
Agghazi, Swoboda, and of the ladies Frau Knapp, Fraulein Lepessy,
[The above-mentioned were favorite pupils of the Master at the
Academy.] etc., in Counterpoint, Harmony, Composition,
Aesthetics, Hungarian music and the indispensable Piano-playing.

The work best praises the Master: in like manner do the pupils,
when preparing themselves for pre-eminence, praise their teacher.
The "Zene Akademia" has not to work for the universally usual
kind of musical study, but has indeed a weightier, higher task to
fulfil.

2. The publication of your "Academic lectures" I had especially
recommended to His Excellency Minister Trefort. "Suitable
teaching and departmental books" printed in the Hungarian
language are inaccessible. You, my honored Secretary-General,
have to look after that,--and the Minister will certainly support
your scientific-patriotic work for the use and benefit of
learners and teachers at the "Zene Akademia"--and further, in all
Hungary.

3. As to the "Plan of classes in the department for Church music,
Singing and Organ," I can now only repeat my previously expressed
wish that the right and able person of good working capability
may be found for conducting these classes. Neither invalids nor
dabblers may officiate at No. 4, Fischplatz!--[Liszt's house,
and, for the time, the locale of the Academy.] If unfortunately
the right reverend Herr F. Witt should continue unable to fill
the post offered to him in Budapest, I shall propose that the new
director should come for a year on trial. And a complaisant sort
of Protection is thereby to be avoided, for the matter in
question is nothing less than the worthy thriving and culture of
Church music in Hungary.

4. I consider as necessary the appointment of an experienced
Pianoforte Professor, one who is pushing forwards, and who will
be able to relieve our highly honored Director Herr F. Erkel of a
part of his very meritorious but excessive exertions. Meanwhile I
protest strongly against desiring to have a professorship without
salary. Fees with honor; judicious restrictions without beggarly
management; otherwise we shall come to grief.

5. I beg that my "jubilee-stipend," entrusted to me in the most
honorable manner by the municipality of Budapest, may next year
('78) be apportioned to the same artists as this year. I will
gladly sign all the papers having reference to this. Looking
forward to the speedy appearance of your Study of Harmony, and of
the collected writings of our never-to-be-forgotten friend
Mosonyi, together with his biography and Abranyi's new
compositions, and greeting your laudable and persistent endeavors
in the cause of Art with sympathetic recognition,

I remain, with best regards, yours truly,

F. Liszt

Next week I journey farther--shall be in Rome by the middle of
August--and in November in Pest, where I intend to spend the
winter again. Write to me in September: my address will be Villa
d'Este, Tivoli, (presso) Roma, Italia.

I beg you to give the enclosed lines to Frau Knapp.



213. To the Music Publisher Constantin Sander

Very dear Sir,

I shall have much pleasure in preparing the re-discovered
manuscript of the "Harold Symphony" (Score for Piano and Alto
[viola]) for the dress and in entrusting it to you. Send me the
manuscript soon, together with the original score of Berlioz,
which is necessary for the accurate revision of the arrangement.
My fee shall be a moderate one, as I am pleased that your firm is
going to publish this arrangement, which was finished in
Switzerland forty years ago. I would have made it public long
since, if the manuscript had not been lost.

Sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, Tivoli (near Rome), September 5th, 1877

Please send with it a copy of the excellent Trio of Edward
Napravnik. My friend Sgambati will produce it publicly in Rome,
and make it a success.



214. To Adelheid von Schorn at Weimar

Dear and honored One,

When one is at a loss what to say or write, well--one tries to
help oneself with music. Enclosed I forward you the song of your
noble-hearted mother: "Ach, was ist Leben doch so schwer!" [Ah,
why is life so burdensome!] My setting is so managed that you
will easily master it, as well in the singing as in the
accompaniment. [Published in the 8th book of Songs under the
title "Sei still" ("Be still")]

Faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, September 15th, 1877



215. To Breitkopf and Hartel

Honored Sirs,

.--. May my slight share in your edition of Chopin's works, which
nearly all belong to your firm, be of use to you. I remarked
before how little really remains to be done to Chopin's
compositions, as he himself, with praiseworthy and exceptional
accuracy, added every possible instruction to the performer--even
to the pedal indications, which in no other author appear so
frequently.--Your collaborators will certainly find accuracy and
authenticity of the original text in Karl Klindworth's Moscow
edition of Chopin. I chose the "Etudes," because the first volume
was dedicated to me, and the second too for the matter of that
(at that time). I gladly dispense with a revision of both, and
beg you particularly, dear Sirs, not to expose me to an unseemly
rivalry. I will always maintain a most peaceful attitude towards
my honored colleagues, and, wherever they please, allow their
influence and opinion to have free play.

According to your letter, you repudiate the idea of "an
instructive edition with other additions" of Chopin's works. Are
then the directions for fingering also to be omitted?...All the
more undisturbed will the leisure of the collaborators be.--

Last week I sent you the corrections of the "Triomphe funebre du
Tasse," as well as the "Impromptu." Tomorrow "Heroide funebre"
(for four hands) will follow, and very soon I am expecting the
"Hunnenschlacht," which completes all the arrangements for four
hands of the 12 "Symphonic Poems." A complete edition of them in
3 or 4 volumes (as you may judge best) will be a pleasure to me.

In spite of the much criticising, ignoring, and denunciation,
which these things have had to suffer for 20 years, they are
perhaps not yet quite done to death.

I beg you to add the Prefaces and Poems (French and German) to
the edition for four hands, as well as to the scores, and also to
the further editions for 2 pianos. The same with regard to the
transcription for piano of the "Triomphe funebre" (Italian and
German), because, as a matter of fact, a well-disposed programme
composer uses such hints more than is generally supposed. Of
course the dedication of the "Impromptu"--"a Madame la Baronne
Olga de Meyendorff, nee Princesse Gortschakoff"--must not be left
out.

With distinguished respect,

Your obedient

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, September 26th, 1877

Till the end of October my address will be: 43, Via dei Greci,
Roma (Italia). From the middle of November: Budapest (Hungary).



216. To Frau Ingeborg von Bronsart in Hanover

Dear Kind Friend,

I am much touched by your charming letter, and grieved at not
being able to accept your friendly invitation. That would
certainly be more agreeable than to attend to all sorts of
duties; but, since three parts of these are self-imposed, I am
all the more bent upon fulfilling them; and, in order to keep
faith with myself, I am returning to Budapest before the middle
of November, and shall remain there till April. Perhaps I am less
useless there than elsewhere; it is an idea or an illusion of
mine.

What excellent and beautiful things the two Hans are going to do
at Hanover! [Hans von Bulow had been appointed Hofcapellmeister
in Hanover, where Hans von Bronsart was Intendant of the
theater.] It is a matter of lively joy to me, and next summer I
hope that my ears will benefit by the new musical regime all in
honor of Art, and the example of which will be of service and
bear fruit far and wide.

Last week I forwarded from the author to your address a copy of
Sgambati's Quintet, dedicated to Bulow; and also a Fugue
(preceded by a grand Prelude and ending in a Chorale--the same
which Guido d'Arezzo made use of to name the six notes of the
gamut: "Ut queant taxis resonare fibris, etc.!"...One of the two
Hans will tell you the rest of the hymn, which is always chanted
on the 24th June, the feast of St. John the Baptist).

Once on a time you used to cultivate fugues with maestria: will
that of Sgambati seem to you classical enough? I almost doubt it,
since in these matters your strictness is extreme. In consequence
of H.M. the Queen of the Netherlands being in mourning, the
"auditions" at the chateau of Loo do not take place this year. I
shall therefore go straight from here to Pest.

Please give my love to your children, and believe me to be for
all time the heartily devoted friend of their papa and mamma.

F. Liszt

(Villa d'Este,) October 2lst, 1877



217. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

.--. I am told that one or two newspapers announce that I am
going to Paris. I have no thought of doing so, and am moreover
very weary of travelling. What I should prefer would be to remain
firmly fixed in one place, it matters not what, village or city,
till my end, and to go on as quietly as possible with my work. As
this is not permitted to me, I try at least to avoid unnecessary
perambulations, do not go (in spite of various invitations) to
Paris or London, and keep within that already far too extensive
and troublesome triangle, Pest, Weimar, Rome!--So I shall again
spend the next four months here, and then, at the beginning of
April, pay you a week's visit.

Write and tell me where my dear cousin Marie is. [She had shortly
before married Baron von Saar, an officer.] Is her husband
established in Wiener-Neustadt, and in what capacity?

How are our Franz in Graz and his wife?

Heartiest greetings to the Frau Generalissimus-Procuratorin
[Eduard v. L. had in December 1875 become General Procurator.
Liszt called his wife in joke "Generalissima" or "Generalin."]
from your heartily and faithfully affectionate

F. Liszt

Budapest (Fischplat 4), November 23rd, 1877

All friendly greetings to Bosendorfer.



218. To Jules de Zarembski

[A highly gifted pupil of Liszt, born in 1854 in Russian Poland,
died in 1885 at Brussels, where he was Professor in the
Conservatoire.]

Dear Friend,

Thinking that you would spend some weeks at Berlin, I sent the
day before yesterday a letter for you to our friend Bosendorfer,
begging him to have it punctually delivered to you. This letter
enclosed another, which you will remit to Paris to Madame la
Comtesse Taida Rczewazska. She promised me lately at Rome to take
an interest in your success at Paris, and I assured her that your
talent and intellectual gifts would not make her patronage
irksome. Therefore be careful not to give me the lie, and to show
yourself of an amiable disposition at Countess Rczewazska's.

I forgot to ask her where she lives in Paris; but you will find
out without difficulty from some compatriot, or from other people
of the world, which is society. Enclosed are a few lines of
introduction to the illustrious, indefatigable and unageing
publicist, Emile de Girardin. They say of him in joke that he has
an idea every day. If he were to reach the age of Methuselah
ideas would certainly never fail him.

At one time there used to be music in his salon; he understands
it quite as well as the late M. Thiers or the Marechal MacMahon.
However, if M. de Girardin invites you, play there, as I did when
I was last in Paris (in the year '66).--

An excellent recipe against unjust criticisms (of the kind like
that of M. X. which you quote to me) is to criticise oneself
thoroughly before and after--and finally to remain perfectly calm
and follow one's own road!

Cordially yours,

F. Liszt

Budapest, December 13th, 1877

An enthusiastic account of your success at Vienna was given me by
Mme. Tony Raal, who yesterday evening played Tausig's
"Zigeunerweisen" admirably at a concert of M. de Swert. [A
Belgian violoncellist, recently deceased]



219. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Dear and most excellent Friend,

Your "intrigues" are noble, salutary, beneficent, and would win
every advantage in the broad light of day. To take my part in
them, at your command, is one of my most agreeable duties.

[Mme. Laussot was trying to obtain the nomination of Antonio
Bazzini, the excellent violinist and composer (born 1818), as
director of the Conservatoire at Milan, and begged Liszt to
support this choice through the German ambassador Baron Keudell
in Rome, which he did. Bazzini however did not at that time
receive the office, which he at present holds.]

I sent my letter direct to Rome to Baron de Keudell
yesterday..--. Bazzini deserves the post of director of the
Conservatoire at Milan, which ought to be offered to him at the
first onset.

Your most heartily devoted

F. Liszt

Budapest, January 29th, 1878

Our friend Mihalovich will give you news of Budapest. As
elsewhere, I am absorbed here in the most difficult of tasks--to
put up with myself. Happily I receive plenty of help; noble
friendships and dear and beautiful memories light up the path
which I still have to follow before I reach the grave.



220. To Madame Jessie Laussot

Dear and Excellent Friend,

Under present circumstances (indicated in your note of this
evening) I doubt whether your just and noble efforts will attain
their end. [Refers to the as yet unsuccessful candidature of
Bazzini for the directorship of the Milan Conservatoire. See the
preceding letter.]

Without pretending to Catonism, it is a good thing to attach
oneself to good causes, whether favored by the gods or not.

"Victrix causa diis placuit."...So, if you are vanquished on the
battle-field between the Cathedral and the Conservatoire of
Milan, I shall remain on your side, in spite of my reasonable
leaning towards Caesar, and the lawful inheritors of his
idea,...not towards the others, please, because that would drag
me too low and roll me in the mire.

From my heart your old servant and friend,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 3rd, 1878



221. To the  Music Publisher B. Bessel

Dear Sir,

You have been unusually parsimonious in only sending me a single
copy of the Ballade of Count Tolstoy. ["The Blind Bard." Liszt
wrote the melodramatic piano accompaniment to it (1874).] Allow
me then to make use of this copy to indicate the version which I
think should be put into the arrangement for piano (alone without
declamation). I add, the necessary notes and alterations, for you
to publish or not, as you think best, the version subjoined. I
have no claim to the sale of my wares, and am only manufacturing
them...for the honor of Castile!--Count Tolstoy understood this
sentiment; he only has to make a bargain: that is why I have sung
with Tolstoy his Ballade of the "Blind Bard," hoping too for
"peace" at last "for all noble boyars." [Slavonic noblemen.] You
sent me some other publications of your house: "six morceaux pour
piano" by Liadoff; they are pleasantly refined; and the "Russian
national songs edited by N. Rimsky-Korsakoff," for whom I feel
high esteem and sympathy. To speak frankly, Russian national
music could not be more felt or better understood than by Rimsky-
Korsakoff. His notation of the "popular songs" is most
intelligent and most musical; and the accompaniment and harmonies
seem to me admirably adequate. If you publish the version for
piano of "Tolstoy's Ballades" I beg you to send me the proofs
beforehand.

A thousand affectionate compliments.

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 11th, 1878

Please send me in any case half a dozen copies of the "Ballade,"
already printed, to Weimar, where I remain from mid-April till
the end of July.



222. To Walter Bache

Very honored and dear Friend,

I have always to be thanking you; it is from my heart, and will
ever be so.

The programme of your fourteenth "Annual Concert" is again an act
of courage; particularly in London, where my compositions meet
with all manner of obstructions--almost more than elsewhere, from
the Leipzig Gewandhaus down to many greater and smaller
Gewandhausler.

It stands clearly written, a hundred times over, that I cannot
compose; without indulging in unseemly protests against this, I
quietly go on writing, and set all the greater store by the
constancy of some of my friends, particularly Walter Bache, for
the stout-* heartedness which till fourteen times fourteen he has
for so many years displayed.

In the introduction to your fourteenth Programme F. Niecks
[Friedrich Niecks, Professor of Music at the University of
Edinburgh; the writer of the excellent work "F. Chopin as Man and
Musician"], a propos of F. Liszt, said very truly:--

1. "Form is an abstract idea."

2. "A harmonic combination or progression may be against the
rules of a system," etc.

3. "Programm-music is a 'legitimate genre of the art.'" [Portion
in quotes (' ') written in English by Liszt]

Give Niecks my sincere thanks; also to Mr. Manns and
courtoisement Miss Williams [The well-known vocalist Miss Anna
Williams]. The "Funeral Pyre of Joan of Arc" will, I trust, have
done away with her coolness.

With regard to the Tempi I am very yielding in my small pieces,
and gladly allow well-disposed artists to decide this.

Sophie Menter-Popper was recently here and will probably (middle
of May) play in Sir Benedict's model monster-concert, which for
forty years has wielded the sceptre of London successes. Call on
my honored friend Sophie Menter--a rarely natural and excellently
schooled musical individuality. You will feel yourself quite at
home with her, and I told her this beforehand. Yours
affectionately,

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 19th, 1878

From the middle of April till the end of July I remain in Weimar;
later, at the end of August, I go again to the Villa d'Este.



223. To Professor Dr. Ludwig Nohl

Honored and dear Friend,

Of the many pictures of the remarkable group of cypresses in the
Villa d'Este your brother's [Max Nohl, painter] beautiful
poetical drawing is my favorite. For the present of this and the
inscription on it I thank you most heartily. I attempted (last
October) to put down on music paper the conversation which I
frequently hold with these same cypresses. ["Au Cypres de la
Villa d'Este" [To the Cypress of the Villa d'Este). 2 numbers.
Schott, Mainz.]  Ah! how dry and unsatisfactory on the piano, and
even in the orchestra,--Beethoven and Wagner excepted--sounds the
woe and the sighing [Das Weh and Wehen] of almighty nature!--

Nevertheless I will most modestly show you this Cypress-Memento
at the piano when we next see each other--I hope in Vienna, where
I am staying during the first week of April with my dear cousin
as usual. Afterwards I go to Bayreuth and Weimar.

Sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 20th, 1878



224. To Professor Dr. Siegmund Lebert

Honored Friend,

Quite excellent so. Let us divide the revision of the Cotta
edition of the 4-handed Schubert, and for your part look after
all the Sonatas, "Lebenssturme," Scherzi, etc.--If you wish it, a
few pedal marks. and fingerings shall willingly be added to the
Variations Op. 10 and 82. Send me both works to Weimar, with the
rest of Schubert's Waltzes for four hands, which show more
creative power than many big compositions--old or new.

With the few Schubert pieces send me also the scopes of the
Beethoven Concertos and their accompaniments, arranged for a
second piano by Moscheles. My arrangement I will forward you at
the beginning of August. Meanwhile I beg you to give the Freiherr
von Cotta my most grateful thanks.

Very respectfully yours,

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 27th, 1878

From the middle of April till the end of July I remain in Weimar.



225. To Edmund von Mihalovich

Very dear Friend,

I most sincerely feel with you in your grief. "Non ignara
mali"...for I too have wept at the grave of my mother.

A sad but well-written book, "Stello" ("Consultations of the
black doctor"), depicts the sufferings and death of three young
poets,--Millevoye, Andre Chenier, Chatterton,--gathered home
before they had acquired glory here below.

In these moving pages of Alfred de Vigny he asks, "What is one to
think of a world which one enters with the hope of seeing one's
father and mother die?"...Prayer alone can answer this question.
Let us then pray our heavenly Father that His Will may be done on
earth as it is in heaven, and that the work of our life may be
ever conformed to the Divine Will.

Ever yours,

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, April 13th, 1878



226. To Kornel von Abranyi

.--. What could I write to you about Wagner's "Parsifal?" The
composition of the first act is finished: in it are revealed the
most wondrous depths and the most celestial heights of Art.

Ever very sincerely yours,

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, April 14th, 1878



227. To Frau Ingeborg von Bronsart

Dear Kind Friend,

If you have not already done so, you will end by having a bad
opinion of your old and very affectionate servant. My share of
free locomotion is very limited. Having arrived at Weimar last
Wednesday I could not pack off again immediately without
inconvenience. I must therefore await a favorable week for my
Hanover wish. In May "Rheingold" is to be given here, and St.
Saens's "Dalila" again, which I wish to hear and see. Monseigneur
the Grand Duke assured me yesterday that this work made a success
at its first performances; and several people, who often hold a
contrary opinion, agree in their praises of "Dalila."

From the 13th to the 15th June (Whit week) a Tonkunstler-
Versammlung is announced at Erfurt. It will seem pale as compared
with that of Hanover of last year; but I want to be present at
it, considering my unvarying interest in the work undertaken by
the late Brendel and bravely continued by Riedel and Gille. After
having said A, and even B and C, I ought to go through the whole
alphabet.

Formerly, in the first period of your success, I had the pleasure
of applauding and admiring you at the old theater of Erfurt. Now
there is a new and very handsome one, I am told, with more than
1100 seats; besides that a new concert room which I do not know,
any more than I do the theater. I dare not invite you to favor
them with your presence, but if you should come with Hans it
would be charming.

The next time I see X. I shall come upon him to show himself an
editor rather than a shopkeeper ("Kramer") in the little
negotiation of which you speak.

A thousand sincere wishes for the finishing of "Hiarne" [The
Opera composed by Frau von Bronsart, which was given for the
first time in 1892 in Berlin with great success.] and my constant
and very devoted homage to the persevering composer.

F. Liszt

Weimar, Saturday, April 20th, 1878



228. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest and most honored Cousin,

The accompanying copy of the Budapest telegram will tell you that
I must go to Paris probably at the end of May. I had indeed
refused several private invitations to visit the Paris
Exhibition; for years past both long and short journeys-unless
there is some special reason for them--have been inconvenient,
difficult and repugnant to me. It was on that account that I told
you and others of my having given up the collective-wonder of
Paris.

Now the telegram from Trefort and Szapary (President of the
Hungarian Exhibition in Paris) alters my negative decision.
Without ever talking twaddle about patriotism, yet in all modesty
I will not be wanting where there is something to be done for
Hungary.

[The telegram, dated 21st April, is as follows: "Abbe Franz
Liszt, Weimar. Universal wish that you should represent Hungary
in International Jury of Paris Universal Exhibition. Jury begins
on 1st June, lasts about 2 to 3 weeks. Please accept confidential
mission, and wire reply immediately to Presidential Bureau,
Handelsministerium, Budapest. Minister Trefort. Count Julius
Szapary."

To this Liszt replied: "Most ready for service, Liszt begs for
full particulars of his duties."]

As soon as my duty in Paris as an Hungarian Member in the
International Jury is fulfilled I shall return here. I have
promised to be present at the Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Erfurt
in the last week of June, and on the 8th July Weimar celebrates
the jubilee of the 25th year of the accession of the Grand Duke.

.--. I shall be much pleased to make the acquaintance of Herr
Adalbert Goldschmidt. I have several times hankered after the
score or pianoforte score of his grand work "Die Todsunden" ["The
Mortal Sins"], which, so I am told, has not yet appeared in
print. Is the composer staying long in Hanover? Probably I shall
go to see Bulow and Bronsart there immediately after the Erfurt
Tonkunstler-Versammlung, at the end of June.

You remember that I categorically dissuaded Fraulein Remmert from
giving an orchestral concert in Vienna. In spite of that she had
it announced and advertised,...and in the end there only came of
it a vexatious mancando, perdendosi!

Ah! the artist-world is full of troubles! Thy faithful and
heartfelt-devoted

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 26th, 1878



229. To Hofconcertmeister Edmund Singer

Dear Honored Friend,

Your charming, gifted illustration of my little Quelle [spring]
[Liszt's "Au bord d'une source" (Annees de Pelerinage), for three
violins concertante (Schott, Mainz)] delights me anew. The three
violins flow, splash, bubble and sing--and sound like rainbow
colors.

With friendly thanks for this Artist-gift, I remain your ever
respectfully obliged

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 10th, 1878



230. To Adolf von Henselt in St. Petersburg

[The "German Chopin," as Henselt has been called (1814-1889),
lived in St. Petersburg from the year 1838, where, after Liszt's
first visit there in 1842, they became warm friends. Henselt sent
his "interpretation" of Liszt's Lucia-Fantasia to the latter "for
correction." The above letter is in answer to that.]

My Honored Friend,

The original works of Adolf Henselt's are the noblest jewels of
Art. One longs for more of them...

By-the-by, when Henselt gives a hope of arranging,
"interpreting," "making an effect with" other compositions, he
succeeds so admirably that the public,

the pianists, and the compositions in question are thereby
enriched and favored. Even my little "Lucia"-transcription has
gained much by throe "interpretation," dear friend. Hearty thanks
for this reminiscence of our Petersburg intimacy.

The proof-copy I simply sent back to you, unaltered and nothing
crossed out, as all the various readings are admirably suitable,
and henceforth I leave it to your good pleasure to decide about
the publishing. (In Russia Hofmeister's German copyright holds
good, does it not? . . .)

Tomorrow I go to Paris, and will observe there your
recommendation of the Russian instrument.

Many of your admirers frequently tell me about you; above all
Zschocher and Topfer. You come backwards and forwards to Dresden
and Leipzig; why not also to Weimar?...Answer this modest
question in person here to throe old and most faithful

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 5th, 1878



231. To Eduard von Liszt

[Weimar, June 6th, 1878]

Dearest Eduard,

Adalbert Goldschmidt has brought you Weimar news. I consider his
"Todsunden" a remarkable Art-work. If the composer maintains
himself on these heights in his next Opera his name will become
famous in spite of all the critics...

Nowadays, more than ever, the public thirst for Opera alone.
Everything else in music is nonsense to them. There is a French
saying--"There is some one who is wittier than Mr. de Voltaire;
that is everybody"--and when all the world gets a fancy into its
head one must certainly consider it either reasonable, or
stupid,--but necessary--

With With regard to the delay of the Jury (Class 13, "Instruments
de Musique") I go to Paris next Sunday, 8th June, remain there
till the 19th, and return here on the 20th June on account of the
Erfurt Musical Festival...

Thy faithful, loving

F. Liszt

To simplify our correspondence call me also "Dearest Franz."

My Grand Duke much wishes to have the photograph of your son-in-
law's cousin, the poet Saar. Send me this speedily.



232. To Professor Carl Riedel

Dear Friend,

The further carrying out and arranging of the Erfurt programme I
lease to your long-tried and complete mastery.

I once more recommend Borodin's Symphony; the quartet parts that
are wanting can certainly be speedily written out next week (at
my expense).

The study of the numerous works will offer no difficulties in
Sondershausen; there they are accustomed to step boldly forward.

Friend Riedel conducts my 13th Psalm; Bulow undertakes the two
Faust-episodes (in case these are not struck out, as I did advise
you to do); and I retain the "Hungaria" and Bronsart's Concerto;
but for several reasons I beg that my name may not be put on the
programme as conductor.

I told Concertmeister Kompel [A pupil of Spohr's; died not long
ago at Weimar] and L. Grutzmacher [Solo violoncellist] (the
Weimarer) yesterday that Bulow wishes to play the Bronsart Trio
with them. Both gentlemen are quite agreed about this.

If Frau Erdmannsdorfer would play some other brilliant piano
piece (not of my composition), rather than the often-heard
Hungarian Fantasie, I should prefer it, just because the
programme already contains too many Liszt things, and I could not
myself bear the false appearance of making use of the
Tonkunstler-Versammlungen for bringing forward my compositions...

My real feeling on this matter has been known to you for years
past.--

Early on Saturday, at half-past nine, I go direct from here to
Paris--and on the 2lst June arrives in Erfurt

Yours ever with sincere esteem,

F. Liszt

Weimar, Thursday, June 7th, 1878

My Paris address (from the 10th to the 18th June) will be: Maison
Erard, Rue du Mail, 13.

Do publish the programme in the next number of the Zeitschrift;
two or three slight alterations will not matter in the least.



233. To Vera Timanoff

Dear illustrious One,

I don't know how you will manage to adapt the "Sonnambula" to
your little hands; they will have to trot about on the roofs in
the style of somnambulists.

A revoir, wide awake, the day after tomorrow,--and a thousand
affectionate and devoted regards.

F. Liszt

Thursday [Summer, 1878]



234. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

I have very little in the way of musical matter to tell you about
my stay in Paris from the 9th to the 18th June. I scarcely found
time to hear the two last acts of Gounod's "Faust" at the Grand
Opera. I was prevented from attending concerts by invitations and
visits elsewhere. But I was able to follow attentively the plain-
song during High Mass at Notre Dame on Trinity Sunday, together
with a very intelligent friend, R. P. Joseph Mohr (Societate
Jesu), a competent judge and promoter of Church music.

Hanslick--who showed himself friendly to me in Paris--will report
in the Neue Freie Presse concerning the 13th class (musical
instruments, etc.), of which he is vice-president.

Madame Erard placed at my disposal a princely suite in her house,
Rue du Mail, 13 (with which Spiridion [Liszt's valet] I was quite
satisfied); a carriage also in addition. Thanks to this
hospitality my expenses were very much diminished, and I only
required 1500 francs..--.

My old friend Belloni has also proved himself most faithful this
time in Paris, and saved me many expenses. It is wonderful how
honest and disinterested he remains, with all his constant
contact with the artist-world!--

Immediately on my return I went to Erfurt for the Tonkunstlcr-
Versammlung (from the 22nd to the 25th July). The whole affair
went off well. I send you in addition the whole programme. Bulow
played in a marvellous and masterly manner.

Everything in Weimar is now in a state of commotion over the
Ducal-Jubilee-Festivities, which begin the day after tomorrow.
The King of the Netherlands, the King of Saxony, Prince Friedrich
Carl of Prussia, several reigning German Dukes and foreign
Princes are expected. Our Emperor and King is sending Prince
Windischgratz with congratulations to the Grand Duke. Victor
Scheffel (the author of "Ekkehard," the "Trompeter von
Sackingen," the "Bergpsalmen," etc.) has written the Festival
Play, which is to be performed in the theater here on the 9th
July. My "Carl-Alexander" March, which was published 20 years ago
(by Bote and Bock) in Berlin, is to serve as Prelude.

For 30 years past I have been incrustated into the Royal house of
Weimar, and shall remain faithful to it.--

My dearest cousin Marie wrote me a loving, witty note with
respect to the photograph of her cousin, Ferd. von Saar, which I
wanted for my Grand Duke. I will write my thanks to Marie
shortly. Send the accompanying lines to Franz in Gratz; I am
congratulating him, in them, that you are now grandpapa.

Heartfelt greetings to the Generalissima.

Thy

F.L.

Weimar, July 6th, 1878



235. To Robert Franz

[A facsimile appeared in the "Musikalisches Wochenblatt." Liszt
worked untiringly, like no other of his contemporaries in art, to
make the great German Master of Song, Robert Franz (1815-1892),
understood and appreciated (See "Robert Franz." Gesammelle
Schriften, IV.); and, when increasing deafness prevented this
artist from practical musical work, Liszt founded the fund in his
honor.]

My Much-Honored Friend,

How beautiful, how deep, how fervently and truly finished are,
once more, your "Six Songs" (Opus 48)!

Heartfelt thanks far so kindly sending them. You well know that
for thirty years past your genius--a fixed star in German lyrics-
-has been sincerely admired by your ever most faithful

F. Liszt

Weimar, July 12th, 1878



236. To Kornel von Abranyi

Dear and Honored Friend,

On arriving here yesterday evening I found your letter, together
with the enclosure to Minister Trefort, which I return
immediately to you, signed. Agghazy deserves to be helped,
because his hands and his head are very musically endowed.
[Agghazy (now teacher of pianoforte playing at Stern's
Conservatorium in Berlin) received a stipendium from the
Hungarian Government, through Liszt's intercession, in order to
make a livelihood in Paris.] Juhasz and he will certainly do
honor everywhere to the Budapest Academy of Music. Agghazy must
have some letters of introduction for Paris. Advise him to ask
for there from Minister Trefort, Ministerial-Counsel Hegedus
Friedrich Harkany and Count Geza Zichy. Before his departure I
will send him a few lines to Madame Erard, and to my loyal old
friend Belloni, who is ever ready to do me a service.

I need scarcely ask, dear Abranyi, how you have passed your
summer. The chief thing is to hold out steadfastly, and you show
this in the noblest manner by your unwearied, meritorious
endeavors after the high goal of Art. "Perseverons!"

I think of staying here till the beginning of January, and of
returning then direct to Budapest. First of all I must finish a
little extra work: as soon as the new setting of the text for the
dramatic Oratorio "Der heilige Stanislaus," which Baron
Dingelstedt has kindly promised me, comes to hand the composition
shall proceed. I am often quite anxious about further writing of
music, but I do not give it up, although I do not imagine at all
that I can express that which floats before my mind. But my self-
dissatisfaction finds ample consolation in the ever-fresh joy at
the master-works of the Past and Present:--most of all in
Wagner's majestic word-tone-creations. King Ludwig II. of Bavaria
rightly addressed "to the Tone-poet Master Richard Wagner."--

Hearty greetings to your family, and ever yours

Sincerely and gratefully,

F. Liszt

September 13th, 1878 (Villa d'Este, Tivoli)

The loss of Augusz touches me most painfully. Since the first
performance of the Gran Mass, more than twenty years ago, we have
been one in heart. He it was also who especially decided me to
carry out my wish to settle myself in Budapest.

After the opening of the new Academical Course write to me about
it.



237. To Eduard von Liszt

Dearest Eduard,

I give my heartiest thanks to the highly-honored friendly Frau
General for writing at your dictation.

We take the heartiest interest here in your recovery. It is to be
hoped you are already on the best road to vigor.

My dearest cousin Marie has now happily made me a great-uncle.
Enclosed are two words of thanks to Marie.

I am now waiting for the new setting of the poem of "Stanislaus"
from Dingelstedt in order to take up my interrupted composition
again--I want at least a year and something over to finish it.

Meanwhile I have not quite lost my time. In the last two months I
have completed a "Via crucis" (the 14 Stations) and pretty full
responses to the 7 Sacraments (for Chorus and Organ). I rejoice
[to think] that I shall play them to you on the 2nd April, '79,
at the Schottenhof.

Thy faithful

F. Liszt

Rome, November 4th, 1878



238. To Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen in Bayreuth

[The well-known writer on Wagner and publisher of the Bayreuther
Blatter]

Highly-honored Baron,

The October number of your Bayreuther Blatter brought me the
highest intellectual gift. [Wagner's Essay "The Public in Time
and Space"] No temporal ruler can bestow one like it. The
estimation of it lays me all the more under an obligation to that
true humility with which I have long and most devoutly paid
homage to our incomparable master, Richard Wagner.

Accept my sincere thanks for the friendly words in remembrance of
the performance of the Dante Symphony in your house, and kindly
recall to the good graces of the Frau Baronin von Wolzogen.

Yours most respectfully and devotedly,

F. Liszt

November 15th, 1878 (Villa d'Este, Tivoli)



239. To Eduard von Liszt

.--. I take a hearty interest in the improvement of your health.
You are the younger, the more sensible and useful of us two;
therefore you should outlive me many years in good health.

I have been dreadfully industrious with my music-writing since
the middle of September. I sit and walk in it like one possessed!

The "Via crucis" (now finished) has brought me back to a long-
cherished idea--namely, the composition of choruses to be made
use of at Church festivals during the giving of the 7 holy
sacraments; thus 7 pieces of music of about a hundred bars each.
These have now been 8 days at the copyist's, and, according to my
thinking, are not quite a failure. If you also think this it will
heartily rejoice

Your most faithfully devoted

F. Liszt

November 2lst, 1878

[Tivoli]

This evening I shall be in Rome, and will have this letter and
the signed enclosure attended to at the post.

Hearty greetings and thanks to the dear Frau Generalissima.



240. To Eduard von Liszt

Budapest, January 22nd, 1879

Dearest Eduard,

.--. On Sunday, the 12th January, His Holiness was so gracious as
to give me, for the second time, a private audience. I will tell
you shortly, by word of mouth, the friendly sentiments of the
Pope towards me.

I spent last Wednesday evening in Gorz with Frau Baronin Augusz,
and arrived again at Fischplatz, No. 4., early on Friday. The
roof is already on the new Music Academy building, Radialstrasse,
and is said to look very well. In November of this year I shall
inhabit it.

My friends in Budapest, Abranyi, Mihalovich, Count Albert
Apponyi, Count Geza Zichy and several others, are strongly and
heartily attached to me. Archbishop Haynald only comes to Pest in
the beginning of January. I was not caught in the other base
spider's web. "Honesty is the best policy!"

Bosendorfer called on me yesterday and told me of the intention
of the Vienna Friends of Music to perform the "Gran Mass" at the
end of March. If Bosendorfer's intimations are correct I am not
disinclined to conduct this performance, although for many years
I have refused all such invitations--and only a little while ago
to London, Aix-la-Chapelle, Berlin, etc. I should be rejoiced if
at last the "Gran Mass" had a fair hearing in Vienna.

A hearty greeting to Frau Generalissima from thy faithfully
devoted

F. Liszt

Looking forward to our speedy meeting at the end of March.

[It did not come to pass. Councillor E. von Liszt died on the 8th
February, 1879. "It is for me a constant sorrow at the heart that
Eduard is no longer with us," wrote Liszt to the widow a year
after Eduard's death.]



241. To Ludwig Bosendorfer

Dear and honored Friend,

I take your friendly hint by enclosing these lines to
Hellmesberger; please to give them to him. During many years, in
Vienna, Weimar and Budapest, Hellmesberger has always shown
himself kindly disposed towards me. In ingratitude there is,
alas, only too much rivalry; the matter grows contemptible, and
contemptible people like to find amusement in it. My nature
absolutely forbids me such despicable behavior. Count Geza Zichy
tells me, dear friend, that he expects you shortly. Perhaps you
will come with Hellmesberger to our Kunstlerabend [Artists'
Evening] here on the 7th March, when we shall be honored by the
fine composer and splendid virtuoso, my excellent friend, Saint-
Saens.

Count Zichy writes you the rest about the Klausenburg journey.

A hearty greeting to your wife.

Truly devoted,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 19th, 1879

I have just received Zellner's letter. Give him my hearty thanks
for it.

Sophie Menter went to Warsaw the day before yesterday, and gives
a concert there tomorrow with her husband Popper,--and afterwards
in St. Petersburg,



242. To Adolf von Henselt

Very dear Friend,

Hast thou still pleasure in beautiful, distinguished virtuoso
piano-playing? If so then go and hear the eminent pianiste Frau
Menter. She brings thee the hearty greeting of thy old friend

F. Liszt

Budapest, February, 1879



243. To Marie Lipsius

My dear Friend,

Hearty thanks for your dear lines of sympathy. The loss of my
cousin and most intimate friend Eduard von Liszt is a deep grief
to me. You wish for the dates of the Budapest and Vienna
concerts; for this I was obliged to ask the help of my excellent
friend Kornel Abranyi. He knows these and other things far better
than I. For ten years he edited the Hungarian musical paper, and
now officiates as General Secretary and Professor at the Royal
Academy of Music in Budapest, the Director being Franz Erkel, and
my humble self the President.

Here is the result of Abranyi's researches, by which it is
evident that I have neither been idle nor used anything for my
own benefit.

At the same time let it be mentioned to the praiseworthy and
amiable authoress of "Musikalische Studienkopfe," La Mara, that
since the end of '47 I have not earned a farthing by pianoforte
playing, teaching or conducting. All this rather cost me time and
money.

Since the year '47 I only played in public twice in Rome--'63 and
'64--at the gracious command of Pope Pius IX.; often in Budapest
later on, twice in Vienna, once in Pressburg and Oedenburg (my
native town) as a child of the country. Nowhere else. May my poor
pianoforte performing at last come to an end! It has long been a
torment to me. Therefore--Amen!--

On the occasion of the celebration of their Majesties' silver
wedding I shall have the honor, in accordance with the invitation
of the Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde [Society of friends of
music,] of conducting the "Gran Mass" in Vienna on the 8th April
(the Tuesday before Good Friday). Performances of this Mass
(after the first at Gran in '56) took place in Pest, Prague,
Vienna, later in Leipzig and Amsterdam, in '66 in Paris, and
again in Amsterdam, as also in '77 in Weimar and Dusseldorf, the
latter under the conductorship of Ratzenberger. This Mass has
also been heard in America.

In conclusion also the following memoranda for La Mara: Without a
written engagement, yet indeed morally bound, since '71 I spend
several months of every winter in Budapest, from April to July in
Weimar, then the autumn months, and more, chiefly in the Villa
d'Este near Rome, where His Eminence Cardinal Hohenlohe affords
me the kindest reception. There I wrote the "Christmas-tree," the
"Via Crucis," the "Responses to the Seven Sacraments," etc. These
three works are quite ready, and indeed beautifully copied, as
well as the "Cantico del Sole" of the marvellous St. Francis of
Assisi. Their publication troubles me little, for they are not
suitable to the usual musical customs and trade...

So why bargain with them?

I have only fragmentarily sketched the Oratorio "Stanislaus," but
wish to finish it, which will take at least a year.

My "Technical Piano-Exercises"--improperly advertised in the
papers as "Pianoforte-School"--still require a few months for
revision and arrangement with fingering, etc., but could come out
next year if I have no hindrances.

Accept, my dear friend, my sincere and grateful attachment.

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 2nd, 1879

The middle of April I shall be in Weimar again



244. To Otto Lessmann

My dear Friend,

The enclosed programme proves to you that in spite of all fatigue
my invalided piano-playing still contributes in a small degree to
the relief of the sufferers of Szegedin.

[According to the programme, Liszt played Schubert's "Funeral
March"; "To the memory of Petofi," and "Cantique d'Amour" of his
own composition, as well as, with Mihalovich, Schubert's
Fantaisie (C major) for two pianofortes.]

To assist in other concerts than in this country would not become
me, and I have already declined many invitations of that sort
with excuses and thanks.

For the celebrations preceding the silver wedding of their
Majesties I shall have the honor of conducting the "Gran Mass" in
Vienna on the 8th April ("Society of the friends of music").

To our speedy meeting in Weimar, and ever yours in all
friendship,

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 23rd, 1879



245. To Von Trefort, the Hungarian Minister of Instruction

[From a copy in the possession of K. v. Abranyi.]

Monsieur le Ministre,

I learn through M. Abranyi that Your Excellency continues to show
your solicitude for the Royal Academy of Music at Budapest. The
work of this institution is to serve Art in Hungary, and thus to
help, in this connection, in making your patriotic, grand
intentions fruitful. My colleagues at the Academy of Music are of
one mind and devoted in their activity.

I permit myself to recommend once more particularly to your
kindness M. Abranyi. He perseveres in his meritorious career as
writer, theorist, composer, translator, professor, and Magyar
character of the noblest stamp. The evidence of his merits will
assuredly be recognised in many languages by a heap of laudatory
phrases...after his death. A brilliant obituary is assured to
Abranyi, but I hope that Your Excellency will accord him the
modest satisfaction that he claims while he is alive.

I have the honor to be, Monsieur le Ministre, your very humble
and very devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 12, 1879



246. To Walter Bache

Very honored, dear Friend,

Hearty thanks for your letter and for letting me see Manns's
Commentary on the "Hunnenschlacht." Please give to Manns the
accompanying short explanation of the idea of my "Symphonic
Poem." In spite of my spending several hours in letter-writing
almost every day, it is impossible for me to be regarded as a
punctual correspondent. Intelligent and kindly-disposed persons
will excuse me, and the many others I can scarcely entertain any
longer, because I don't require any such entertainment! [Play
upon the words "wirthschaften" (to manage) and "Wirthschaft"
(housekeeping, or a public house]

Next Whit-week "Tonkunstler-Versammlung" in Wiesbaden. On the 5th
June Bulow conducts the first concert there, at which Bronsart's
beautiful and valuable "Fruhlings-Fantasie," Billow's music to
Shakespeare's "Julius Caesar," and my "Faust Symphony" will be
performed. Bulow kindly plays the piano the same evening, and has
chosen Tschaikowsky's Concerto. Besides this his favorite pupil
Schwarz produces several "Etudes transcendantes." [By Liszt] Till
the middle of July I stay here. Then Bayreuth, and at the end of
August Villa d'Este. To Frau Jessie Hillebrand and her husband
[who were just then in London] give heartfelt and faithful
devotion, with respectful thanks, from

Theirs in old friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 25th, 1879

[The explanation, accompanying this letter, of the idea of the
"Hunnenschlacht" is as follows:]

Kaulbach's world-renowned picture presents two battles--the one
on earth, the other in the air, according to the legend that
warriors, after their death, continue fighting incessantly as
spirits. In the middle of the picture appears the Cross and its
mystic light; on this my "Symphonic Poem" is founded. The chorale
"Crux fidelis," which is gradually developed, illustrates the
idea of the final victory of Christianity in its effectual love
to God and man.



247. To Ludmilla Schestakoff

Madame,

Your illustrious brother Glinka is one of the well-chosen
admirations of my youth. His genius has been known to me ever
since the year 1842; and at my last concert in St. Petersburg (in
'43) I played the "Marche tscherkesse" from "Russlan and
Ludmilla," and a brilliant transcription by Vollweiler of several
themes from the same Opera.

Glinka remains the Patriarch-prophet of music in Russia.

With my sincere thanks to you for sending me the beautiful score
of "Russlan," carefully edited and well arranged by Messrs.
Rimsky-Korsakoff, Balakireff and Liadoff [The score was published
in 1879.], I beg you to accept, Madame, the expression of very
respectful homage of your very humble servant,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 14th, 1879



248. To Alexander Borodin, Caesar Cui, Anatolie Liadoff and
Nicolas Rimsky-Korsakoff in St. Petersburg

Very Honored Gentlemen,

You have done a work of serious value under the form of a jest.
Your "Paraphrases" charm me: nothing can be more ingenious than
these 24 Variations and the 16 little pieces upon the favorite
and obligato subject

[Here, Liszt writes a 4-bar musical score excerpt of the main
theme of the 24 Variations]

In short, here we have an admirable compendium of the science of
harmony, of counterpoint, of rhythms, of figuration, and of what
in German is called "The Theory of Form" (Formenlehre)! I shall
gladly suggest to the teachers of composition at all the
Conservatoires in Europe and America to adopt your "Paraphrases"
as a practical guide in their teaching. From the very first page,
the Variations II. and III. are true gems; and not less the other
numbers continuously, up to the grotesque Fugue and the "Cortege"
which crown the whole work gloriously. Thanks for this dainty
feast, gentlemen, and I beg that when any one of you brings out a
new composition he will let me know it. My most lively, my
highest and most sympathising esteem has for many years been
assured to you; pray accept also the expression of my sincere
devotion.

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 15th, 1879



249. To Capellmeister Professor Jos. Bohm in Vienna

Honored Herr Vereinsleiter [Conductor of a Verein (Society)], I
follow your edifying endeavors in the Cacilien-Verein with
sincere interest. It seems singular that they should stumble on
obstacles. What is in question? Innovations?...By no means. The
noblest Conservatism remains the essence and aim of the Cacilien-
Verein; it merely demands a serious study and proper performances
of the most dignified classical authors in Church music,
Palestrina and Lassus at the head. Nothing can reasonably be
objected to this, and you may confidently maintain, dear sir,
that "recognition must take place and the good cause prove
victorious."

I beg you will put down my name as a subscriber to your "Vienna
journal for Catholic Church music," [Professor Bohm was at that
time the editor of it, and had invited subscriptions for a
monument to the musical historian Ambros.] and have the numbers
which have already appeared addressed to me in Weimar.

Be so good as to employ the enclosed hundred florins for the
gravestone of my highly esteemed friend the late A. W. Ambros.

Yours with all esteem,

F. Lizst

Weimar, June 22nd, 1879



250. To Vera Timanoff

A hearty welcome to you, Illustrissima, and pray tell M. Sauret
that I shall be delighted to make closer acquaintance with him. I
greatly admired his superb talent in Vienna.--You know my rule
never to bother anyone, and least of all artistes; but if M.
Sauret should feel inclined to play something at the Hofgartnerei
this morning, it would give me great pleasure.

In any case I invite him to come (at eleven) with you, and I
shall request you to fulfil your promise of captivating us by
your performance (not by dancing, but by your superior fingering)
of Rubinstein's Ballet, "Feramors."

Yours affectionately,

F. Liszt

Sunday Morning [Summer, 1879]



251. To Adolf von Henselt

Very dear friend,

Our meeting once more is a cordial pleasure to me. According to
your last letter, you purposed arriving on the 19th inst. Why
delay? Still, arrange it entirely according to your own
convenience. Only allow me to make one observation: on Wednesday
evening, 23rd July, I am invited by somebody where a refusal
would be wrong and stupid. But if you were favorably inclined,
our extra three-handed whist might be quite well arranged at the
house of this somebody.

[Henselt was in Weimar the 19th and 20th July. "We played
together, not on the piano, but certainly half a dozen games of
whist, of which I fortunately lost five at least," wrote Liszt to
Fraulein von Schorn.]

Your version with the grace note [passing note?] B flat pleases
me best.

[Figure: musical example, two bars]

[The two bars of music refer to C. M, v. Weber's "Episodic
Thought," which Henselt had transcribed for piano and amplified;
he published it in March, 1879, dedicating it to "his friend
Franz Liszt." Henselt at first meditated calling it "Hymn of
Love." But Liszt found the term rather too highflown for this
favorite melody. "Episodic thought is more suitable," he wrote,
and so that title remained.]

In expectation of seeing you, and in faithful and admiring
friendship,

Weimar, July 12th, 1879

F. Liszt



252. To Dr. Siegmund Lebert

Dear friend,

I keep a long-standing promise today, by sending you the 3 last
Concerti by Beethoven arranged for 2 pianos. This arrangement is
distinctly different from all other existing arrangements of the
same Concerti for 2 pianos. Till now it has been the habit of
arrangers to content themselves with setting the Tutti (or
better, the orchestral parts) for the 2nd piano only, leaving the
1st to rest entirely or to support the 2nd according to
inclination. By this a grievous disproportion in the effect of
the orchestra parts is induced, let alone the fact that some of
the arrangements are exceedingly scanty.

In my opinion this sort of proceeding belongs to the past and is
hackneyed. What good is there it the first player sitting there
at all, if he does not know how to take part in the whole? Ergo,
I had to occupy him almost constantly.

As a matter of course I have not altered a single note of
Beethoven's original version (of the so-called Soli parts), and
have only added a tolerable amount of indications for pedal and
fingering, for the convenience of pupils and teachers.

2 identical copies (printed on 4 lines--excepting the Cadenzas)
are necessary for the performance of this arrangement.

It may prove useful and effective, as well in studing at the
"homely fireside" and in musical schools, as also in performances
in small concerts (where there is no orchestra), in
Conservatoires, at examination: and drawing-room performances.

The chief title stands on the first page; on the 2 following ones
are remarks for the printer, which I leave to your masterly hand
as a pedagogue, dear friend, to render more distinct and to
complete. With special regard I remain always yours sincerely,

F. Liszt

Rome, September 25th, 1879

I have great pleasure in the perusal of the 2nd edition of
Weitzmann's "History of Pianoforte Playing."



253. To Professor Bassani in Venice

[A well-known teacher of the pianoforte in Venice, and friend of
Liszt's]

Much-esteemed Colleague,

You are so forcibly exceptional a person, and prove this by truly
uncommon musical and poetical works.

Mademoiselle Giuli has already written to tell you the lively
pleasure I have had in hearing her play one of your compositions
remarkably well; several others, for piano or for the voice,
deserve a similar success, and will obtain it as soon as they are
known.

Pray accept, dear Monsieur Bassani, the very sincere esteem and
sympathy which is offered to you, together with best wishes for
the extension and widespread fame of your "Armonie dell' Anima,"
by

F. Liszt

(Villa d'Este) October 28th, 1879



254. To the Composer Anatolie Liadoff in St. Petersburg

Dear Sir,

All your compositions bear the stamp of distinction and of good
taste. This one is charmed to find again in the "Arabesques" you
are kind enough to send me. Pray accept my thanks and the
expression of my very sincere and devoted esteem.

F. Liszt

(Villa d'Este,) December 25th, 1879.



255. To Frau Reisenauer-Pauly in Rome

[The mother of Liszt's pupil, Alfred Reisenauer]

Dear Madame,

My best thanks for your kind notice of the Roman concert of
January 23rd. It seems to me that "populations necessiteuses"
[distressed population] would have been better on the programme
than "populations affamees" [starving population] of Silesia.

Mendelssohn's excellent Concerti always hold their ground without
risk, especially since Berlioz's witty article (published nearly
30 years ago), according to which they are occasionally performed
by the pianos alone, without further trouble on the part of the
pianist.

While taking affectionate part in the success achieved by your
son Alfred, whose talents are duly valued by me, I remain, dear
Madame,

Yours truly,

F. Liszt

Budapest, January 30th, 1880.

My cordial greetings to Madame Helbig.



256. To Professor Klindworth in Moscow

Much-esteemed dear Friend,

My sincere thanks for your masterly arrangement of Chopin's
Concerto. [The Concerto in F minor; score, orchestral parts and
arrangement for 2 pianos published by Jurgenson (Moscow) and Bock
(Berlin).] You showed me the first movement of it some years ago
in Munich. I consider the modifications in the instrumentation
and in the piano part successful. As much transparency as
possible should be preserved in the melodious parts.

I conclude that you will impress on M. Jurgenson the necessity of
not giving way to the ancient careless abuses of publishers in
the 2-piano edition. Thus four lines and two identical copses are
requisite for performance.

As leader and head of the now numerous Chopin-Editors, your
excellent Jurgenson-Edition authorises you to advance a proudly
modest "Sic vos non vobis."

Au revoir this summer in Hall, dear Klindworth. Give my kind
regards to your wife.

Yours faithfully,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 16th, 1880

The last corrected proofsheets of Tschaikowsky's Polonaise
dedicated to you leave by today's post addressed to Jurgenson.



257. To the Kammervirtuoso Professor Hermann Scholtz in Dresden

[Pianist and composer (born 1845, pupil of Bulow and
Rheinberger), is especially famous as an admirable player of
Chopin.]

Much-esteemed Sir and Friend,

I have sincere pleasure in praising and recommending your Chopin-
Edition. To Klindworth belongs the merit of having preceded you
by his intelligent and practical work. Your publisher, Peters,
might be advised in the next thousand copies he issues of the
Chopin-Edition signed Hermann Scholtz:--

A. Not to fill up the first volume with Waltzes. Why make this
paltry concession to the trifling requirements of the drawing-
room? Chopin's Waltzes are certainly charming, elegant and full
of invention...still his Polonaises and Mazurkas have a far
higher importance.

Chopin is the bewitching musical genius in which the heroically
chivalrous Polish nationality finds expression. This chief
characteristic ought to be distinctly emphasised in classifying
his works. So, first volume: Polonaises, Mazurkas and the
Fantasia upon Polish motives.

B. The clear notation of the melodies (indicated by tails turned
upwards!), as in the Klindworth-Edition, should be maintained.

C. In works having an orchestral accompaniment an arrangement of
that accompaniment for a second piano ought to be printed under
the Solo part of the first piano.

(The brains of most pianists become addled by the usual editions,
where the essentially melodious and rhythmical character, nay
often even the correct bass, is wanting.)

D. This is again addressed to Mr. Peters. He ought not to
withhold from the audience your admirable version of the
Recitative in the Adagio of the F minor Concerto for Piano Solo,
and should add these few pages to your Chopin-Edition.

Yours faithfully,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 29th, 1880



255. To Sophie Menter

Dear Friend,

The signature of the telegram front Rome announced to me your
return to "Hungaria." I met friend Bosendorfer the day before
yesterday in Frankfort: we began at once of course to talk about
Sophie Menter and her new thickly-leaved Petersburg laurels.
Similar plants will bloom for you everywhere according to the
capacity of the soil, and will always shade your artistic
peregrinations through Europe and America.

Give my kindest regards to Neuschul, from yours cordially,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 26th, 1880



259. To Jules de Zarembski

Dear Friend,

You have made an excellent choice; and M. Gevaert also. The
Brussels Conservatoire keeps in the first ranks: its very active
and intelligent Director will take good care not to allow it to
degenerate or to sink into idleness; on the contrary, he gives
and will give it an entirely progressive impulse. You will have
to see that your piano class does honor to the Conservatoire, to
its head and to your own name. This will take some years to do;
therefore, persevere.

Your three studies are most uncommon, remarkable and successful.
The second, in F minor, might be signed Chopin. This exceedingly
high praise does not imply that you have in any way been guilty
of plagiarism, for in your works original power is manifest.

Perhaps there may be a slight falling-off towards the middle of
the third Study; still this does not disturb the total good
impression.

When we are chatting together again about music I will explain to
you viva voce my antiquated ideas concerning the whys and
wherefores of matters belonging to our profession.

I am sending Simon at Berlin at once the good copy of your three
Studies. He has sent me the rather bad one of your Mazurkas for
two performers. These I played over with the Baroness von
Meyendorff yesterday evening. She begs me to tell you our very
favorable opinion of these charming productions of your Polish
muse.

I am telling Simon that publishers cannot do better than bring
out works of value such as Zarembski writes.

Pray, dear friend, present the sincere regards to Mme. Zarembska
of your cordially attached

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 1st, 1880

I am just sending off the copies of the Studies and Mazurkas to
Simon.



260. To Professor Bassani

Dear Friend,

Your "Studio sinfonico" is fine poetry in music. It reminds me of
Venice when I was twenty. The solemn, sad motive (5/4)
corresponds to the lagoons and to the gloomy stroke of their
waves round the Bridge of Sighs: the other subject soars on high
accompanied by the gentle sound of the belfries, announcing, as
it were, from a distance the joyfulness of divine hopes.

My cordial sympathy and friendship.

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 4th, 1880



261. To Marie Lipsius

Dear Friend,

Hearty thanks for your persistent kindness; "Carmen" has just
arrived, and I now beg you to find out for and send to me another
tale of Merimee's, called "Les ames du Purgatoire" [Souls in
Purgatory]. It narrates the adventures of Don Juan de Marana,
immortalised by Mozart and Lord Byron. Grabbe has also turned his
poetical attention towards this mauvais sujet, and gives him as a
companion to Faust, which might perplex His Excellency von
Goethe.

I hope soon to see you either in Leipzig or Weimar.

Ever yours gratefully,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 10th, 1880

Tomorrow I shall write to Hartel's that the edition of my
"Gesammelte Schriften" could not do better than begin with your
excellent version of the "Chopin."



262. To Kornel von Abranyi

Highly Esteemed Dear Friend,

My hearty thanks for the dedication copy of your charming
"Nocturnes." "Near the chapel" and "Starry night" belong to my
most select intimate Programme.

Aladar Juhasz needs but health to stand forth and hold his own as
an excellent artist, virtuoso and composer. The matter of his
stipend is now arranged--as we wished it. Juhasz will certainly
also greatly distinguish himself at the Klausenburg Musical
Festival. My lines of introduction to Trefort, the Minister, must
no longer be presented to His Excellency as mustard after dinner.
The less scribbling and gossiping the better. "Vitam impendere
vero."--

I request that the two accompanying letters in Hungarian may be
answered by the General Secretary of the Royal Hungarian National
Academy of Music, Abranyi Kornel, in my name. Before I left
Budapest we read together the polyphone tattoo by J. K., and I
then requested you to make the composer understand that
Meyerbeer's far-famed "Rataplan, Rataplan, plan, plan" (in the
"Huguenots") is quite enough henceforth for the audience.

Do not delay any longer returning his score to J. Beg Herr P. A.
to excuse me for not being a millionaire.

Till the end of July remains in Weimar Yours most faithfully and
gratefully,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 20th, 1880



263. To Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen

Highly esteemed Freiherr and Friend,

.--. Wagner has shown and taught us triumphantly "what style is."
You explain the mighty matter admirably in your last writing,
dear Sir. That a "School for the culture of style in Bayreuth"
should be established, is wished by no one more seriously than by

Yours most sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weimar, July 28th 1880



149. To Friedrich Hofmeister, Music Publisher in Leipzig

Weimar, August 17th, 1880

Dear Sir,

For the last twenty years or more Kirchner has known how
sincerely I esteem his compositions. I rejoice to see that he
continues adding to their number with freshness and vigor, and am
much obliged to you for sending me his "Toys," "Caprices,"
"Leaves," etc., which you have brought out.

Yours truly,

F. Liszt



265. To Baroness Helen Augusz, Sister of Mercy in Graz

[Daughter of Liszt's late friend, Baron Anton Augusz, of Szegzard
in Hungary]

Most revered Sister of St. Vincent de Paule,

Pray always dispose of my feeble services. I am writing to the
Baroness de Roner according to your instructions, and request
that you will send her the enclosed lines.

M. Tirindelli's [Professor at the "Liceo Marcello" in Venice;
violinist and composer.] abilities deserve attention,
consideration and encouragement. This you have well understood,
and it will be a pleasure to me to second you.

How can I be of use to him?

By recommending him to some publisher in Germany?

Does he intend to travel and give concerts? Your protege, M.
Tirindelli, may count upon my sincere readiness to oblige him:
the only thing I ask is, that he should write me distinctly in
what way I can be of service to him. Yesterday I took the liberty
of noting several alterations in his melody "All' Ideale," his
Mazurka, and in the Adagio of the Trio which pleases you by its
fine feeling.

By the way, this Adagio has been so badly copied that another
less faulty one will have to be made before sending it to print.
By this same post you will receive the three works with my
alterations.

Having arrived here last Saturday, I shall remain at the Villa
d'Este till New Year. In the middle of January will return to
Budapest

Your very respectful and devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Rome, September 1st, 1880

The most convenient address for me during the next months is:
Albergo a Via Alibert, Roma.



266. To Madame A. Rubinstein

Allow me, dear Madame Rubinstein, to dedicate to you my
transcription of your husband's charming and very famous Lied. To
the very conservative burden "Ach! wenn es doch immer so bliebe"
[Ah! could it remain so for ever!] I add that what will certainly
always remain as now is, your most respectfully and
affectionately obedient servant,

F. Liszt

(Villa d'Este,) October 24th, 1880



267. To Frau Amalie von Fabry in Budapest

Dear Madame,

I do not know whether I talk too much; but I certainly write too
little to those who remain constantly in possession of my sincere
gratitude. I crave your kindly indulgence therefore for my
involuntary shortcomings.

Through your nephew Imre [Baron Augusz, son of Anton Augusz. He
died at an early age.] I hear that his mother, Baroness von
Augusz, has been so good as to look at my new dwelling in the
Academy of Music, and that the arrangement of it, as yet unknown
to me, meets her approval. The solicitude you have shown, Madame,
in this matter--as well as in other similar ones in the
Palatingasse and Fischmarkt during the last 8 years--I beg to
acknowledge with warmest thanks. It never enters my head to make
exaggerated pretensions with regard to my residential
requirements. Decency without display continues to be the right
thing for me. I only have one wish at all times: never to be a
trouble to my friends anywhere.

It will be agreeable to me if Fanny feels disposed to undertake
my modest household service again this winter. She adapts herself
well to it with her pretty smiling face.

Pray accept, dear Frau von Fabry, the renewed expression of my
old devoted affection.

F. Liszt.

Villa d'Este, Tivoli, November 1st, 1880

On the 15th January I shall again arrive at Budapest.



268. To Frau Anna Benfey-Schuppe

[Autograph belonging to Herr Fritz Donebauer at Prague.--The
addressee is an authoress residing at Weimar.]

Dear Madam,

A thousand apologies. I ought long ere this to have written you
and my esteemed friend, Dr. Benfey, a letter of thanks, and to
have sent your sheetful of questions back answered. [The answers
follow in the letter.] Pray excuse this delay.--

I frankly confess that the title of the pamphlet, "Beethoven and
Liszt," [Alludes to a pamphlet contemplated by the late husband
of the lady addressed.] at first frightened me. It called to my
mind a reminiscence of my childhood. Nearly fifty years ago, at
the Jardin des Plantes in Paris, I used often to notice a
harmless poodle keeping company in the same cage with a majestic
lion, who seemed to be kindly disposed towards the little
chamberlain. I have exactly the same feeling towards Beethoven as
the poodle towards that forest-king.

With sincere thanks and regards,

Yours, F. Liszt

November 11th, 1880 (Villa d'Este, Tivoli)

At the end of September, Breitkopf and Hartel sent my own duet
arrangements of my twelve "Poemes Symphoniques" at my request to
Gottschalg (Weimar). This copy is intended for Dr. Benfey.
Gottschalg will likewise willingly place the scores of the
"Dante" and "Faust" Symphonies, as well as the arrangement for
two pianos of both these works, at your disposal.

The names of the greatest performers figure in the Court
concerts, such as, Joachim, Ernst, Vieuxtemps, Bulow, Rubinstein,
Bronsart, Tausig, Madame Viardot-Garcia, etc., etc. A few of
these concerts were conducted by Berlioz, and their programmes in
every case contained nova et vetera (as prescribed in the
gospel).

During my direction of the Opera at Weimar, from '49 to '58, the
following works were performed there, together with the standing
repertoire of Mozart's, Weber's, Rossini's, Meyerbeer's Operas,
etc.

February '49 "Tannhauser;" August 28th, '50, "Lohengrin" (first
performance); later on "The Flying Dulchman," and Wagner's
splendid edition of Gluck's "Iphigenia in Aulis."--Berlioz's
"Benvenuto Cellini;" Schumann's "Manfred" (first performance),
Raff's "King Alfred," two of Lassen's Operas, Spohr's "Faust"
(with the recitatives), Sobolewski's "Comala," Dorn's
"Nibelungen" (first performance), etc., etc.--Finally, Peter
Cornelius' "Barber of Bagdad"--the last operatic performance
which I directed there.

This short list will suffice for your purpose of the pamphlet; to
it we may add that several Oratorios and Symphonic works were
performed under my direction, such as Marx' "Moses," Rubinstein's
"Paradise Lost," Schumann's "Paradise and the Peri" and his
concluding scenes in "Faust," etc.; as for Symphonies, the Great
Pyramid--Beethoven's "Ninth" (for Goethe's Jubilee in '49),
nearly all Berlioz's Symphonies and Overtures, besides other
Symphonies and Overtures by Schumann, Raff, Hiller, Bronsart,
Joachim, Bulow, etc., most of which were at that time scarcely
known or entirely new.

You might obtain better and more detailed information concerning
musical life at Weimar (from '49 to '58) from some who took part
in it either as performers or friends, especially Gille, Lassen,
Gottschalg, Grosse (trombone-player and contrapuntist),
Wahlbrull, Milde and his wife, and Fran Dr. Emilie Merian, than
from the theater archives.

I have no doubt, moreover, that the present Intendant, Baron
von Loen, will readily permit you to inspect the archives of the
theater and see any programmes of the Court concerts of that time
which may still be forthcoming. You may likewise count upon the
obliging readiness of Lassen and Muller-Hartung in making your
pamphlet known.

During my summer stay in Weimar in latter years, some pianists
have taken to coming there regularly who play my Symphonic Poems
well and willingly. I am not able to name any of those who come
during the winter. Ask Lassen and Muller-Hartung about this.
Enclosed you will find an introduction from me to Madame Merian.
She sings my songs with fervent intelligence, from heart to
heart.

F. Liszt

November 11th, 1880 (Villa d'Este)



269. To the Committee of the Antwerp Musical Society

Very Honored Gentlemen,

The expression of my sincere gratitude for your very kind letter
has been delayed owing to a circumstance which was independent of
my will.

I am acquainted with the high character which the Antwerp Musical
Society bears; many of those who were present at your Festivals
in 1876, '77, and have spoken to me in the liveliest terms of
praise of those great musical performances, of the far-famed
merits of your director, Peter Benoit, of his Rubens Cantata and
of his Oratorio [La Guerre, De Oorlog.] recently sung at Brussels
on the occasion of the national commemoration by 900 members of
your Society. Greatly flattered by your invitation, I hope,
Gentlemen, that my answer to it may not appear discourteous to
you. Allow me to decline the honor of directing the Festival you
have in view for 1881 and to be present at it as a simple
listener. Should any work of mine have been admitted to your
programme, I would fain request M. Peter Benoit [One of the chief
representatives of Belgian national music (born 1884), Director
of the Antwerp Conservatoire] to conduct it, since for the last
fifteen years I have declared myself unfit for this work in all
countries.

My engagements keep me at Budapest till Easter. After that time I
shall be charmed to have the opportunity of assuring you again
personally at Antwerp of the sentiments of high consideration and
distinguished esteem with which I remain,

Yours faithfully,

F. Liszt

November 16th, 1880 (Villa d'Este,) Tivoli

[The Lisztt-Festival given by the Societe de Musique d'Anvers
took place on the 26th May, 1881, under Benoit's direction, in
Antwerp. The programme comprised the Gran Mass; the E flat
Concerto, played by Fran Falk-Mehlig; the Dance of Death, played
by Zarembski; Mignon and other songs, sung by the ladies
Kufferath and Schauenburg; and the Preludes.

In a second Festival-Concert on 29th May, arranged by Liszt's
former pupil F. von Servais and Jules de Zarembski, Tasso and the
Faust Symphony, the Concerto Pathetique (played by M. and Mme.
Zarembski), and "Loreley" with orchestra (Mdlle. Kufferath) were
performed. Gevaert, the celebrated musical savant, apostrophised
Liszt in the opening speech as "the incomparable Virtuoso whose
prestige has never been surpassed, nor even equalled; the
prolific and inspired composer, who in the numerous domains of
Art which he has touched has opened new roads, explored new
shores, and left everywhere the luminous imprint of his bold and
innovating genius; the eminent head of a School, who may without
exaggeration be described as the initiator, par excellence, of
the musical movement of our epoch; one of those rare favorites of
the gods for whom posterity begins even during their life-time,"
etc.]



270. To Sophie Menter

Dear, Highly Valued Friend,

If I rightly understand your letter and telegram you are soon
going to Paris and London, and also soon coming to Rome. When?--
tell me this clearly. A Roman Sophie Menter Concert is easily
arranged and will be a great pleasure for me.

Although introductions from me are quite superfluous for you, I
beg you to consider them always at your disposal. The best person
to safeguard your interests with the German Ambassadors in France
and England will be Frau Grafin Schleinitz. Alter, shorten and
improve anything you like in the Fantaisie on the Huguenots.
Pieces of this sort ought only to be brought forward by super-
eminent virtuosi--Sophie Menter, for instance. The transcriber
then hardly serves as "Klecks." [Klecks is the name of Mme.
Menter's favorite cat.]

Yours cordially,

F. Liszt

December 2nd, 1880 (Villa D'este, Rome)

Maybe you will tell me yourself soon in Rome where I am to send
the letters; if not, send me your address. I shall remain here
till January 5th and be at Budapest on the 15th.



271. To Dr. Friedrich Stade in Leipzig

[Musical writer (born 1844) in Leipzig]

Very Dear Sir and Friend,

Your transcription of "Gretchen" [Out of Liszt's Faust Symphony.]
for pianoforte and harmonium is capital, just as I wished. I only
take the liberty of very slightly altering it, and have added ten
bars at the end, which are to be henceforth inserted in the score
and in my own arrangements of the Faust Symphony. [They follow
herewith in the orchestral movement, according to Dr. Stade's
copy.]

If you will kindly take the trouble to arrange the entire Faust
Symphony for two performers on one piano, I shall be greatly
indebted to you. [This was done.] Deal as freely as possible with
the figurations and also with the distribution among the seven
octaves of the odious keyboard. It seems to me that what may be
more laterally accurate ought often to give way to what sounds
better and even to what is more convenient for the players at the
piano.

Thanking you once more, I remain,

Yours most cordially,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 11th, 1880.

We will play your duet arrangement together before it is
published, in Weimar--next spring.

[Here, Liszt illustrates with Musical score excerpts]



272. To Professor S. Jadassoiin in Leipzig

[Composer (born in 1831), teacher at the Leipzig Conservatoire
since 187l]

Dear Sir,

Your setting of the 100th Psalm is nobly religious in feeling and
excellent in style. The working out of the choruses is masterly
throughout, from beginning to end; a passage which comes out with
especial brilliancy is that on pages 14, 15-19, 20, "with
rejoicing," where the trombones, and then the trumpets and
trombones, joyously repeat the subject of the fugue in
augmentation.

The Arioso too which follows, "He made us," is most fervent in
expression. There is a fine field here for beautiful contralto
voices to rejoice in.

My sincere thanks, dear sir, for the dedication of this excellent
work. I shall recommend it for performance to such of my friends
as are conductors; above all, to Hofcapellmeister Muller-Hartung,
whom I shall request to bring out your Psalm at Weimar.

Yours sincerely,

F. Liszt

Villa d'Este, January 10th, 1881



273. To Frau Reisenauer-Pauly in Konigsberg

Dear Madam,

It is one of my duties to deal sparingly in letters of
introduction. Still I am quite willing to repeat my opinion that
your son Alfred is a highly gifted and brilliantly aspiring
pianoforte-player.

Should this conscientious opinion enable him to obtain further
recommendations, he is free to make use of it.

Yours sincerely,

F. Liszt

Budapest, January 29th, 1881



274. To Dionys von Pazmandy, Editor of the Gasette de Hongrie

[This letter is printed in French in the Gazette de Hongrie, but
is only known to the Editor in the German translation (Neue
Zeitschrift fur Musik?).]

Dear Sir and Friend,

You want to know my impression of yesterday's Bulow Concert? Yet
it must have been yours, that of all of us, that of the whole of
the intelligent audiences of Europe. To define it in two words:
admiration, enthusiasm. Bulow was my pupil in music five-and-
twenty years ago, as I myself, five-and-twenty years before, had
been the pupil of my much respected and beloved master, Czerny.
But to Bulow it was given to do battle better and with greater
perseverance than I did. His admirable Beethoven-Edition is
dedicated to me as the "fruit of my tuition." Here however it was
for the master to learn from the pupil, and Bulow continues to
teach by his astonishing performances as virtuoso, as well as by
his extraordinary learning as a musician, and now too by his
matchless direction of the Meiningen Orchestra.--Here you have
the musical progress of our time!

Yours cordially,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 15th, 1881



275. To Frau Colestine Bosendorfer in Vienna

[The wife of the celebrated pianoforte-maker, who died young]

Not to see you in Vienna this time, Madame, was a grief to me. It
cast, as it were, a melancholy shadow over my stay there, which
otherwise was brightened by so cordial a reception.--

I am accompanied by the roses without thorns of my pleasant
recollections of you, and my hearty and respectful devotion
remains unaltered.

F. Liszt

Weimar, Easter Sunday, April 17th, 1881

Have the kindness to repeat to Bosendorfer the assurance of my
very cordial friendship.



276. To the Most Honorable Committee of the Wagner-Verein, Berlin

Addressed to Professor Otto Lessmann.

Gentlemen,

A distinction such as that which was conferred upon me yesterday
by the Berlin "Wagner-Verein" and by the audience has seldom been
received by the highest masters in the musical art, among whom I
can only count as an apprentice.

["Les Preludes" and "Festklange," the former under Lessmann's,
the latter under Mannstadt's direction, had been performed in the
winter garden of the Central Hotel before a numerous audience
assembled by invitation. Between the two symphonies, Marianne
Brandt sang "Jeanne d'Arc au bucher," and Heinrich Ernst some of
Liszt's songs. A banquet concluded the festival.]

Accept my warmest thanks for the "Liszt Festival Concert" of
Sunday, 24th April; it remains as a joyous incentive to lifelong
continuous work with

Yours respectfully,

F. Liszt

Berlin, Monday, April 25th, 188l



277. To Kornel von Abranyi

Weimar, May 13th, 1881

My Dear Friend,

Rather more than half of my concert-engagements for this year
have now been fulfilled. The two performances of "Christus" in
Berlin and Freiburg were admirable; the Liszt-Concerts in
Freiburg and Baden-Baden likewise; in the first of these the
three-part hymn "L'enfant au reveil" was also given, charmingly
sung by deliciously clear voices. By way of a rehearsal of this
piece the ladies gave a morning serenade in honor of me at the
house of my friendly hosts the Rieslers, whose villa will remain
most pleasantly in my remembrance. Felix Mottl conducted the
Liszt concert in Baden-Baden with "Mazeppa," the "Mephisto-
Waltz," the "Hunnenschlacht," and three pieces from the Oratorio
"Christus" in a most praiseworthy manner. Bulow's Liszt-evening
in Berlin glorious as at Pest and Vienna..--.

I shall stay here till Sunday, 22nd May. On the 24th I shall be
at Antwerp. On the 26th is the performance of the "Gran Mass"
there.

I am very glad that the Committee of the Musical Festival has
chosen just this particular work, which has hitherto been more
talked about and abused by the critics than heard. Of course I
had left the programme entirely to the discretion of the
Committee, for I really have no wish to recommend any work of my
own for performance anywhere. My mission is to work on
unpretendingly and without troubling myself about advancement.

Yours faithfully,

F. Liszt

My best regards to your wife and sons. I will send you programmes
from Antwerp and Brussels. I shall be back here again on the 4th
June. From the 9th to the 12th June Tonkunstler-Versammlung in
Magdeburg.



278. To Kornel von Abranyi,

Much Esteemed, Dear Friend,

The second copy (with the additional few hundred bars) of the
score of my second Mephisto-Waltz is admirably done. Thank Gyula
Erkel very particularly in my name for it. I request his
acceptance of the enclosed forty florins, as a slight
remuneration for the time he has spent on it. I depend upon your
firm friendship, which has stood the test of so many years, to
find a delicate mode of presenting them to him. The score of the
second Mephisto-Waltz will be published next autumn by Furstner
(Berlin), and then performances can take place at Budapest and
elsewhere.

I am writing to our esteemed Director of the Royal Hungarian
Academy of National Music, Franz Erkel, to have Chickering's
grand pianoforte, as an excellent and kind gift from America,
placed in the music-hall in the Radial-Strasse. This piano, as
well as the whole of my possessions in Budapest, will belong to
the Royal Hungarian Academy of Music at my death, which is not
far off. Correctness remains the motto of

Yours most faithfully,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 22nd, 1881.

Tomorrow evening I shall be at Antwerp. The Committee there have
decided for the Gran Mass to be performed on the 26th May without
any pressure on my part. Therefore Eljen Hungaria--in all
countries. You may address to Weimar in the beginning of June.



279. To Frau Charlotte Blume-Arends

[A pupil of Liszt's now in Berlin.]

Weimar, August 29th, 1881

Dear Madam,

A good deal of irregularity has crept into my housekeeping during
my long indisposition. Your kind letter only reached me
yesterday. Thank you heartily for it; I accept the office of
godfather. So your son is to be named Franz, and to walk the
waters of life firmly and serenely, trusting securely in God,
like my patron Saint Francois de Paule, whose motto is:
"Caritas."  I have long been wishing to thank you by letter for
the charming present which decorates my study in the new wing of
the Musical Academy at Pest. That elegant work of art is greatly
admired by my numerous visitors. It would be charming, were the
amiable donor to return and inspect it. The remembrance of you is
still vivid in Pest.

Best compliments to your husband from

Yours gratefully and truly,

F. Liszt

I hope to be quite recovered in ten days, and shall then go to
Rome.



280. To Otto Lessmann

Weimar, September 8th, 1881

Dear Friend,

I have still to undergo a supplementary treatment of baths and
sweatings. [In consequence of a fall, Liszt had been seriously
ill all summer.] This I shall do at Weimar. From the 21st to the
30th September I shall be at Bayreuth, and from October till New
Year in Rome.

I am sending off the duet version of my Symphonic Poem "From
cradle to grave" to Bock to day. .--. I shall send him the score
from Bayreuth, because just now I am not able to work more than a
few hours a day continuously.

There is so much admirable music written that one is ashamed to
write any more. With me it only happens in cases of urgency and
from inner necessity.

Thanking you heartily,

Yours ever,

F. Liszt



281. To Francois Auguste Gevaert, Director of the Brussels
Conservatoire

[Celebrated Belgian music teacher and composer, born 1828]

Very Honored, Dear Friend,

Among the recollections of my long artistic life one of the
dearest to me is that of your kind sympathy. I cherish sincere
gratitude for it, of which I should be glad to give you a proof.
Allow me, to begin with, to dedicate to you the Symphonic Poem I
have just written, which was suggested by a drawing by Michel
Zichy entitled "From the cradle to the grave."--The score is
short enough, and, it seems to me, free from superfluous
repetition.

Lassen has spoken to you about the performance of your Quentin
Durward at Weimar. The Grand Duke desires it to take place; his
Theater-Intendant, Baron von Loen, was preparing for it, and the
singers are certain to take great pains and show all alacrity in
performing their several parts well.

To my own regret, in which his Royal Highness shares, as well as
his theater company and the audience, the performance has to be
adjourned; for the German translation is not forthcoming, and
some dawdling on the part of your publisher throws obstacles in
the way. Let him soon turn over a new leaf. As for the German
translation, I particularly recommend to you my friend Richard
Pohl  (who is living at Baden-Baden, where he is editor-in-chief
of the local newspaper of that charming place). Pohl is
distinguished by great musical intelligence and cleverness in
translating, of both of which he has given proof in Berlioz's
Beatrice and Bennedict and Saint-Saens' Samson.

Lassen and Baron Loen will continue to correspond with you
concerning the mise-en-scene of Quentin Durward at Weimar. Small
towns have but small successes to offer. You are entitled by
right to both large and small ones. Accept them.--

I do not scruple to ask a favor of you, my dear friend. The
decoration of the Order of Leopold arrived at a time when I was
ill in bed. It was accompanied by a few complimentary lines from
the Secretary of the Foreign Office, Baron de Lambermont, as well
as by the official document which was to be signed by me. It
would have been my most agreeably imperative duty to have thanked
Baron de L., and to have expressed my lively feelings of
gratitude for this royal favor. This I could not immediately do,
owing to the state of my health, which did not allow of my
writing, and still renders that occupation very difficult. Add to
this that a good deal of disorder had got into my household;
several letters and manuscripts have been mislaid, and,
notwithstanding all my endeavors, I have not been able to find
Baron de L.'s lines again or the document they enclosed. I
therefore beg you, dear and highly esteemed friend, to present my
apologies to the Baron, and to ask him to send me a duplicate of
the document I have to sign. My address from 22nd September to
2nd October will be: Bayreuth (Bavaria); after that, Via and
Hotel Alibert, Rome.

Yours, in high esteem and cordial friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 19th, 188l



282. To Francois Auguste Gevaert

Highly Honored Master and Dear Friend,

Thanks to your kind help I have at last put my business with
Baron Lambermont in order and have just written him a letter of
very grateful acknowledgment.

Permit me to revenir a nos moutons. Panurge has nothing to do
with them, nor has the honorable biscuit-seller of the Gymnase,
still less his peaceable neighbor, your publisher Mr. Grus. What
we want is the score of your "Quentin Durward" and composer's
consent to the performance of it at Weimar. The Grand Duke's
Theater-Intendant undertakes the payment of the German
translator, my old friend, Richard Pohl, who will certainly take
great pleasure in performing his task in the most satisfactory
way possible. Baron Loen and Lassen will correspond with you
concerning the performance, which is intended to take place in
December '82.

My cordial thanks for your favorable acceptance of my dedication.
Some months are still necessary for the copying and publishing of
the score together with the orchestral parts. Before this is
finished 1 will send you the printed pianoforte arrangement for
one and for two performers.

Be good enough, dear friend, to give my affectionate regards to
Madame Gevaert and to your sons, and ever count upon my very
grateful devotion.

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, October 8th, 1881

I shall be in Rome in eight days.



283. To Eduard von Mihalovich

Dearest Friend,

I must be found guilty [of negligence?]. I do not apologise. My
aversion to letter-writing has grown excessive. But who could
answer more than two thousand letters a year without becoming an
idiot?

I have been ailing a good deal for the last three months. As soon
as there was an improvement, something else appeared. Do not let
us mention this any more, for you know how little my health
occupies my thoughts, and how disagreeable it is to me to hear it
talked of. In short, I feel sufficiently recovered to set out for
Rome the day after tomorrow. My very dear granddaughter Daniela
goes with me, and will remain till the beginning of January. This
is a providential pleasure on which I did not count at all, but
for which I thank the good angels.

I will tell you by word of mouth the minor reasons which
prevented me from sooner communicating your two splendid scores
and the pianoforte duet arrangements of them to the publishers,
Breitkopf and Hartel. Your fine manuscripts have at last reached
Leipzig, and you will soon have a letter from the present
proprietors of the ancient and illustrious house Breitkopf and
Hartel, with their conditions for publication, which will be
their ultaiytalunz. They are aware of the sincere interest I take
in your works, and will, I trust, share it, without leading you
into any expense.

Stern [Adolph Stern in Dresden, author of the libretto.] has
given me fairly good news as to the preparations for the
performance of your Haubar at Dresden. Young composers are always
too impatient.--

Pray remember me cordially to our excellent friends the Veghs,
Albert Apponyi, Madame d'Eotvos and her daughter, Mademoiselle
Polyxena, and...I was just going to add the name of a charming
woman with whom I am out of favor.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, October 8th, 1881

My address from the middle of October to the lst of January: Via
and Hotel Alibert, Rome.

You are held in affectionate remembrance at Wahnfried. Wagner is
finishing the instrumentation of the 2nd act of Parsifal, and
gives it his most passionate attention. We shall have something
new, marvellous, unheard of, to hear.

M. Humperdink, the lucky triple laureate of the three
scholarships, "Mozart," "Meyerbeer," "Mendelssohn," is at work
here copying the score of Parstfal; [E. Humperdink, born in 1854,
made Wagner's acquaintance in 1880 at Naples, and at the first
performance of Parsifal conducted the choruses from on high and
the music on the stage. He has been teacher at the Barcelona
Conservatoire since 1885.] Joseph Rubinstein [Born 1847 in
Russia, he lived a great deal in Wagner's society after 1872, and
took an active part in the rehearsals for the Bayreuth Festival
Performances in 1875 and 1876, He died by his own hand the 15th
of September, 1884, at Lucerne.] is continuing his arrangement of
it for piano at Palermo just now, and will complete it later on
at Bayreuth. Other artists on the high road to celebrity are also
employed in copying this same Opus magnum, the performance of
which we shall applaud in July 1882. It will be a next to
miraculous and highly fashionable pilgrimage.

P.S.--The busybody Spiridion has been so careless as to carry off
a little gold watch of mine that I had merely given him leave to
wear while he was in my service. Please ask Spiridion to give you
this watch on New Year's Day. You will return it to me about the
middle of January 1882, when I go back to Budapest.



284. To Jules de Zarembski

Dearest Friend,

I have rarely done a minor work--big ones bother me--with as much
pleasure as that of setting your two Galician Dances for
Orchestra. It is quite finished, with a few additions of which I
hope you will not disapprove; but my scrawl of a manuscript
cannot possibly be sent you: therefore I have asked Friedheim
[One of the most pre-eminent among the younger pupils of the
Master.] to undertake to copy it, and I will send you this copy
before the New Year. If the publisher Simon is inclined to
publish this orchestration I will let him have it for a thousand
marks; if not, keep it yourself; and make any use you like of it;
first of all at the concert in which you are going to bring
forward your own compositions exclusively. I wish I could be
present at it, and on this occasion I renew to you the sincere
and sympathetic esteem in which I hold your noble and rare
talents. They will fructify by means of perseverance.

Friedheim's copy will reach you in time to have the parts copied
and to add the necessary nuances. Please send me a programme of
the concert of which Zarembski as composer is to fill the list.
The other programme you are meditating, to be devoted to my works
for the pianoforte, seems to me to be too long; this is a defect
for which I can only be very thankful to you, and yet I am going
to ask you to reduce your recital to the average proportion. An
hour and a half of pianoforte music of mine, however admirably
played, is more than sufficient.

M. Becquet, President of the Brussels Musical Society, writes to
me concerning the performance of my Elizabeth, and M. Radoux,
Director of the Liege Conservatoire, likewise. I fear the
translation of the libretto and its proper adaptation to the work
will be impediments. Nevertheless, if your friend Franz Servais
were good enough to undertake the work of revision and of
intelligent adaptation to the vocal parts, I should be more easy
in my mind, and should only wish to look through the whole before
the publisher, Kahnt, prints the French version under the German
original. I am now writing this to M. Becquet. Pray give my
cordial regards to Franz Servais and my grateful remembrances to
Maitre Gevaert.

Enclosed are the photographs with signature for MM. Dumon and
Dufour; to which I add a third (recently taken in Rome) for
yourself.

I am honored, flattered, and also...overwhelmed by numbers of
letters. I have received more than a hundred during the last six
weeks; I should have to give ten hours a day to letter-writing if
I were to attempt to pay my debts of correspondence: this I
cannot do. Even the state of my health, which is not bad but
forbids any continuous occupation, is opposed to it. Besides,
when my old mania for writing music lays hold of me--as is the
case just now--I feel quite unable to use my pen in any other
way. I therefore beg you to convey my apologies and very
affectionate thanks to M. and Mme. Tardieu for the kindness they
show me.

I hope to repeat all this to them personally, for it is not said
that I shall not return to Brussels, although travelling is
becoming arduous for me. M. Tardieu's present of spirituous
liquid has restored me several evenings during my work,...which
may be superfluous, but completes what has gone before.

Your very devoted friend,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 4th, 1881

I remain here till the first week in January at Via and Hotel
Alibert.



285. To Camille Saint-Saens

Much-Esteemed Dear Friend,

You are not one of those who are easily forgotten, and you have
won your fame valiantly. My feelings of sincere admiration and
gratitude have followed you for many years; they are confirmed
and increased by the proofs you give of constant and active
sympathy.

I wrote to you last summer from Magdeburg on the occasion of the
festival. Your remarkable work "La Lyre et la Harpe" figured on
the programme; a delay in the translation and in the study of the
choruses obliged me, to my great regret, to defer the performance
of it till next summer, when the Tonkunstler-Versammlung, which
is honored by your active membership and has just named me its
Honorary President, will again meet.

Before Christmas Furstner, the publisher, will send you, from me,
three copies (score and arrangements for pianoforte solo and
duet) of my second Mephistopheles Waltz, dedicated to Camille
Saint-Saens. I thank you cordially for giving it so hearty a
welcome. No one more than myself feels the disproportion in my
compositions between the good-will and the effective result. Yet
I go on writing--not without fatigue--from inner necessity and
old habit. We are not forbidden to aspire towards higher things:
it is the attainment of our end which remains the note of
interrogation, being in this something like the end to the
Mephistopheles Waltz on b, f--

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt]

intervals which are indicated in the first bars of the piece.

You intimate the friendly desire that I should revisit Paris.
Travelling at my age becomes burdensome, and I greatly fear that
I should be found out of place in capitals like Paris or London,
where no immediate obligation calls me. This fear does not make
me less grateful towards the public, and especially towards my
Parisian friends, to whom I acknowledge myself to be so greatly
indebted. Besides, I should not like completely to give up the
thought of ever seeing them again, although the deplorable
performance of the Gran Mass in 1866 left a painful impression
upon me.

This is easily explained on both sides. Nevertheless, it would be
too much for me in future to expose myself to such
misapprehensions. Without false modesty or foolish vanity I
cannot allow myself to be classed among the celebrated pianists
who have gone astray in composing failures.

By the way, allow me to ask a question. If I were to return to
Paris, would you feel disposed, dear friend, to repeat your
former offence by conducting any of my works in I know not what
orchestral concert? I dare not ask you to do it, but, supposing
that a favorable opportunity should occur, I should be very proud
to be present. Meanwhile be so good as to remember me very kindly
to Viscount Delaborde, and to thank your colleague of the
Institute, Massenet, sincerely for his telegram. He will excuse
me for not answering him at once. To fulfil the duties of a
correspondent is an insoluble problem for your very grateful and
devoted friend,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 8th, 1887.



256. To Ludwig Bosendorfer

Very Dear Friend,

I was raised to a very exhilarated state of mind by the many
tokens of sympathy and friendship on the 22nd October. [Liszt's
70th birthday.] To give it expression, I wrote several pages of
music, but no letters at all. Antipathy to letter-writing is
becoming a malady with me...Have the kindness to beg my friends
in Vienna to excuse this. Perhaps I may yet live long epough to
prove my affection to them in a better way than by words. My
health does not preoccupy me at all; it is fairly good and only
requires care, a thing which is at times irksome to me.

As usual for the last 10 years, I shall return to Budapest in the
middle of January '82.

My best regards to your wife.

Yours faithfully and gratefully,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 8th, 1881

I repeat especially my hearty thanks to Zellner.



287. To Pauline Viardot-Garcia

[The great singer, who still teaches in Paris, was Liszt's pupil
for piano.]

Most Illustrious and Gracious Friend,

A woman distinguished by her shrewdness and talents, the
authoress of several volumes which have had the good fortune to
pass through several editions, has asked me for a line of
introduction to you. I have told her what she and all the world
besides already knows: that Pauline Viardot is the most exquisite
dramatic singer of our time, and besides this a consummate
musician and a composer of the most delicate and lively
intelligence. To which opinion, as merited as it is universal,
Madame X. is prepared to give ample and elegant expression in a
notice she meditates publishing upon you.

Pray give a kind reception to your new correspondent, and keep a
friendly remembrance of your old and most devoted admirer,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 12th, 1881



288. To Madame Malwine Tardieu in Brussels

[The wife of the chief editor of the Independance Belge]

How good of you, Madame, to make such ready allowance for my
delays and shortcomings in correspondence. It is a disagreeable
infirmity of mine not to be able to write longer and better
letters. Your last kind lines delighted me, and I thank you for
them most affectionately. The brilliant success of Massenet's
Herodiade [The first performance of the Opera took place at the
Theater de la Monnaie in Brussels, 19th December, 1881.] gives me
sincere pleasure; all Paris, after having applauded the work on
its first appearance at Brussels, will be all the more ready to
applaud it again in Paris itself. For my own part let me confess
to you quite in a whisper that I am inclined rather to hold back
with respect to certain love-scenes, which, it seems, are
necessary on the stage, when introduced into biblical subjects.
They jar on my feelings--excepting in our admirable and valiant
friend St. Saens' Dalila, where he has made a glorious love duet
which is quite in place; for Dalila and Samson are bound to give
themselves to the devil for love's sake, whilst in Massenet's
Magdalen and Herodfade the whole thing is merely
conventional...theatrical.

Pray forgive me, Madame, for this opinion, which is slightly
pedantic, but without any pretension. When you see Madame Viardot
again, tell her that I still cherish an enthusiastic recollection
of her--a typical Orpheus, Fides and Rosina,--and, besides, an
enchanting composer and a pianist full of ingenious dexterity.
Have you heard anything of her daughter, Madame Heritte? Do you
know her remarkable setting of Victor Hugo's "Feu du Ciel"?
Monsieur Becquet [President of the Brussels Musical Society
(since dissolved).] has sent me an excellent French translation
of my Elizabeth, [By Gustave Lagye.] quite adapted to the sense
and rhythm of the music. When this Legend of St. Elizabeth was
first performed at Budapest (end of August 1865) the Independance
Belge published a most flattering article on the work. .--.

Pray remember most kindly to M. Tardieu your affectionate and
devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Rome, January 20th, 1882.

Zarembski has received my orchestration of his charming "Danses
Polonaises."  ["Danses Galiciennes."]



289. To Colonel Alexander Wereschagin

[The brother of the celebrated painter; formerly adjutant to the
Russian General Skobeleff, also an author.]

Dear M. de Wereschagin,

I am very grateful to you for sending me the photograph of one of
your brother's admirable pictures. His "Forgotten" is a dismal,
ghastly symphony of crows and vultures; I understand it, and
deeply enter into his marvellous inspiration.

Be so good as to tell your brother how great is my admiration for
his genius, and accept, dear Sir, the expression of my best and
most devoted regards.

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 5th, 1882.



290. To the Kammervirtuosin Martha Remmert

Dear Martha,

Enclosed are the various readings [Varianten] to my "Todtentanz."
[Dance of Death.] I noted them down after hearing the piece last
May for the first time with Orchestra at the Antwerp Musical
Festival (played by Zarembski in a masterly way). The brief
alterations are easy to insert into the instrumental parts, for
they only apply to the Horns, and consist in the addition of 7
bars; the rest are pauses in the orchestra while the pianoforte
solo continues.

All is accurately indicated in the enclosed copy, so that, should
the publisher Siegel (Leipzig) feel disposed to add a
complementary sheet to the score, it might be easily printed from
this copy. I should not like to trouble Siegel about this; but I
authorise you, dear Martha, to communicate the complementary
pages A, B, C, to Siegel. [The alterations alluded to did not
appear in print.]

I wish you all the success you deserve in your concert
productions, and remain always, Yours sincerely,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 20th, 1882.



291. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Dear Madame,

You were beforehand with me in knowing that the performance of my
St. Elizabeth is to take place, for the first time in French, at
Brussels on Sunday, 30th April. If the date is not changed, I
shall arrive on the 27th for the last rehearsals.

I hardly venture to accept the hospitality you are so good as to
offer me, from delicacy; if, however, you help me ever so little
to overcome my scruples, they will vanish. A thousand thanks for
the good news you give me of the success of "Samson" and of other
works by St. Saens in Germany. He has possessed my admiring
friendship for many years.

My very affectionate and grateful regards.

F. Liszt

Budapest, April 11th, 1882

I shall return to Weimar in about ten days, where I shall expect
to receive the printed programme from M. Becquet, which is to fix
my arrival in Brussels.

Pray thank M. Tardieu for his obliging intention of reproducing
the article of the Independance upon the first performance of the
St. Elizabeth at Budapest in August 1865. I will tell you by word
of mouth who penned those lines. [This article, which was signed
Remenyi, was written by Frau Cosima Wagner, Liszt's daughter, and
(according to Madame Tardieu's opinion) had "a high interest on
account of its poetical and brilliant conception."]



292. To Franz Servais

Very Dear Friend,

It is a grief to me that you will be conspicuous by your absence
on the approaching occasion of my return to Brussels. The Liszt-
Concert set afloat and directed by you last spring remains one of
my pleasantest recollections during my too long artistic career.
Even at that time you suggested a performance of my "Elizabeth,"
and I did not think that it would take place during your absence.
My approaching second visit to Brussels is entirely one of
gratitude for the sympathetic reception granted to me there at
the concert which you directed--an excellent performance of some
works of mine. Perhaps the "Elizabeth" may likewise be favored by
good luck...M. Lagye has made an excellent French translation of
it.

The one thing important for you, my dear Franz, is to complete
your Ion [The original tile of the Opera now called
"L'Apollonide", which Servais still keeps in his portfolio,
though it is finished.]. This will be your advent as composer,
for a complete and resounding success in which you have the best
wishes of

Yours ever devotedly,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 22nd, 1882.

Write to me at Brussels, where I shall be from May 1st to 4th,
and address your letter to Zarembski.



293. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Unless I receive a countermand from you, I shall be in Brussels
on Sunday evening. [The first performance of "St. Elizabeth in
French took place on the 3rd of May. Saint-Saens, Massenet,
Francis Plante, and others besides were present.] I shall take
the liberty of sending you a telegram on the road to give you the
hour of my arrival. It will interest me greatly to hear the
"Herodiade". [Liszt heard Massenet's opea on 2nd of May.] Bulow's
exceedingly witty article on Saint-Saens' "Samson", which Bulow
declares to be the best and most successful of all the Operas
that have been performed for the last fifteen years (excepting
Wagner's),--this article, which creates a sensation and makes a
noise at "Landerneau," will reach you at the same time as these
lines from your affectionate servant,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 23rd, 1882



294. To Otto Lessmann

I owe you so many thanks, dear, esteemed friend, that I could
never get to the end of them. If the canon form were less
unfamiliar to me, I would dedicate a symphonic Canone perpetuo of
thanksgiving to you.

Our friend Adelheid von Schorn tells me that you are likely to
spend your holidays at Weimar. A hearty welcome to you.

This year the Tonkunstler-Versammlung, at which I am accustomed
to appear as a superfluous necessity ("le superflu, chose si
necessaire," according to Voltaire), ever since the foundation of
these gatherings twenty years ago with Brendel--takes place at
Zurich from the 9th to the 12th July.

Let us go there together, dear friend, from Weimar. I read by
preference your excellent newspaper, and am making a lively
propaganda for it.

Yours gratefully and cordially,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 23rd, 1882



295. To Frau Charlotte Blume-Arends

Weimar, April 23rd, 1882.

Dear Madame,

Poetry is your domain. As a pretty French verse has it, "Meme
quand l'oiseau marche, on sent qu'il a des ailes" [Even when it
walks, we feel that a bird has wings].--My most cordial thanks
therefore for the gift which you call prosaic, and my best
regards to your husband. It would be charming if you came to
Weimar again. From the middle of June to the 12th of July remains
here uninterruptedly

Yours very truly,

F. Liszt



296. To Freiherr Hans Von Wolzogen

Much-esteemed Freiherr,

Your "Leitfaden" are a salutary enrichment to musical literature.
They essentially promote the spiritual comprehension of the
great, sublime, unique works of Wagner. The "Leitfaden" are
already considered classical, and rightly so, because, as a
masterly piece of work, they establish a school.

Pray accept my very best thanks for the numerous proofs of
kindness you have given me, to correspond in some degree to which
is the wish of

Yours sincerely,

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 25th, 1882

A cordial and friendly meeting at Parsifal!



297. To Frau Heriette Von Liszt in Vienna

Weimar, May 11th, 1882.

My Dear Cousin,

Our dear Hedwig [The daughter of E. von Liszt, who studied a
whole summer under Liszt in Weimar.] has not been forgotten.
Immediately on arriving here I ordered Overbeck's edifying
drawings for her, "The Seven Sacraments," a serious study of
which, as well as of the commentary, is to be highly recommended.
The work is published at Ratisbon; my bookseller here is wont to
do business in Tempo moderato molto commodo. He kept me waiting,
and I had to go to Belgium (on the 30th of April). I only
received the above-mentioned work here yesterday, and send it you
today together with the "Ave Maria" for Harmonium and Meyer's
excellent "Manual of Universal Knowledge." Eduard and Hedwig may
extend their knowledge by means of it.

My Belgian week--from May 1st to 8th, Brussels and Antwerp--was
of the pleasantest. Enclosed are the moderate articles (on the
performance of "St. Elizabeth") by the Brussels Schelle and
Hanslick [In the "Independance Belge"]--Eduard Fetis, the son of
the renowned and meritorious author of the many-volumed
"Biographic universelle des Musiciens" and of the "Universal
History of Music." Thirty years ago I said to that same Fetis
somewhat arrogantly, nay almost insolently: "My aspirations are
directed not merely towards obtaining articles, but rather
towards acquiring a durable position in the History of Art."

Till the beginning of July will remain in Weimar

Yours most cordially,

F. Liszt

P.S.--The arrival of the "Kaiser Virginia" has just been
announced to me. Please send me the little bill.



298. To Camille Saint-Saens

Very Dear Friend,

I am still quite struck with wonder at your "Predication aux
oiseaux de St. Francois." ["St. Francis preaching to the birds."
Composed by Liszt for pianoforte alone. (Roszavolgyi.)] You use
your organ as an orchestra in an incredible way, as only a great
composer and a great performer, like yourself, could do. The most
proficient organists in all countries have only to take off their
hats to you.

I am sending you by this post a parcel of things of mine for
organ. If you should find an opportunity at Brussels of producing
the Introduction to St. Elizabeth, it would, under your fingers,
have the effect I intended.

Cordial thanks for your visit to Brussels, and ever yours in
admiration and friendship.

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 14th, 1882



299. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Dear Kind Friend, ["Chere bienveillante"]

The telegram Tardieu-Lynen-Lessmann sent from Aix-la-Chapelle has
given me extreme pleasure. [The Tardieus, the Lynens (Antwerp
friends of Liszt), and Otto Lessmann were present at the Musical
Festival at Aix-la-Chapelle.]

My padrone di casa (Lessmann is this through his paper) are
always most excellent.

Daniela de Bulow, my darling granddaughter, writes how kind you
are, and will come with us shortly to Villa "Fantaisie"
(Bayreuth). [She had accompanied her father, Dr. Hans V. Bulow,
who played (under Wullner's conductorship) Brahms' first
Pianforte Concerto, and Beethoven's 15 Variations (on a theme out
of Eroica).]

At "Parsifal" we shall be 30,000; that will be the best chance of
seeing one another again.

The Opera of Hamlet, by Stadtfeld, [The first performance of the
Opera. The composer, a Wiesbaden man (born 1826), had studied at
the Brussels Conservatoire, and died there in 1853.] written in
transition years (50), and twice given here, not without success,
is one of the best that I know of the Meyerbeer-Donizetti genre.
The Wagner invasion is strangely modifying theatrical
requirements at the present time. It is no longer possible to
write a "Hamlet" according to the style of a Duprez, some
absolute tenor with the famous "ut de boitrine," nor to make the
ghost of Hamlet's father benevolently intervene in order to
effect a Trio or Quartet, even of a pretty musical manufacture.
The distinguished work of Stadtfeld belongs, then, to the
theatrical Past, so rich in oblivion...

As you are so kind as to undertake my books, I will ask you to
send me soon the following works:--

1st, Gevaert--History of Music in ancient times 2 volumes.
(Publisher, Annoot Braekmann, at Ghent.)

2nd, Charles Clement--Michael Angelo, Leonardo da Vinci,
Raphael,--a magnificent volume illustrated by 167 drawings.
Price, bound, 15 francs. (Publisher, Hetzel, Paris.)

3rd, J. D. Lewis--"Bons Mots of the Greeks and Romans": 1 volume
in 16--Charavay library. A thousand pardons for thus using and
abusing your amiable kindness.

I have read with pleasure the article in the "Guide Musical" on
the Festival at Aix-la-Chapelle, and beg you to repeat to the
author [Presumably Monsieur Tarideu.] my sincere friendship.

Till our happy meeting at Bayreuth, at the end of July, farewell.

In affectionate gratitude,

F. Liszt

I add the article from the official paper of Weimar on
Stadtfeld's "Hamlet."

Weimar, June 10th, 1882.



300. To the Honorable Committee of the Allgemeine Deutsche
Musikverein

[Printed in Neue Zeitschrift fur Musik, 1882, No. 23.]

Dear Sirs,

The Allgemeine Deutsche Musikverein confers a high distinction on
me by electing me as its Honorary President.

Since the starting of this Verein, 20 years ago, I have the honor
of feeling that I have been of service to it. Its aim is a worthy
one,--the advancement of music and musicians in an unprejudiced
manner, and in accordance with the spirit of the time. Its ways
have always been known as pure and worthy of recognition,
regardless of opposition and silence.

Let us therefore go boldly forwards on our noble road!

Accept, dear Sirs, my heartiest thanks, together with the
assurance that, ever conscious of my task, I remain, with high
esteem,

Yours most faithfully,

F. Liszt

Rome, [June, 1882]



301. To the Commendatore F.von Jagemann at Freiburg in Breisgau

[From a copy of Liszt's in the possession of Otto Lessmann at
Chalottenburg.]

Dear Sir and Commendatore

You ask me if L. Ramann's biography is "classical"? To belong to
the classical means, first of all, to be dead, then to be to the
world immortal. Neither of these is claimed at present by yours,

F. Liszt

Freiburg, July 6th, 1882



302. To Nicolaus Oesterlein in Vienna

[The Addressee was the able founder and possessor of the Richard
Wagner Museum in Vienna, a unique collection, in its way, of
musical and historical importance. The bibliography mentioned in
the letter came out I (at Breitkopf and Hartel's) shortly before
the first performance of "Parsifal."]

My Dear Sir,

I have already heard the praise of your "Catalogue of a Richard
Wagner Library." It will be a pleasure to me to make its
acquaintance, and while awaiting your kind sending of the work
accept thanks for your accompanying lines,

From yours very truly,

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, July 16th, 1882



303. To Kornel von Abranyi

Bayreuth, July 23rd, 1882

Dear honored Friend,

By the same post you will receive the instrumentation of the "A
magyarok istene" for the Musical Festival at Debreczin..--. I beg
the directors carefully to try over the small instrumentation
before the full rehearsal, with the instruments (plus the
brilliant cymbals), without the vocal parts.

The solo trumpeter must perform his part, as a Hungarian Magnate,
in a noble manner, and not blow the trumpet as though it were a
trade.

I also beg that the directors will be so good as to correct any
chance mistakes there may be in my hastily written and unrevised
manuscript score. Though I trouble myself but little about the
spread of my compositions, yet I do not wish them to be offered
to the public in a mutilated form. As I flatter myself that I
possess a sufficient portion of self-criticism, other criticism
remains only valuable and instructive to me.

Your son Kornel is heartily welcome to me at Bayreuth.

I will discuss here with Vegh [Formerly Vice-president of the
Hungarian Academy of Music.] the ministerial affairs of your
"academic, historical manual." The matter will assuredly be
settled to your satisfaction.

Yours most faithfully,

F. Liszt

Wagner's "Parsifal" far surpasses the master-works which the
theater boasts up to the present time. May the public be educated
up to it.



304. To Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen

My dear Freiherr,

Both at and after yesterday's performance of Wagner's "Parsifal"
it was the universal feeling that about this wonder-work it is
impossible to speak.

It has indeed struck dumb those who were so deeply impressed by
it; its sacred pendulum swings from the sublime to the sublimest.

Yours ever,

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, July 27th, 1882



305. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Weimar, September 12th, 1882

Dear Madame and Friend,

How I reproach myself for the delay in my written thanks! Those
preceding my letter have not been wanting, and your friendly
kindness touches me deeply. Lassen assures me of your indulgence.
He has lately heard at Brussels "l'hymne a la beaute," [By
Benoit. Performed at the Brussels Musical Festival in August
1882] and (between ourselves) did not think it particularly
beautiful. In this kind of music even the greatest masters have
seldom succeeded in freeing themselves from lukewarm
conventionality. This [conventionality] affords matter for
academical prizes such as have been carried off several times by
Madame Louise Collet of inglorious memory.

Our friend Benoit shall follow his vocation of musical "Rubens".
And Gounod's "Redemption"! Ought one to speak of success or non-
success in a work of that kind? Gounod has always kept the
Catholic religious incentive with a turn towards the sublime. His
"Polyeucte" is a witness for him.

May that abominable quibbler and bloodthirsty "doctrinaire,"
Henry VIII., be the means of a brilliant and lasting success to
St. Saens, who richly deserves it; but in the matter of serious
opera the public has reached that blase point which is explained
in the words of Ronge, a naive German reformer:--

"What we have we don't want any more; and what we would have we
don't quite know." Wagner has known how to want and to act--
gloriously, although and because. [Wagner a su vouloir et
perpetrer--glorieusement, quoique et parce que.] His work is
already becoming immortal.

Let us speak of some modest things, concerning your humble
servant. The three Psalms have been admirably translated into
French by Mr. Lagye; I will write my thanks to him fully, as soon
as I have entirely finished the work of adapting the text to the
music. For this it is necessary to modify and rewrite about
fifteen pages, a dozen of which are ready. I shall send the whole
to Kahnt, the publisher, on Sunday next, and shall inform Lagye,
in whose debt I am, of the remainder of the arrangements.

His translations appear to me really excellent, very carefully
made, and prosodically well suited to the music. I only regret to
have to give him so much trouble, but I hope that in the end he
will be satisfied with me. He shall have the second copy of my
"Lieder;" if he succeeds as well in putting them into French as
he has done with the three Psalms, they may with advantage make
their way in Belgium and still farther.

All my articles of musical criticism, lately published by L.
Ramann under the title of "Essays" (Breitkopf and Hartel,
Leipzig), were written in French. Three or four appeared long ago
in the Debats and the Constitutionnel. The most extensive of
these, on Berlioz's "Harold Symphony," was to have been put into
a celebrated review in Paris, but in the fifties it was
considered too eulogistic, and I refused any curtailments for
Berlioz...Consequently this article has only appeared in a German
translation (Neue Zeitschrift fur Musik, Leipzig). What has
become of the original French manuscripts of my complete articles
I don't in the least know. The introduction to Hartel's for which
Mr. Kufferath [Moritz Kufferath, a writer on music, reviewer of
the "Guide musical" (Schott), and translator of many of Wagner's
writings, wanted to translate Liszt's Essays into French.] asks
will not serve his end at all. The only person who could give him
some particulars would be Mademoiselle L. Ramann, my biographer,
who has been for many years past on the look-out for everything
relative to my prose and music. She is the directress of a
Pianoforte School in the Durerplatz at Nuremberg (Bavaria).

Please thank Kufferath for his kind interest, and assure him
that, if I abstain from writing to the firm of Hartel, it is from
no want of willingness on my part. A thousand friendly regards to
your husband, and ever cordial and devoted expressions to
yourself.

F. Liszt

I stay here till the beginning of October.



306. To Otto Lessmann

My Very Dear Friend,

It is only through your kindness that I learn of Hellmesberger's
intention to perform shortly in Vienna a new Mass of my
composition. Hellmesberger has indeed always been very well
disposed towards me, and has frequently conducted the Hungarian
Coronation-Mass in the Hofkapelle, and several of my longer works
at concerts; but it would be rather difficult for him to conduct
a new Mass, because I have not composed one. I should think it
must be the "Missa choralis" (with Organ accompaniment only)...

Here is the list of my Masses, and the order in which they were
composed:--

1. For men's voices (with Organ), Anno 48--Editio nova at
Hartel's.

2. The Gran Mass.

3. Missa choralis (with Organ) at Kahnt's.

4. Hungarian Coronation-Mass (performed at the coronation in
Buda).

5. Requiem for men's voices (with Organ). Rome, latter half of
the sixties. Published by Kahnt.

Perhaps I shall yet write a Requiem at special command. [A
requiem,  composed on the death of the Emperor Maximilian of
Mexico, still exists in manuscript.] I beg you to give my thanks
to the friendly publisher of the Symphonic Poem "From the cradle
to the grave," for sending me the pianoforte version of this
composition. Before the end of October I will send Bock the
completed score.

A short piece from Parsifal, "Solemn March to the Holy Grail,"
will reach Schott today at Mainz.

Three weeks longer remains here Yours ever faithfully,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 16th, 1882,

Ever heartily welcome in Weimar; that is to say, if the visit
suits you as Allegro commodo. It would be dreadful to me to
incommode my friends.



307. To Otto Lessmann

Dear Friend,

If one wants to be just, he must see that he speaks only with
high respect of Hans von Bulow. His knowledge, ability,
experience are astounding, and border on the fabulous. Especially
has he, by long years of study, so thoroughly steeped himself in
the understanding of Beethoven, that it seems scarcely possible
for any one else to approach near him in that respect. One must
read his commentary on the pianoforte works of Beethoven (Cotta's
edition), and hear his interpretations of them--(what other
virtuoso could have ventured to play the 5 last Sonatas of
Beethoven before the public in one evening?), and follow Bulow's
conducting in the orchestral works of Beethoven. To set one's
back up against such remarkable deeds as these, I call feeble or
malicious nonsense.

Yours ever in friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 20th, 1882.



308. To Frau Charlotte Blume-Arends

Weimar, September 27th, 1882.

My dear friend,

I thank you again for a beautiful, kind gift--"The Oberammergau
Passion Play," described by Franz Schoberl, a clergyman in
Laibstadt. The little book has been composed with reverence, and
gives an exact description of the Oberammergau production, which
seems to me especially deserving of notice on account of the
agreement between the Old Testament representations--beginning
from Adam and Eve to the Brazen Serpent and further--and their
fulfilment in the facts of the gospel. This agreement is no
simple peasant's invention, but indeed a significant, most
touching parallel, thought out by cultured priests, familiar with
the Christian tradition. The grouping, and the mute performance
of the life-like Old Testament representations and of the
Crucifixion of Christ in Oberammergau, deserve full praise, in
contrast to the music, which is beneath criticism, and very much
spoiled the whole performance for me. And even such esteemed and
highly honored Catholic musicians and divines as F. Witt, Haberl,
etc., protest against such inane musical stuff and rubbish.

Thank you once more, and with heartfelt greetings to you and
yours,

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt



309. To Otto Lessmann

Dear Friend,

At the Musical Festival which I had the honor of conducting some
twenty-five years ago at Aix-la-Chapelle, Hiller, the friend of
my young days in Paris, took up quite a critical attitude against
the conductor and his compositions.

I took no particular notice of his behavior, but I heard that it
displeased many people, who made no secret of it to him. I was
also told that at one of the rehearsals Hiller did not exactly
leave of his own accord. As I was engaged at the conductor's desk
I did not observe the occasion of his leaving, and contented
myself with reading, some days later, his witty report of the
Aix-la-Chapelle Musical Festival in the Cologne paper. My
excellent friend, Freiherr Hans von Bronsart, replied to Hiller's
article with no less wit and with a different opinion. Unhappily
the musical chronicle is overflowing with unresolved discords.

To you, dear friend, I am ever harmoniously,

F. Liszt

Weimar, October 14th, 1882



310. To Otto Lessmann

[Weimar,] November 4th, 1882

Dear Friend,

I shall be delighted if the Tannhauser-Songs [Composed by
Lessmann, transcribed by Liszt for piano, and published by Barth,
Berlin (now Junne, Leipzig)] give you satisfaction. Find a
pianist of the fair sex, or the other sex, in Berlin, who will
set about his task well of playing these songs in public. As far
as I can tell I should think they would bring the player
applause.

I will answer your two questions at once.

Of my "continuously written autobiography" I have as yet heard
nothing. Publishers have frequently asked me to write memoirs,
but I put it off with the excuse that it was more than enough for
me to live through my life, without transcribing it to paper. If
I were married I could certainly dictate somewhat of it to my
wife now and then. But I am glad to keep out of the bothers of
penmanship, which I dislike.

The dramatic performance of the Elizabeth in Cologne is to take
place after my return from Budapest, next April or May. (I have
promised to be present at it.) Yesterday evening I wrote a couple
of lines of thanks and commendation to Herr Duysen, for Fraulein
Spiring, whom you met here [Lives now in Jena]. She is a pianist
and teacher deserving of recommendation, and is trying to
establish herself in Berlin, and I commend her to your good
graces.

With thanks, yours ever,

F. Liszt

Rubinstein is coming to see me next Tuesday after the Leipzig
performance of the "Maccabees."



311. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Weimar, November 6th, 1882

Dear Friendly One [Chere bienveillante],

I am still detained here, partly on account of a stupid
indisposition,--nothing serious, but disagreeably prolonged. I
make a rule of never bothering my head about my health, and I beg
my friends never to trouble about it.

Thank you for sending the 3rd volume of the correspondence of
George Sand. The long letter of 20 pages to Mazzini, dated the
23rd May, '52, appears to me to be a chef d'oeuvre of judgment
and foresight. In 1852 few political men were placed in a
sufficiently elevated position to rule the fluctuations of
socialism and to understand its necessary value. Mazzini himself
was mistaken in this, as well as in regard to the importance of
the acquisition of universal suffrage. Forgive me for wandering
off thus into political matters, of which I don't understand
anything, and of which it does not concern me to talk. But I will
just quote to you a mot which in 1842 was rather widely spread on
the sly in Petersburg. A fair lady of my acquaintance told me
that the Emperor Nicholas had said to her of me, "As to his hair
and his political opinions, they displease me." I begged the same
lady to transmit my reply, which was as follows: His Majesty has
every right in the world to judge me as seemeth well to him,
nevertheless I venture to beg him not to think that I am an
idiot. Now it would be idiocy on my part to proclaim political
opinions. The Emperor shall know them when he deigns to put
300,000 soldiers at my disposal.--

To return to the letters of George Sand. Those addressed in '52
to Prince Jerome Bonaparte and to Louis Napoleon about the
pardoning of several democrats are in exquisite taste; the genius
of a great heart appears in them. Allow me to beg for the little
account of the books that you have been so kind as to send me,
dear Madame Tardieu, and please add to it the price of the
subscription to the Bien public. I suppose you only took it for
one quarter, and I will not go on with it, not having time to
read half the papers which my profession and my tastes would lead
me to peruse. Besides this my eyes, without having exactly
anything the matter with them, do not any longer adapt themselves
either to reading or writing without reprieve; and by evening I
often feel extremely tired...

Has the Independance Belge spoken of a most interesting and
superb volume,

"The Correspondence and Musical Works of Constantin Huygens"
(17th century), published by Jonckbloet and Land, professors at
the University of Leyden, magnificently edited by Brill at
Leyden?

The work is worthy of notice.

To the kind remarks which the Indpendance has inserted on the
concert of the 23rd October with the Liszt programme, [A Liszt-
concert in the Weimar theater in celebration of his birthday.] I
add the observation that the real title of my "Transcription" of
the "Rakoczy March" should be--"Paraphrase symphonique." It has
more than double the number of pages of Berlioz's well-known one,
and was written before his. From delicacy of feeling for my
illustrious friend I delayed the publication of it until after
his death; for he had dedicated to me his orchestral version of
the Rakoczy, for which, however, one of my previous
transcriptions served him, chiefly for the harmonisation, which
differs, as is well known, from the rudimentary chords usually
employed in the performances of the Tsiganes and other little
orchestras on the same lines. Without any vanity I simply
intimate the fact, which any musician can verify for himself.

At last I have just written to my most honored and more than
obliging collaborator, Mr. Lagye. His excellent French
translation of my four Psalms is being engraved. As soon as it is
out you shall have it.

In about ten days I shall join the Wagners, and shall spend more
than a month with them at the Palazzo Vendramin, Venice.

Cordial regards to your husband, from your

Very grateful and affectionate

F. Liszt

The director of the subscription concerts at Weimar is going to
give Benoit's "La Guerre," and at the next Musical Festival
Benoit's "Sanctus" and "Benedictus" will be heard. [Both these
intentions of Liszt came to nothing, owing to external causes.]



312. To the Editor of the "Allgemeine Musikzeitung," Otto
Lessmann, at Charlottenburg

Dear Mr. Editor,

As I am very much hindered in my work by overmuch sending of
scores, other compositions, and suchlike writings, I beg you to
make it known that I wish in future not to have my attention
claimed in this manner. I have modestly refrained for many years
past from contributing to collections of autographs.

Yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weimar, November, 1882



313. To Adelheid Von Schorn

Monday, November 20th, 1882

Venezia la bella: Palazzo Vendramin.

Dear Friend,

I don't intend you to hear first through others of my safe
arrival here. Thank Heaven! the Wagners and all the family are in
perfect health.

Your brother will write you word from Nuremberg that the method
of whist, so to say invented and certainly perfected by you, is
being spread on to the Durerplatz also under your name at L.
Ramann's. To get rid of all the aces first of all is really
glorious.

With the exception of one incident, which stricter people than
myself would call a regular fleecing on the part of the Custom
House at Milan, whereby I parted with about 70 francs as a fine
for having brought 50 cigars (!), all my journey passed off very
well. At Zurich I met with the same kind reception on the part of
several members of the Committee--with the President of the town,
Mr. Roemer, at their head--as at the Musical Festival last July.
The proprietor of the Bellevue Hotel, Mr. Pohl (no relation to
his namesake at Baden), insisted on my accepting gratis a
charming room, with dinners, suppers and excellent wines. Such
munificence would have given a fit of fever to the late Hemleb of
the Erbprinz, and his associates will scarcely imitate Mr. Pohl's
amiable proceeding. So I will beg you to recommend the very
comfortable Hotel Bellevue, in the front ranks, to any of your
friends and acquaintances who may pass through Zurich. Without
promising that they will be received gratis, I can assure them
that they will find the beautiful view on to the lake, good
rooms, an excellent cuisine, and attentive service. The Duke of
Altenburg and other princes have stayed in it, and inscribed
their names in the hotel album.

Your friend Ada Pinelli is still here with the Princess Hatzfeld,
at Palazzo Malipieri. I shall go and see her tomorrow. I shall,
however, practise great sobriety in the matter of visits. Wagner
does not pay any, and I shall imitate him on this point to the
best of my ability. My illustrious friend has lodged me
splendidly in a spacious apartment of the Palazzo Vendramin,
which formerly belonged to Madame la Duchesse de Berry. Her son,
the Duke della Grazia, is at present the owner of it, and Wagner
is the tenant for one year. The beautiful furniture still bears
the impress of the old princely regime, and is perfectly
preserved. The main inhabited part of the Palazzo Vendramin is in
the best possible condition, so that Wagner did not have to go to
any special expense, not even for stoves and other requisites,
which are often neglected.

Ever since my first stay in 1837 I have been enamoured of Venice:
this feeling will not grow less this time, but quite the
contrary.

Cordial and very devoted friendship.

F. Liszt

Try to learn something about Bulow, and send me word. It was
heart-breaking to me not to see him again at Meiningen.



314. To Freiherr Hans Von Wolzogen

My Dear Freiherr,

.--. Wagner is perfectly within the truth when he says that
without the extraordinary munificence of H.M. the King of Bavaria
the performances of "Parsifal" at Bayreuth would have been
endangered, and only the sympathy of the public, outside the
Wagner Societies, made the continuance of them possible. But does
it follow from this that the Wagner Societies are useless, and
that this is the opportunity for disbanding them? To my thinking,
No, for they keep up a wholesome agitation, and support the
"Bayreuther Blatter," which essentially promote the good cause.
There does not seem to me to be any advantage in changing the
name Society [Verein] into Fellowship [Genossenschaft]. Wagner's
great name and most important personality are what are most
needed here. Moreover the parliamentariness of the Societies will
not be averse to the absolute authority of the creator of so many
immortal works. In merely minor matters variety of opinions may
be made apparent; in all essentials we are really and truly one.
On this account I desire the continuance, consistency, and
increasing welfare of the Societies.--

It goes without saying that Wagner must reign and govern as
legitimate monarch, until the complete outward realization of his
Bayreuth conception--namely, the model performance of his entire
works, under his own aegis and directions at Bayreuth. It behoves
all who sympathise in the historico-civilised culture of Art in
the coming years of the closing 19th century to endeavor to
promote this aim.

When we have attained the end in question let us sing with
Schiller and Beethoven,

"Freude, schoner Gotterfunken!" ["Joy, thou spark from heaven
descending!"]

Accept, dear Freiherr, the assurance of my true and high esteem.

F. Liszt

Venezia, November 24th, 1882

Pray remember me most kindly to your family.



3l5. To Franz Servais

Dear Franz,

Your welcome lines reached me at Weimar and I thank you cordially
for them...

I tell you again, dear Franz, that you were "born with a silver
spoon in your mouth;" after the hearing of your Opera with the
piano the success of a performance will follow.--Don't get
impatient at a little delay; the most illustrious composers,
including Meyerbeer, could not say, like Louis XIV., "J'ai failli
attendre." ["I nearly had to wait."]...But I hope that the saying
"Tout vient a point, a qui sait attendre" ["All comes to him who
can wait."] will be realised in your case without much delay.
Good courage then and Mistress Patience.

Will you remember me very affectionately to Godebski; his
graceful bust, so perfect in its likeness to the never-to-be-
forgotten Madame Moukhanoff, is ever the precious ornament of my
little salon at the "Hofgartnerei" in Weimar.

The large bust of Rossini which Godebski presented to the Grand
Duke ornaments the lobby of the theater, where it blooms like a
god from Olympus. Tell me what works Godebski has been doing
lately.

When next you see Madame Judith Gautier, please express to her
anew the admiring homage of your very faithful

F. Liszt

Venezia, November 26th, 1882

P.S.--Our friends * * * might, I think, do you good service with
M. Vaucorbeil, and could tell him also, as a "by the way," that I
take a lively interest in your work. Would you perhaps think it
advisable to let some fragment of it be given at a public
concert? I am remaining here till New Year's Day with the
Wagners, at the superb Palazzo Vendramin; then I shall return
direct to Budapest.



316. To Adelheid von Schorn

Venezia, December 8th, 1882

Dear Friend,

Your sad news about Bulow's bad state of health are much the same
as his wife gave to Daniela. Let us hope for more reassuring
news!

Here, in Palazzo Vendramin, a peaceful and most united family
life goes on without monotony. But I cannot speak of the things
which touch me most, except clumsily. So it is better to keep
from doing so. The Princess writes to me from Rome that she shall
be delighted to obtain possession of the two water-colors of
Gleichen for the splendid portfolios of drawings belonging to her
daughter, of which the mother, since the years at Weimar, has
regally provided the greater part. These portfolios are among the
finest collections in Europe.

Joukowski [Widely known by his "Parsafal" sketches and the
portraits of Liszt and of Wagner's family], who has been delayed
by a funeral and by the floods, will arrive here today. Neither
funerals nor floods have been able to prevent Lassen from scoring
our Symphonic Intermezzo "Uber allen Zauber Liebe" ["Above all
magic Love"]. I hope Lassen will conduct it at the Court concert
on New Year's Day, and I beg you to go and hear it and let me
know about it. .--.

I beg Gille to send me the volume "Die deutsche Buhne von einem
Weimaraner" ["The German stage, by a Weimarer"]. Do you know who
it is? According to the index he seems to ignore the doings of
the Weimar theater during the last thirty years, which is not
very honorable to a Weimarer, and looks very like a cowardly
action of a low standard.

Your cordially devoted

F. Liszt

Saturday Morning, December 9th

Joukowski arrived last night, and we began at once to sound your
praises.

Daniela has written to you. I will send you the programme of the
performance of Goethe's "Geschwister" ["Brothers and Sisters"],
which will take place tomorrow at Princess Hatzfeld's. Those old
books of operas, such as "Les Indes galantes" ["The gallant
Indies"], and other antiquities, re-edited in Paris, may
peaceably repose at the "Hofgartnerei;" unless you prefer to lend
them to some one who likes works of that kind, which are sought
by some.



317. To Professor Carl Riedel

Dear Friend,

Draseke's "Requiem" is such a first-rate work, and is so likely
to obtain a good reception from the public, that I again
recommend the performance of it at the next Tonkunstler-
Versammlung. Draseke will presumably also agree to it in the end.

Gustav Weber's Trio, Op. 5, published by Siegel, and dedicated to
me, I consider an eminent work, worthy of recommendation and
performance. I am sure you think the same.

I should like to add to the vocal programme of the Tonkunstler-
Versammlung two songs by your name-sake Riedel, now
Hofkapellmeister in Brunswick. [Hermann Riedel, born 1847, made a
special success with songs from Scheffel's "Trompeter von
Sakkingen."] If they should be ascribed to you they will please
you all the better for that. And a propos, why do you let your
valuable, excellent works be so seldom heard in public? I shall
reproach you further with this injustice to yourself when we come
to talk over the programme, and I hope that you won't continue to
overdo your reserve as a composer. Without pushing one's-self
forward one must still maintain one's position, to which you,
dear friend, are fully entitled. Will you be so kind as to tell
Hartel to send me here quickly 25 sheets of to line, and 25
sheets of 12 line music paper (oblong shape, not square) for
cash, together with a few of the small books of samples,
containing all kinds of music paper, which I have recommended
several musical friends of mine here and elsewhere to buy. One
can rub out easily on this paper, which is one of the most
important things--that is to say, unless one tears up the whole
manuscript, which would often be advisable.

A happy Christmas, and a brave New Year '83.

Ever your faithfully attached

F. Liszt

Venezia, Palazzo Vendramin, December 9th, 1882



318. To Arthur Meyer in Paris, Presidet of the "Presse
Parisienne"

[Copied in the Gazette de Hongrie at Budapest, February 1st,
1883]

Monsieur le Directeur,

My telegram of this morning expressed to you my excuses and deep
regret at being unable to be of use in the programme of your
Festival. [Liszt had been asked to take part in a Festival which
was given at the Grand Opera for the benefit of the sufferers
from the inundations in Alsace-Lorraine. "The Dame of Liszt in
France," they wrote, "is synonymous with triumph, and we know
that it is also synonymous with kindness."]

It would certainly be an honor to me to take part in it, and I am
by no means oblivious of the gratitude I owe to Paris, where my
youthful years were passed. Moreover it would be, it seems to me,
a becoming thing that, after the generous and striking sympathy
shown by Paris--also by a festival at the Grand Opera--to my
compatriots on the occasion of the inundation of Szeged, an
artist from Hungary, who has been favored by so much French
kindness, should make his public acknowledgments at your
approaching grand performance.

Unfortunately my age of 72 years invalidates me as a pianist. I
could no longer risk in public my ten fingers--which have been
out of practice for years--without incurring just censure. There
is no doubt on this point; and I am perfectly resolved to abstain
from any exhibition of my old age at the piano in any country.

Please accept, Monsieur le Directeur, my thanks and best
compliments.

F. Liszt

Budapest, January 28th, 1883



319. To the Composer Albert Fuchs

Your "Hungarian Suite" [For Orchestra, dedicated to Liszt] is an
excellent and effective work. While springing from the musical
ground of Hungary, it nevertheless remains your own property, as
there are no imitations or used-up ornamentations in it, but
rather much new employment of harmonies, and always a national
coloring. For the dedication you are heartily thanked by

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 4th, 1883



320. To Saissy, Editor of the "Gazette de Hongrie in Budapest

[From a rough copy in the possession of Herr O. A. Schulz,
bookseller in Leipzig.]

I come to ask your advice, dear Monsieur Saissy; please give it
me quite frankly, without any reserve, and tell me whether you
think it is an opportune moment for my letter (which I enclose),
relative to my pretended animadversion against the Israelites, to
be published or not. If you think it is, I beg you to insert it
in the next number of the Gazette de Hongrie; otherwise it shall
remain unprinted, as I shall not send it to any other paper.

As the proverb says, "Silence is gold"; but perhaps, under the
given circumstances, in view of the serious question of the
Israelites in Hungary, it would be better to speak in the current
silver money in the papers.

Let us rectify errors, and remain modest but not timid. In
faithful devotion,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 6th, 1883



321. To The Editor of the "Gazette de Hongrie"

[Published in the Gazette de Hongrie of February 8th, 1883,
Budapest. A translation of it also appeared in German papers;
amongst others, in Lessmann's Allgemeine Musikzeituug, at the
wish of the Master, who was annoyed with the aspersion against
himself of having promoted the Antisemitic movement.]

Mr. Editor,

It is not without regret that I address these lines to you; but,
as there has been some report spread here about my pretended
hostility to the Israelites, I ought to rectify the mistake of
this false report.

As is well known in the musical world, many illustrious
Israelites, Meyerbeer first and foremost, have given me their
esteem and friendship, and the same in the literary world with
Heine and others.

It seems to me that it would be superfluous to enumerate the many
proofs I have given, during fifty years, of my active loyalty
towards Israelites of talent and capacity, and I abstain in like
manner from speaking of my voluntary contributions to the
charitable institutions of Judaism in various countries.

The motto of my patron saint, St. Francois de Paule, is
"Caritas!" I will remain faithful to this throughout my life!

If, by some mutilated quotations from my book on the Gipsies in
Hungary, it has been sought to pick a quarrel with me, and to
make what is called in French une querelle d'Allemand, I can in
all good conscience affirm that I feel myself to be guiltless of
any other misdeed than that of having feebly reproduced the
argument of the kingdom of Jerusalem, set forth by Disraeli (Lord
Beaconsfield), George Eliot (Mrs. Lewes), and Cremieux, three
Israelites of high degree.

Accept, Sir, etc.,

F. Liszt

February 6th, 1883



322. To Rich and Mason in Toronto

[From a rough copy in the possession of Herr O. A. Schulz,
bookseller in Leipzig]

[1883]

Dear Sirs,

The Rich and Mason Grand Piano which you have so kindly sent me
here is a pattern one. And as such will artists, judges, and the
public recognise it.

Together with my hearty thanks I wanted at the same time to send
you the Liszt portrait for which you wished. It was painted by
Baron Joukowski, son of the highly honored tutor and friend of
Alexander II., a man who will also be ever famous in Russian
literature. Now, however, this Liszt portrait has been such a
success that they wanted to have a second one like it for the
Joukowski Museum. The painter kindly consented to the request,
which has necessitated a delay of 2 to 3 months in my sending off
the first portrait to Toronto.

Joukowski had also prepared the sketches for the "Parsifal"
scenery in Bayreuth, which were followed by a successful
performance.

Excuse, dear Sirs, the delay in my acknowledgments, and accept
the assurance of my high esteem.

F. Liszt



323. To Madame Marie Jaell in Vienna

[Autograph in possession of Herr Commerzienrath Bosendorfer in
Vienna.--The addressee was the widow of Alfred Jaell, and was a
pianiste and composer in Paris.]

Chere Admirable [Dear Admirable One],

I give you at once a most cordial welcome to Budapest. Have you
already made your arrangements for concerts here? Can my very
excellent friend Bosendorfer be of use to you as an agent? To my
regret I am not in a position to help you in that, on account of
my being so very decidedly out of touch with the principal
concert arrangers of the neighborhood, who impertinently make a
pitiable trade for the benefit of Art...the art of their own
pocket and predominance.

To our right speedy meeting! Will you let me make acquaintance
with your new compositions, and accept the homage of my admiring
sympathy and affection?

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 12th, 1883

Have you had anything to do with a serious and really
distinguished composer,--Rendano? He is giving his concert in
Vienna one of these next days.



324. To Adelheid Von Schorn

If you were here, dear friend, you would perhaps find means to
put into some sort of order the hundreds of letters that rain
upon me from everywhere. These bothers and burdens of the
amiability with which I am credited are becoming insupportable,
and I really long, some fine day, to cry from the housetops that
I beg the public to consider me as one of the most disagreeable,
whimsical and disobliging of men.

To our cordial meeting at Weimar in the early days of April.

Ever your very affectionate and grateful

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 14th, 1883



325. To Otto Lessmann

Your sad news [After Wagner's death on the 13th February] pierces
my heart. Worthily have you said of the great, undying hero of
Art, "May the memory of him lead us on the right road to truth!"

I abstained from going at once to Venice and Bayreuth, but no
sensible man will on that account doubt my feelings. Until
Passion Week I remain here; then according to what my daughter
arranges I shall either go to Bayreuth or elsewhere, wherever my
dearly beloved daughter may be.

Hearty thanks, dear friend, for your satisfactory, truthful
adjustment of my position, which is neither a doubtful nor a
cowardly one, in the Jewish question.

The watchword and solution of that question is a matter for the
perseverance of the Israelites and for the all-ruling Divine
Providence.

Yours faithfully and gratefully,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 18th, 1883

I shall send that number of your weekly paper (16th February) to
Cardinal Haynald, my gracious patron of many years' standing--who
was also the President of the Liszt-Jubilee Festival in Budapest.



326. To Lina Ramann

My very dear Friend,

Ever since the days of my youth I have considered dying much
simpler than living. Even if often there is fearful and
protracted suffering before death, yet is death nonetheless the
deliverance from our involuntary yoke of existence.

Religion assuages this yoke, yet our heart bleeds under it
continually!--

"Sursum corda!"

In my "Requiem" (for men's voices) I endeavored to give
expression to the mild, redeeming character of death. It is shown
in the "Dies irae," in which the domination of fear could not be
avoided; in the three-part strophe

"Qui Mariam absolvisti,
Et latronem exaudisti,
Mihi autem spem dedisti"

lies the fervent, tender accent, which is not easily attained by
ordinary singers...The execution is also made more difficult by
the 2 semitones, ascending in the 1st Tenor, and descending in
the 2nd Tenor and 1st Bass. Progressions of this kind are indeed
not new, but singers so seldom possess the requisite crystal-
clear intonation without which the unhappy composer comes to
grief.

Our 3rd Elegie, "The funeral gondola" ("la gondola funebre"),
written unawares last December in Venice, is to be brought out
this summer by Kahnt, who has already published my 2 earlier
Elegies.

Heartfelt greetings to your respected collaborators, and ever
yours gratefully,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 22nd, 1883



327. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Dear Benevolent One,

To great grief silence is best suited. I will be silent on
Wagner, the prototype of an initiatory genius.

Thank you cordially for your telegram of yesterday. [On the
success of Saint-Saens' Opera "Henry VIII." at the opera in
Paris] No one rejoices more than I in the success of Saint-Saens.
There is no doubt that he deserves it; but fortune, grand
sovereign of doubtful manners, is often in no hurry to array
herself on the side of merit.

One has to keep on tenaciously pulling her by the ear (as Saint-
Saens has done) to make her listen to reason.

Be so good as to send me the number of the Independance with the
article on "Henry VIII." I will ask M. Saissy, the director of
the Gazette (French) de Hongrie, professor of French literature
at the University of Budapest, to reproduce this article in his
Gazette. Saissy is one of my friends; consequently he will
publish what is favorable to "Henry VIII."

Saint-Saens has sent me the score of his beautiful work "La Lyre
et la Harpe." Alas! everything that is not of the theater and
does not belong to the repertoire of the old classical masters
Handel, Bach, Palestrina, etc., does not yet gain any attentive
and paying consideration--the decisive criterion--of the public.
Berlioz, during his lifetime, furnished the proof of this.

Please give my love to your husband, and accept my devoted and
grateful affection.

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 6th, 1883

With regard to Lagye, I am contrite. Various things which I had
to send off with care have prevented me from going on with the
revision of the French edition of my Lieder. It shall be done
next month.



328. To Ferdinand Taborszky, Music Publisher in Budapest

Dear Taborszky,

As it is uncertain whether I shall still be alive next year, I
have just written an Hungarian "Konigslied" [Royal Song]
according to an old mode, for the opening of the New Hungarian
Theater in Radialstrasse.

Herewith is the manuscript for pianoforte, two hands, and the
score with text by Kornel Abranyi [German translation by
Ladislaus Neugebauer] will follow in Easter week.

The publishing of my "Konigslied" ought not to take place till
the first performance in the new theater in '84,

Until then we will keep quiet about it.--

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Budapest, March 11th, 1883



329. To Baroness M. E. Schwartz

[Autograph in the Liszt Museum at Weimar]

Budapest, March 22nd, 1883

Dear and most excellent One,

[Chere excellentissime]

It is really extraordinary that after so many years of constant
practice in works of mercy you are not ruined. Your life seems to
me one vast symphony of generosity, munificence, charities, gifts
and attentions as delicate as they are costly. To begin with,
there are Garibaldi and his people, and to continue indefinitely
there are those poor German fellows, ill at Rome, and buried
there at your expense; and then the fighting Cretans, the infirm
people in your hospital at Jena, the societies for the protection
of animals, etc., etc.

I admire you and bow before your perpetual kindnesses and
goodness,--all the more because you exercise them unobtrusively,
as it were in the shade, without any flourish of trumpets and
drums.

Do not scold me for having divided the gift you confided to me
for the sufferers from the inundations at Raab. 300 florins were
amply sufficient for them, and the other 300 florins of your 50
pounds sterling were well employed for the children's gardens (an
admirable institution of Frobel's), of which Madame Tisza, the
wife of the President of Council of the Ministers of Hungary, is
the president in this country.

I send you herewith Madame Tisza's thanks (in Hungarian, with a
German translation), and the receipt of Count Thun,--supreme
Count (an ancient title still preserved,--"Obergespan" in German)
of the Committee of Raab.

I preferred to send your gift in the name of Madame E. de
Schwartz, and not to mix up your nom de plume of Elpis Melena
with it. Pardon me this innocent bit of arbitrariness.

Shall I see you again, my very dear friend, this summer at
Weimar? I hope so, and I remain sempper ubique

Your grateful and attached

F. Liszt

From the middle of April until August I shall stay at Weimar,
with the exception of some excursions of a few days' duration.
Please let me know a couple of weeks beforehand when your
friendly visit will take place.



330. To Baroness Wrangel in St. Petersburg

[This lady had begged Liszt for a contribution to an album which
it was intended to present to Henselt on the occasion of a
festival in honor of his having been 25 years General Music
Inspector of the Imperial Schools in St. Petersburg, Moscow, etc.
This is Liszt's answer.]

Madame la Baronne,

For thirty years past I have entirely abstained from adding to
collections of autographs and of writing my name in any albums
whatever. Nevertheless I willingly make an exception today, while
thanking you for your kind words, and begging you to transmit to
my honored friend A. Henselt the short copy enclosed herewith.

A renowned diplomatist once said to me, "To princes one should
offer only flowers gathered from their own gardens."

Henselt belongs to the princes, and will accept the souvenir of
one of the most beautiful flowers of his own noble gardening.

Very humble respects.

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 20th, 1883

[Liszt adds a postscript to this letter where he writes a musical
score excerpt of the Larghetto form Henselt's Concerto:]

"Albumblatt" for Henselt.

Motive of the wonderful Larghetto in A. Henselt's Concerto.
Larghetto.

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt of the main
theme of the Larghetto.]

For 40 years the composer's admiring and truly attached

Weimar, May, 1883

F. Liszt



331. To Mason and Hamlin in Boston

[Printed in Gottschalg's "Urania"]

My dear Sirs,

For what a magnificent Organ I have to thank your kindness! It is
worthy of all praise and admiration! Even average players could
attain much success on it.--I should gladly have kept this
splendid instrument in my own house, but, alas! there is not
sufficient room for it. It is now looking grand in the large room
of the Orchestral School here, an institution of importance, the
excellent director of which is Herr Professor and
Hofcapellmeister K. Mueller-Hartung--he has published some
beautiful Organ Sonatas and plays them no less beautifully.--On
the evening of its opening two renowned organists played upon it,
the Court organist A. W. Gottschalg (the publisher of the
considerable Organ repertoire, etc., etc.), and the town organist
B. Sulze, who has attained a great name through many valuable
compositions and transcriptions.--I shall probably have a visit
this summer from Prof. Dr. Naumann from Jena, Walter Bache from
London, and Saint-Saens from Paris, who, according to my opinion,
continues to be the most eminent and extraordinary king of
organists. I shall not fail to beg the three above-mentioned
virtuosi to make a closer acquaintance with your organ. For the
rest it shall not be misused and shall remain closed to ordinary
players.

Accept, etc.,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 12th, 1883



332. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Chere Bienveillante,

Thank you for the very agreeable news of the resumption and
continuation of the performances of "Henry VIII." No one wishes
Saint-Saens, more than I do, all the success that he grandly
deserves, both in the theater and in concerts.

In the matter of concerts, those of the Meiningen orchestra,
under Bulow's conductorship, are astonishing, and very
instructive for the due comprehension of the works and the
rendering of them. I send you a copy of some lines written to a
friend; these will give you my impression,--one which you would
share if you heard these concerts of the highest artistic
lineage.--The parallel between the "Sigurd" of Reyer [Performed
for the first time on 7th January, 1884, at the Theater de la
Monnaie, Brussels.] and the "Siegfried" of Wagner is ingeniously
traced by your husband, and renders good preparatory service to
the success of the performances of "Sigurd." As to the
"Nibelungen" tetralogy of Wagner--it shines with an immortal
glory. In the course of the winter season the Weimar theater will
give Gevaert's "Quentin Durward." Lassen will take the utmost
pains in directing the study and performance of it. To my regret
I shall not be able to be present at the premiere here, as I am
obliged to be at Budapest before the middle of January.

Please give Tardieu the cordial love of

Your much attached

F. Liszt

Weimar, December 14th, 1883

Yet another young pianist, but one of the best kind,--M. Siloti,
a Russian by birth, and of good education. He was said to be the
best pupil of Nicholas Rubinstein before he came to work with me.
He obtained a marked success at Leipzig lately, which he will
continue next week at Antwerp. In spite of my aversion to letters
of introduction, I am giving him a couple of words for the
Lynens, and I recommend him to your kind attention.



333. To Casar Cui

Very Honored Friend,

It is well known in various countries in what high esteem I hold
your works. As I am convinced that the "Suite" of which you speak
will prove itself worthy of your preceding compositions, I feel
that I am honored by the dedication, and thank you for it with
gratitude. Your musical style is raised far above ordinary
phraseology; you do not cultivate the convenient and barren field
of the commonplace...Doubtless form in Art is necessary to the
expression of ideas and sentiments; it must be adequate, supple,
free, now energetic, now graceful, delicate; sometimes even
subtle and complex, but always to the exclusion of the ancient
remains of decrepit formalism.

At Meiningen, where Bulow's admirable conducting is working
wonders of rhythm and nuances with the orchestra, I lately had
the honor of a conversation with the Grand Duke Constantine
Constantinowitch, on the actual development of music in Russia
and of the well-known capacity of its courageous promoters. His
Imperial Highness justly appreciates their serious worth, their
noble character and intense originality; consequently, dear
Monsieur Cui, the Grand Duke accords full praise to your talents
and deserts. I take pleasure in repeating this to you, at the
same time renewing to you the assurance of my very sincere
regard.

F. Liszt

Weimar, December 30th, 1883

A young Russian pianist, M. Siloti, who has been brought to a
high state of virtuosity by the lessons and example of Nicholas
Rubinstein, is now gaining a real success in Germany. When he
comes to Petersburg I recommend him to your kindness.



334. To Otto Lessmann

Weimar, January l0th, 1884

Dear Friend,

The remarkable concerts of the Meiningen Court orchestra led me
to the attempt to write a "Bulow March." I send you herewith a
Preface to this, and also an article (in French), in the form of
a letter, on my impressions in Meiningen. Will you insert both
these in your paper? Also kindly translate the French letter.

[It follows here after the Preface in the original. A German
translation of it appeared in Lessmann's Allgemeine Musikzeitung
on the 18th January, 1884, under the title of "Letter to a
friend."]

Faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

I shall stay ten days to a fortnight longer in Weimar on account
of the severe illness of Achilles [Liszt's servant].

Preface to the Bulow March:

For thirty years Hans von Bulow has been expressing and actively
furthering everything that is noble, right, high-minded and free-
minded in the regions of creative Art. As virtuoso, teacher,
conductor, commentator, propagandist--indeed even sometimes as a
humorous journalist--Bulow remains the Chief of musical progress,
with the initiative born in and belonging to him by the grace of
God, with an impassioned perseverance, incessantly striving
heroically after the Ideal, and attaining the utmost possible.

His conducting of the Meiningen Court orchestra is a fresh proof
of this. To that same orchestra this "Bulow March" is dedicated
in high esteem for their model symphonic performances, by

F. Liszt

Weimar, January, 1884

Meiningen, December, 1883

At seven o'clock people were at the rehearsal of the Beethoven
concert. Under Bulow's conducting the Meiningen orchestra
accomplishes wonders. Nowhere is there to be found such
intelligence in different works; precision in the performance
with the most correct and subtle rhythmic and dynamic nuances.
The fact of the opera having been abolished at Meiningen by the
Duke some twenty years ago is most favorable to the concerts. In
this way the orchestra has time to have a fair number of partial
and full rehearsals without too much fatigue, as the opera work
has been done away with. Bulow is almost as lavish of rehearsals
as Berlioz would have been if he had had the means to be...The
result is admirable and in certain respects matchless, not
excepting the Paris Conservatoire and other celebrated concert-
institutions. The little Meiningen phalanx, thanks to its present
General, is in advance of the largest battalions. It is said that
Rubinstein and some others have expressed themselves
disapprovingly about some of the unusual tempi and nuances of
Bulow, but to my thinking their criticism is devoid of
foundation...

Besides the programme of the Beethoven concert, in the morning
there was an extra seance of the orchestra for the performance of
the Overtures to "King Lear" (Berlioz) and to the
"Meistersinger," my march "Vom Fels zum Meer," the "Ideales," and
Brahms' Variations on a theme of Haydn. Always the same and
complete understanding in the ensemble and the details of the
scores,--the same vigor, energy, refinement, accuracy, relief,
vitality and superior characteristics in the interpretation.

An extraordinary thing! the most difficult Quartet of Beethoven,
one which on account of its complications never figures on any
programme, the grand fugue, Op. 133, is played by the Meiningen
orchestra with a perfect ensemble. On a previous occasion I also
heard at Meiningen Bach's celebrated Chaconne played in unison
with a real virtuosity by some ten violins.

F. Liszt



335. To Felix Mottl, Hofcapellmeister at Carlsruhe

[The addressee, born in 1856, has been since 1880 at Carlsruhe,
where he was recently appointed to the post of Court opera
conductor, and since 1886 one of the conductors of the Bayreuth
Festivals. He is one of the most important conductors of the
present day, and has also come forward as a composer.]

My Very Dear Friend,

You have done a noble artistic deed in reinstating Cornelius's
charming Opera "The Barber of Bagdad." I hardly know of any other
comic opera of so much refined humor and spirit. This champagne
has the real sparkle and great worth.

The one-act arrangement seems to me the most propitious. As in
Carlsruhe so elsewhere it will make its way. Write about this to
Hans Richter. "The Barber of Bagdad" might perhaps, in one act,
become a stock-opera in Vienna, and then return once more to
Weimar, where, at the first performance long ago, they behaved so
ill about it.

Friendly thanks, and yours ever,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 8th, 1884



336. To Frau Hofrathin Henriette von Liszt

My Very Dear Cousin,

This time I was not able to have a thorough rest in Vienna. Such
an extra [luxury] is hardly my lot anywhere. My life is one
continued fatigue. Some one once asked the celebrated Catholic
champion Arnauld (the Jansenist) why he did not allow himself
some rest. "We have eternity for that," answered he.

I hear for the first time through you of a cousin or niece, Mary
Liszt, a concert giver. Concert givers have frequently misused
our name by playing under it in provincial towns. A pianist in
Constantinople, Herr Listmann, apologised to me for having
knocked off the second syllable of his name. On this account he
received a valuable present from the then Sultan Abdul Medgid. .-
-.

Farewell till our next meeting in Easter week, dear cousin, from
yours ever affectionately,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 8th, 1884

One, and even two, letters from the Princess in the month of
January have been lost.



337. To Camille Saint-Saens.

Very Dear and Most Excellent Friend,

Before I received your kind letter I had intimated to Baron
Podmaniczki, the Intendant of the theater of Budapest, that he
ought to esteem it an honor to give your Henry VIII.--a frightful
personage in history, but brilliantly illustrated by your
beautiful music [an Opera by Saint-Satins]. The inauguration of
the new theater will take place at the end of September with the
St. Etienne, a new Opera by Erkel, the popular dramatic composer
par excellence in Hungary. His Huvtyadi Laszlo was performed 250
times, and his "Bankban" more than 100, without ever over-
reaching the mark. Two other works are promised after the St.
Etienne, so that your Henry VIII. cannot appear till '85, for it
still has to be translated into Hungarian.

I spoke about it in Vienna to his Excellency Baron Hoffmann, the
Intendant of the Imperial Theaters. He told me that your work is
going to be given shortly at Prague, and that he will send his
own conductor, M. Jahn, there, in order that it may be better
looked after. I beg that you will send the piano score of Henry
VIII. at once to M. le directeur Jahn (very influential), with a
few polite lines; also to do the same to M. Erkel Sandor (son of
the composer), conductor of the National Opera of Budapest.
Address to him "Theater National," Budapest.

Very much vexed to be unable to make a place for one of your
grand works--such as your superb Mass or some Poeme symphonique--
in the programme of our next Tonkunstler-Versammlung at Weimar
from the 23rd to the 28th May. Sauret is going to play your third
Concerto, and I will send you this overloaded programme. If you
came to hear it, it would be a very great pleasure to

Your admiringly and cordially attached

F. Liszt

Weimar, April 29th, 1884



338. To Otto Lessmann

[Weimar,] May 7th, 1884

Dear Friend,

The motto of my Oratorio "Stanislaus" is "Religion and
Fatherland." In the fragment (Orchestral Interlude) which will be
given here at the next Tonkunstler-Versammlung the whole meaning
of the work is made plain. [This remained unfinished, as is well
known.]

Farewell till our speedy meeting.

Ever faithfully yours,

F. Liszt



339. To Camille Saint-Saens

Very dear Friend and Confrere,

I refused to suspect that there could be any ill-will against you
at Budapest. Nevertheless I think it is strange and most unjust
that your dramatic and symphonic works have not yet taken the
place which is due to them in Hungary. I have explained myself
clearly about them several times, but the theater menage, and
even that of the Philharmonic Concerts, is formed outside of my
influence. They are quite ready to accord me a general
consideration, with the exception of arranging particular cases
otherwise than I wished. For many people doubtful profits and
manoeuvres contrary to their dignity exercise an irresistible
attraction. The idea of honor seems to them too troublesome.

I shall not desist in the least from my conscientious propaganda
of your 'Henry VIII' and other of your works. The new theater at
Budapest will open (at the end of September) with the 'Roi St.
Etienne', [King Stephen] a grand Hungarian Opera by Erkel
(senior). After that Baron Podmaniczky, the Intendant, has
promised to give a new Opera by Goldmark, also Hungarian in
subject, and another by Delibes. The "Henry VIII." should appear
somewhere between these three. Its performance at Prague will
determine that at Vienna, which will be soon, I hope. His
Excellency Baron Hoffmann, the Intendant of the Imperial Theaters
in Vienna, told me that he would send his artistic and musical
conductor (at the Opera), M. Jahn, to Prague. It depends on the
opinion of this person whether "Henry VIII." is given at Vienna.

When you come again to Weimar you are sure to be received there
with sympathy, gratitude and sincere admiration by your old
attached friend,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 18th, 1884

Thanks for the photograph. You will find it well placed here near
a charming bust. The Court and town of Weimar keep their
affectionate and kind sentiments towards you.



340. To Walter Bache

Dear honored Friend,

I am very gladly in accord with all your doings, and only protest
against the sacrifice you have in the noblest manner made for my
severely criticised works.

The English edition of the "Elizabeth Legend" with your sister's
translation delights me.

Tell Mr. Alfred Littleton he can send me the proof-sheets (bound)
of the piano edition, and the score, to Weimar. Along with this
the 4 four-hand pieces (published by Kahnt) might also be
published. Would it be well perhaps to begin with these? Arrange
about this as you like with Mr. Littleton. I have only to correct
the proofs, which will quickly follow.

If you think it would do, I shall also add to the English edition
a little Preface, in the form of a letter--addressed to Walter
Bache.

By the same post today I send you the complete enormous programme
of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung (going through 25 years). This
evening they begin with the acting performance of the "Elizabeth
Legend."

Auf Wiedersehen! [To our next meeting!]

I shall stay at Bayreuth from July 5th till the middle of August,
and then come back to Weimar.

Faithfully and gratefully,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 23rd, 1884

I have told Kahnt all that concerns himself in your letter.



341. To the Composer Carl Navratil in Prague

Dear Herr Navtatil,

I write in haste to tell you that Smetana's [Bohemian composer
and pianist (1824-84).] death has moved me deeply. He was a
genius. More in my next. In haste.

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 30th, 1884



342. To Baron Friedrich Podmaniczky, Intendant of the Hungarian
Opera in Budapest

[From a rough copy in Liszt's own handwriting in the possession
of Abranyi]

[1884]

Monsieur le Baron,

I have begged my friend M. de Mihalovich to lay before you a
proposition, the fate of which depends on the committee that
directs the orders for the sculptures of the new National
Hungarian Theater.

In my humble opinion it would be unjust, and even ungrateful, to
exclude from them the likenesses of two composers of high
distinction, the late Mosonyi and Franz Doppler.

A charming Opera of Mosonyi's of elevated taste, "Szep Ilonka"
["The fair Helen": its subject, like that of his other Opera
"Almos," was taken from Hungarian history], has been performed
here some dozen times with success, and was then consigned to
oblivion in the oubliettes of the administration. Another greater
dramatic work by Mosonyi, "Almos," has remained in manuscript,
although Baron Orczy, your predecessor as Intendant, had some
idea of producing it.

The whole of the brave musical activity of Mosonyi at Budapest is
most honorable and meritorious, as much by his teaching as by his
numerous compositions of Church music, orchestral music, and
piano music. Many of his Hungarian pieces remain classical, as
opposed to the current wares, supposed to be of this same kind,
more frequently heard (at the present time in Vienna).

Franz Doppler has left the best possible remembrance of his rare
talents and qualities at Budapest, where during many years he
fulfilled the duties of conductor to the theater, and shone by
his virtuosity (very celebrated in Europe) as a flute player--an
instrument which Frederick the Great condescended to use.
Doppler's Operas "Beniowszky" and "Ilka" were favorably received;
and up to the present time "Ilka" is the only Hungarian opera
admitted to the repertoire of several theaters in Germany.
Besides this Doppler has also written two acts of the "Elizabeth"
[The opera "Elizabeth," composed by Franz Erkel and Doppler, was
performed at the National Theater in 1857], by which Her Majesty
the Queen of Hungary was entertained at the theater of Budapest.

I venture then, Monsieur le Baron, to recommend you to see about
the desirability of placing two fine reliefs of Mosonyi and
Doppler [The reliefs adorn the vestibule of the opera house.] in
a suitable position in the new theater in the Radialstrasse, and
beg you to accept the expression of my high esteem and sincere
devotion.

F. Liszt



343. To Freiherr Hans von Wolzogen

Dear Freiherr,

My admiration remains unlimited for the sublime genius of Wagner.

What blissful creative power and influence has he not, ever
active from "Tannhauser" to the "Ring des Nibelungen" and the
marvellous "Parsifal."--

The Art of our century finds its foundation and glory therein.

The little that I have written in letters about Wagner is at the
service of the public.

With highest esteem yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 18th, 1884

To our friendly meeting in Bayreuth in the middle of July.



344. To the Concert-Singer Auguste Gotze

[Daughter of Professor Franz Gotze, and--as one of the first
singing mistresses of the present day--the inheritor of his
school; she is also a talented singer, reciter, and dramatic
poetess. She lives at Leipzig.]

Dear Friend,

In honor of you I will willingly endeavor to add the melodramatic
accompaniment to Felix Dahn's poem. ["Die Mette von Marienburg"
[The Matins of Marienburg] Liszt's intention remained, alas,
unfulfilled.] This short work will only require a few hours but I
can seldom get any free hours for working...All sorts of
interruptions keep me from writing.

Hearty greetings to your charming colleague, Fraulein von
Kotzebue.

High esteem from your friendly

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 22nd, 1884.



345 To Kornel von Abranyi

Dear, excellent Friend,

The best person to make a suitable instrumentation of the
"Rheinweinliedes" [Rhine-wine-song] for the Miskolcz Musical
Festival will be our friend C. Huber. [Carl Huber, conductor of
the Hungarian Provincial Singers' Union, died 1885.] This chorus
for men's voices was written in Berlin in the year '42, and
performed there several times, and afterwards in Leipzig also,
about which a "querelle d'Allermand" [groundless quarrel] soon
reached me in Paris.--

To bear and forbear is ever our life's task.

As I have marked on the accompanying copy, on pages 3, 5, 7,
instead of D-flat, G-flat in the 2nd tenor, the C, F

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt showing a
cadence in B-flat]

is to remain.

The Gazette de Hongrie [Gazette of Hungary], and still more the
Budapester Tageblatt [Budapest daily paper], in which your son
Kornel is a collaborator, gave me the tidings of the election
doings in the cara patria.

Without in the least taking part in politics, yet I take that
interest in them which it behoves every not uneducated man to do;
and I rejoice that Kornel Abranyi, junior, is taking his seat in
Parliament.

Heartily, faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Weimar, July 1st, 1884

From the 12th July till the middle of August I shall be at
Bayreuth.

Tell Huber to do the instrumentation of the "Rheinweinlied" quite
freely, according to his own will and what he thinks best,
without a too careful attention to the printed piano
accompaniment.



345A. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

[Autograph in possession of Constance Bache]

Dear kind Friend,

I have spoken to you several times of my excellent friend--of
more than 20 years--Walter Bache. He maintains himself worthily
in London as an artist of worth, intelligence, and noble
character. His sister has made a remarkable translation of the
"Elizabeth" into English.

Receive the Baches (who pass a day in Brussels) in a friendly
manner.

Cordial devotion,

F. Liszt

Bayreuth, August 9th, 1884

Tomorrow evening I shall be back at Weimar, and shall probably go
to Munich for the second series of the "Nibelungen" performances
(28th August).

Please give my cordial regards to Tardieu.



346. To the Music Publisher Rahter in Hamburg

Dear Herr Rahter,

Best thanks for kindly sending me the Russian "Fantasie" by
Naprawnik--a brilliantly successful concert-piece--and the
Slumber Songs by Rimsky-Korsakoff, which I prize extremely; his
works are among the rare, the uncommon, the exquisite.--The piano
edition of his Opera "Die Mainacht" [The May Night] has either
not reached me or else has got lost.--Send it me to Weimar
together with a second copy of Naprawnik's Russian "Fantasie,"
which is necessary for performance.

Many of my young pianists will be glad to make this "Fantasie"
known in drawing-rooms and concerts.--

With friendly thanks,

F. Liszt

Munich, August 28th, 1884



347. To Richard Pohl

[Printed in the Allgemeine Deutsche Musikzeitung of 24th
October,1884.]

My very dear Friend,

I have long wanted to repeat my hearty thanks to you for the
faithful, noble devotion which you have always bravely and
decidedly shown to the Weimar Period of Progression in the years
1849-58. The third volume of your collected writings "Hector
Berlioz" affords another proof of this devotion, which is highly
to be valued in contrast with the far too general wishy-washy
absence of opinion.

After the unheard-of success of more than 20 performances of "The
Damnation of Faust" by the concert societies of Lamoureux,
Pasdeloup, Colonne, in the same season in Paris--not counting the
theater, for which this work is not suitable, the French Berlioz
literature is increasing. You know Hippeau's octavo book "Berlioz
Intime," which is shortly to be followed by a second, "Berlioz
Artiste." I wish this to profit by your work.

In reading the first volume I was painfully affected by several
passages out of Berlioz's letters, in which the discord and
broken-heartedness of his early years are only too apparent. He
could not grasp the just idea that a genius cannot hope to exist
with impunity, and that a new thing cannot at once expect to
please the ancient order of things.

For the rest, there lies in his complaints against the Parisian
"gredins et cretins" [fools and scoundrels], whom he might also
find in other places, a large share of injustice. In spite of his
exaggerated leniency in favor of a foreign country, the fact
remains that up to the present time no European composer has
received such distinctions from his own country as Berlioz did
from France. Compare the position of Beethoven, Weber, Schubert,
Schumann, with that of Berlioz. In the case of Beethoven the
Archduke Rudolf alone bespoke the "Missa solemnis." The profit
from his rarely given concerts was small, and at the last he
turned to the London Philharmonic Society for support.

Weber acted as Court conductor in Dresden, and wrote his Oberon
at the invitation of London.

Schubert's marvellous productiveness was badly paid by the
publishers; other favorable conditions had he none.

Schumann's biography testifies no patriotic enthusiasm for his
works during his lifetime. His position as musical conductor at
Dusseldorf was by no means a brilliant one...

It was otherwise with Mendelssohn, who had private means, and
who, by his delicate and just eclecticism, clinging to Bach,
Handel, and even Beethoven, obtained continual success in England
and Germany. King William IV. called him to Berlin at the same
time with Cornelius, [This means the painter Cornelius.--Trans.]
Kaulbach, Schelling, and Meyerbeer, which he did not enjoy any
better than Leipzig.

I make no further mention of Meyerbeer here, because he owes his
universal success chiefly to Paris. It was there that all his
Operas, from "Robert" and "The Huguenots" to his posthumous
"L'Africaine," were first performed--with the exception of "Das
Feldlager in Schlesien" [The Camp in Silesia], which also
sparkled later in Paris as "L'etoile du Nord."

Now let us see how things went with Berlioz in his native land.

Like Victor Hugo, he was, after three times becoming a candidate,
elected a member of the "Institute of France,"--similarly
(without any candidature) to be librarian of the Conservatoire;
he was also a collaborator of the highly esteemed "Journal des
Debats" and officer of the Legion of Honor.

Where do we find in Germany similar proofs of distinction? Why,
therefore, the bitter insults of Berlioz against the Paris
"gredins" and "cretins"? Unfortunately it certainly never brought
Berlioz an out-and-out theatrical success, although his nature
leaned that way.

I send you herewith Reyer's feuilleton (Journal des Debats, 14th
September) regarding the latest brochure by Ernst "upon Berlioz."

With hearty thanks, yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 12th, 1884



348. To Sophie Menter

My dear Friend,

My few days' stay at your fairy-like castle Itter [In Tyrol.]
will remain a magic memory.

When you have signed the Petersburg Conservatorium contract let
me know. You know, indeed, that I very much approve of this turn
and fixing of your brilliant artistic career. It requires no
excessive obligations, and will be an advantage to you.

Friendly greetings to the New School from your faithful admirer
and friend,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 13th, 1884

I am here till the end of October. Later on I shall visit my
friends Geza Zichy and Sandor Teleky in Hungary.



349. To Baron Friedrich Podmaniczky, Intendant of the Royal
Hungarian Opera in Budapest

[Printed in the Pester Lloyd (evening paper of 27th September,
1884).--Liszt having sent Podmaniczky a Royal Hymn for the
opening of the New Hungarian Opera House instead of a Festal
Prelude, which the latter had requested, Podmaniczky wrote to the
Master on the 17th September, 1884, that the motive of the hymn
having been borrowed from a revolutionary song would prove an
"unsurmountable obstacle" to its performance. The letter was also
signed by Alexander Erkel as conductor. Whereupon Liszt wrote the
above reply.]

Dear, Hochgeborener [Many of these titles have been left in their
original language, being unused in England, and having no
equivalent with us.--Trans.] Herr Baron,

To your letter dated the 17th of this month I have the honor of
replying as follows: that the song "Hahj, Rakoczy, Bercsenyi" was
not unknown to me is shown by the piano edition of my "Hungarian
royal hymn" published by Taborsky and Parsch, on the title-page
of which stand the words "After an old Hungarian air." I learned
to know this song from Stefan Bartolus's Anthology, and it took
hold of me with its decided, and expressive and artless
character; I at once provided it with a finale of victory, and
without troubling my head further about its former revolutionary
words I begged Kornel Abranyi, jun., for a new, loyal text with
the refrain "Eljen a kiraly," so that my "Royal hymn" might
attain its due expression both in words and music.

Transformations are nothing rare in Art any more than in life.
From countless heathen temples Catholic churches were formed. In
the classic epoch of Church music--in the 16th century--many
secular melodies were accepted amongst devotional songs, and in
later times the Catholic antiphones were heard as Protestant
Chorales. And this went yet further, not excepting Opera, in
which Meyerbeer utilised the Chorale "Eine feste Burg" for a
stage effect, and in "L'Etoile du Nord" consecrated the "Dessauer
Marsch" into the Russian National hymn. A revolutionary tendency
is commonly ascribed to the universally known and favorite
"Rakoczy March," and its performance has been more than once
forbidden.

Music remains ever music, without superfluous and injurious
significations. For the rest, God forbid that I should anywhere
push forward either myself or my humble compositions. I leave it
entirely to your judgment, hochgeborener Herr Baron, to decide
whether my "Royal hymn" shall be performed in the new Hungarian
Opera House or not. The score, as also the many orchestral and
vocal parts, are to be had at the publishers, Taborsky and
Parsch.

I beg you, Sir, to accept the expression of my high esteem.

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 21st, 1884

[To this Alex. Erkel made the proposal that Liszt's "Konigslied"
("Royal Song"), instead of being performed at the opening of the
new theater on the 27th September, should be given at an "Extra
Opera performance." The Master consented, but did not appear at
this first performance of his work, which took place on the 25th
March, 1885, and met with tremendous applause.]



350. To Walter Bache

[This letter is published, as a Preface, in the English edition
of Liszt's "St. Elizabeth."]

Very honored Friend,

For some twenty years past you have been employing your beautiful
talent as a pianist, your care as a professor and as a conductor
to make my works known and to spread them in England. The task
seemed an ungrateful one, and its want of success menacing, but
you are doing it nobly, with the most honorable and firm
conviction of an artist. I renew my grateful thanks to you on the
occasion of the present edition of the "Legend of St. Elizabeth,"
published by the well-accredited house of Novello. [The
translator of the English edition (Constance Bache) has also
translated many of Liszt's songs into English.]

This work, which was performed for the first time in 1865 at
Budapest, has been reproduced successively in several countries
and languages. Let us hope that it will also meet with some
sympathy in England.

Your much attached

F. Liszt

Weimar, October 18th, 1884



351. To the Composer Mili Balakireff, Conductor of the Imperial
Court Choir in St. Petersburg

Very honored, dear Confrere,

My admiring sympathy for your works is well known. When my young
disciples want to please me they play me your compositions and
those of your valiant friends. In this intrepid Russian musical
phalanx I welcome from my heart masters endowed with a rare vital
energy; they suffer in no wise from poverty of ideas--a malady
which is widespread in many countries. More and more will their
merits be recognised, and their names renowned. I accept with
gratitude the honor of the dedication [to me] of your Symphonic
Poem "Thamar," which I hope to hear next summer with a large
orchestra. When the 4-hand edition comes out you will greatly
oblige me by sending me a copy. From the middle of January until
Easter I shall be at Budapest.

Please accept, dear confrere, the expression of my high esteem
and cordial attachment.

F. Liszt

Weimar, October 2lst, 1884



352. To Countess Louise de Mercy-Argenteau

[Known through her zealous propaganda, in Belgium and France, of
the music of the New Russian School. After the death of her
husband (1888), Chamberlain of Napoleon III., she left her native
land of Belgium and removed to St. Petersburg, where she died in
November 1890.]

October 24th, 1884

Certainly, my very dear and kind friend, you have a hundredfold
right to appreciate and to relish the present musical Russia.
Rimski-Korsakoff, Cui, Borodine, Balakireff, are masters of
striking originality and worth. Their works make up to me for the
ennui caused to me by other works more widely spread and more
talked about, works of which I should have some difficulty in
saying what Leonard once wrote to you from Amsterdam after a song
of Schumann's: "What soul, and also what success!" Rarely is
success in a hurry to accompany soul. In Russia the new
composers, in spite of their remarkable talent and knowledge,
have had as yet but a limited success.--The high people of the
Court wait for them to succeed elsewhere before they applaud them
at Petersburg. A propos of this, I recollect a striking remark
which the late Grand Duke Michael made to me in '43: "When I have
to put my officers under arrest, I send them to the performances
of Glinka's operas." Manners are softening, and Messrs. Rimski,
Cui, Borodine, have themselves attained to the grade of colonel.

At the annual concerts of the German and Universal Musical
Association (Allgemeiner Deutscher Musik-Verein) they have, for
many years past, always given some work of a Russian composer, at
my suggestion. Little by little a public will be formed. Next
year our Festival will take place in June at Carlsruhe. St. Saens
is coming; why not you, too, dear friend? You would also hear
something Russian there.

When you write to St. Saens, please tell him of my admiring and
very constant friendship. By the work of translation which you
have bravely undertaken, I think that you are doing wisely and
skilfully in freeing yourself from the bondage of rhyme, and in
keeping to rhythmic prose. The important point is to maintain the
lyric or dramatic accent, and to avoid the "desastreuses salades
de syllabes longues et breves, des temps forts et faibles"
[disastrous mess of long and short syllables, and of the strong
and weak time]. The point is to make good prose without any other
scruples whatever. It is said that M. Lamoureux is admitting the
"Steppes" by Borodine into one of his programmes. We shall see
what sort of a reception it will have. For the rest, I doubt
Lamoureux's venturing so soon on the Russian propaganda. He has
too much to do with Berlioz and Wagner.

Do not let yourself be disconcerted either by the "ineffable"
carelessness, or by the square battalions of objections such as
these: "It is confusion worse confounded; it is Abracadabra"
[Senseless jabber.]--etc.

Without politeness or ceremony I tell you in perfect sincerity
that your instinct did not lead you astray the day when this
music so forcibly charmed you. Continue, then, your work with the
firm conviction of being in the right path.

Above all I beg that you will not falsely imagine that I am
taking hold of the thing wrong end foremost. When you knock I
shall not merely say, Enter, but I myself will go before you. To
return to Paris and show myself off there as a young composer or
to continue the business of an old pianist in the salons does not
attract me in the least. I have other things to do elsewhere.

Faithful homage.

F. Liszt

P.S.--I do not know what date to put to these lines. I wrote the
first page on the receipt of your bewitching letter. I meant to
reply to it in full, but all sorts of pressing obligations and
botherations intervened...I have also been to the inauguration of
the statue of Bach at Eisenach, illustrated by three concerts,
composed exclusively of numerous works of Bach's (the Mass in B
minor first and foremost); then I was present at a more curious
concert at Leipzig: on my return I had a severe attack of
illness, which prevented me for several days from writing. In
short, this letter ought to have reached you three weeks ago.
Tomorrow, 25th October, I leave Weimar, and shall not return here
till after Easter. If you condescend to continue writing to me,
please address to Budapest (Hungary) till the end of November. A
prompt answer shall follow.

F. Liszt



353. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Budapest, December 7th, 1884

Dear Kind Friend,

Really and truly when it sometimes happens that I obtain success
I rejoice less over that than over the success of my friends.
Thank you for the pleasant tidings of the brilliant success of
Ossiana [Madame Marie Jaell, the well-known artiste, a friend of
Liszt's.] at Godard's concert. .--.

You do not tell me where the little notice appeared (with my name
at the heading) which you were so good as to send me. [In the
Gaulois, from the pen of Fourcaud, and, later, in the Album of
the Gaulois, to which the most celebrated tone-poets had
contributed a piece of music as yet unpublished.] One of my works
is mentioned in it with the greatest eulogy--the Gran Mass--which
was so unhappily performed at Paris in '66, and more unhappily
criticised then...The mistake I made was not to have forbidden a
performance given under such deplorable conditions. A
philanthropic reason, which is valueless in matters of Art, kept
me from doing so. I did not wish to deprive the fund for the poor
of the assured receipts of more than 40,000 francs. Pardon me for
recalling this vexatious affair, which makes me all the more
sensible of the flattering attention which the same work is
receiving.

To my great regret the performances of Henry VIII. by our very
valiant friend St. Saens, which were to have taken place at
Weimar and Budapest, are put off. Mediocrity, as Balzac said,
governs even theaters. Anyhow its power must sometimes be
intermittent. Please say many cordial things to your husband from
your much attached

F. Liszt

On Wednesday I shall be in Rome, and back here towards the middle
of January.



354. To Freiherr Hans Von Wolzogen

Dear Freiherr,

Hearty thanks for your kind letter. To include me in your noble,
zealous, high-minded efforts in matters for the glorification of
Wagner and according to the wishes of his widow, is to me ever a
duty and an honor.

Faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 18th, 1884



355. To Camille Saint-Saens

[End of 1884 or beginning of 1885.]

Very Dear Friend and Companion in Arms,

Your sympathy for the "Salve, Polonia" [Orchestral Interlude from
the unfinished Oratorio Stanislaus. It was given at the
Tonkunstler-Versammlung in Weimar in 1884, at which Saint-Saens
was present.] makes me quite happy. Still writing music, as I am,
I sometimes ask myself at such and such a passage, "Would that
please St. Saens?" The affirmative encourages me to go on, in
spite of the fatigue of age and other wearinesses.

If you do me the honor of playing one of my compositions at the
Carlsruhe Festival please choose which it shall be: perhaps the
Danse macabre [Dance of Death] with orchestra; or--which I think
would be better, for the public would rather hear you alone--the
Predication aux oiseaux [St. Francis preaching to the birds,
followed by Scherzo and March. [Saint-Saens did not go to
Carlsruhe.]

Cordial wishes for the year '85, and ever your admiringly
attached

F. Liszt

Give my best remembrances from Budapest to Delibes.



356. To Countess Mercy-Argenteau

What wonders you have just accomplished with your Russian concert
at Liege, dear admirable one! From the material point of view the
Deaf and Dumb and Blind Institutions have benefited by it;
artistically, other deaf and dumb have heard and spoken; the
blind have seen, and, on beholding you, were enraptured.

I shall assuredly not cease from my propaganda of the remarkable
compositions of the New Russian School, which I esteem and
appreciate with lively sympathy. For 6 or 7 years past, at the
Grand Annual Concerts of the Musical Association ("Allgemeiner
Deutscher Musik-Verein"), over which I have the honor of
presiding, the orchestral works of Rimsky-Korsakoff and Borodine
have figured on the programmes. Their success is making a
crescendo, in spite of the sort of contumacy that is established
against Russian music. It is not in the least any desire of being
peculiar that leads me to spread it, but a simple feeling of
justice, based on my conviction of the real worth of these works
of high lineage. I do not know which ones Hans von Bulow, the
Achilles of propagandists, chose for the Russian concert he gave
lately with the Meiningen orchestra, of an unheard-of discipline
and perfection.

I hope Bulow will continue concerts of the same quality in
various towns of Germany.

The best among my disciples, brilliant virtuosi, play the most
difficult piano compositions of Balakireff, etc., superbly. I
shall recommend to them Cui's Suite (piano and violoncello).

Considering the rarity of singers gifted at once with voice,
intelligence and good taste for things not hackneyed,--there is
some delay in regard to the vocal compositions of Cui, Borodine,
etc. Nevertheless the right time for their production will come,
and for making them succeed and be appreciated. In France your
translation of the words will be a great help, and in Germany we
must be provided with a suitable translation.

A portion of the articles which you kindly sent me upon your
concert at Liege shallbe inserted in the Neue Zeitschrift fur
Musik. I shall endeavor to find another paper also, although my
relations with the Press are by no means intimate.

Rahter, the musical editor at Hamburg, and representative of
Jurgenson in Moscow, will offer you in homage three of my Russian
transcriptions,--Tschaikowsky's "Polonaise"; Dargomijsky's
"Tarentelle" with the continuous pedal bass of A, A; and a
"Romance" of Count Michel Wielhorsky. Let us add to these the
"Marche tscherkesse" of Glinka, and, above all, the prodigious
kaleidoscope of variations and paraphrases on the fixed theme

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a musical score excerpt]

It is the most seriously entertaining thing I know; it gives us a
practical manual, par excellence, of all musical knowledge;
treatises on harmony and composition are summed up and blended in
it in some thirty pages, which teach the subject very fully--
above and beyond the usual instruction.

My very amiable hosts at Antwerp, the Lynens, have invited me to
return there this summer at the time of the Exhibition, of which
M. Lynen is the president. I am tempted to do so after the
Carlsruhe Festival, as I keep a charming remembrance of the
kindness that was shown to me in Brussels and Antwerp.

In about ten days I return to Budapest, whence you shall receive
a photograph of the old, sorry face of your constant admirer and
devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Rome, January 20th, 1885

A pertinacious editor keeps asking me for my transcription of
Gounod's "Ste. Cecile." If amongst your old papers you should
find the manuscript of it, will you lend it me for a fortnight,
so that it may be copied, printed, and then restored to its very
gracious owner?

February and March my address--Budapest, Hungary.



357. To Camille Saint-Saens.

Very honored, dear Friend,

In order not to become too monotonous I won't thank you any more.
Nevertheless your transcription of my Orpheus for Piano, Violin
and Violoncello charms me, and I beg that you will send it either
to Hartel direct, so that he may publish it at once, or else to
yours very gratefully, so that I may remit it to him, after
having had the pleasure of reading and hearing it at Budapest,
whither, by next Thursday, will have returned

Your much-attached fellow-disciple,

F. Liszt.

Florence, Tuesday, January 27th, 1885.

Goodbye till we meet in May at Carlsruhe.



358. To Madame Malwine Tardieu.

I am writing to the director of our "Musik-Verein" to write to
you, dear friend. You will tell Mademoiselle Kufferath, better
than any one else can, how agreeable it will be to everybody, and
to myself in particular, if she takes part in the concerts at
Carlsruhe--in the last days of May. [This did not come to
anything. Saint-Saens' "Deluge," in which she was to have sung,
was not performed at Carlsruhe, and meanwhile Fraulein Kufferath
married and gave up her artistic career.]

Our "Musak-Verein" has not the advantage of material wealth;
nevertheless we have existed bravely for 25 years without getting
into debt, and faithfully put in practice our principal rule,
which is to perform every year in different towns the valid works
of contemporary composers of any country whatsoever (exclusive of
works for the theater, with the exception of occasional vocal
numbers). This rule, which is difficult to maintain, considering
the expenses and the difficult preparations, distinguishes us
from other musical societies and gives us the character of
pioneers of progress. We have not been behindhand with the group
of composers of young Musical Russia, Rimsky-Korsakoff, Borodine,
Cui, etc., for we have been giving their works for four years
past.

The very gracious Countess of Mercy-Argenteau has been making
them known lately at Liege, with a brilliant success, quite
justified by the qualities of the works and the charm of the
patroness.

Will you, dear friend, be so kind as to express my
acknowledgments to Mr. de Fourcaud, [Musical and Art
Correspondent of the Paris Gaulois, with outspoken Wagner
tendencies and opinions.] and accept the expression of my cordial
affection?

F. Liszt.

Budapest, April 6th, 1885.

In a few days I shall be back at Weimar.



359. To Lina Ramann.

[Weimar] April 27th, 1885.

I am sending you at once, my very dear friend, the volumes of
scores which I have by me in Weimar. [Works of Palestrina's.] The
celebrated Missa Papoe Marcelli is not amongst them, but can
easily be found; the last edition of it by Amelli, Milan, the
editor-in-chief of the Church-Music paper there. I got him to add
a few indications of expression because, according to my opinion,
without such indications any further editions of Palestrina and
Lassus--the two great Cardinals of old Catholic Church-music--
would serve only for reading, and not for actual performances. Of
course no one can fix with absolute certainty the figures to the
basses of Palestrina and Lassus; yet there are determining points
from which one can steer.

The best model of all is and will continue to be--Wagner's
arrangement of Palestrina's "Stabat Mater"--with marks of
expression and plan of the division of the voices into semi-
chorus, solos, and complete chorus.

Wagner made this model arrangement at the time when he was
conductor in Dresden. It appeared 15 years later, published by
Kahnt. It is to be hoped that people will gradually regulate
themselves by this with judgment--and time.

Faithfully yours,

F. Liszt



360. To Camille Saint-Saens

Thank you cordially, my very dear friend, for the concession you
are willing to make to me.

The Society of Musicians, in which I have taken part for 25
years, holds to the principle of producing the works of living
Symphonic composers of all countries. I claim then your superior
and continued share in it, and remain your admiring and attached
friend,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 8th, 1885



361. To Alexander Siloti

[Well known as one of the most gifted pupils of Liszt, and one of
the first pianists of the present day. Born 1863, and lives now
in Paris]

In Weimar it is wisest to keep oneself negative and passive.
Therefore, dear Siloti, attempt no "Liszt-Verein."

[In consequence of the above letter the Liszt-Verein (Liszt
Society) was not founded in Weimar, as Siloti intended, but in
Leipzig in 1885, where it has flourished brilliantly under the
direction of Professor Martin Krause.]

With thanks, yours truly,

F. Liszt

May, 1885



362. To the Composer J.P. von Kiraly in Eisenstadt

[From a copy by Director Aug. Gollerich in Nuremberg.]

Dear Friend,

Ninety years ago my father was preparing for his duties as book-
keeper to Prince Nikolaus Esterhazy in Eisenstadt. At that time
he often took part, as an amateur, among the violoncellos in the
Prince's frequent Court concerts, under the conductorship of the
happy great master Josef Haydn. My father often told me about his
intercourse with Haydn, and the daily parties he made up with
him. In 1848 I visited the dear, affectionate Father Albach at
the Franciscan monastery of Eisenstadt, and dedicated to him my
Mass for men's voices, which will be brilliantly performed here
very shortly. May the simple, artless genius of Haydn ever rule
over the Eisenstadt Kindergarten conducted by your daughter.

"Joke and earnest!" Bravo, friend! The work honors the master who
knows so well the Muses. In Oedenburg and Eisenstadt surely every
one will subscribe. At the beginning of July I shall send you a
small contribution for the Kindergarten. Perhaps later on I shall
be able to do more; unfortunately I am anything but well off, and
must content myself with a small amount.

F. Liszt

Antwerp, June 5th, 1885



363. To Ferdinand Taborszky, Music Publisher in Budapest

Antwerp, June 8th, 1885

Very dear Friend,

From Weimar, where I shall once more be in ten days' time, you
will receive at the beginning of July some short Hungarian
pianoforte pieces, which I shall orchestrate later on, entitled:

  To the memory of
Stephan   | Szechenyi
Franz     | Deak
Josef     | Eotvos
-----------------------
Ladislas  | Telek
Michael   | Vorosmarti
Alexander | Petofi

The last piece has already been published by Taborszky, but must
have a few more concluding bars in the new edition.

"Mosonyi's Trauerklange" (Mosonyi's funeral music), which you
have already had by you for fifteen years, shall make No. 7. Our
friend Mosonyi, so excellent and full of character, and so pre-
eminent a musician, must also not be forgotten.

The seven numbers make altogether sixty pages of print. All the
new pieces are perfectly ready, written out in manuscript, only
requiring a copyist, whom I cannot find while I am on my journey.
[Liszt's intention to orchestrate the pieces remained
unfulfilled.]

When I send you the manuscripts I will write all further
particulars with regard to the publishing of them.

First of all, dear friend, will you be so kind as to go to my
house with Frau von Fabry? I stupidly forgot there--in the
bedroom, not in the salon--the beautiful and revised copy of a
composition for piano and violin or violoncello, together with
the transcription of the same for pianoforte alone. The title is
"La lugubre Gondola" (the funeral gondola). As though it were a
presentiment, I wrote this elegie in Venice six weeks before
Wagner's death.

Now I should like it to be brought out by Fritzsch (Leipzig),
Wagner's publisher, as soon as I receive it from you in Weimar.
[Published by Frizsch] Hearty greetings to your family.

Ever faithfully yours,

F. Liszt



364. To Alfred Reisenauer

Dear Friend and Art-Comrade,

I beg you to send me here, in manuscript, your capital
orchestration of the 3rd Mephisto-waltz. Don't take the trouble
to alter anything in this manuscript or to write anything new;
send it me just as I have seen it. When it has been copied the
printed edition will follow, with the name of Reisenauer attached
to it.

In all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 1st, 1885



365. To the Editor of the "Allgemeine Musikzeitung," Otto
Lessmann, in Charlottenburg

[Was published in the Allgemeine Musikzeitung of September 1885]

Dear Mr. Editor,

With regret, and a firm conviction, I repeat to you in writing
that Theodor Kullak's forgetfulness ought to be made good by his
heirs. Otherwise it would be severely denounced as unfaithfulness
to his position as an artist. A fortune of several millions
gained by music-teaching ought not to remain buried without any
regard to music students. Unless the heirs prefer to found a
Kullak-Scholarship, I consider that they are in duty bound to
endow the four existing musical scholarships--those in the names
of Mozart, Mendelssohn, Meyerbeer, Beethoven--with 30,000 marks
each: total 120,000 marks.

With well-known opinions, mindful of the artist's standing, I am
yours truly,

F. Liszt

Weimar, September 5th, 1885



366. To Casar Cui

Very honored Friend,

The very gracious propagandist, the Countess of Mercy-Argenteau,
has already received a transcription of your brilliant
"Tarentelle." I will send a second copy of it to Bessel
(Petersburg), and shall ask him to give it to you, trusting that
you will not disapprove of the few liberties and amplifications
that I have ventured to make in order to adapt this piece to the
programmes of virtuosi pianists.

Sincere feelings of esteem and attachment.

F. Liszt

Munich, October 18th, 1885



367. To Countess Mercy-Argenteau

Dear admirable Propagandist,

It is your habit to write the most charming letters in the world.
Before receiving your last I had sent you from Weimar my
transcription of Cui's "Tarentelle." If you will condescend to
illustrate it with your fingers it will receive its full meed of
light.

I am sure you will be so kind as to send my note to Cui, who, I
hope, will not be vexed with the varying readings and
amplifications I have ventured to make, with a view of bringing
the pianist still more forward. In this kind of transcription
some sort of distinction is wanted.

Tomorrow evening I shall be in Rome,--Hotel Alibert. Please send
me word there of your safe receipt of the manuscript.

Constant homage, admiring and sincere.

F. Liszt

Innsbruck, October 24th, 1885



368. To Eduard Reuss in Carlsruhe [Pianist, pupil of Liszt's.]

My dear Friend,

Thanks and praise for your capital orchestral arrangement of the
"Concerto pathetique." It appears to me effective, well-
proportioned, and done with a refined and due understanding of
it. I had but little to alter in it; but some additions to the
original are desirable, in order to allow full scope to the piano
virtuoso. ["This 'Concerto Pathetique' seems to me a murderous
piece, with which first-rate virtuosi can make an effect," writes
Liszt, on the 10th November, to Reuss.] Hence, in different
places, there are altogether somewhere about fifty to sixty bars
which I add to your manuscript. The beginning is also to be ten
bars sooner, and the ending to conclude with twenty-two bars
more.

I hear an orchestration of the same "Concerto pathetique" spoken
of, as having been produced in Moscow. I do not know it myself,
and after yours there is no use in it. I received in Weimar,
almost simultaneously with yours, a letter from Joseffy in New
York, begging me to instrumentate the piece. I shall answer him
very soon that your score is already completed, and that he is to
apply to my friend Eduard Reuss if he is disposed to perform the
"Concerto" with orchestra in America. [Joseffy played the
"Concerto Pathetique" in this form from a copy, in the spring of
1886, in New York.]

Enclosed is my recommendation to Hartel with regard to the
publishing. Send it together with your manuscript, of which it is
not necessary to make a copy--only my scribbling of the additions
must be copied out clean and clearly on an extra sheet.--

Probably Hartels will not show themselves disobliging. If they
undertake the publication I should still like to read through the
last proof-sheets.

The most charming recollection remains to me of Carlsruhe.
[Namely, of the "Tonkunstler-Versammlung" of the "Allgemeine
Deutsche Musikverein," from the 27th May to the 1st June, 1885.]
The Grand Duke was so gracious and truly kind!--

Assure your wife of my sincere attachment.

Faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Hotel Alibert, Rome, November 4th, 1885



369. To Breitkopf and Hartel

[This is Liszt's last autograph letter to the Firm; a later one
on the same subject (on the 16th June, 1886) is only signed by
him]

My dear Sirs,

Although your shop is already saddled with two editions of my
"Concerto pathetique," I recommend you most particularly the
excellent orchestral arrangement of the same piece, [By Eduard
Reuss. It was published by Breitkopf and Hartel.] to which I have
added some bars for more completion, which should also be
included in the possible (?) later piano editions.

The poet and the writer often make alterations. With the
engraving of music this is more difficult, though not entirely to
be put aside.

With esteem,

F. Liszt

Rome, November, 1885



370. To Walter Bache

My very dear Friend,

Certainly your invitation takes precedence of all others. So
choose the day that suits yourself and I will appear. Without
Walter Bache and his long years of self-sacrificing efforts in
the propaganda of my works my visit to London were indeed not to
be thought of.

Do you know your namesake (without the final E), Herr Emil Bach,
Prussian Court-pianist? I enclose herewith a second letter, which
I have answered, as I did the first, that I must not be the
occasion of expense and inconvenience to any one. Orchestral
concerts are expensive everywhere, especially in London.
Consequently I cannot encourage Emil Bach's project, and can only
dissuade him from putting it into execution. Send me word about
this.

Gratefully and faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, Hotel Alibert, November 17th, 1885

Mr. Stavenhagen, [Now one of the most celebrated pianists] a
pianist and musician of real talent, wants to come out in London,
and is writing to you on this subject.



370a. To Walter Bache

My very dear Friend,

It is fixed then: Thursday, 8th April, Ricevimento [Reception] at
Walter Bache's house. Enclosed is the letter of the Philharmonic
Society, together with the rough copy of my reply which I send
off today. Please observe the postscript:

"If, in the concert at which one of my Symphonic Poems will be
performed, Mr. Walter Bache would play some Pianoforte
composition of mine, that would give me great pleasure. I permit
myself to give this simple hint without the slightest desire of
influencing your programme, which it is for you to fix."--

I am quite of your opinion, dear friend. The accented poaht of my
coming to London is to be present at the "Elizabeth" performance.
It was this that decided my coming, and it is to be hoped it will
be a success. [It was given on the 6th April, 1886, under the
conductorship of Mackenzie. Bache had already given it in London
in 1876.]

I have answered Emil Bach's first and second letters to the
effect that I should not wish to involve any one in expense, and
that consequently I must dissuade him from giving an orchestral
Liszt concert. Beg Littleton personally to make my wish quite
clear to Herr Emil Bach, that his proposed concert should not be
given. .--.

Faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

November 26th, 1885

I have just received a second letter from the "Philharmonic
Society."--To my answer to the first (sent yesterday) I have
nothing to add.



370b. To the Philharmonic Society

Very honored Directors,

Much flattered with your kind intention to admit one of my
"Poemes Symphoniques" on to the programme of the Philharmonic
Society, during my stay in London, I beg you to accept my sincere
thanks.

Will you please choose, according to your own pleasure, the work
which suits you best, and also ask your "conductor," Sir Arthur
Sullivan, from me, to direct it?

For twenty years past I have been quite outside of any work as
orchestral conductor and pianist.

Distinguished consideration and loyal devotion.

F. Liszt

Rome, November 26th, 1885

P.S.--If, in the concert at which one of my Symphonic Poems will
be performed, Mr. Walter Bache would [etc., see quotation in
previous letter].



371. To Countess Mercy-Argenteau

Dear admirable Propagandist,

Herewith is a different rendering of the shake, with an
indication to the left hand of the motive which is then taken up
again in full. This new shake is a little awkward to do, but not
too troublesome. Will you be so kind as to send it to Cui, and
beg him to be my emissary to the editor of the original of Cui's
brilliant "Tarantelle," for the publication of the transcription?
To my regret the smallness of my income obliges me to leave no
stone unturned to make money out of my transcriptions, [La
modicite de man revenu m'oblige a faire fleche, non pas de tout
bois, mais de fagots de mes transcriptions. The literal
translation is, "Obliges me to utilise, not the wood, but the
faggots of my transcriptions," the point of the sentence turning
upon the French idiom "faire fleche de tout bois," which in
English is rendered by a totally different idiom.--Trans.] for
which I am now paid in Germany, Russia, France, at the rate of
from twelve to 1500 marks apiece, for the copyright in all
countries.

Observe that I choose works to be transcribed, and refuse myself
to any other demands. This year, for instance, I have confined
myself to the volume that you condescend to accept--and that you
will, I hope, bring to the light by the diamonds and pearls of
your fingers.

Mr. Bessel therefore only has either to send me 1200 marks in
payment, or else to return me the manuscript without being
ashamed.

Most humble and constant homage.

F. Liszt

Rome, November 21st, 1885

When you have sent me word of the result of the negotiation with
Bessel, I will write my thanks and acknowledgments to Cui.

N.B.--The new shape should be printed as an Ossia, above the old
one.



372. To Camille Saint-Saens

Very honored Confrere and very dear Friend,

I shall certainly be in London the first week in April. With
regard to my visit to Paris I am still very undecided, as I do
not wish to expose myself to discomfiture like that which I had
to go through in '66. [Liszt's scruples were removed; as is well
known, he went to Paris, and found himself indescribably feted
there. The triumphs of his youth were repeated once more in the
evening of his life.]

Everywhere and always I shall be happy and proud  of your
collaboration, and remain your sincere admirer and devoted
friend,

F. Liszt

Rome (Hotel Alibert), November 28th, 1885

I shall remain here till the middle of January. This summer Mme.
Montigny [Mme. Montigny-Remaury, an excellent pianist; retired
into private life on her second marriage in Vienna] spoke to me
of her marriage, which has now taken place. M. de Serres gave me
the impression of an honest man who adores his wife. I have no
news of the newly married couple.

There is nothing more witty than your remark on the perpetual
youth of composers in Paris. In your company, dear friend, I
would gladly be of the party, in spite of my seventy-four years.



373. To Eugen d'Albert

[The most important and many-sided of the younger pupils of
Liszt]

Admired, Dear "Albertus Magnus,"

Thank you for the dedication of your worthy, noble, effective
Concerto, which I have again read through with special pleasure,
and heard played by Stavenhagen.

Is no edition of it for two pianofortes come out? I think such
editions are desirable--almost indispensable. They are also much
used now.

Congratulating you on your happiness in becoming a father, with
best regards to your wife,

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 26th, 1885



370. To Sophie Menter

Kind Diplomatist and Very Dear Friend,

I am writing my most humble thanks to the Grand Duke Constantine
for his gracious invitation, together with the very kindly
intentioned consideration of my age and failing eyesight--and
especially my unfitness for pianoforte playing and orchestral
conducting. This deters me from making any pretensions to a fee;
but you know, dear friend, that my small income would not be
sufficient to pay for lodging and a carriage in Petersburg. From
the 1st to the 12th April I am detained in London. If it is not
too late then, to Petersburg comes

Yours ever most faithfully,

F. Liszt

Rome, December 30th, 1885

In the middle of January I return to Budapest. Friendly greetings
to the New School, whom I will beg to assist me as a veritable
privy council in Petersburg. From the next letter of the Grand
Duke Constantine I await the decision whether my journey to
Petersburg in the middle of April is accepted or not.



375. To Eduard Reuss

My Dear Friend,

Still some slight alterations and amplifications in the "Concerto
pathetique."

The drum rhythm

[Here, Liszt illustrates with a 2-bar musical score excerpt]

appears to me too risky; if the drummer comes down plump on it
he will spoil the whole piece. Let's therefore put

[Here, Liszt illustrates with 3-bar musical score excerpt]

This rhythm will serve us twice as a transition,--and at the end.

Before the end of this month I shall be in Budapest, and at the
beginning of April in London, for the "Elizabeth" performance
(St. James's Hall) under Mackenzie's conducting.

Faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Rome, January 10th, 1886



376. To Walter Bache

My Very Dear Friend,

They seem determined in London to push me to the Piano.

I cannot consent to this in public, as my seventy-five-year-old
fingers are no longer suited to it, and Bulow, Saint-Satins,
Rubinstein, and you, dear Bache, play my compositions much better
than what is left of my humble self.

Perhaps it would be opportune if friend Hueffer would have the
kindness to let the public know, by a short announcement, that
Liszt only ventures to appear as a grateful visitor, and neither
in London nor anywhere else as a man with an interest in his
fingers.

In all friendship yours,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 11th, 1886



77. To the Countess Mercy-Argeneau

Very Admirable and Admired One [Tres admirable et admiree],

Your most amiable letter did not reach me without some delay, for
I took about ten days to make the journey from Rome to Budapest.

Madame Falk writes to me also of the concert at Liege, but I fear
I shall only have excuses to offer. On the 20th March I shall be
in Paris, where the "Gran Mass," too much criticised, and even
hissed by some low fellows (at the Pasdeloup concert in '66), is
to make its reappearance at St. Eustache on the 25th March. This
time M. Colonne will conduct it, and I am assured that it will be
better understood now...

Invariable homage,

F. Liszt

Budapest, February 17th, 1886

Very affectionate thanks for the invitation of Argenteau. Whether
I can avail myself of it must remain in abeyance for your very
humble servant, old and enfeebled.



378. To Sophie Menter

Dear and Respected Diplomatist,

Eight days before the 19th April (Russian style) I will be in
Petersburg. I entreat you to make as little ceremony as possible
for my humble self. The two programmes appear to me all right; I
will tell you when I get to Petersburg what my small part in them
will be. On the 19th April, then, "Elizabeth;" on the 23rd a
concert.--Tell the Committee to address their invitation to me,
for the two performances, to "Novello and Co., Music Publishers,
1, Berners Street, London." From the 1st to the 12th April I am
Novello's guest. How does it stand with regard to my lodging in
Petersburg, for which my inadequate means will not suffice?--From
you, dear friend, I shall expect to hear something definite in
London.--However honorable for me were the invitation to Warsaw I
could not comply with it now. My return to Weimar is requisite
before the end of May, on account of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung
at Sondershausen.

Heartily and truly yours,

F. Liszt

Argenteau [Liege], March 18th, 1886

Enclosed are some lines and the photographs that friend Zet
wished for.--To write anything further under the photographs for
the use of the newspaper I consider quite superfluous. Excess
does not suit me at all.--



379. To the Countess Mercy-Argenteau

Westwood House, Syndenham (Near London, Where Everything is
Distant).

Wednesday, April 14th, 1886

Very Dear President and Brave Russophile Propagandist,

The second performance of the "Elizabeth," which is fixed for
next Saturday, at the Crystal Palace, detains me here some days
longer than I had anticipated.

From Tuesday next till Easter Tuesday I have asked for the kind
hospitality of the Lynens (at Antwerp).

There is still some talk of the "Elizabeth" at the Trocadero on
the 30th April. If you were not to be there it would be an
affront to your very humble and admiring old servant,

F. Liszt

This time I shall stay at the Munkacsys' (Avenue Villiers, 53).

(In great haste.)



359. To Alexander Ritter in Meiningen

Antwerp, April 20th, 1886

My Very Dear Friend,

Heartfelt thanks for the dedication. Your "fauler Hans" [Ritter's
Opera, "Der faule Hans"--"Lazy Hans"] has nothing lazy in it.
With its graceful, refined wit it is excellent company for our
dear "Barber of Bagdad," which I shall shortly recommend Baron
Loen (Weimar) to take up again in conjunction with the "fauler
Hans."

Faithfully,

F. Liszt

In the middle of May I shall be back in Weimar. Give my
respectful greetings to your wife.



381. To Frau Amalie von Fabry

My Dear Friend,

I wish my rooms in Budapest to remain closed during my absence.
[Many inquisitive people were fond of going and having a look
round, so that Liszt was obliged to prohibit it.] For the rest,
His Excellency Minister Trefort must give his own commands. There
is no risk of his meeting with any opposition from my humble
self. I shall not pass this summer much quieter than the winter
and the spring. Next week I shall be at the Musical Festival at
Sondershausen; then here again until the 30th June.

My granddaughter, Daniela von Bulow, is to be married on the 3rd
July, at Bayreuth, to the highly esteemed Art-historian Thode.
After that, I shall stay from the 5th to the 18th July with my
dear, excellent friends the Munkacsys, at their castle of Colpach
(Luxemburg). I shall be present at the entire cycle of the
Parsifal and Tristan performances at Bayreuth, from the 20th July
till the 23rd August.

I am already more than half blind; perhaps I shall not have to
wait long for the rest...

Ever faithfully yours,

F. Liszt

Weimar, May 27th, 1886



382. To Madame Malwine Tardieu

Weimar, May 29th, 1886

My sight is going, dear friend, and I can no longer write without
difficulty.

Cordial thanks for your letter, and farewell till we meet at
Bayreuth, at the performances of Parsifal and Tristan.

Your very affectionate

F. Liszt

I shall be at Bayreuth on the 3rd July--the wedding day of my
granddaughter Daniela.

From the 4th to the 18th July my excellent friends the Munkacsys
will be my hosts at their castle of Colpach (Luxemburg), whence I
shall return to Bayreuth, to stay there till the last performance
on the 23rd August.

Would you send me Victor Hugo's "Le theater en liberte"? We will
settle our accounts at Bayreuth.



383. To Eduard Reuss

My Dear Friend,

The weakness in my eyes is increasing, and on that account I
cannot write to you "mano propria." I wish to bring good luck to
Wilhelm Franz. Meanwhile I thank you heartily for making me
godfather.

In sincere friendship yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Sondershausen, June 5th, 1886



384. To Frau Reuss-Belce, Opera-Singer to the Court of Baden

My Dear Lady,

The thanks which I have just expressed to your husband I double
to you, as you have played the principal part in the family-drama
of Wilhelm Franz.

With the most heartful wishes for the continued prosperity of
parents and child I remain

Yours most truly,

F. Liszt

Sondershausen, June 5th, 1886



385. To Eduard Reuss

Very Dear Friend,

I have just received the enclosed reply from Hartel. Send him,
therefore, the score with the Piano part, and recommend him to
print this complete score--not the orchestral score alone--if
possible by next October, that is to say, end of September. Then,
for the present, two copies of the complete score will be wanted
for performance--one for the conductor and one for the soloist
who has so long had to play the Piano part out of the score,
until you, perhaps with little delay, arrange the orchestral part
for a second Piano, and the Concerto comes out in an edition like
the E-flat Concerto.

Yours in all friendship,

F. Liszt

Weimar, June 22nd, 1886

N.B.--On the 1st July I am leaving here for a couple of months.



386. To Sophie Menter

Bayreuth, July 3rd, 1886

My very dear Friend,

Tomorrow, after the religious marriage of my granddaughter
Daniela von Bulow to Professor Henry Thode (Art-historian), I
betake myself to my excellent friends the Munkacsys, Chateau
Colpach, Grand Duchy of Luxemburg.

On the 20th July I shall be back here again for the first 7-8
performances of the Festspiel [Festival Play]: then, alas! I must
put myself under the, to me, very disagreeable cure at Kissingen,
and in September an operation to the eyes is impending for me
with Grafe at Halle.

For a month past I have been quite unable to read and almost
unable to write, with much labor, a couple of lines. Two
secretaries kindly help me by reading to me and writing letters
at my dictation.

How delightful it would be to me, dear friend, to visit you at
your fairy castle of Itter! But I do not see any opportunity of
doing so at present. Perhaps you will come to Bayreuth, where,
from the 20th July to the 7th August, will be staying

Your heartily sincere

F. Liszt

[This was the very last letter written by the Master's hand. He
returned in bad health from Colpach to Bayreuth. Yet once again
he heard "Parsifal" and "Tristan" then he lay down upon his
death-bed, and at 11 o'clock on the night of the 31st July his
great soul had passed away into everlasting peace.]



		******************************



Supplement of Some Letters Received During The Printing:



387 To Hofmarschall Freiherr Von Spiegel In Weimar

[Autograph in the Liszt-Museum at Weimar.]

Monsieur Le Grand Marechal,

I am very happy to learn through you that Her Imperial Highness
the Grand Duchess has deigned to accept with kindness my
translation of the beautiful work of Beethoven which I have
permitted myself humbly to offer to her. For musicians, the
original of this work marks the summit of perfection of the
classical style (an extremely arbitrary designation, in my
opinion) among non-symphonic instrumental compositions.
Beethoven--as well as many great geniuses in the history of Art--
is like the ancient Janus; one of his two faces is turned towards
the past, the other towards the future. The Septet to a certain
extent marks the point of intersection, and is thus unreservedly
admired both by the devotees of the past and the believers in the
future.

On this account I thought there was a suitability in paying my
respectful homage to Her Imperial Highness by means of it, until
such time as I should be allowed to place a longer work at her
feet, and one which will more particularly express my personal
gratitude.

It is only yesterday that the very flattering lines of Your
Excellency have reached me. It is therefore not my fault that I
have not sooner replied to the gracious request which you are
pleased to make me with reference to my journey to Weimar.

Without any doubt I eagerly accept Your Excellency's invitation
for the month of October. Allow me only to beg you to be so good
as to let me know whether you consider it will be best for me to
arrive at the beginning or end of the month. Not being entirely
master of my time, I should be particularly glad to know from you
the most favorable week.

I have the honor, Monsieur le Grand Marechal, to be, with
respect, Your Excellency's very humble and obedient servant,

F. Liszt

Paris, September 30th, 1841

19, Rue Pigalle (Permanent Address).



388. To Eugenio Gomez, Organist of the Cathedral at Seville

[Autograph, without address, in the Liszt-Museum in Weimar. The
addressee (born 1802) was both pianist and composer.]

You have been pleased, my dear Monsieur Gomez, to ask my
perfectly frank opinion of your "Melodies harmonisees," and-quite
frankly [Liszt uses the same expression--tout franc--in each
case.]--I am much embarrassed by it, for it is in vain I turn
them over and over again; on every side I find only compliments
to make you about them. It is true that you could not doubt their
sincerity any more than you could the real merit of your work. It
is needless to speak of the modesty of true talent; this modesty
cannot go to the extent of foolishness, and the Artist and
supreme Architect of the spheres gives us Himself the example of
this legitimate satisfaction which the consciousness of having
done well brings us, by rejoicing over His work each day of the
Creation.

One defect, nevertheless, and a very grave defect, which I have
discovered in your "Harmonies" by dint of searching, is, that
there are only 12 instead of 24 or 48--as all true lovers will
wish. Make haste, my dear Monsieur Gomez, set yourself to work,
and repair as quickly as possible this unpardonable defect in
your labor; and, while extending it to the utmost, think
sometimes of your most affectionate and devoted servant,

F. Liszt



389. To Madame(?).

[Autograph, without address, date, and conclusion, in the Liszt-
Museum at Weimar.]

[Sevilla, end of December, 1844]

You have not told me too much of the wonders of Seville, Madame,
and, nevertheless, you could hardly have told me beforehand of
that which I have found the most charming--the letter from
Mademoiselle Caroline. Thanks to her charming lines, I found
myself in the best possible frame of mind for the enjoyment of
all imaginable chefs d'oeuvre, and I could not have been more
disposed to admiration and wonderment! During the ten days which
I have just spent in Seville I have not allowed a single day to
pass without going to pay my very humble court to the cathedral,
that epic of granite, that architectural Symphony whose eternal
harmonies vibrate in infinity!--

One cannot use any set phrases about such a monument. The best
thing to do would be to kneel there with the faith of the
charcoal-burner (if one could do so), or to soar in thought the
length of these arches and vaulted roofs, for which it seems that
there is even now "no longer time"!--As for me, not feeling
myself enough of the charcoal-burner or of the eagle, I am
constrained to stand with my nose in the air and mouth open.
Nevertheless my prayer sometimes climbs up like useless ivy,
lovingly embracing those knotted shafts which defy all the storms
of the genius of Christianity.

Whatever you may think of my enthusiasm for your cathedral, it is
a fact that I have been entirely absorbed by it during the ten
days I have spent in Seville; so much so, that it was only on the
evening before my departure that I could prevail on myself to
visit the Alcazar.

In truth, if one might wish for the re-introduction of the
bastinado, it would be to apply it exclusively to those malicious
wretches who have dared to besmear so many ravishing flights of
fancy, so many fairy-like vagaries, with lime and plaster.

What adorable enchantment and what hideous devastation!

The heart expands--and then contracts at every step. Little do I
care for the gardens (which, by the way, slightly resemble the
ornamental gardens of a priest); little do I care even for the
baths of Maria Padilla, which, in fact, have slightly the effect
of an alkaline; but what outlines, what harmonious profusion in
these lines, what incredible voluptuousness in all this
ornamentation! Would that I could send them you in this envelope,
such as I have felt and devoured them with my eyes!

Here are, indeed, many marks of admiration, and you will
certainly smile at me, will you not, Madame? But what can I do?
And how, after that, can I speak to you of myself and my paltry
individuality?



390. To Madame (?)

[Autograph sketch of a letter, without address, date, and
conclusion, in the Liszt-Museum at Weimar.]

[Probably beginning of 1845]

What are your travelling plans for this winter, Madame? Mine are
quite unsettled. I did not succeed in leaving Spain, and the fact
is that, being well, there is no sense in searching for better
elsewhere.The only thing that provokes me is the necessity in
which I am placed of having to give up the rest of my duties at
Weymar for this winter. But I shall try to take a brilliant
revenge in the course of this very year.

In spite of our agreement I have not sent you the bulletin of my
peaceful victories in the arena of Madrid [Liszt gave concerts in
the Teatro del Circo in Madrid from October till December
1844.](and elsewhere), because you know that there are certain
things which are moreover very simple, but which I cannot do.
More than once, nevertheless, I have regretted you in your
founder's loge--the first in front--and I have turned to that
side in expectancy of the inciting bravos which used to begin
before all the others at the brilliant passages!

La Melinetti will doubtless have given you my ancient news from
Pau! Poor woman, with her luxury of a husband (a superfluity
which was not in the least a necessary thing for her), and her
little impulsive ways,...she has really promised me to be at
length reasonable, steady, and deliberate. I hope she will keep
her word. With a little wit, behavior, and tact, she could make
herself a very good position in Pau. Mme. d'Artigaux, [When
unmarried, as Countess Caroline St. Criq, sixteen years before
this time, she had possessed Liszt's whole heart, while hers
belonged to him. But the command of her father, Minister St.
Criq, separated eir ways, because he--was only an artist. Liszt
thought of her in his last Will, but she left this world before
him, at the beginning of the seventies.] who is the most ideally
good woman I know, takes a real interest in her. Several other
people sincerely wish her well--it only depends on herself to
take a good position there--but unfortunately she is too
outspoken, and inclined to play tricks.

What do you know of the elegaic and seraphic Chopin? I wrote a
few lines from Pau to Mme. Sand, but my letter hardly asked for a
reply, and she has, moreover, better things to do.



391. To Madame (?) in Milan

[Autograph in the Liszt-Museum in Weimar]

[1846]

I am at your feet, Madame, and kiss your hands--but it is
impossible not to quarrel with you, and that seriously, over the
last lines of your letter! Through what absence of mind, let me
ask you, could you have written to me, "I do not speak to you of
our affairs because I remember that your sympathies are not with
us"? Frankly, if you were to tell me that I have never played any
but false notes on the piano, and that my calling was that of a
retail grocer, this opinion would offer, to my thinking, a
greater degree of probability. Evidently, in my double character
of citizen and musician, I am not even to exonerate myself from
the fault you [ascribe] to me. Suffer me then not to dwell longer
upon it, and deign for the future to spare me the pain which all
suspicion of this kind would cause me.

Otherwise your letter was a great joy to me; first, as coming
from you; and then, as announcing the realization of a wish, an
idea, to the postponement of which I had resigned myself as well
as I could, but which I had hardly relinquished. Your
Sardanapalus comes in the nick of time, just as the 2000 francs
will be opportune to the poet. The mode of payment is very
simple. Belloni's sister being in Milan, she will have the honor
of calling upon you, and an return for the restoration of the
manuscript she will discharge the total of my debt, viz., two
thousand francs. Allow me only a last request, which is that you
will kindly take the trouble to read the whole libretto through
again, and, if it should be expedient, to communicate to the poet
direct any observations which you consider necessary. The notes
and commentaries which you have added on the margin of Rotondi's
libretto (which I keep very carefully) showed such a complete
virtuosity in this style of subject that one could not possibly
do better than submit with confidence to your decision.--[The
plan of composing an opera "Sardanapalus" occupied Liszt for
years.]

Thanks to God, and to this good star which has let me live many
years pretty uprightly, "as if I were immortal," as you put it,
behold me now since the end of September in last year entirely
out of the circle of concerts--and it does not seem likely that I
shall soon return to this drudgery.--I shall remain in Weymar
till the 15th August; then I shall go and make a tour in the
Crimea by way of the Danube, probably returning by Constantinople
if I can manage it.--

Next spring "Sardanapalus" will be ready,--and I shall perhaps
have to speak to you about another matter at the same time, a
matter about which it is worth while speaking to you.--

Be good enough to acknowledge the receipt of these lines; but
pray spare me abuse, and be pleased to do me the honor of
believing without reserve or restriction in the upright sincerity
of my sympathies, and in my frank and firm good-will to transform
them into acts or deeds, according to circumstances, in the
degree of which I am capable.

Yours ever, with admiration and friendship,

F. Liszt



392. To Frau Charlotte Moscheles (?)

[Draft of an undirected autograph letter in the Liszt-Museum at
Weimar.--Presumably written to the wife of the distinguished
piano-virtuoso and teacher Ignaz Moscheles]

I am most grateful to you, Madame, for wishing to keep me in
remembrance on the occasion of the publication of the Album of
Workers, and I hasten to reply as quickly and as well as I can.

I must, nevertheless, confess to you in all sincerity that I am a
little embarrassed as to the choice to be made among the number
of useless and unusable manuscripts which I should be charmed to
put at your kind disposal. After the Arbeiter Chor [workman's
chorus] and the Arbeiter Marsch [workman's march] with which I
have just gratified two Albums in Vienna, your gracious letter
comes as a surprise rather short of apropos. How malapropos, is
it not? But let us see how to remedy this.--

I thought first of a "Marche funebre" for the use of the bankers;
then of an "Elegie" dedicated to the idle; next of "Jeremiades
Omnibus" [lamentations for all];--but nothing of that sort quite
satisfies me.

In default of perfection, permit me to be satisfied with the
relative best (which will be, it seems to me, a better choice): a
Paraphrase--charitably adapted to the fingers of charitable
pianists who will have the charity to buy and to play it--of
Rossini's "Charite;" which I shall have the honor of sending to
you through Mr. Kistner early in July. An old saying of a very
old Father of the Church would, if needful, justify this choice.
"In things necessary, Unity; in matters doubtful, Liberty; in all
things, Charity!"--

Will you have the goodness, Madame, to remember me very kindly to
my excellent master and friend, Moscheles? and accept again, I
beg you, the expression of my respect, and of my most
affectionate sentiments.

F. Liszt

Weymar, June 22nd, 1848



393. To Heinrich Wilhelm Ernst

[Portions of this, as of the previous letter, were printed in the
"Voltaire."--Addressee the famous violin virtuoso and composer
(1814-1865)]

May 30th, 1849

Dear Friend,

Weymar has not forgotten you, and I hope soon to be able, after
the return of the Hereditary Prince whom we expect for the day of
his fete, by the 24th of May at the very latest, to forward to
you the token of the distinguished remembrance in which you are
held. It pleases me to think that it will be agreeable to you,
and that it will tend to attach you more in the sequel to people
worthy to appreciate you.

I should have desired to tell you sooner of this, but the
inevitable delays in present circumstances postpone more than one
wish.

After the deplorable days in Dresden Wagner came here, and only
departed again in order to escape from a warrant (lettre de
cachet) with which the Saxon government is pursuing him. I hope
that at the present moment he will have arrived safe and well in
Paris, where his career of dramatic composer cannot fail to be
extended, and in grand proportions. He is a man of evident
genius, who must of necessity obtrude himself on the general
admiration, and hold a high place in contemporary art. I regret
that you have not had the opportunity of hearing his
"Tannhauser," which is for me the most lyric of dramas, the most
remarkable, the most harmonious, the most complete, the most
original and selbstwurdig (the most worthy of its country), both
in foundation and form, that Germany has produced since
Weber. Belloni has, I believe, written to you on the subject of
Wagner, to ask for information as to the actual state of the
English Opera in London. I make no doubt that if it were possible
for Wagner to obtain from the directors a tour of performances in
the course of the year for a new work ("Lohengrin," the subject
of which, having reference to the Knights of the Round Table who
went to search for the Holy Grail, is of the most poetic
interest) he would make a great sensation and large receipts by
it. As soon as he tells me the news of his arrival in Paris,
allow me to induce him to write to you direct if his plans do not
change in this matter.



394. To Joseph Dessauer

[Draft of an autograph letter, without address, date, and
conclusion, in the Liszt-Museum at Weimar.]

[Probably at the beginning of the fifties.]

Heartiest thanks for your Songs. I rejoice that you consider me
worthy of a dedication, and I promise you that if we meet again I
will sing you the songs by heart. Perhaps you will bring me again
into such a mood for songs as will impel me to write something of
that sort. My earlier songs are mostly too ultra sentimental, and
frequently too full in the accompaniment.



395. Testimonial for Joachim Raff

[Draft of an autograph letter, without address and date, in the
Liszt-Museum at Weimar]

[Probably at the beginning of the fifties.]

The talents of M. Raff as composer and musician are a fact so
evident and certain, his recent orchestral compositions as well
as his works for voice and piano furnish such forcible proofs of
it, that I consider it superfluous to add to this evidence and to
certify it further.

Having had more opportunity than others, during the few years of
our intercourse, of appreciating his capacities (notably at the
time of the Musical Festival at Bonn for the inauguration of
Beethoven's monument in 1845,-and of those to Herder and Goethe
at Weymar in 1850, etc.), knowing thoroughly both the score of
his four-act Opera "King Alfred," given many times with great
success in Weymar under the author's conductorship, as well as
many of his manuscript works, which I sincerely esteem, I shall
always make it my duty seriously to recommend M. Raff to those of
the Musical Institutes which attach a value to the possession of
an intelligent director and one well acquainted with the
exigencies and the progress of the art.

F. Liszt



396. To Dr. Eduard Hanslick in Vienna

[The renowned musical author and critic (born in Prague in 1825),
professor of the history of music in the University of Vienna.--
The letter refers to the Mozart jubilee concert conducted by
Liszt in Vienna, and to Hanslick's critique, in which he censured
the want of courtesy with which Liszt, who had been invited to
conduct this concert, was treated by the committee and the
public.]

Sir,

The manner in which you have given an account in the Presse of
the two concerts of Sunday and Monday, corresponds entirely with
the opinion which I had of you--and you have proved yourself on
this occasion, according to your custom, an eminent critic and a
perfect gentleman. [The word "gentleman" is in English in Liszt's
letter.]

Permit me to offer you my sincere thanks for the part you have
been pleased to devote to me, and to hope that the coming years,
in bringing us more together, will better enable me to prove the
sincere sentiments of esteem and distinguished regard, the
assurance of which I beg you to accept.

F. Liszt

January 3lst, 1856



397. To the Austrian Minister of the Interior, Freiherr von Bach

[Autograph sketch of a letter in the Liszt-Museum at Weimar. The
Gran Mass was in fact engraved and published by the State
printing-press at Vienna.]

Your Excellency,

The interest and protection which your Excellency extends to the
spiritual interests of the empire permit me to bring forward the
wish and the petition that the Mass which I composed by order of
His Eminence the Prince Primate of Hungary for the Dedication-
Festival of the Basilica at Gran, and performed there on the 3lst
August, may be printed and published in full score and piano
score by the Royal Imperial State printing-press at the cost of
the State.

Without improperly praising my own composition I venture humbly
to express the confidence that the Catholic significance and
spirit which form its groundwork and supplement its modest
porportions would gradually be more propagated and comprehended
by the publication of the work, so that I might hope to have
furnished a not unworthy contribution to Christian Art as well as
to the great Church and Country's Festival of the 31st August.

In the expectation that my request will meet with that assisting
favor which is indispensable to earnest and honest artistic
effort, I have the honor to remain most obediently

Your Excellency's most humble and devoted servant,

F. Liszt

Vienna, September 18th, 1856



398. To (?) in Leipzig

[Draft of an autograph letter, without address, date, and
conclusion, in the Liszt-Museum at Weimar.--The contents refer to
the Orchestral Concert of the Tonkunstler-Versammlung, planned
and carried out at Leipzig in the beginning of June, 1859.]

[Spring, 1859.]

Dear Friend,

At the same time with your letter I received from Brendel fuller
information about the Leipzig preliminaries, to which he will
also receive a fuller reply.

I am not of opinion that the Orchestral concert is to be given up
immediately on account of the negative decision of Rietz. Very
possibly David will undertake to conduct it, and I advise Brendel
to come to a good understanding with him about it. On the other
hand it might be expected, in a case of necessity, that the
Weimar and Sondershausen orchestras would unite to carry out the
Programme. But this latter must be as strictly adhered to as was
formerly determined, and not lose its exclusive character as
"compositions by collaborators of the newspaper only"--Schumann,
Berlioz, Wagner, R. Franz, and lastly my humble self. I cannot
therefore in any respect agree to the concession enjoined by
Brendel, of admitting works of Haydn, Mozart, Beethoven, etc.,
nor do I see the motive of it. As far as the musical is
concerned, I consider it impossible to give such an exceedingly
rich programme on one evening without stupifying the public; that
would go beyond the ill-famed London concerts which last six
hours, not to speak of the fact that we should have to put the
recognised classics far too much in the shade!--But, above all,
such an over-loaded programme is thoroughly unsuitable to the
jubilee-celebration of the Neue Zeitschrift, which on this
occasion [ought] especially to emphasize its just claims and the
progress in Art which it aims at and supports. On this account it
is necessary to adhere to the limits of the programme originally
agreed upon.

Finally, in case insurmountable hindrances should arise to
prevent the carrying out of this same, I have no inclination to
substitute for the Orclaestral-concert one for Chamber-music. But
the word "Evening entertainment" must, as is self-evident, be
entirely dispensed with. Our business is to raise, to educate the
audience, not to amuse them; and if indeed, as Goethe very
pertinently says, "deep and earnest thinkers are in a bad
position as regards the public," we will therefore not so much
the less, but so much the more earnestly maintain this position.
Meanwhile it is advisable to advertise the first evening's
musical performance by the expression Concert in the Gewandhaus,
until we have quite decided whether it shall be a concert with
orchestra, or only with chamber-music. [An orchestral concert
took place in the theater, when compositions by Mendelssohn,
Schubert, and Chopin were, nevertheless, included among the
others.]

N.B.-Please not to communicate these remarks to any one except
perhaps Brendel, as the very outspoken opinions herein about the
Concert-programme must absolutely be kept secret.



399. To Dr. Eduard Hanslick

[The letter refers to Hanslick's notice of Liszt's book "Les
Bohemiens et leur musique," in the Vienna Presse (the old one).]

Sir,

Experience having taught me to regard as a fate attached to my
name the impossibility of publishing anything which does not
instantly gather round it opinions as contrary as they are
forcibly enunciated, I am, although quite accustomed to these
little storms, very sensitive to the kindly judgment of those
who, not letting themselves be influenced by this transitory
impulse, desire to take into consideration what I have written,
with sobriety and composure, just as you have done in your
account of my book "Des Bohemiens."-I am above all extremely
obliged to you for having admitted that, if the requirements of
my subject, and the opinion which after some twenty years of
reflection I have formed of Bohemian music, compel me to
attribute to a nomad people an art thoroughly imbued with a
poetry which could only have been developed in a wandering
nation, I have none the less endeavored to bring into prominence
everything for which this art is indebted to the comprehension
and taste which the Hungarians have always had for the music of
Bohemia. I desire in no way to diminish the merit of the works,
while at the same time I see the impossibility of considering as
emanating from them the expression of sentiments which could not
in their nature belong to them, however sympathetically they were
associated therewith.--

Still, the point which I notice first, in consequence of the very
violent and premature attacks of which I have been the object, is
not the one which I regard as the most important in my volume. As
a matter of fact it would signify little to me as artist to know
whether this music is originally from India or Tartary. That
which has appeared to me worthy the study of an artist is this
music itself, its meaning, and the feelings it is destined to
reproduce.--It is in trying clearly to account for these latter
that I have only found it possible to connect them with people
placed in the exceptional conditions of the Bohemians; and it is
through asking myself what the poetry of this wandering life
would be (a question so often raised), that I have become
convinced that it must be identical with that which breathes in
the Art of the Bohemians. This identity once made evident to my
mind, I have naturally sought to make it felt by and evident to
my readers. The better to succeed in this I have corroborated my
opinion by grouping together as a sort of complement various
suppositions about the question of these sources. But the
scientific side of this question has never been, in my eyes,
anything but very accessory; I should probably not have taken up
the pen to discuss it. If I have raised it, that has been the
consequence, not the aim of my work. Artist, and poet if you
like, I am only interested in seeing and describing the poetical
and psychological side of my thesis. I have sought in speech the
power of depicting, with less fire and allurement possibly, but
with more precision than music has done, some impressions which
are not derived from science or polemics-which come from the
heart and appeal to the imagination.

Poetical and descriptive prose being little used in Germany, I
can easily conceive that, on the announcement of the title of my
book, a set of lectures, rather than a kind of poem in prose,
will be expected. I own that I would never have attempted to
lecture on a subject the materials of which did not appear to me
sufficient for this purpose. How small a number of people,
moreover, would have been interested in learning the little which
it would be allowable to affirm in this case? Whilst the
expression of the innermost and deep feelings, whatever they be,
from the moment that they have been powerful enough to inspire an
art, is never entirely unattractive, even to the more extended
circle which includes not alone musicians, but all those who feel
and wish to understand music. Thanking you once more, Sir, for
the perfect impartiality and clearness with which you have stated
and criticised the compilation of my book, I beg you to accept
this expression of my complete esteem and distinguished
consideration.

F. Liszt

September 20th, 1859



END OF LETTERS OF FRANZ LISZT, VOL. II.



INFO ABOUT THIS E-TEXT EDITION

This volume of "Letters of Franz Liszt" is the second volume of a
2-volume set. The letters were selected by La Mara, and
translated into English by Constance Bache. The edition used was
an original 1894 Charles Scribner edition (New York), printed in
America. Each page was cut out of the book with an X-acto knife
and fed into an Automatic Document Feeder Scanner to make this e-
text; hence, the original book was, well, ruined in order to save
it.

Some adaptations from the original text were made while
formatting it for an e-text. Italics in the original book were
ignored in making this e-text, unless they referred to proper
nouns, in which case they are put in quotes in the e-text.
Italics are problematic because they are not easily rendered in
ASCII text, although, unlike in the first volume, they often add
some useful emphasis to Liszt's expression.

Almost everything occurring in brackets [ ] are original
footnotes inserted into the text. The marking .--. appeared in
the original volumes and indicates points where original material
in the letters was lost or fragmented.

Also, special German characters like U with an umlaut, and French
characters like a's and e's with various markings above them were
ignored, replaced with their closet single-letter equivalents. U
with an umlaut is U, A with a caret above it is A, and so on.
Words altered include Gotze, Tonkunstler, Gluck, Handel and
Bulow, among numerous others.

In addition, the English spellings of words like "honour,"
"colour," "humour," "splendour," "favour," "endeavour" "labour,"
"vigour," "neighbour" "saviour," "behaviour" and "theatre" were
changed into American equivalents like "honor," "color," "humor,"
"splendor," "favor," "endeavor" "labor," "vigor," "neighbor"
"savior," "behavior" and "theater."

This electronic text was prepared by John Mamoun with help from
numerous other proofreaders, including those associated with
Charles Franks' Distributed Proofreaders website. Thanks to M.
Fong, N. Harris, S. Morrison, J. Roberts, R. Zimmerman, P.
Rydzewski, D. McKee, R. Rowe, E. Beach, M. Beauchamp, K. Rieff,
D. Maddock, T. Mills, B. Wyman, J. Hyllegaard, T. McDermott, M.
Taylor, K. Peterson and several others for proof-reading.

This e-text is public domain, freely copyable and distributable
for any non-commercial purpose, and may be included without
royalty or permission on a mass media storage product, such as a
cd-rom, that contains at least 50 public domain electronic texts,
even if offered for commercial purposes. Any other commercial
usage requires permission. The biographical sketch was prepared
for this e-text and is also not copyright and is public domain.





Use of the Project Gutenberg Trademark requires separate
permission.






This etext was produced by Charles Franks, Robert Rowe and the
Online Distributed Proofreading Team.





A SECOND BOOK OF OPERAS

by Henry Edward Krehbiel




CONTENTS AND INDEX

CHAPTER I

BIBLICAL OPERAS

England and the Lord Chamberlain's censorship,
et Gounod's "Reine de Saba,"
The transmigrations of "Un Ballo in Maschera,"
How composers revamp their music,
et seq,--Handel and Keiser,
Mozart and Bertati,
Beethoven's readaptations of his own works,
Rossini and his "Barber of Seville,"
Verdi's "Nebuchadnezzar,"
Rossini's "Moses,"
"Samson et Dalila,"
Goldmark's "Konigin von Saba,"
The Biblical operas of Rubinstein,
Mehul's "Joseph,"
Mendelssohn's "Elijah" in dramatic form,
Oratorios and Lenten operas in Italy,
Carissimi and Peri,
Scarlatti's oratorios,
Scenery and costumes in oratorios,
The passage of the Red Sea and "Dal tuo stellato,"
Nerves wrecked by beautiful music,
"Peter the Hermit" and refractory mimic troops,
"Mi manca la voce" and operatic amenities,
Operatic prayers and ballets,
Goethe's criticism of Rossini's "Mose,"

CHAPTER, II

BIBLE STORIES IN OPERA AND ORATORIO

Dr. Chrysander's theory of the undramatic nature of the Hebrew, his
literature, and his life,
Hebrew history and Greek mythology,
Some parallels,
Old Testament subjects: Adam and Eve,
Cain and Abel,
The "Kain" of Bulthanpt and d' Albert,
"Tote Augen,"
Noah and the Deluge,
Abraham,
The Exodus,
Mehal's "Joseph,"
Potiphar's wife and Richard Strauss,
Raimondi's contrapuntal trilogy,
Nebuchadnezzar,
Judas Maccabseus,
Jephtha and his Daughter,
Judith,
Esther,
Athalia,

CHAPTER  III

RUBINSTEIN AND HIS "GEISTLICHE OPER"

Anton Rubinstein and his ideals,
An ambition to emulate Wagner,
The Tower of Babel,"
The composer's theories and strivings,
et seq.--Dean Stanley,
"Die Makkabaer,"
Sulamith,"
Christus,"
"Das verlorene Paradies,"
"Moses,"
Action and stage directions,
New Testament stories in opera,
The Prodigal Son,
Legendary material and the story of the Nativity,
Christ dramas,
Hebbel and Wagner,
Parsifal,"

CHAPTER IV

"SAMSON ET DALILA"

The predecessors of M. Saint-Saens,
Voltaire and Rameau,
Duprez and Joachim Raff,
History of Saint-Saens's opera,
et seq.--Henri Regnault,
First performances,
As oratorio and opera in New York,
An inquiry into the story of Samson,
Samson and Herakles,
The Hebrew hero in legend,
A true type for tragedy,
Mythological interpretations,
Saint-Saens's opera described,
et seq.--A choral prologue,
Local color,
The character of Dalila,
et seq.--Milton on her wifehood and patriotism,
"Printemps qui commence,"
"Mon coeur s'ouvre a ta voix,"
Oriental ballet music,
The catastrophe,

CHAPTER V

"DIE KONIGIN VON SABA"

Meritoriousness of the book of Goldmark's opera,
Its slight connection with Biblical story,
Contents of the drama
et seq.--Parallelism with Wagner's "Tannhauser,"
First performance in New York,
Oriental luxury in scenic outfit,
Goldmark's music,

CHAPTER VI

"HERODIADE"

Modern opera and ancient courtesans,
Transformed morals in Massenet's opera,
A sea-change in England,
Who and what was Salome?
Plot of the opera,
Scenic and musical adornments,
Performances in New York,
(footnote).

CHAPTER VII

"LAKME"

Story of the opera,
et seq.--The "Bell Song,"
Some unnecessary English ladies,
First performance in New York,
American history of the opera,
Madame Patti,
Miss Van Zandt
Madame Sembrich
Madame Tetrazzini,
Criticism of the drama,
The music,

CHAPTER VIII

"PAGLIACCI"

The twin operas, "Cavalleria rusticana" and "Pagliacci,"
Widespread influence of Mascagiii's opera,
It inspires an ambition in Leoncavallo,
History of his opera,
A tragic ending taken from real life,
et seq.--Controversy between Leoncavallo and Catulle Mendes,
et seq.--"La Femme de Tabarin,"
"Tabarin" operas,
The "Drama Nuevo" of Estebanez and Mr. Howells's "Yorick's Love,"
What is a Pagliaccio?
First performances of the opera in Milan and New York,
The prologue,
et seq.--The opera described,
et seq.--Bagpipes and vesper bells,
Harlequin's serenade,
The Minuet,
The Gavotte,
Plaudite, amici, la commedia finita est!"
Philip Hale on who should speak the final words,

CHAPTER IX

"CAVALLERIA RUSTICASTA"

How Mascagni's opera impressed the author when it was new,
Attic tragedy and Attic decorum,
The loathsome operatic brood which it spawned,
Not matched by the composer or his imitators since,
Mascagni's account of how it came to be written,
et seq.--Verga's story,
et seq.--Story and libretto compared,
The Siciliano,
The Easter hymn,
Analysis of the opera,
et seq.--The prelude,
Lola's stornello,
The intermezzo,
"They have killed Neighbor Turiddu!"

CHAPTEE X

THE CAREER OF MASCAGNI

Influence of "Cavalleria rusticana" on operatic composition,
"Santuzza," a German sequel,
Cilea's "Tilda,"
Giordano's "Mala Vita,"
Tasca's "A Santa Lucia,"
Mascagni's history,
et seq.--Composes Schiller's "Hymn to Joy,"
"Il Filanda,"
"Ratcliff,"
"L'Amico Fritz,"
"I Rantzau,"
"Silvano,"
"Zanetto,"
"Le Maschere,"
"Vistillia,"
"Arnica,"
Mascagni's American visit,

CHAPTEE XI

"IRIS"

The song of the sun,
Allegory and drama,
Story of the opera,
et seq.--The music,
et seq.--Turbid orchestration,
Local color,
Borrowings from Meyerbeer,

CHAPTER XII

"MADAMA BUTTERFLY"

The opera's ancestry,
Loti's "Madame Chrysantheme,"
John Luther Long's story,
David Belasco's play,
How the failure of "Naughty Anthony" suggested "Madame Butterfly,"
William Furst and his music,
Success of Mr. Belasco's play in New York,
The success repeated in London,
Brought to the attention of Signor Puccini,
Ricordi and Co. and their librettists,
"Madama Butterfly" fails in Milan,
The first casts in Milan, Brescia, and New York,
(footnote)
Incidents of the fiasco,
Rossini and Puccini,
The opera revised,
Interruption of the vigil, Story of the opera,
et seq.--The hiring of wives in Japan,
Experiences of Pierre Loti,
Geishas and mousmes,
A changed denouement,
Messager's opera, "Madame Chrysantheme,"
The end of Loti's romance,
Japanese melodies in the score,
Puccini's method and Wagner's,
"The Star-Spangled Banner,"
A tune from "The Mikado,"
Some of the themes of Puccini and William Furst,

CHAPTEE XIII

"DER ROSENKAVALIER"

The opera's predecessors, "Guntram," "Feuersnot," "Salome,"
Oscar Wilde makes a mistaken appeal to France,
His necrophilism welcomed by Richard Strauss and Berlin,
Conried's efforts to produce "Salome" at the Metropolitan Opera
Blouse suppressed,
Hammerstein produces the work,
"Elektra,"
Hugo von HofEmannsthal and Beaumarchais,
Strauss and Mozart,
Mozart's themes and Strauss's waltzes,
Dancing in Vienna at the time of Maria Theresa,
First performance of the opera at New York,
"Der Rosenkavalier" and "Le Nozze di Figaro,"
Criticism of the play and its music,
et seq.--Use of a melodic phrase from "Die Zauberflote,"
The language of the libretto,
The music,
Cast of the first American performance,
(footnote)

CHAPTER XIV

"KONIGSKINDER"

Story of the play,
et seq.--First production of Hummerdinck's opera and cast,
Earlier performance of the work as a melodrama,
Author and composer,
Opera and melodrama in Germany,
Wagnerian symbolism and music,
"Die Meistersinger" recalled,
Hero and Leander,
Humperdinck's music,

CHAPTER XV

"BORIS GODOUNOFF"

First performance of Moussorgsky's opera in New York,
Participation of the chorus in the tragedy,
Imported French enthusiasm,
Vocal melody, textual accents and rhythms,
Slavicism expressed in an Italian translation,
Moussorgsky and Debussy,
Political reasons for French enthusiasm,
Rimsky-Korsakoff's revision of the score,
Russian operas in America,
"Nero," "Pique Dame," "Eugene Onegin,"
Verstoffeky's "Askold's Tomb,"
The nationalism of "Boris Godounoff,"
The Kolydda song "Slava" and Beethoven,
Lack of the feminine element in the drama,
The opera's lack of coherency,
Cast of the first American performance,

CHAPTER XVI

"MADAME SANS-GENE" AND OTHER OPERAS BY GIORDANO

First performance of "Madame Sans-Gene,"
A singing Napoleon,
Royalties in opera,
Henry the Fowler, King Mark, Verdi's Pharaoh, Herod, Boris Godounoff, Macbeth,
Gustavus and some mythical kings and dukes,
et seq.--Mattheson's "Boris,"
Peter the Great,
Sardou's play and Giordano's opera,
Verdi on an operatic Bonaparte,
Sardou's characters,
"Andrea Chenier,"
French Rhythms,
"Fedora,"
"Siberia,"
The historic Chenier,
Russian local color,
"Schone Minka,"
"Slava,"
"Ay ouchnem,"
French revolutionary airs,
"La Marseillaise,"
"La Carmagnole,"
"Ca ira,"

CHAPTER XVII

TWO OPERAS BY WOLF-FERRARI

The composer's operas first sung in their original tongue in America,
First performances of "Le Donne Curiose," "Il Segreto di Susanna," "I
Giojelli della Madonna," "L'Amore Medico,"
Story and music of "Le Donne Curiose,"
Methods and apparatus of Mozart's day,
Wolf-Ferrari's Teutonism,
Goldoni paraphrased,
Nicolai and Verdi,
The German version of "Donne Curiose,"
Musical motivi in the opera,
Rameau's "La Poule,"
Cast of the first performance in New York,
(footnote)--Naples and opera,
"I Giojelli della Madonna,"
et seq.--Erlanger's "Aphrodite,"
Neapolitan folksongs,
Wolf-Ferrari's individuality,
His "Vita Nuova,"
First performance in America of I Giojelli,"



CHAPTER I

BIBLICAL OPERAS


Whether or not the English owe a grudge to their Lord Chamberlain
for depriving them of the pleasure of seeing operas based on
Biblical stories I do not know. If they do, the grudge cannot be a
deep one, for it is a long time since Biblical operas were in
vogue, and in the case of the very few survivals it has been easy
to solve the difficulty and salve the conscience of the public
censor by the simple device of changing the names of the characters
and the scene of action if the works are to be presented on the
stage, or omitting scenery, costumes and action and performing them
as oratorios. In either case, whenever this has been done, however,
it has been the habit of critics to make merry at the expense of my
Lord Chamberlain and the puritanicalness of the popular spirit of
which he is supposed to be the official embodiment, and to
discourse lugubriously and mayhap profoundly on the perversion of
composers' purposes and the loss of things essential to the lyric
drama.

It may be heretical to say so, but is it not possible that Lord
Chamberlain and Critic have both taken too serious a view of the
matter? There is a vast amount of admirable material in the Bible
(historical, legendary or mythical, as one happens to regard it),
which would not necessarily be degraded by dramatic treatment, and
which might be made entertaining as well as edifying, as it has
been made in the past, by stage representation. Reverence for this
material is neither inculcated nor preserved by shifting the scene
and throwing a veil over names too transparent to effect a
disguise. Moreover, when this is done, there is always danger that
the process may involve a sacrifice of the respect to which a work
of art is entitled on its merits as such. Gounod, in collaboration
with Barbier and Carre, wrote an opera entitled "La Reine de Saba."
The plot had nothing to do with the Bible beyond the name of
Sheba's Queen and King Solomon. Mr. Farnie, who used to make comic
operetta books in London, adapted the French libretto for
performance in English and called the opera "Irene." What a title
for a grand opera! Why not "Blanche" or "Arabella"? No doubt such a
thought flitted through many a careless mind unconscious that an
Irene was a Byzantine Empress of the eighth century, who, by her
devotion to its tenets, won beatification after death from the
Greek Church. The opera failed on the Continent as well as in
London, but if it had not been given a comic operetta flavor by its
title and association with the name of the excellent Mr. Farnie,
would the change in supposed time, place and people have harmed it?

A few years ago I read (with amusement, of course) of the
metamorphosis to which Massenet's "Herodiade" was subjected so that
it might masquerade for a brief space on the London stage; but when
I saw the opera in New York "in the original package" (to speak
commercially), I could well believe that the music sounded the same
in London, though John the Baptist sang under an alias and the
painted scenes were supposed to delineate Ethiopia instead of
Palestine.

There is a good deal of nonsensical affectation in the talk about
the intimate association in the minds of composers of music, text,
incident, and original purpose. "Un Ballo in Maschera," as we see
it most often nowadays, plays in Nomansland; but I fancy that its
music would sound pretty much the same if the theatre of action
were transplanted back to Sweden, whence it came originally, or
left in Naples, whither it emigrated, or in Boston, to which highly
inappropriate place it was banished to oblige the Neapolitan
censor. So long as composers have the habit of plucking feathers
out of their dead birds to make wings for their new, we are likely
to remain in happy and contented ignorance of mesalliances between
music and score, until they are pointed out by too curious critics
or confessed by the author. What is present habit was former custom
to which no kind or degree of stigma attached. Bach did it; Handel
did it; nor was either of these worthies always scrupulous in
distinguishing between meum and tuum when it came to appropriating
existing thematic material. In their day the merit of individuality
and the right of property lay more in the manner in which ideas
were presented than in the ideas themselves.

In 1886 I spent a delightful day with Dr. Chrysander at his home in
Bergedorf, near Hamburg, and he told me the story of how on one
occasion, when Keiser was incapacitated by the vice to which he was
habitually prone, Handel, who sat in his orchestra, was asked by
him to write the necessary opera. Handel complied, and his success
was too great to leave Keiser's mind in peace. So he reset the
book. Before Keiser's setting was ready for production Handel had
gone to Italy. Hearing of Keiser's act, he secured a copy of the
new setting from a member of the orchestra and sent back to Hamburg
a composition based on Keiser's melodies "to show how such themes
ought to be treated." Dr. Chrysander, also, when he gave me a copy
of Bertati's "Don Giovanni" libretto, for which Gazzaniga composed
the music, told me that Mozart had been only a little less free
than the poet in appropriating ideas from the older work.

One of the best pieces in the final scene of "Fidelio" was taken
from a cantata on the death of the emperor of Austria, composed by
Beethoven before he left Bonn. The melody originally conceived for
the last movement of the Symphony in D minor was developed into the
finale of one of the last string quartets. In fact the instances in
which composers have put their pieces to widely divergent purposes
are innumerable and sometimes amusing, in view of the fantastic
belief that they are guided by plenary inspiration. The overture
which Rossini wrote for his "Barber of Seville" was lost soon after
the first production of the opera. The composer did not take the
trouble to write another, but appropriated one which had served its
purpose in an earlier work. Persons ignorant of that fact, but with
lively imaginations, as I have said in one of my books, ["A Book of
Operas," p. 9] have rhapsodized on its appositeness, and professed
to hear in it the whispered plottings of the lovers and the merry
raillery of Rosina contrasted with the futile ragings of her grouty
guardian; but when Rossini composed this piece of music its mission
was to introduce an adventure of the Emperor Aurelianus in Palmyra
in the third century of the Christian era. Having served that
purpose it became the prelude to another opera which dealt with
Queen Elizabeth of England, a monarch who reigned some twelve
hundred years after Aurelianus. Again, before the melody now known
as that of Almaviva's cavatina had burst into the efflorescence
which now distinguishes it, it came as a chorus from the mouths of
Cyrus and his Persians in ancient Babylon.

When Mr. Lumley desired to produce Verdi's "Nabucodonosor" (called
"Nabucco" for short) in London in 1846 he deferred to English
tradition and brought out the opera as "Nino, Re d'Assyria." I
confess that I cannot conceive how changing a king of Babylon to a
king of Assyria could possibly have brought about a change one way
or the other in the effectiveness of Verdi's Italian music, but Mr.
Lumley professed to have found in the transformation reason for the
English failure. At any rate, he commented, in his "Reminiscences
of the Opera," "That the opera thus lost much of its original
character, especially in the scene where the captive Israelites
became very uninteresting Babylonians, and was thereby shorn of one
element of success present on the Continent, is undeniable."

There is another case even more to the purpose of this present
discussion. In 1818 Rossini produced his opera "Mose in Egitto" in
Naples. The strength of the work lay in its choruses; yet two of
them were borrowed from the composer's "Armida." In 1822 Bochsa
performed it as an oratorio at Covent Garden, but, says John Ebers
in his "Seven Years of the King's Theatre," published in 1828, "the
audience accustomed to the weighty metal and pearls of price of
Handel's compositions found the 'Moses' as dust in the balance in
comparison." "The oratorio having failed as completely as erst did
Pharaoh's host," Ebers continues, "the ashes of 'Mose in Egitto'
revived in the form of an opera entitled 'Pietro l'Eremita.' Moses
was transformed into Peter. In this form the opera was as
successful as it had been unfortunate as an oratorio.... 'Mose in
Egitto' was condemned as cold, dull, and heavy. 'Pietro l'Eremita,'
Lord Sefton, one of the most competent judges of the day,
pronounced to be the most effective opera produced within his
recollection; and the public confirmed the justice of the remark,
for no opera during my management had such unequivocal success."
[Footnote: "Seven Years of the King's Theatre," by John Ebers, pp.
157, 158.] This was not the end of the opera's vicissitudes, to
some of which I shall recur presently; let this suffice now:

Rossini rewrote it in 1827, adding some new music for the Academie
Royal in Paris, and called it "Moise"; when it was revived for the
Covent Garden oratorios, London, in 1833, it was not only performed
with scenery and dresses, but recruited with music from Handel's
oratorio and renamed "The Israelites in Egypt; or the Passage of
the Red Sea"; when the French "Moise" reached the Royal Italian
Opera, Covent Garden, in April, 1850, it had still another name,
"Zora," though Chorley does not mention the fact in his "Thirty
Years' Musical Recollections," probably because the failure of the
opera which he loved grieved him too deeply. For a long time
"Moses" occupied a prominent place among oratorios. The Handel and
Haydn Society of Boston adopted it in 1845, and between then and
1878 performed it forty-five times.

In all the years of my intimate association with the lyric drama
(considerably more than the number of which Mr. Chorley has left us
a record) I have seen but one opera in which the plot adheres to
the Biblical story indicated by its title. That opera is Saint-
Saens's "Samson et Dalila." I have seen others whose titles and
dramatis personae suggested narratives found in Holy Writ, but in
nearly all these cases it would be a profanation of the Book to
call them Biblical operas. Those which come to mind are Goldmark's
"Konigin von Saba," Massenet's "Herodiade" and Richard Strauss's
"Salome." I have heard, in whole or part, but not seen, three of
the works which Rubinstein would fain have us believe are operas,
but which are not--"Das verlorene Paradies," "Der Thurmbau zu
Babel" and "Moses"; and I have a study acquaintance with the books
and scores of his "Maccabaer," which is an opera; his "Sulamith,"
which tries to be one, and his "Christus," which marks the
culmination of the vainest effort that a contemporary composer made
to parallel Wagner's achievement on a different line. There are
other works which are sufficiently known to me through library
communion or concert-room contact to enable me to claim enough
acquaintanceship to justify converse about them and which must
perforce occupy attention in this study. Chiefest and noblest of
these are Rossini's "Moses" and Mehul's "Joseph." Finally, there
are a few with which I have only a passing or speaking
acquaintance; whose faces I can recognize, fragments of whose
speech I know, and whose repute is such that I can contrive to
guess at their hearts--such as Verdi's "Nabucodonosor" and Gounod's
"Reine de Saba."

Rossini's "Moses" was the last of the Italian operas (the last by a
significant composer, at least) which used to be composed to ease
the Lenten conscience in pleasure-loving Italy. Though written to
be played with the adjuncts of scenery and costumes, it has less of
action than might easily be infused into a performance of
Mendelssohn's "Elijah," and the epical element which finds its
exposition in the choruses is far greater than that in any opera of
its time with which I am acquainted. In both its aspects, as
oratorio and as opera, it harks back to a time when the two forms
were essentially the same save in respect of subject matter. It is
a convenient working hypothesis to take the classic tragedy of
Hellas as the progenitor of the opera. It can also be taken as the
prototype of the Festival of the Ass, which was celebrated as long
ago as the twelfth century in France; of the miracle plays which
were performed in England at the same time; the Commedia
spiritiuale of thirteenth-century Italy and the Geistliche
Schauspiele of fourteenth-century Germany. These mummeries with
their admixture of church song, pointed the way as media of
edification to the dramatic representations of Biblical scenes
which Saint Philip Neri used to attract audiences to hear his
sermons in the Church of St. Mary in Vallicella, in Rome, and the
sacred musical dramas came to be called oratorios. While the
camerata were seeking to revive the classic drama in Florence,
Carissimi was experimenting with sacred material in Rome, and his
epoch-making allegory, "La Rappresentazione dell' Anima e del
Corpo," was brought out, almost simultaneously with Peri's
"Euridice," in 1600. Putting off the fetters of plainsong, music
became beautiful for its own sake, and as an agent of dramatic
expression. His excursions into Biblical story were followed for a
century or more by the authors of sacra azione, written to take the
place of secular operas in Lent. The stories of Jephtha and his
daughter, Hezekiah, Belshazzar, Abraham and Isaac, Jonah, Job, the
Judgment of Solomon, and the Last Judgment became the staple of
opera composers in Italy and Germany for more than a century.
Alessandro Scarlatti, whose name looms large in the history of
opera, also composed oratorios; and Mr. E. J. Dent, his biographer,
has pointed out that "except that the operas are in three acts and
the oratorios in two, the only difference is in the absence of
professedly comic characters and of the formal statement in which
the author protests that the words fata, dio, dieta, etc., are only
scherzi poetici and imply nothing contrary to the Catholic faith."
Zeno and Metastasio wrote texts for sacred operas as well as
profane, with Tobias, Absalom, Joseph, David, Daniel, and Sisera as
subjects.

Presently I shall attempt a discussion of the gigantic attempt made
by Rubinstein to enrich the stage with an art-form to which he gave
a distinctive name, but which was little else than, an inflated
type of the old sacra azione, employing the larger apparatus which
modern invention and enterprise have placed at the command of the
playwright, stage manager, and composer. I am compelled to see in
his project chiefly a jealous ambition to rival the great and
triumphant accomplishment of Richard Wagner, but it is possible
that he had a prescient eye on a coming time. The desire to combine
pictures with oratorio has survived the practice which prevailed
down to the beginning of the nineteenth century. Handel used scenes
and costumes when he produced his "Esther," as well as his "Acis
and Galatea," in London. Dittersdorf has left for us a description
of the stage decorations prepared for his oratorios when they were
performed in the palace of the Bishop of Groswardein. Of late years
there have been a number of theatrical representations of
Mendelssohn's "Elijah." I have witnessed as well as heard a
performance of "Acis and Galatea" and been entertained with the
spectacle of Polyphemus crushing the head of presumptuous Acis with
a stave like another Fafner while singing "Fly, thou massy ruin,
fly" to the bludgeon which was playing understudy for the fatal
rock.

This diverting incident brings me to a consideration of one of the
difficulties which stand in the way of effective stage pictures
combined with action in the case of some of the most admired of the
subjects for oratorios or sacred opera. It was not the Lord
Chamberlain who stood in the way of Saint-Saens's "Samson et
Dalila" in the United States for many years, but the worldly wisdom
of opera managers who shrank from attempting to stage the spectacle
of the falling Temple of Dagon, and found in the work itself a
plentiful lack of that dramatic movement which is to-day considered
more essential to success than beautiful and inspiriting music.
"Samson et Dalila" was well known in its concert form when the
management of the Metropolitan Opera House first attempted to
introduce it as an opera. It had a single performance in the season
of 1894-1895 and then sought seclusion from the stage lamps for
twenty years. It was, perhaps, fortunate for the work that no
attempt was made to repeat it, for, though well sung and
satisfactorily acted, the toppling of the pillars of the temple,
discreetly supported by too visible wires, at the conclusion made a
stronger appeal to the popular sense of the ridiculous than even
Saint-Saens's music could withstand. It is easy to inveigh against
the notion frivolous fribbles and trumpery trappings receive more
attention than the fine music which ought to be recognized as the
soul of the work, the vital spark which irradiates an
inconsequential material body; but human nature has not yet freed
itself sufficiently from gross clogs to attain so ideal an
attitude.

It is to a danger similar to that which threatened the original New
York "Samson" that the world owes the most popular melody in
Rossini's "Mose." The story is old and familiar to the students of
operatic history, but will bear retelling. The plague of darkness
opens the opera, the passage of the Red Sea concludes it. Rossini's
stage manager had no difficulty with the former, which demanded
nothing more than the lowering of the stage lights. But he could
evolve no device which could save the final miracle from laughter.
A hilarious ending to so solemn a work disturbed the management and
the librettist, Totola, who, just before a projected revival in
Naples, a year or two after the first production, came to the
composer with a project for saving the third act. Rossini was in
bed, as usual, and the poet showed him the text of the prayer, "Dal
tuo stellato," which he said he had written in an hour. "I will get
up and write the music," said Rossini; "you shall have it in a
quarter of an hour." And he kept his word, whether literally or not
in respect of time does not matter. When the opera was again
performed it contained the chorus with its melody which provided
Paganini with material for one of his sensational performances on
the G-string.

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

Carpani tells the story and describes the effect upon the audience
which heard it for the first time. Laughter was just beginning in
the pit when the public was surprised to note that Moses was about
to sing. The people stopped laughing and prepared to listen. They
were awed by the beauty of the minor strain which was echoed by
Aaron and then by the chorus of Israelites. The host marched across
the mimic sea and fell on its knees, and the music burst forth
again, but now in the major mode. And now the audience joined in
the jubilation. The people in the boxes, says Carpani, stood up;
they leaned over the railings; applauded; they shouted: "Bello!
bello! O che bello!" Carpani adds: "I am almost in tears when I
think of this prayer." An impressionable folk, those Italians of
less than a century ago. "Among other things that can be said in
praise of our hero," remarked a physician to Carpani, amidst the
enthusiasm caused by the revamped opera, "do not forget that he is
an assassin. I can cite to you more than forty attacks of nervous
fever or violent convulsions on the part of young women, fond to
excess of music, which have no other origin than the prayer of the
Hebrews in the third act with its superb change of key!"

Thus music saved the scene in Naples. When the opera was rewritten
for London and made to tell a story about Peter the Hermit, the
corresponding scene had to be elided after the first performance.
Ebers tells the story: "A body of troops was supposed to pass over
a bridge which, breaking, was to precipitate them into the water.
The troops being made of basketwork and pulled over the bridge by
ropes, unfortunately became refractory on their passage, and very
sensibly refused, when the bridge was about to give way, to proceed
any further; consequently when the downfall of the arches took
place the basket men remained very quietly on that part of the
bridge which was left standing, and instead of being consigned to
the waves had nearly been set on fire. The audience, not giving the
troops due credit for their prudence, found no little fault with
their compliance with the law of self-preservation. In the
following representations of the opera the bridge and basket men
which, en passant (or en restant rather), had cost fifty pounds,
were omitted." [Footnote: Op. cit., p. 160] When "Moise" was
prepared in Paris 45,000 francs were sunk in the Red Sea.

I shall recur in a moment to the famous preghiera but, having
Ebers' book before me, I see an anecdote so delightfully
illustrative of the proverbial spirit of the lyric theatre that I
cannot resist the temptation to repeat it. In the revised "Moses"
made for Paris there occurs a quartet beginning "Mi manca la voce"
("I lack voice") which Chorley describes as "a delicious round."
Camporese had to utter the words first and no sooner had she done
so than Ronzi di Begnis, in a whisper, loud enough to be heard by
her companion, made the comment "E vero!" ("True!")--"a remark,"
says Mr. Ebers, "which produced a retort courteous somewhat more
than verging on the limit of decorum, though not proceeding to the
extremity asserted by rumor, which would have been as inconsistent
with propriety as with the habitual dignity and self-possession of
Camporese's demeanor."

Somebody, I cannot recall who, has said that the success of "Dal
tuo stellato" set the fashion of introducing prayers into operas.
Whether this be true or not, it is a fact that a prayer occurs in
four of the operas which Rossini composed for the Paris Grand Opera
and that the formula is become so common that it may be set down as
an operatic convention, a convention, moreover, which even the
iconoclast Wagner left undisturbed. One might think that the
propriety of prayer in a religious drama would have been enforced
upon the mind of a classicist like Goethe by his admiration for the
antique, but it was the fact that Rossini's opera showed the
Israelites upon their knees in supplication to God that set the
great German poet against "Mose." In a conversation recorded by
Eckermann as taking place in 1828, we hear him uttering his
objection to the work: "I do not understand how you can separate
and enjoy separately the subject and the music. You pretend here
that the subject is worthless, but you are consoled for it by a
feast of excellent music. I wonder that your nature is thus
organized that your ear can listen to charming sounds while your
sight, the most perfect of your senses, is tormented by absurd
objects. You will not deny that your 'Moses' is in effect very
absurd. The curtain is raised and people are praying. This is all
wrong. The Bible says that when you pray you should go into your
chamber and close the door. Therefore, there should be no praying
in the theatre. As for me, I should have arranged a wholly
different 'Moses.' At first I should have shown the children of
Israel bowed down by countless odious burdens and suffering from
the tyranny of the Egyptian rulers. Then you would have appreciated
more easily what Moses deserved from his race, which he had
delivered from a shameful oppression." "Then," says Mr. Philip
Hale, who directed my attention to this interesting passage,
"Goethe went on to reconstruct the whole opera. He introduced, for
instance, a dance of the Egyptians after the plague of darkness was
dispelled."

May not one criticise Goethe? If he so greatly reverenced prayer,
according to its institution under the New Dispensation, why did he
not show regard also for the Old and respect the verities of
history sufficiently to reserve his ballet till after the passage
of the Red Sea, when Moses celebrated the miracle with a song and
"Miriam, the prophetess, the sister of Aaron, took a timbrel in her
hand; and all the women went out after her with timbrels and with
dances"?




CHAPTER II

BIBLE STORIES IN OPERA AND ORATORIO


It was the fond belief of Dr. Chrysander, born of his deep devotion
to Handel, in whose works he lived aud moved and had his being,
that the heroic histories of the Jews offered no fit material for
dramatic representation. In his view the Jews never created
dramatic poetry, partly because of the Mosaic prohibition against
plastic delineation of their Deity, partly because the tragic
element, which was so potent an influence in the development of the
Greek drama, was wanting in their heroes. The theory that the Song
of Songs, that canticle of canticles of love, was a pastoral play
had no lodgment in his mind; the poem seemed less dramatic to him
than the Book of Job. The former sprang from the idyllic life of
the northern tribes and reflected that life; the latter, much more
profound in conception, proved by its form that the road to a real
stage-play was insurmountably barred to the Hebrew poet. What
poetic field was open to him then? Only the hymning of a Deity,
invisible, omnipresent and omnipotent, the swelling call to combat
for the glory of God against an inimical world, and the celebration
of an ideal consisting in a peaceful, happy existence in the Land
of Promise under God's protecting care. This God presented Himself
occasionally as a militant, all-powerful warrior, but only in
moments when the fortunes of His people were critically at issue.
These moments, however, were exceptional and few; as a rule, God
manifested Himself in prophecy, through words and music. The laws
were promulgated in song; so were the prophetic promises,
denunciations, and calls to repentance; and there grew up a
magnificent liturgical service in the temple.

Hebrew poetry, epic and lyrical, was thus antagonistic to the
drama. So, also, Dr. Chrysander contends, was the Hebrew himself.
Not only had he no predilection for plastic creation, his life was
not dramatic in the sense illustrated in Greek tragedy. He lived a
care-free, sensuous existence, and either fell under righteous
condemnation for his transgressions or walked in the way prescribed
of the Lord and found rest at last in Abraham's bosom. His life was
simple; so were his strivings, his longings, his hopes. Yet when it
came to the defence or celebration of his spiritual possessions his
soul was filled with such a spirit of heroic daring, such a glow of
enthusiasm, as are not to be paralleled among another of the
peoples of antiquity. He thus became a fit subject for only one of
the arts--music; in this art for only one of its spheres, the
sublime, the most appropriate and efficient vehicle of which is the
oratorio.

One part of this argument seems to me irrelevant; the other not
firmly founded in fact. It does not follow that because the Greek
conscience evolved the conceptions of rebellious pride and punitive
Fate while the Hebrew conscience did not, therefore the Greeks were
the predestined creators of the art-form out of which grew the
opera and the Hebrews of the form which grew into the oratorio.
Neither is it true that because a people are not disposed toward
dramatic creation themselves they can not, or may not, be the cause
of dramatic creativeness in others. Dr. Chrysander's argument, made
in a lecture at the Johanneum in Hamburg in 1896, preceded an
analysis of Handel's Biblical oratorios in their relation to Hebrew
history, and his exposition of that history as he unfolded it
chronologically from the Exodus down to the Maccabaean period was
in itself sufficient to furnish many more fit operatic plots than
have yet been written. Nor are there lacking in these stories some
of the elements of Greek legend and mythology which were the
mainsprings of the tragedies of Athens. The parallels are striking:
Jephtha's daughter and Iphigenia; Samson and his slavery and the
servitude of Hercules and Perseus; the fate of Ajax and other
heroes made mad by pride, and the lycanthropy of Nebuchadnezzar, of
whose vanity Dr. Hanslick once reminded Wagner, warning him against
the fate of the Babylonian king who became like unto an ox, "ate
grass and was composed by Verdi"; think reverently of Alcestis and
the Christian doctrine of atonement!

The writers of the first Biblical operas sought their subjects as
far back in history, or legend, as the written page permitted.
Theile composed an "Adam and Eve" in 1678; but our first parents
never became popular on the serious stage. Perhaps the fearful soul
of the theatrical costumer was frightened and perplexed by the
problem which the subject put up to him. Haydn introduced them into
his oratorio "The Creation," but, as the custom goes now, the third
part of the work, in which they appear, is frequently, if not
generally omitted in performance. Adam, to judge by the record in
Holy Writ, made an uneventful end: "And all the days that Adam
lived were nine hundred and thirty years: and he died"; but this
did not prevent Lesueur from writing an opera on his death ten
years after Haydn's oratorio had its first performance. He called
it "La Mort d'Adam et son Apotheose," and it involved him in a
disastrous quarrel with the directors of the Conservatoire and the
Academie. Pursuing the search chronologically, the librettists next
came upon Cain and Abel, who offered a more fruitful subject for
dramatic and musical invention. We know very little about the
sacred operas whieh shared the list with works based on classical
fables and Roman history in the seventeenth and eighteenth
centuries; inasmuch, however, as they were an outgrowth of the
pious plays of the Middle Ages and designed for edifying
consumption in Lent, it is likely that they adhered in their plots
pretty close to the Biblical accounts. I doubt if the sentimental
element which was in vogue when Rossini wrote "Mose in Egitto"
played much of a role in such an opera as Johann Philipp Fortsch's
"Kain und Abel; oder der verzweifelnde Brudermorder," which was
performed in Hamburg in 1689, or even in "Abel's Tod," which came
along in 1771. The first fratricidal murder seems to have had an
early and an enduring fascination for dramatic poets and composers.
Metastasio's "La Morte d'Abele," set by both Caldara and Leo in
1732, remained a stalking-horse for composers down to Morlacchi in
1820. One of the latest of Biblical operas is the "Kain" of
Heinrich Bulthaupt and Eugen d'Albert. This opera and a later lyric
drama by the same composer, "Tote Augen" (under which title a
casual reader would never suspect that a Biblical subject was
lurking), call for a little attention because of their indication
of a possible drift which future dramatists may follow in treating
sacred story.

Wicked envy and jealousy were not sufficient motives in the eyes of
Bulthaupt and d'Albert for the first fratricide; there must be an
infusion of psychology and modern philosophy. Abel is an optimist,
an idealist, a contented dreamer, joying in the loveliness of life
and nature; Cain, a pessimist, a morose brooder, for whom life
contained no beautiful illusions. He gets up from his couch in the
night to question the right of God to create man for suffering. He
is answered by Lucifer, who proclaims himself the benefactor of the
family in having rescued them from the slothful existence of Eden
and given them a Redeemer. The devil discourses on the delightful
ministrations of that Redeemer, whose name is Death. In the morning
Abel arises and as he offers his sacrifice he hymns the sacred
mystery of life and turns a deaf ear to the new-found gospel of
his brother. An inspiring thought comes to Cain; by killing Abel
and destroying himself he will save future generations from the
sufferings to which they are doomed. With this benevolent purpose
in mind he commits the murder. The blow has scarcely been struck
before a multitude of spirit-voices call his name and God thunders
the question: "Where is Abel, thy brother?" Adam comes from his
cave and looks upon the scene with horror. Now Cain realizes that
his work is less than half done: he is himself still alive and so
is his son Enoch. He rushes forward to kill his child, but the
mother throws herself between, and Cain discovers that he is not
strong-willed enough to carry out his design. God's curse condemns
him to eternal unrest, and while the elements rage around him Cain
goes forth into the mountain wilderness.

Herr Bulthaupt did not permit chronology to stand in the way of his
action, but it can at least be said for him that he did not profane
the Book as Herr Ewers, Mr. d'Albert's latest collaborator, did
when he turned a story of Christ's miraculous healing of a blind
woman into a sensational melodrama. In the precious opera, "Tote
Augen" ("Dead Eyes"), brought out in March, 1916, in Dresden,
Myrocle, the blind woman, is the wife of Arcesius, a Roman
ambassador in Jerusalem. Never having seen him, Myrocle believes
her husband to be a paragon of beauty, but he is, in fact, hideous
of features, crook-backed, and lame; deformed in mind and heart,
too, for he has concealed the truth from her. Christ is entering
Jerusalem, and Mary of Magdala leads Myrocle to him, having heard
of the miracles which he performs, and he opens the woman's eyes at
the moment that the multitude is shouting its hosannahs. The first
man who fills the vision of Myrocle is Galba, handsome, noble,
chivalrous, who had renounced the love he bore her because she was
the wife of his friend. In Galba the woman believes she sees the
husband whom in her fond imagination she had fitted out with the
charms of mind and person which his friend possesses. She throws
herself into his arms, and he does not repel her mistaken embraces;
but the misshapen villain throws himself upon the pair and
strangles his friend to death. A slave enlightens the mystified
woman; the murderer, not the dead hero at his feet, is her husband.
Singularly enough, she does not turn from him with hatred and
loathing, but looks upon him with a great pity. Then she turns her
eyes upon the sun, which Christ had said should not set until she
had cursed him, and gazes into its searing glow until her sight is
again dead. Moral: it is sinful to love the loveliness of outward
things; from the soul must come salvation. As if she had never
learned the truth, she returns to her wifely love for Arcesius. The
story is as false to nature as it is sacrilegious; its trumpery
theatricalism is as great a hindrance to a possible return of
Biblical opera as the disgusting celebration of necrophilism in
Richard Strauss's "Salome."

In our historical excursion we are still among the patriarchs, and
the whole earth is of one language and of one speech. Noah, the
ark, and the deluge seem now too prodigious to be essayed by opera
makers, but, apparently, they did not awe the Englishman Edward
Eccleston (or Eggleston), who is said to have produced an opera,
"Noah's Flood, or the Destruction of the World," in London in 1679,
nor Seyfried, whose "Libera me" was sung at Beethoven's funeral,
and who, besides Biblical operas entitled "Saul," "Abraham," "The
Maccabees," and "The Israelites in the Desert," brought out a
"Noah" in Vienna in 1818. Halevy left an unfinished opera, "Noe,"
which Bizet, who was his son-in-law, completed. Of oratorios
dealing with the deluge I do not wish to speak further than to
express my admiration for the manner in which Saint-Saens opened
the musical floodgates in "Le Deluge."

On the plain in the Land of Shinar the families of the sons of Noah
builded them a city and a tower whose top they arrogantly hoped
might reach unto heaven. But the tower fell, the tongues of the
people were confounded, and the people were scattered abroad on the
face of the earth. Rubinstein attempted to give dramatic
representation to the tremendous incident, and to his effort and
vain dream I shall revert in the next chapter of this book. Now I
must on with the history of the patriarchs. The story of Abraham
and his attempted offering of Isaac has been much used as oratorio
material, and Joseph Elsner, Chopin's teacher, brought out a Polish
opera, "Ofiara Abrama," at Warsaw in 1827.

A significant milestone in the history of the Hebrews as well as
Biblical operas has now been reached. The sojourn of the Jews in
Egypt and their final departure under the guidance of Moses have
already occupied considerable attention in this study. They
provided material for the two operas which seem to me the noblest
of their kind--Mehul's "Joseph" and Rossini's "Mose in Egitto."
Mehul's opera, more than a decade older than Rossini's, still holds
a place on the stages of France and Germany, and this despite the
fact that it foregoes two factors which are popularly supposed to
be essential to operatic success--a love episode and woman's
presence and participation in the action. The opera, which is in
three acts, was brought forward at the Theatre Feydeau in Paris on
February 17, 1807. It owed its origin to a Biblical tragedy
entitled "Omasis," by Baour Lormian. The subject--the sale of
Joseph by his brothers into Egyptian slavery, his rise to power,
his forgiveness of the wrong attempted against him, and his
provision of a home for the people of Israel in the land of Goshen
--had long been popular with composers of oratorios. The list of
these works begins with Caldara's "Giuseppe" in 1722. Metastasio's
"Giuseppe riconosciuto" was set by half a dozen composers between
1733 and 1788. Handel wrote his English oratorio in 1743; G. A.
Macfarren's was performed at the Leeds festival of 1877. Lormian
thought it necessary to introduce a love episode into his tragedy,
but Alexander Duval, who wrote the book for Mehul's opera, was of
the opinion that the diversion only enfeebled the beautiful if
austere picture of patriarchal domestic life delineated in the
Bible. He therefore adhered to tradition and created a series of
scenes full of beauty, dignity, and pathos, simple and strong in
spite of the bombast prevalent in the literary style of the period.
Mehul's music is marked by grandeur, simplicity, lofty sentiment,
and consistent severity of manner. The composer's predilection for
ecclesiastical music, created, no doubt, by the blind organist who
taught him in his childhood and nourished by his studies and labors
at the monastery under the gifted Hauser, found opportunity for
expression in the religious sentiments of the drama, and his
knowledge of plain chant is exhibited in the score "the simplicity,
grandeur, and dramatic truth of which will always command the
admiration of impartial musicians," remarks Gustave Choquet. The
enthusiasm of M. Tiersot goes further still, for he says that the
music of "Joseph" is more conspicuous for the qualities of dignity
and sonority than that of Handel's oratorio. The German Hanslick,
to whom the absence from the action of the "salt of the earth,
women" seemed disastrous, nevertheless does not hesitate to
institute a comparison between "Joseph" and one of Mozart's latest
operas. "In its mild, passionless benevolence the entire role of
Joseph in Mehul's opera," he says, "reminds one strikingly of
Mozart's 'Titus,' and not to the advantage of the latter. The opera
'Titus' is the work of an incomparably greater genius, but it
belongs to a partly untruthful, wholly modish, tendency (that of
the old opera seria), while the genre of 'Joseph' is thoroughly
noble, true, and eminently dramatic. 'Joseph' has outlived
'Titus.'" [Footnote: "Die Moderne Opera," p. 92.] Carl Maria von
Weber admired Mehul's opera greatly, and within recent years Felix
Weingartner has edited a German edition for which he composed
recitatives to take the place of the spoken dialogue of the
original book.

There is no story of passion in "Joseph." The love portrayed there
is domestic and filial; its objects are the hero's father,
brothers, and country--"Champs eternels, Hebron, douce vallee." It
was not until our own day that an author with a perverted sense
which had already found gratification in the stench of mental,
moral, and physical decay exhaled by "Salome" and "Elektra" nosed
the piquant, pungent odor of the episode of Potiphar's wife and
blew it into the theatre. Joseph's temptress did not tempt even the
prurient taste which gave us the Parisian operatic versions of the
stories of Phryne, Thais, and Messalina. Richard Strauss's
"Josephslegende" stands alone in musical literature. There is,
indeed, only one reference in the records of oratorio or opera to
the woman whose grovelling carnality is made the foil of Joseph's
virtue in the story as told in the Book. That reference is found in
a singular trilogy, which was obviously written more to disclose
the possibilities of counterpoint than to set forth the story--even
if it does that, which I cannot say; the suggestion comes only from
a title. In August, 1852, Pietro Raimondi produced an oratorio in
three parts entitled, respectively, "Putifar," "Giuseppe giusto,"
and "Giacobbe," at the Teatro Argentina, in Rome. The music of the
three works was so written that after each had been performed
separately, with individual principal singers, choristers, and
orchestras, they were united in a simultaneous performance. The
success of the stupendous experiment in contrapuntal writing was so
great that the composer fell in a faint amidst the applause of the
audience and died less than three months afterward.

In the course of this study I have mentioned nearly all of the
Biblical characters who have been turned into operatic heroes.
Nebuchadnezzar appeared on the stage at Hamburg in an opera of
Keiser's in 1704; Ariosti put him through his bovine strides in
Vienna in 1706. He was put into a ballet by a Portuguese composer
and made the butt of a French opera bouffe writer, J. J.
Debillement, in 1871. He recurs to my mind now in connection with a
witty fling at "Nabucco" made by a French rhymester when Verdi's
opera was produced at Paris in 1845. The noisy brass in the
orchestration offended the ears of a critic, and he wrote:

    Vraiment l'affiche est dans son tort;
      En faux, ou devrait la poursuivre.
    Pourquoi nous annoncer Nabuchodonos--or
      Quand c'est Nabuchodonos--cuivre?


Judas Maccabaeus is one of the few heroes of ancient Israel who
have survived in opera, Rubinstein's "Makkabaer" still having a
hold, though not a strong one, on the German stage. The libretto is
an adaptation by Mosenthal (author also of Goldmark's "Queen of
Sheba") of a drama by Otto Ludwig. In the drama as well as some of
its predecessors some liberties have been taken with the story as
told in Maccabees II, chapter 7. The tale of the Israelitish
champion of freedom and his brothers Jonathan and Simon, who lost
their lives in the struggle against the tyranny of the kings of
Syria, is intensely dramatic. For stage purposes the dramatists
have associated the massacre of a mother and her seven sons and the
martyrdom of the aged Eleazar, who caused the uprising of the Jews,
with the family history of Judas himself. J. W. Franck produced
"Die Maccabaische Mutter" in Hamburg in 1679, Ariosti composed "La
Madre dei Maccabei" in 1704, Ignaz von Seyfried brought out "Die
Makkabaer, oder Salmonaa" in 1818, and Rubinstein his opera in
Berlin on April 17,1875.

The romantic career of Jephtha, a natural son, banished from home,
chief of a band of roving marauders, mighty captain and ninth judge
of Israel, might have fitted out many an opera text, irrespective
of the pathetic story of the sacrifice of his daughter in obedience
to a vow, though this episode springs first to mind when his name
is mentioned, and has been the special subject of the Jephtha
operas. An Italian composer named Pollarolo wrote a "Jefte" for
Vienna in 1692; other operas dealing with the history are Rolle's
"Mehala, die Tochter Jephthas" (1784), Meyerbeer's "Jephtha's
Tochter" (Munich, 1813), Generali, "Il voto di Jefte" (1827),
Sanpieri, "La Figlia di Jefte" (1872). Luis Cepeda produced a
Spanish opera in Madrid in 1845, and a French opera, in five acts
and a prologue, by Monteclaire, was prohibited, after one
performance, by Cardinal de Noailles in 1832.

Judith, the widow of Manasseh, who delivered her native city of
Bethulia from the Assyrian Holofernes, lulling him to sleep with
her charms and then striking off his drunken head with a falchion,
though an Apocryphal personage, is the most popular of Israelitish
heroines. The record shows the operas "Judith und Holofernes" by
Leopold Kotzeluch (1799), "Giuditta" by S. Levi (1844), Achille
Peri (1860), Righi (1871), and Sarri (1875). Naumann wrote a
"Judith" in 1858, Doppler another in 1870, and Alexander Seroff a
Russian opera under the same title in 1863. Martin Roder, who used
to live in Boston, composed a "Judith," but it was never performed,
while George W. Chadwick's "Judith," half cantata, half opera,
which might easily be fitted for the stage, has had to rest content
with a concert performance at a Worcester (Mass.) festival.

The memory of Esther, the queen of Ahasuerus, who saved her people
from massacre, is preserved and her deed celebrated by the Jews in
their gracious festival of Purim. A gorgeous figure for the stage,
she has been relegated to the oratorio platform since the end of
the eighteenth century. Racine's tragedy "Athalie" has called out
music from Abbe Vogler, Gossec, Boieldieu, Mendelssohn, and others,
and a few oratorios, one by Handel, have been based on the story of
the woman through whom idolatry was introduced into Judah; but I
have no record of any Athalia opera.




CHAPTER III

RUBINSTEIN'S "GEISTLICHE OPER"


I have a strong belief in the essential excellence of Biblical
subjects for the purposes of the lyric drama--at least from an
historical point of view. I can see no reason against but many
reasons in favor of a return to the stage of the patriarchal and
heroic figures of the people who are a more potent power in the
world to-day, despite their dispersal and loss of national unity,
than they were in the days of their political grandeur and glory.
Throughout the greater part of his creative career Anton Rubinstein
was the champion of a similar idea. Of the twenty works which he
wrote for the theatre, including ballets, six were on Biblical
subjects, and to promote a propaganda which began with the
composition of "Der Thurmbau zu Babel," in 1870, he not only
entered the literary field, but made personal appeal for practical
assistance in both the Old World and the New. His, however, was a
religious point of view, not the historical or political. It is
very likely that a racial predilection had much to do with his
attitude on the subject, but in his effort to bring religion into
the service of the lyric stage he was no more Jew than Christian:
the stories to which he applied his greatest energies were those of
Moses and Christ.

Much against my inclination (for Rubinstein came into my
intellectual life under circumstances and conditions which made him
the strongest personal influence in music that I have ever felt), I
have been compelled to believe that there were other reasons
besides those which he gave for his championship of Biblical opera.
Smaller men than he, since Wagner's death, have written trilogies
and dreamed of theatres and festivals devoted to performances of
their works. Little wonder if Rubinstein believed that he had
created, or could create, a kind of art-work which should take
place by the side of "Der Ring des Nibelungen," and have its
special home like Bayreuth; and it may have been a belief that his
project would excite the sympathetic zeal of the devout Jew and
pious Christian alike, as much as his lack of the capacity for
self-criticism, which led him like a will-o'-the-wisp along the
path which led into the bogs of failure and disappointment.

While I was engaged in writing the programme book for the music
festival given in New York in 1881, at which "The Tower of Babel"
was performed in a truly magnificent manner, Dr. Leopold Damrosch,
the conductor of the festival, told me that Rubinstein had told him
that the impulse to use Biblical subjects in lyrical dramas had
come to him while witnessing a ballet based on a Bible story many
years before in Paris. He said that he had seldom been moved so
profoundly by any spectacle as by this ballet, and it suggested to
him the propriety of treating sacred subjects in a manner worthy of
them, yet different from the conventional oratorio. The explanation
has not gotten into the books, but is not inconsistent with the
genesis of his Biblical operas, as related by Rubinstein in his
essay on the subject printed by Joseph Lewinsky in his book "Vor
den Coulissen," published in 1882 after at least three of the
operas had been written. The composer's defence of his works and
his story of the effort which he made to bring about a realization
of his ideals deserve to be rehearsed in justice to his character
as man and artist, as well as in the interest of the works
themselves and the subjects, which, I believe, will in the near
future occupy the minds of composers again.

"The oratorio," said Rubinstein, "is an art-form which I have
always been disposed to protest against. The best-known
masterpieces of this form have, not during the study of them but
when hearing them performed, always left me cold; indeed, often
positively pained me. The stiffness of the musical and still more
of the poetical form always seemed to me absolutely incongruous
with the high dramatic feeling of the subject. To see and hear
gentlemen in dress coats, white cravats, yellow gloves, holding
music books before them, or ladies in modern, often extravagant,
toilets singing the parts of the grand, imposing figures of the Old
and New Testaments has always disturbed me to such a degree that I
could never attain to pure enjoyment. Involuntarily I felt and
thought how much grander, more impressive, vivid, and true would be
all that I had experienced in the concert-room if represented on
the stage with costumes, decorations, and full action."

The contention, said Rubinstein in effect, that Biblical subjects
are ill adapted to the stage beeause of their sacred character is a
testimony of poverty for the theatre, which should be an agency in
the service of the highest purposes of culture. The people have
always wanted to see stage representations of Bible incidents;
witness the mystery plays of the Middle Ages and the Passion Play
at Oberammergau to-day. But yielding to a prevalent feeling that
such representations are a profanation of sacred history, he had
conceived an appropriate type of art-work which was to be produced
in theatres to be specially built for the purpose and by companies
of artists to be specially trained to that end. This art-work was
to be called Sacred Opera (geistliche Oper), to distinguish it from
secular opera, but its purpose was to be purely artistic and wholly
separate from the interests of the Church. He developed ways and
means for raising the necessary funds, enlisting artists,
overcoming the difficulties presented by the mise en scene and the
polyphonic character of the choral music, and set forth his aim in
respect of the subject-matter of the dramas to be a representation
in chronological order of the chief incidents described in the Old
and New Testaments. He would be willing to include in his scheme
Biblical operas already existing, if they were not all, with the
exception of Mehul's "Joseph," made unfit by their treatment of
sacred matters, especially by their inclusion of love episodes
which brought them into the domain of secular opera.

For years, while on his concert tours in various countries,
Rubinstein labored to put his plan into operation. Wherever he
found a public accustomed to oratorio performances he inquired into
the possibility of establishing his sacred theatre there. He laid
the project before the Grand Duke of Weimar, who told him that it
was feasible only in large cities. The advice sent him to Berlin,
where he opened his mind to the Minister of Education, von Muhler.
The official had his doubts; sacred operas might do for Old
Testament stories, but not for New; moreover, such a theatre should
be a private, not a governmental, undertaking. He sought the
opinion of Stanley, Dean of Westminster Abbey, who said that he
could only conceive a realization of the idea in the oldtime
popular manner, upon a rude stage at a country fair.

For a space it looked as if the leaders of the Jewish congregations
in Paris would provide funds for the enterprise so far as it
concerned itself with subjects taken from the Old Dispensation; but
at the last they backed out, fearing to take the initiative in a
matter likely to cause popular clamor. "I even thought of America,"
says Rubinstein, "of the daring transatlantic impresarios, with
their lust of enterprise, who might be inclined to speculate on a
gigantic scale with my idea. I had indeed almost succeeded, but the
lack of artists brought it to pass that the plans, already in a
considerable degree of forwardness, had to be abandoned. I
considered the possibility of forming an association of composers
and performing artists to work together to carry on the enterprise
materially, intellectually, and administratively; but the great
difficulty of enlisting any considerable number of artists for the
furtherance of a new idea in art frightened me back from this
purpose also." In these schemes there are evidences of Rubinstein's
willingness to follow examples set by Handel as well as Wagner. The
former composed "Judas Maccabaeus" and "Alexander Balus" to please
the Jews who had come to his help when he made financial shipwreck
with his opera; the latter created the Richard Wagner Verein to put
the Bayreuth enterprise on its feet.

Of the six sacred operas composed by Rubinstein three may be said
to be practicable for stage representation. They are "Die
Makkabaer," "Sulamith" (based on Solomon's Song of Songs) and
"Christus." The first has had many performances in Germany; the
second had a few performances in Hamburg in 1883; the last, first
performed as an oratorio in Berlin in 1885, was staged in Bremen in
1895. It has had, I believe, about fourteen representations in all.
As for the other three works, "Der Thurmbau zu Babel" (first
performance in Konigsberg in 1870), "Das verlorene Paradies"
(Dusseldorf, 1875), and "Moses" (still awaiting theatrical
representation, I believe), it may be said of them that they are
hybrid creations which combine the oratorio and opera styles by
utilizing the powers of the oldtime oratorio chorus and the modern
orchestra, with the descriptive capacity of both raised to the
highest power, to illustrate an action which is beyond the
capabilities of the ordinary stage machinery. In the character of
the forms employed in the works there is no startling innovation;
we meet the same alternation of chorus, recitative, aria, and
ensemble that we have known since the oratorio style was perfected.
A change, howeer, has come over the spirit of the expression and
the forms have all relaxed some of their rigidity. In the oratorios
of Handel and Haydn there are instances not a few of musical
delineation in the instrumental as well as the vocal parts; but
nothing in them can be thought of, so far at least as the ambition
of the design extends, as a companion piece to the scene in the
opera which pictures the destruction of the tower of Babel. This is
as far beyond the horizon of the fancy of the old masters as it is
beyond the instrumental forces which they controlled.

"Paradise Lost," the text paraphrased from portions of Milton's
epic, is an oratorio pure and simple. It deals with the creation of
the world according to the Mosaic (or as Huxley would have said,
Miltonic) theory and the medium of expression is an alternation of
recitatives and choruses, the latter having some dramatic life and
a characteristic accompaniment. It is wholly contemplative; there
is nothing like action in it. "The Tower of Babel" has action in
the restricted sense in which it enters into Mendelssohn's
oratorios, and scenic effects which would tax the utmost powers of
the modern stage-machinist who might attempt to carry them out. A
mimic tower of Babel is more preposterous than a mimic temple of
Dagon; yet, unless Rubinstein's stage directions are to be taken in
a Pickwickian sense, we ought to listen to this music while looking
at a stage-setting more colossal than any ever contemplated by
dramatist before. We should see a wide stretch of the plain of
Shinar; in the foreground a tower so tall as to give color of
plausibility to a speech which prates of an early piercing of
heaven and so large as to provide room for a sleeping multitude on
its scaffoldings. Brick kilns, derricks, and all the apparatus and
machinery of building should be on all hands, and from the summit
of a mound should grow a giant tree, against whose trunk should
hang a brazen shield to be used as a signal gong. We should see in
the progress of the opera the bustling activity of the workmen, the
roaring flames and rolling smoke of the brick kilns, and witness
the miraculous spectacle of a man thrown into the fire and walking
thence unharmed. We should see (in dissolving views) the dispersion
of the races and behold the unfolding of a rainbow in the sky. And,
finally, we should get a glimpse of an open heaven and the Almighty
on His throne, and a yawning hell, with Satan and his angels
exercising their dread dominion. Can such scenes be mimicked
successfully enough to preserve a serious frame of mind in the
observer? Hardly. Yet the music seems obviously to have been
written in the expectation that sight shall aid hearing to quicken
the fancy and emotion and excite the faculties to an appreciation
of the work.

"The Tower of Babel" has been performed upon the stage; how I
cannot even guess. Knowing, probably, that the work would be given
in concert form oftener than in dramatic, Rubinstein tries to
stimulate the fancy of those who must be only listeners by profuse
stage directions which are printed in the score as well as the book
of words. "Moses" is in the same case. By the time that Rubinstein
had completed it he evidently realized that its hybrid character as
well as its stupendous scope would stand in the way of performances
of any kind. Before even a portion of its music had been heard in
public, he wrote in a letter to a friend: "It is too theatrical for
the concert-room and too much like an oratorio for the theatre. It
is, in fact, the perfect type of the sacred opera that I have
dreamed of for years. What will come of it I do not know; I do not
think it can be performed entire. As it contains eight distinct
parts, one or two may from time to time be given either in a
concert or on the stage."

America was the first country to act on the suggestion of a
fragmentary performance. The first scene was brought forward in New
York by Walter Damrosch at a public rehearsal and concert of the
Symphony Society (the Oratorio Society assisting) on January 18 and
19, 1889. The third scene was performed by the German Liederkranz,
under Reinhold L. Herman, on January 27 of the same year. The third
and fourth scenes were in the scheme of the Cincinnati Music
Festival, Theodore Thomas, conductor, on May 25,1894.

Each of the eight scenes into which the work is divided deals with
an episode in the life of Israel's lawgiver. In the first scene we
have the incident of the finding of the child in the bulrushes; in
the second occurs the oppression of the Israelites by the Egyptian
taskmasters, the slaying of one of the overseers by Moses, who,
till then regarded as the king's son, now proclaims himself one of
the oppressed race. The third scene discloses Moses protecting
Zipporah, daughter of Jethro, a Midianitish priest, from a band of
marauding Edomites, his acceptance of Jethro's hospitality and the
scene of the burning bush and the proclamation of his mission.
Scene IV deals with the plagues, those of blood, hail, locusts,
frogs, and vermin being delineated in the instrumental introduction
to the part, the action beginning while the land is shrouded in the
"thick darkness that might be felt." The Egyptians call upon Osiris
to dispel the darkness, but are forced at last to appeal to Moses.
He demands the liberation of his people as the price to be paid for
the removal of the plague; receiving a promise from Pharaoh, he
utters a prayer ending with "Let there be light." The result is
celebrated in a brilliant choral acclamation of the returning sun.
The scene has a parallel in Rossini's opera. Pharaoh now
equivocates; he will free the sons of Jacob, but not the women,
children, or chattels. Moses threatens punishment in the death of
all of Egypt's first-born, and immediately solo and chorus voices
bewail the new affliction. When the king hears that his son is dead
he gives his consent, and the Israelites depart with an ejaculation
of thanks to Jehovah. The passage of the Red Sea, Miriam's
celebration of that miracle, the backsliding of the Israelites and
their worship of the golden calf, the reception of the Tables of
the Law, the battle between the Israelites and Modbites on the
threshold of the Promised Land, and the evanishment and apotheosis
of Moses are the contents of the remainder of the work.



It is scarcely to be wondered at that the subjects which opera
composers have found adaptable to their uses in the New Testament
are very few compared with those offered by the Old. The books
written by the evangelists around the most stupendous tragical
story of all time set forth little or nothing (outside of the
birth, childhood, teachings, miracles, death, and resurrection of
Jesus of Nazareth) which could by any literary ingenuity be turned
into a stage play except the parables with which Christ enforced
and illustrated His sermons. The sublime language and imagery of
the Apocalypse have furnished forth the textual body of many
oratorios, but it still transcends the capacity of mortal
dramatist.

In the parable of the Prodigal Son there is no personage whose
presentation in dramatic garb could be looked upon as a profanation
of the Scriptures. It is this fact, probably, coupled with its
profoundly beautiful reflection of human nature, which has made it
a popular subject with opera writers. There was an Italian
"Figliuolo Prodigo" as early as 1704, composed by one Biffi; a
French melodrama, "L'Enfant Prodigue," by Morange about 1810; a
German piece of similar character by Joseph Drechsler in Vienna in
1820. Pierre Gaveaux, who composed "Leonore, ou l'Amour Conjugal,"
which provided Beethoven with his "Fidelio," brought out a comic
opera on the subject of the Prodigal Son in 1811, and Berton, who
had also dipped into Old Testament story in an oratorio, entitled
"Absalon," illustrated the parable in a ballet. The most recent
settings of the theme are also the most significant: Auber's five-
act opera "L'Enfant Prodigue," brought out in Paris in 1850, and
Ponchielli's "Il Figliuolo Prodigo," in four acts, which had its
first representation at La Scala in 1880.

The mediaeval mysteries were frequently interspersed with choral
songs, for which the liturgy of the Church provided material. If we
choose to look upon them as incipient operas or precursors of that
art-form we must yet observe that their monkish authors, willing
enough to trick out the story of the Nativity with legendary matter
drawn from the Apocryphal New Testament, which discloses anything
but a reverential attitude toward the sublime tragedy, nevertheless
stood in such awe before the spectacle of Calvary that they deemed
it wise to leave its dramatic treatment to the church service in
the Passion Tide. In that service there was something approaching
to characterization in the manner of the reading by the three
deacons appointed to deliver, respectively, the narrative, the
words of Christ, and the utterances of the Apostles and people; and
it may be--that this and the liturgical solemnities of Holy Week
were reverently thought sufficient by them and the authors of the
first sacred operas. Nevertheless, we have Reiser's "Der Blutige
und Sterbende Jesus," performed at Hamburg, and Metastasio's "La
Passione di Gesu Christi," composed first by Caldara, which
probably was an oratorio.

Earlier than these was Theile's "Die Geburt Christi," performed in
Hamburg in 1681. The birth of Christ and His childhood (there was
an operatic representation of His presentation in the Temple) were
subjects which appealed more to the writers of the rude plays which
catered to the popular love for dramatic mummery than did His
crucifixion. I am speaking now more specifically of lyric dramas,
but it is worthy of note that in the Coventry mysteries, as Hone
points out in the preface to his book, "Ancient Mysteries
Described," [Footnote: "Ancient Mysteries Described, especially the
English Miracle Plays Founded on Apocryphal New Testament Story,"
London, 1823.] there are eight plays, or pageants, which deal with
the Nativity as related in the canon and the pseudo-gospels. In
them much stress was laid upon the suspicions of the Virgin
Mother's chastity, for here was material that was good for rude
diversion as well as instruction in righteousness.



That Rubinstein dared to compose a Christ drama must be looked upon
as proof of the profound sincerity of his belief in the art-form
which he fondly hoped he had created; also, perhaps, as evidence of
his artistic ingenuousness. Only a brave or naive mind could have
calmly contemplated a labor from which great dramatists, men as
great as Hebbel, shrank back in alarm. After the completion of
"Lohengrin" Wagner applied himself to the creation of a tragedy
which he called "Jesus of Nazareth." We know his plan in detail,
but he abandoned it after he had offered his sketches to a French
poet as the basis of a lyric drama which he hoped to write for
Paris. He confesses that he was curious to know what the Frenchman
would do with a work the stage production of which would "provoke a
thousand frights." He himself was unwilling to stir up such a
tempest in Germany; instead, he put his sketches aside and used
some of their material in his "Parsifal."

Wagner ignored the religious, or, let us say, the ecclesiastical,
point of view entirely in "Jesus of Nazareth." His hero was to have
been, as I have described him elsewhere, [Footnote: "A Book of
Operas," p. 288.] "a human philosopher who preached the saving
grace of Love and sought to redeem his time and people from the
domination of conventional law--the offspring of selfishness. His
philosophy was socialism imbued by love." Rubinstein proceeded
along the lines of history, or orthodox belief, as unreservedly in
his "Christus" as he had done in his "Moses." The work may be said
to have brought his creative activities to a close, although two
compositions (a set of six pianoforte pieces and an orchestral
suite) appear in his list of numbered works after the sacred opera.
He died on November 20, 1894, without having seen a stage
representation of it. Nor did he live to see a public theatrical
performance of his "Moses," though he was privileged to witness a
private performance arranged at the German National Theatre in
Prague so that he might form an opinion of its effectiveness. The
public has never been permitted to learn anything about the
impression which the work made.

On May 25, 1895, a series of representations of "Christus" was
begun in Bremen, largely through the instrumentality of Professor
Bulthaupt, a potent and pervasive personage in the old Hanseatic
town. He was not only a poet and the author of the book of this
opera and of some of Bruch's works, but also a painter, and his
mural decorations in the Bremen Chamber of Commerce are proudly
displayed by the citizens of the town. It was under the supervision
of the painter-poet that the Bremen representations were given and,
unless I am mistaken, he painted the scenery or much of it. One of
the provisions of the performances was that applause was prohibited
out of reverence for the sacred character of the scenes, which were
as frankly set forth as at Oberammergau. The contents of the
tragedy in some scenes and an epilogue briefly outlined are these:
The first scene shows the temptation of Christ in the wilderness,
where the devil "shewed unto him all the kingdoms of the world in a
moment of time." This disclosure is made by a series of scenes,
each opening for a short time in the background--castles, palaces,
gardens, mountains of gold, and massive heaps of earth's treasures.
In the second scene John the Baptist is seen and heard preaching on
the banks of the Jordan, in whose waters he baptizes Jesus. This
scene at the Bremen representations was painted from sketches made
by Herr Handrich in Palestine, as was also that of the "Sermon on
the Mount" and "The Miracle of the Loaves and Fishes," which form
the subject of the next part. The fourth tableau shows the
expulsion of the money changers from the Temple; the fifth the Last
Supper, with the garden of Gethsemane as a background; the sixth
the trial and the last the crucifixion. Here, as if harking back to
his "Tower of Babel," Rubinstein brings in pictures of heaven and
hell, with angels and devils contemplating the catastrophe. The
proclamation of the Gospel to the Gentiles by St. Paul is the
subject of the epilogue.




CHAPTER IV

"SAMSON ET DALILA"


There are but two musical works based on the story of Samson on the
current list to-day, Handel's oratorio and Saint-Saens's opera; but
lyric drama was still in its infancy when the subject first took
hold of the fancy of composers and it has held it ever since. The
earliest works were of the kind called sacred operas in the books
and are spoken of as oratorios now, though they were doubtless
performed with scenery and costumes and with action of a sort. Such
were "II Sansone" by Giovanni Paola Colonna (Bologna, 1677),
"Sansone accecato da Filistri" by Francesco Antonio Uri (Venice,
about 1700), "Simson" by Christoph Graupner (Hamburg, 1709),
"Simson" by Georg von Pasterwitz (about 1770), "Samson" by J. N.
Lefroid Mereaux (Paris, 1774), "Simson" by Johann Heinrich Rolle
(about 1790), "Simson" by Franz Tuczek (Vienna, 1804), and "Il
Sansone" by Francesco Basili (Naples, 1824). Two French operas are
associated with great names and have interesting histories.
Voltaire wrote a dramatic text on the subject at the request of La
Popeliniere, the farmer-general, who, as poet, musician, and
artist, exercised a tremendous influence in his day. Rameau was in
his service as household clavecinist and set Voltaire's poem. The
authors looked forward to a production on the stage of the Grand
Opera, where at least two Biblical operas, an Old Testament
"Jephte" and a New Testament "Enfant prodigue" were current; but
Rameau had powerful enemies, and the opera was prohibited on the
eve of the day on which it was to have been performed. The composer
had to stomach his mortification as best he could; he put some of
his Hebrew music into the service of his Persian "Zoroastre". The
other French Samson to whom I have re ferred had also to undergo a
sea-change like unto Rameau's, Rossini's Moses, and Verdi's
Nebuchadnezzar. Duprez, who was ambitious to shine as a composer as
well as a singer (he wrote no less than eight operas and also an
oratorio, "The Last Judgment"), tried his hand on a Samson opera
and succeeded in enlisting the help of Dumas the elder in writing
the libretto. When he was ready to present it at the door of the
Grand Opera the Minister of Fine Arts told him that it was
impracticable, as the stage-setting of the last act alone would
cost more than 100,000 francs, Duprez then followed the example set
with Rossini's "Mose" in London and changed the book to make it
tell a story of the crusades which he called "Zephora".
Nevertheless the original form was restored in German and Italian
translations of the work, and it had concert performances in 1857.
To Joachim Raff was denied even this poor comfort. He wrote a
German "Simson" between 1851 and 1857. The conductor at Darmstadt
to whom it was first submitted rejected it on the ground that it
was too difficult for his singers. Raff then gave it to Liszt, with
whom he was sojourning at Weimar, and who had taken pity on his
"Konig Alfred"; but the tenor singer at the Weimar opera said the
music was too high for the voice. Long afterward Wagner's friend,
Schnorr von Carolsfeld, saw the score in the hands of the composer.
The heroic stature of the hero delighted him, and his praise moved
Raff to revise the opera; but before this had been done Schnorr
died of the cold contracted while creating the role of Wagner's
Tristan at Munich in 1865. Thus mournfully ended the third episode.
As late as 1882 Raff spoke of taking the opera in hand again, but
though he may have done so his death found the work unperformed and
it has not yet seen the light of the stage-lamps.

Saint-Saens's opera has also passed through many vicissitudes, but
has succumbed to none and is probably possessed of more vigorous
life now than it ever had. It is the recognized operatic
masterpiece of the most resourceful and fecund French musician
since Berlioz. Saint-Saens began the composition of "Samson et
Dalila" in 1869. The author of the book, Ferdinand Lemaire, was a
cousin of the composer. Before the breaking out of the Franco-
Prussian War the score was so far on the way to completion that it
was possible to give its second act a private trial. This was done,
an incident of the occasion-which afterward introduced one element
of pathos in its history-being the singing of the part of Samson by
the painter Henri Regnault, who soon after lost his life in the
service of his country. A memorial to him and the friendship which
existed between him and the composer is the "Marche Heroique,"
which bears the dead man's name on its title-page. Toward the end
of 1872 the opera was finished. For two years the score rested in
the composer's desk. Then the second act was again brought forth
for trial, this time at the country home of Mme. Viardot, at
Croissy, the illustrious hostess singing the part of Dalila. In
1875 the first act was performed in concert style by M. Edouard
Colonne in Paris. Liszt interested himself in the opera and secured
its acceptance at the Grand Ducal Opera House of Weimar, where
Eduard Lassen brought it out on December 2, 1877. Brussels heard it
in 1878; but it did not reach one of the theatres of France until
March 3, 1890, when Rouen produced it at its Theatre des Arts under
the direction of M. Henri Verdhurt. It took nearly seven months
more to reach Paris, where the first representation was at the Eden
Theatre on October 31 of the same year. Two years later, after it
had been heard in a number of French and Italian provincial
theatres, it was given at the Academie Nationale de Musique under
the direction of M. Colonne. The part of Dalila was taken by Mme.
Deschamps-Jehin, that of Samson by M. Vergnet, that of the High
Priest by M. Lassalle. Eight months before this it had been
performed as an oratorio by the Oratorio Society of New York. There
were two performances, on March 25 and 26, 1892, the conductor
being Mr. Walter Damrosch and the principal singers being Frau
Marie Ritter-Goetze, Sebastian Montariol, H. E. Distelhurst, Homer
Moore, Emil Fischer, and Purdon Robinson. London had heard the work
twice as an oratorio before it had a stage representation there on
April 26, 1909, but this performance was fourteen years later than
the first at the Metropolitan Opera House on February 8, 1895. The
New York performance was scenically inadequate, but the integrity
of the record demands that the cast be given here: Samson, Signor
Tamagno; Dalila, Mme. Mantelli; High Priest, Signor Campanari;
Abimelech and An Old Hebrew, M. Plancon; First Philistine, Signor
Rinaldini; Second Philistme, Signor de Vachetti; conductor, Signor
Mancinelli. The Metropolitan management did not venture upon a
repetition until the opening night of the season 1915-1916, when
its success was such that it became an active factor in the
repertory of the establishment; but by that time it had been made
fairly familiar to the New York public by performances at the
Manhattan Opera House under the management of Mr. Oscar
Hammerstein, the first of which took place on November 13, 1908.
Signor Campanini conducted and the cast embraced Mme. Gerville-
Reache as Dalila, Charles Dalmores as Samson, and M. Dufranne as
High Priest. The cast at the Metropolitan Opera House's revival of
the opera on November 15,1915, was as follows: Dalila, Mme.
Margarete Matzenauer; Samson, Signor Enrico Caruso; High Priest,
Signor Pasquale Amato; Abimelech, Herr Carl Schlegel; An Old
Hebrew, M. Leon Rothier; A Philistine Messenger, Herr Max Bloch;
First Philistine, Pietro Audisio; Second Philistine, Vincenzo
Reschiglian; conductor, Signor Polacco.



It would be a curious inquiry to try to determine the source of the
fascination which the story of Manoah's son has exerted upon
mankind for centuries. It bears a likeness to the story of the son
of Zeus and Alcmene, and there are few books on mythology which do
not draw a parallel between the two heroes. Samson's story is
singularly brief. For twenty years he "judged Israel," but the
Biblical history which deals with him consists only of an account
of his birth, a recital of the incidents in which he displayed his
prodigious strength and valor, the tale of his amours, and, at the
end, the account of his tragical destruction, brought about by the
weak element in his character.

Commentators have been perplexed by the tale, irrespective of the
adornments which it has received at the hands of the Talmudists. Is
Samson a Hebrew form of the conception personified by the Greek
Herakles? Is he a mythical creature, born in the human imagination
of primitive nature worship--a variant of the Tyrian sun-god
Shemesh, whose name his so curiously resembles? [In Hebrew he is
called Shimshon, and the sun shemesh.] Was he something more than a
man of extraordinary physical strength and extraordinary moral
weakness, whose patriotic virtues and pathetic end have kept his
memory alive through the ages? Have a hundred generations of men to
whom the story of Herakles has appeared to be only a fanciful
romance, the product of that imagination heightened by religion
which led the Greeks to exalt their supreme heroes to the extent of
deification, persisted in hearing and telling the story of Samson
with a sympathetic interest which betrays at least a sub-conscious
belief in its verity? Is the story only a parable enforcing a moral
lesson which is as old as humanity? If so, how got it into the
canonical Book of Judges, which, with all its mythical and
legendary material, seems yet to contain a large substratum of
unquestionable history?

There was nothing of the divine essence in Samson as the Hebrews
conceived him, except that spirit of God with which he was directly
endowed in supreme crises. There is little evidence of his
possession of great wisdom, but strong proof of his moral and
religious laxity. He sinned against the laws of Israel's God when
he took a Philistine woman, an idolater, to wife; he sinned against
the moral law when he visited the harlot at Gaza. He was wofully
weak in character when he yielded to the blandishments of Delilah
and wrought his own undoing, as well as that of his people. The
disgraceful slavery into which Herakles fell was not caused by the
hero's incontinence or uxoriousness, but a punishment for crime, in
that he had in a fit of madness killed his friend Iphitus. And the
three years which he spent as the slave of Omphale were punctuated
by larger and better deeds than those of Samson in like situation--
bursting the new cords with which the men of Judah had bound him
and the green withes and new ropes with which Delilah shackled him.
The record that Samson "judged Israel in the days of the
Philistines twenty years" leads the ordinary reader to think of him
as a sage, judicial personage, whereas it means only that he was
the political and military leader of his people during that period,
lifted to a magisterial position by his strength and prowess in
war. His achievements were muscular, not mental.

Rabbinical legends have magnified his stature and power in
precisely the same manner as the imagination of the poet of the
"Lay of the Nibelung" magnified the stature and strength of
Siegfried. His shoulders, says the legend, were sixty ells broad;
when the Spirit of God came on him he could step from Zorah to
Eshtaol although he was lame in both feet; the hairs of his head
arose and clashed against one another so that they could be heard
for a like distance; he was so strong that he could uplift two
mountains and rub them together like two clods of earth, Herakles
tore asunder the mountain which, divided, now forms the Straits of
Gibraltar and Gates of Hercules.

The parallel which is frequently drawn between Samson and Herakles
cannot be pursued far with advantage to the Hebrew hero. Samson
rent a young lion on the road to Timnath, whither he was going to
take his Philistine wife; Herakles, while still a youthful
herdsman, slew the Thespian lion and afterward strangled the Nemean
lion with his hands. Samson carried off the gates of Gaza and bore
them to the top of a hill before Hebron; Herakles upheld the
heavens while Atlas went to fetch the golden apples of Hesperides.
Moreover, the feats of Herakles show a higher intellectual quality
than those of Samson, all of which, save one, were predominantly
physical. The exception was the trick of tying 300 foxes by their
tails, two by two, with firebrands between and turning them loose
to burn the corn of the Philistines. An ingenious way to spread a
conflagration, probably, but primitive, decidedly primitive.
Herakles was a scientific engineer of the modern school; he yoked
the rivers Alpheus and Peneus to his service by turning their
waters through the Augean stables and cleansing them of the
deposits of 3000 oxen for thirty years. Herakles had excellent
intellectual training; Rhadamanthus taught him wisdom and virtue,
Linus music. We know nothing about the bringing up of Samson save
that "the child grew and the Lord blessed him. And the Lord began
to move him at times in the camp of Dan between Zorah and Eshtaol."
Samson made little use of his musical gifts, if he had any, but
that little he made well; Herakles made little use of his musical
training, and that little he made ill. He lost his temper and
killed his music master with his lute; Samson, after using an
implement which only the black slaves of our South have treated as
a musical instrument, to slay a thousand Philistines, jubilated in
song:--

    With the jawbone of an ass
      Heaps upon heaps!
    With the jawbone of an ass
      Have I slain a thousand men!


The vast fund of human nature laid bare in the story of Samson is,
it appears to me, quite sufficient to explain its popularity, and
account for its origin. The hero's virtues--strength, courage,
patriotism--are those which have ever won the hearts of men, and
they present themselves as but the more admirable, as they are made
to appear more natural, by pairing with that amiable weakness,
susceptibility to woman's charms.

After all Samson is a true type of the tragic hero, whatever Dr.
Chrysander or another may say. He is impelled by Fate into a
commission of the follies which bring about the wreck of his body.
His marriage with the Philistine woman in Timnath was part of a
divine plot, though unpatriotic and seemingly impious. When his
father said unto him: "Is there never a woman among the daughters
of thy brethren or among all my people that thou goest to take a
wife of the uncircumcised Philistines?" he did not know that "it
was of the Lord that he sought an occasion against the
Philistines." Out of that wooing and winning grew the first of the
encounters which culminated in the destruction of the temple of
Dagon, when "the dead which he slew at his death were more than
they which he slew in his life." So his yielding to the pleadings
of his wife when she betrayed the answer to his riddle and his
succumbing to the wheedling arts of Delilah when he betrayed the
secret of his strength (acts incompatible with the character of an
ordinary strong and wise man) were of the type essential to the
machinery of the Greek drama.

A word about the mythological interpretation of the characters
which have been placed in parallel: It may be helpful to an
understanding of the Hellenic mind to conceive Herakles as a
marvellously strong man, first glorified into a national hero and
finally deified. So, too, the theory, that Herakles sinking down
upon his couch of fire is but a symbol of the declining sun can be
entertained without marring the grandeur of the hero or belittling
Nature's phenomenon; but it would obscure our understanding of the
Hebrew intellect and profane the Hebrew religion to conceive Samson
as anything but the man that the Bible says he was; while to make
of him, as Ignaz Golziher suggests, a symbol of the setting sun
whose curly locks (crines Phoebi) are sheared by Delilah-Night,
would bring contumely upon one of the most beautiful and impressive
of Nature's spectacles. Before the days of comparative mythology
scholars were not troubled by such interpretations. Josephus
disposes of the Delilah episode curtly: "As for Samson being
ensnared by a woman, that is to be ascribed to human nature, which
is too weak to resist sin."



It is not often that an operatic figure invites to such a study as
that which I have attempted in the case of Samson, and it may be
that the side-wise excursion in which I have indulged invites
criticism of the kind illustrated in the metaphor of using a club
to brain a gnat. But I do not think so. If heroic figures seem
small on the operatic stage, it is the fault of either the author
or the actor. When genius in a creator is paired with genius in an
interpreter, the hero of an opera is quite as deserving of
analytical study as the hero of a drama which is spoken. No labor
would be lost in studying the character of Wagner's heroes in order
to illuminate the impersonations of Niemann, Lehmann, or Scaria;
nor is Maurel's lago less worthy of investigation than Edwin
Booth's.

The character of Delilah presents even more features of interest
than that of the man of whom she was the undoing, and to those
features I purpose to devote some attention presently.

There is no symbolism in Saint-Saens's opera. It is frankly a piece
for the lyric theatre, albeit one in which adherence to a plot
suggested by the Biblical story compelled a paucity of action which
had to be made good by spectacle and music. The best element in a
drama being that which finds expression in action and dialogue, and
these being restricted by the obvious desire of the composers to
avoid such extraneous matter as Rossini and others were wont to use
to add interest to their Biblical operas (the secondary love
stories, for instance), Saint-Saens could do nothing else than
employ liberally the splendid factor of choral music which the
oratorio form brought to his hand.

We are introduced to that factor without delay. Even before the
first scene is opened to our eyes we hear the voice of the
multitude in prayer. The Israelites, oppressed by their conquerors
and sore stricken at the reflection that their God has deserted
them, lament, accuse, protest, and pray. Before they have been
heard, the poignancy of their woe has been published by the
orchestra, which at once takes its place beside the chorus as a
peculiarly eloquent expositor of the emotions and passions which
propel the actors in the drama. That mission and that eloquence it
maintains from the beginning to the final catastrophe, the
instrumental band doing its share toward characterizing the
opposing forces, emphasizing the solemn dignity of the Hebrew
religion and contrasting it with the sensuous and sensual frivolity
of the worshippers of Dagon. The choral prayer has for its
instrumental substructure an obstinate syncopated figure,

 [figure: an musical score excerpt]

 which rises with the agonized cries of the people and sinks with
their utterances of despair. The device of introducing voices
before the disclosure of visible action in an opera is not new, and
in this case is both uncalled for and ineffective. Gounod made a
somewhat similar effort in his "Romeo et Juliette," where a
costumed group of singers presents a prologue, vaguely visible
through a gauze curtain. Meyerbeer tried the expedient in "Le
Pardon de Ploermel," and the siciliano in Mascagni's "Cavalleria
rusticana" and the prologue in Leoncavallo's "Pagliacci" are other
cases in point. Of these only the last can be said to achieve its
purpose in arresting the early attention of the audience. When the
curtain opens we see a public place in Gaza in front of the temple
of Dagon. The Israelites are on their knees and in attitudes of
mourning, among them Samson. The voice of lamentation takes a fugal
form--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

as the oppressed people tell of the sufferings which they have
endured:--

    Nous avons vu nos cites renversees
    Et les gentils profanants ton autel, etc.


The expression rises almost to the intensity of sacrilegious
accusation as the people recall to God the vow made to them in
Egypt, but sinks to accents of awe when they reflect upon the
incidents of their former serfdom. Now Samson stands forth. In a
broad arioso, half recitative, half cantilena, wholly in the
oratorio style when it does not drop into the mannerism of
Meyerbeerian opera, he admonishes his brethren of their need to
trust in God, their duty to worship Him, of His promises to aid
them, of the wonders that He had already wrought in their behalf;
he bids them to put off their doubts and put on their armor of
faith and valor. As he proceeds in his preachment he develops
somewhat of the theatrical pose of John of Leyden in "The Prophet."
The Israelites mutter gloomily of the departure of their days of
glory, but gradually take warmth from the spirit which has obsessed
Samson and pledge themselves to do battle with the foe with him
under the guidance of Jehovah.

Now Abimelech, Satrap of Gaza, appears surrounded by Philistine
soldiers. He rails at the Israelites as slaves, sneers at their God
as impotent and craven, lifts up the horn of Dagon, who, he says,
shall pursue Jehovah as a falcon pursues a dove. The speech fills
Samson with a divine anger, which bursts forth in a canticle of
prayer and prophecy. There is a flash as of swords in the
scintillant scale passages which rush upward from the eager, angry,
pushing figure which mutters and rages among the instruments. The
Israelites catch fire from Samson's ecstatic ardor and echo the
words in which he summons them to break their chains. Abimelech
rushes forward to kill Samson, but the hero wrenches the sword from
the Philistine's hand and strikes him dead. The satrap's soldiers
would come to his aid, but are held in fear by the hero, who is now
armed. The Israelites rush off to make war on their oppressors. The
High Priest comes down from the temple of Dagon and pauses where
the body of Abimelech lies. Two Philistines tell of the fear which
had paralyzed them when Samson showed his might. The High Priest
rebukes them roundly for their cowardice, but has scarcely uttered
his denunciation before a Messenger enters to tell him that Samson
and his Israelitish soldiers have overrun and ravaged the country.
Curses and vows of vengeance against Israel, her hero, and her God
from the mouth of Dagon's servant. One of his imprecations is
destined to be fulfilled:--

    Maudit soit le sein de la femme
      Qui lui donna le jour!
    Qu'enfin une compagne infame
      Trahisse son amour!


Revolutions run a rapid course in operatic Palestine. The
insurrection is but begun with the slaying of Abimelech, yet as the
Philistines, bearing away his body, leave the scene, it is only to
make room for the Israelites, chanting of their victory. We expect
a sonorous hymn of triumph, but the people of God have been
chastened and awed by their quick deliverance, and their paean is
in the solemn tone of temple psalmody, the first striking bit of
local color which the composer has introduced into his score--a
reticence on his part of which it may be said that it is all the
more remarkable from the fact that local color is here completely
justified:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt, sung to the words "Praise, ye
Jehovah! Tell all the wondrous story! Psalms of praise loudly
swell!]

    "Hymne de joie, hymne de deliverance
      Montez vers l'Eternel!"


It is a fine piece of dramatic characterization; which is followed
by one whose serene beauty is heightened by contrast. Dalila and a
company of singing and dancing Philistine women come in bearing
garlands of flowers. Not only Samson's senses, our own as well, are
ravished by the delightful music:--

    Voici le printemps, nous portant des fleurs
    Pour orner le front des guerriers vainquers!
    Melons nos accents aux parfums des roses
                 A peine ecloses!
       Avec l'oiseau chantons, mes soeurs!


[figure: a musical score excerpt sung to the words "Now Spring's
generous band, Brings flowers to the land]

Dalila is here and it is become necessary to say something of her,
having said so much about the man whose destruction she
accomplished. Let the ingenious and erudite Philip Hale introduce
her: "Was Delilah a patriotic woman, to be ranked with Jael and
Judith, or was she merely a courtesan, as certain opera singers who
impersonate her in the opera seem to think? E. Meier says that the
word 'Delilah' means 'the faithless one.' Ewald translates it
'traitress,' and so does Ranke. Knobel characterizes her as 'die
Zarte,' which means tender, delicate, but also subtle. Lange is
sure that she was a weaver woman, if not an out-and-out 'zonah.'
There are other Germans who think the word is akin to the verb
'einlullen,' to lull asleep. Some liken it to the Arabic dalilah, a
woman who misguides, a bawd. See in 'The Thousand Nights and a
Night' the speech of the damsel to Aziz: 'If thou marry me thou
wilt at least be safe from the daughter of Dalilah, the Wily One.'
Also 'The Rogueries of Dalilah, the Crafty, and her daughter,
Zayrah, the Coney Catcher.'"

We are directly concerned here with the Dalila of the opera, but
Mr. Hale invites us to an excursion which offers a pleasant
occupation for a brief while, and we cheerfully go with him. The
Biblical Delilah is a vague figure, except in two respects: She is
a woman of such charms that she wins the love of Samson, and such
guile and cupidity that she plays upon his passion and betrays him
to the lords of the Philistines for pay. The Bible knows nothing of
her patriotism, nor does the sacred historian give her the title of
Samson's wife, though it has long been the custom of Biblical
commentators to speak of her in this relation. St. Chrysostom set
the fashion and Milton followed it:--

    But who is this? What thing of sea or land--
    Female of sex it seems--
    That, so bedeck'd, ornate and gay
    Comes this way sailing
    Like a stately ship
    Of Tarsus, bound for the isles
    Of Javan or Gadire,
    With all her bravery on, and tackle trim,
    Sails fill'd and streamers waving,
    Courted by all the winds that hold them play;
    An amber scent of odorous perfume--
    Her harbinger, a damsel train behind?
    Some rich Philistian matron she may seem;
    And now, at nearer view, no other certain
    Than Dalila, thy wife.


It cannot be without significance that the author of the story in
the Book of Judges speaks in a different way of each of the three
women who play a part in the tragedy of Samson's life. The woman
who lived among the vineyards of Timnath, whose murder Samson
avenged, was his wife. She was a Philistine, but Samson married her
according to the conventional manner of the time and, also
according to the manner of the time, she kept her home with her
parents after her marriage. Wherefore she has gotten her name in
the good books of the sociological philosophers who uphold the
matronymic theory touching early society. The woman of Gaza whom
Samson visited what time he confounded his would-be captors by
carrying off the doors of the gates of the city was curtly "an
harlot." Of the third woman it is said only that it came to pass
that Samson "loved a woman in the Valley of Sorek, whose name was
Delilah." Thereupon follows the story of her bribery by the lords
of the Philistines and her betrayal of her lover. Evidently a
licentious woman who could not aspire even to the merit of the
heroine of Dekker's play.

Milton not only accepted the theory of her wifehood, but also
attributed patriotic motives to her. She knew that her name would
be defamed "in Dan, in Judah and the bordering tribes."

    But in my country, where I most desire,
    In Eeron, Gaza, Asdod and in Gath,
    I shall be nam'd among the famousest
    Of women, sung at solemn festivals,
    Living and dead recorded, who to save
    Her country from a fierce destroyer, chose
    Above the faith of wedlock bands; my tomb
    With odours visited and annual flowers;
    Not less renown'd than in Mount Ephraim
    Jael, who, with inhospitable guile,
    Smote Sisera sleeping.


In the scene before us Dalila is wholly and simply a siren, a
seductress who plays upon the known love of Samson from motives
which are not disclosed. As yet one may imagine her moved by a
genuine passion. She turns her lustrous black eyes upon him as she
hails him a double victor over his foes and her heart, and invites
him to rest from his arms in her embraces in the fair valley of
Sorek. Temptation seizes upon the soul of Samson. He prays God to
make him steadfast; but she winds her toils the tighter: It is for
him that she has bound a coronet of purple grapes upon her forehead
and entwined the rose of Sharon in her ebon tresses. An Old Hebrew
warns against the temptress and Samson agonizingly invokes a veil
over the beauty that has enchained him.

"Extinguish the fires of those eyes which enslave me."--thus he.

"Sweet is the lily of the valley, pleasant the juices of
mandragora, but sweeter and more pleasant are my kisses!"--thus she.

The Old Hebrew warns again: "If thou give ear to her honeyed
phrases, my son, curses will alight on thee which no tears that
thou may'st weep will ever efface."

But still the siren song rings in his ears. The maidens who had
come upon the scene with Dalila (are they priestesses of Dagon?)
dance, swinging their floral garlands seductively before the eyes
of Samson and his followers. The hero tries to avoid the glances
which Dalila, joining in the dance, throws upon him. It is in vain;
his eyes follow her through all the voluptuous postures and
movements of the dance.

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

And Dalila sings "Printemps qui commence"--a song often heard in
concert-rooms, but not so often as the air with which the love-duet
in the second act reaches its culmination, which is popularly held
also to mark the climax of the opera. That song is wondrously
insinuating in its charm; it pulsates with passion, so much so,
indeed, that it is difficult to conceive that its sentiments are
feigned, but this is lovelier in its fresh, suave, graceful, and
healthy beauty:-

[figure: a musical score excerpt, sung to the words "The Spring
with her dower of bird and flower, brings hope in her train."]

As Dalila leaves the scene her voice and eyes repeat their lure,
while Samson's looks and acts betray the trouble of his soul.

It is not until we see and hear Dalila in the second act that she
is revealed to us in her true character. Not till now does she
disclose the motives of her conduct toward her lover. Night is
falling in the valley of Sorek, the vale which lies between the
hill country which the Israelites entered from the East, and the
coast land which the Philistines, supposedly an island people,
invaded from the West. Dalila, gorgeously apparelled, is sitting on
a rock near the portico of her house. The strings of the orchestra
murmur and the chromatic figure which we shall hear again in her
love-song coos in the wood-winds:

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

She awaits him whom passion has made her slave in full confidence
of her hold upon him.

    Samson, recherchant ma presence,
    Ce soir doit venir en ces lieux.
    Voici l'heure de la vengeance
    Qui doit satisfaire nos dieux!

    Amour! viens aider ma faiblesse!

The vengeance of her gods shall be glutted; it is to that end she
invokes the power of love to strengthen her weakness. A passion
like his will not down--that she knows. To her comes the High
Priest: Samson's strength, he says, is supernatural and flows from
a vow with which he was consecrated to effect the glory of Israel.
Once while he lay in her arms that strength had deserted him, but
now, it is said, he flouts her love and doubts his own passion.
There is no need to try to awaken

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

jealousy in the heart of Dalila; she hates Samson more bitterly
than the leader of his enemies. She is not mercenary, like the
Biblical woman; she scorns the promise of riches which the High
Priest offers so she obtain the secret of the Hebrew's strength.
Thrice had she essayed to learn that secret and thrice had he set
her spell at naught. Now she will assail him with tears--a woman's
weapon.

The rumblings of thunder are heard; the scene is lit up by flashes
of lightning. Running before the storm, which is only a precursor
and a symbol of the tempest which is soon to rend his soul, Samson
comes. Dalila upbraids her lover, rebukes his fears, protests her
grief. Samson cannot withstand her tears. He confesses his love,
but he must obey the will of a higher power. "What god is mightier
than Love?" Let him but doubt her constancy and she will die. And
she plays her trump card: "Mon coeur s'ouvre a ta voix," while the
fluttering strings and cooing wood-winds insinuate themselves into
the crevices of Samson's moral harness and loosen the rivets that
hold it together:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt to the words "My heart, at thy
dear voice"]

Herein lies the strength and the weakness of music: it must fain be
truthful. Dalila's words may be hypocritical, but the music speaks
the speech of genuine passion. Not until we hear the refrain echoed
mockingly in the last scene of the drama can we believe that the
passion hymned in this song is feigned. And we almost deplore hat
the composer put it to such disgraceful use. Samson hears the voice
of his God in the growing and again hesitates. The storm bursts as
Dalila shrieks out the hate that fills her and runs toward her
dwelling.

Beethoven sought to suggest external as well as internal peace in
the "Dona nobis" of his Mass in D by mingling the sounds of war
with the prayer for peace; Saint-Saens pictures the storm in nature
and in Samson's soul by the music which accompanies the hero as he
raises his hands mutely in prayer; then follows the temptress with
faltering steps and enters her dwelling. The tempest reaches its
climax; Dalila appears at the window with a shout to the waiting
Philistine soldiery below. The voice of Samson cuts through the
stormy night: "Trahison!"

Act III.--First scene: A prison in Gaza. Samson, shorn of his
flowing locks, which as a Nazarite he had vowed should never be
touched by shears, labors at the mill. He has been robbed of his
eyes and darkness has settled down upon him; darkness, too, upon
the people whom his momentary weakness had given back into slavery.

"Total eclipse!" Saint-Saens has won our admiration for the solemn
dignity with which he has invested the penitent confession of the
blind hero. But who shall hymn the blindness of Manoah's son after
Milton and Handel? From a crowd of captive Hebrews outside the
prison walls come taunting accusations, mingled with supplications
to God. We recognize again the national mood of the psalmody of the
first act. The entire scene is finely conceived. It is dramatic in
a lofty sense, for its action plays on the stage of the heart.
Samson, contrite, humble, broken in spirit, with a prayer for his
people's deliverance, is led away to be made sport of in the temple
of Dagon. There, before the statue of the god, grouped among the
columns and before the altar the High Priest and the lords of the
Philistines. Dalila, too, with maidens clad for the lascivious
dance, and the multitude of Philistia. The women's choral song to
spring which charmed us in the first act is echoed by mixed voices.
The ballet which follows is a prettily exotic one, with an
introductory cadence marked by the Oriental scale, out of which the
second dance melody is constructed--a scale which has the
peculiarity of an interval composed of three semitones, and which
we know from the song of the priestesses in Verdi's "Aida":--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

The High Priest makes mock of the Judge of Israel: Let him empty
the wine cup and sing the praise of his vanquisher! Dalila, in the
pride of her triumph, tauntingly tells him how simulated love had
been made to serve her gods, her hate, and her nation. Samson
answers only in contrite prayer. Together in canonic imitation (the
erudite form does not offend, but only gives dignity to the scene)
priest and siren offer a libation on the altar of the Fish god.

 [figure: a musical score excerpt]

The flames flash upward from the altar. Now a supreme act of
insolent impiety; Samson, too, shall sacrifice to Dagon. A boy is
told to lead him where all can witness his humiliation. Samson
feels that the time for retribution upon his enemies is come. He
asks to be led between the marble pillars that support the roof of
the temple. Priests and people, the traitress and her dancing
women, the lords of the Philistines, the rout of banqueters and
worshippers--all hymn the praise of Dagon. A brief supplication to
Israel's God--

"And Samson took hold of the two middle pillars upon which the
house stood and on which it was borne up, of the one with his right
hand and of the other with his left.

"And Samson said, 'Let me die with the Philistines.' And he bowed
himself with all his might: and the house fell upon the lords and
upon all the people that were therein. So the dead which he slew at
his death were more than they which he slew in his life."




CHAPTER V

"DIE KONIGIN VON SABA"


The most obvious reason why Goldmark's "Konigin von Saba" should be
seen and heard with pleasure lies in its book and scenic
investiture. Thoughtfully considered the book is not one of great
worth, but in the handling of things which give pleasure to the
superficial observer it is admirable. In the first place it
presents a dramatic story which is rational; which strongly enlists
the interest if not the sympathies of the observer; which is
unhackneyed; which abounds with imposing spectacles with which the
imagination of childhood already had made play, that are not only
intrinsically brilliant and fascinating but occur as necessary
adjuncts of the story. Viewed from its ethical side and considered
with reference to the sources whence its elements sprang, it falls
under a considerable measure of condemnation, as will more plainly
appear after its incidents have been rehearsed.

The title of the opera indicates that the Biblical story of the
visit of the Queen of Sheba to Solomon had been drawn on for the
plot. This is true, but only in a slight degree. Sheba's Queen
comes to Solomon in the opera, but that is the end of the draft on
the Scriptural legend so far as she is concerned. Sulamith, who
figures in the drama, owes her name to the Canticles, from which it
was borrowed by the librettist, but no element of her character nor
any of the incidents in which she is involved. The "Song of Songs,
which is Solomon's" contributes a few lines of poetry to the book,
and a ritualistic service which is celebrated in the temple finds
its original text in the opening verses of Psalms lxvii and cxvii,
but with this I have enumerated all that the opera owes to the
Bible. It is not a Biblical opera, in the degree that Mehul's
"Joseph," Rossini's "Moses," or Rubinstein's "Maccabees" is
Biblical, to say nothing of Saint-Saens's "Samson et Dalila."
Solomon's magnificent reign and marvellous wisdom, which contribute
a few factors to the sum of the production, belong to profane as
well as to sacred history and it will be found most agreeable to
deeply rooted preconceptions to think of some other than the
Scriptural Solomon as the prototype of the Solomon of Mosenthal and
Goldmark, who, at the best, is a sorry sort of sentimentalist. The
local color has been borrowed from the old story; the dramatic
motive comes plainly from Wagner's "Tannhauser."

Assad, a favorite courtier, is sent by Solomon to extend greetings
and a welcome to the Queen of Sheba, who is on the way to visit the
king, whose fame for wealth and wisdom has reached her ears in far
Arabia. Assad is the type (though a milk-and-watery one, it must
be confessed) of manhood struggling between the things that are of
the earth and the things which are of heaven--between a gross,
sensual passion and a pure, exalting love. He is betrothed to
Sulamith, the daughter of the High Priest of the temple, who awaits
his return from Solomon's palace and leads her companions in songs
of gladness. Assad meets the Queen at Gath, performs his mission,
and sets out to return, but, exhausted by the heat of the day,
enters the forest on Mount Lebanon and lies down on a bank of moss
to rest. There the sound of plashing waters arrests his ear. He
seeks the cause of the grateful noise and comes upon a
transportingly beautiful woman bathing. The nymph, finding herself
observed, does not, like another Diana, cause the death of her
admirer, but discloses herself to be a veritable Wagnerian Venus.
She clips him in her arms and he falls at her feet; but a reed
rustles and the charmer flees. These incidents we do not see. They
precede the opening of the opera, and we learn of them from Assad's
narration. Assad returns to Jerusalem, where, conscience stricken,
he seeks to avoid his chaste bride. To Solomon, however, he
confesses his adventure, and the king sets the morrow as his
wedding day with Sulamith.

The Queen of Sheba arrives, and when she raises her veil,
ostensibly to show unto Solomon the first view of her features that
mortal man has ever had vouchsafed him, Assad recognizes the
heroine of his adventure in the woods on Lebanon. His mind is in a
maze; bewilderingly he addresses her, and haughtily he is repulsed.
But the woman has felt the dart no less than Assad; she seeks him
at night in the palace garden; whither she had gone to brood over
her love and the loss which threatens her on the morrow, and the
luring song of her slave draws him again into her arms.

Before the altar in the temple, just as Assad is about to pronounce
the words which are to bind him to Sulamith, she confronts him
again, on the specious pretext that she brings gifts for the bride.
Assad again addresses her. Again he is denied. Delirium seizes upon
his brain; he loudly proclaims the Queen as the goddess of his
devotion. The people are panic-stricken at the sacrilege and rush
from the temple; the priests cry anathema; Sulamith bemoans her
fate; Solomon essays words of comfort; the High Priest intercedes
with heaven; the soldiery, led by Baal-Hanan, overseer of the
palace, enter to lead the profaner to death. Now Solomon claims the
right to fix his punishment. The Queen, fearful that her prey may
escape her, begs his life as a boon, but Solomon rejects her
appeal; Assad must work out his salvation by overcoming temptation
and mastering his wicked passion. Sulamith approaches amid the
wailings of her companions. She is about to enter a retreat on the
edge of the Syrian desert, but she, too, prays for the life of
Assad. Solomon, in a prophetic ecstasy, foretells Assad's
deliverance from sin and in a vision sees a meeting between him and
his pure love under a palm tree in the desert. Assad is banished to
the sandy waste; there a simoom sweeps down upon him; he falls at
the foot of a lonely palm to die, after calling on Sulamith with
his fleeting breath. She comes with her wailing maidens, sees the
fulfilment of Solomon's prophecy, and Assad dies in her arms. "Thy
beloved is thine, in love's eternal realm," sing the maidens, while
a mirage shows the wicked Queen, with her caravan of camels and
elephants, returning to her home.

The parallel between this story and the immeasurably more poetical
and beautiful one of "Tannhauser" is apparent to half an eye.
Sulamith is Elizabeth, the Queen is Venus, Assad is Tannhauser,
Solomon is Wolfram von Eschenbach. The ethical force of the drama--
it has some, though very little--was weakened at the performances
at the Metropolitan Opera House [footnote: Goldmark's opera was presented for
the first time in America at the Metropolitan Opera House on
December 2, 1885. Cast: Sulamith, Fraulein Lilli Lehmann; die
Konigin von Saba, Frau Kramer-Wiedl; Astaroth, Fraulein Marianne
Brandt; Solomon, Herr Adolph Robinson; Assad, Herr Stritt; Der Hohe
Priester, Herr Emil Fischer; Baal-Hanan, Herr-Alexi. Anton Seidl
conducted, and the opera had fifteen representations in the season.
These performances were in the original German. On April 3, 1888,
an English version was presented at the Academy of Music by the
National Opera Company, then in its death throes. The opera was
revived at the Metropolitan Opera House by Mr. Conried in the
season 1905-1906 and had five performances.] in New York by the
excision from the last act of a scene in which the Queen attempts
to persuade Assad to go with her to Arabia. Now Assad rises
superior to his grosser nature and drives the temptress away, thus
performing the saving act demanded by Solomon.

Herr Mosenthal, who made the libretto of "Die Konigin von Saba,"
treated this material, not with great poetic skill, but with a
cunning appreciation of the opportunities which it offers for
dramatic effect. The opera opens with a gorgeous picture of the
interior of Solomon's palace, decked in honor of the coming guest.
There is an air of joyous expectancy over everything. Sulamith's
entrance introduces the element of female charm to brighten the
brilliancy of the picture, and her bridal song--in which the refrain
is an excerpt from the Canticles, "Thy beloved is thine, who feeds
among the roses"--enables the composer to indulge his strong
predilection and fecund gift for Oriental melody. The action
hurries to a thrilling climax. One glittering pageant treads on the
heels of another, each more gorgeous and resplendent than the last,
until the stage, set to represent a fantastical hall with a
bewildering vista of carved columns, golden lions, and rich
draperies, is filled with such a kaleidoscopic mass of colors and
groupings as only an Oriental mind could conceive. Finally all the
preceding strokes are eclipsed by the coming of the Queen. But no
time is lost; the spectacle does not make the action halt for a
moment. Sheba makes her gifts and uncovers her face, and at once we
are confronted by the tragical element, and the action rushes on
toward its legitimate and mournful end.

In this ingenious blending of play and spectacle one rare
opportunity after another is presented to the composer. Sulamith's
epithalamium, Assad's narrative, the choral greeting to the Queen,
the fateful recognition--all these things are made for music of the
inspiring, swelling, passionate kind. In the second act, the
Queen's monologue, her duet with Assad, and, most striking of all,
the unaccompanied bit of singing with which Astaroth lures Assad
into the presence of the Queen, who is hiding in the shadow of
broad-leaved palms behind a running fountain--a melodic phrase
saturated with the mystical color of the East--these are gifts of
the rarest kind to the composer, which he has enriched to give them
in turn to the public. That relief from their stress of passion is
necessary is not forgotten, but is provided in the ballet music and
the solemn ceremonial in the temple, which takes place amid
surroundings that call into active operation one's childhood
fancies touching the sacred fane on Mount Moriah and the pompous
liturgical functions of which it was the theatre.

Goldmark's music is highly spiced. He was an eclectic, and his
first aim seems to have been to give the drama a tonal investiture
which should be in keeping with its character, external as well as
internal. At times his music rushes along like a lava stream of
passion, every measure pulsating with eager, excited, and exciting
life. He revels in instrumental color. The language of his
orchestra is as glowing as the poetry attributed to the royal poet
whom his operatic story celebrates. Many composers before him made
use of Oriental cadences, rhythms, and idioms, but to none do they
seem to have come so like native language as to Goldmark. It is
romantic music, against which the strongest objection that can be
urged is that it is so unvaryingly stimulated that it wearies the
mind and makes the listener long for a change to a fresher and
healthier musical atmosphere.




CHAPTER VI

"HERODIADE"


In the ballet scene of Gounod's most popular opera Mephistopheles
conjures up visions of Phryne, Lais, Aspasia, Cleopatra, and Helen
of Troy to beguile the jaded interest of Faust. The list reads
almost like a catalogue of the operas of Massenet whose fine talent
was largely given to the celebration of the famous courtesans of
the ancient world. With the addition of a few more names from the
roster of antiquity (Thais, Dalila, and Aphrodite), and some less
ancient but no less immoral creatures of modern fancy, like
Violetta, Manon Lescaut, Zaza, and Louise, we might make a pretty
complete list of representatives of the female type in which modern
dramatists and composers seem to think the interest of humanity
centres.

When Massenet's "Herodiade" was announced as the first opera to be
given at the Manhattan Opera House in New York for the season of
1909-1910 it looked to some observers as if the dominant note of
the year was to be sounded by the Scarlet Woman; but the
representation brought a revelation and a surprise. The names of
the principal characters were those which for a few years had been
filling the lyric theatres of Germany with a moral stench; but
their bearers in Massenet's opera did little or nothing that was
especially shocking to good taste or proper morals. Herod was a
love-sick man of lust, who gazed with longing eyes upon the
physical charms of Salome and pleaded for her smiles like any
sentimental milksop; but he did not offer her Capernaum for a
dance. Salome may have known how, but she did not dance for either
half a kingdom or the whole of a man's head. Instead, though there
were intimations that her reputation was not all that a good
maiden's ought to be, she sang pious hosannahs and waved a palm
branch conspicuously in honor of the prophet at whose head she had
bowled herself in the desert, the public streets, and king's
palaces. At the end she killed herself when she found that the
vengeful passion of Herodias and the jealous hatred of Herod had
compassed the death of the saintly man whom she had loved. Herodias
was a wicked woman, no doubt, for John the Baptist denounced her
publicly as a Jezebel, but her jealousy of Salome had reached a
point beyond her control before she learned that her rival was her
own daughter whom she had deserted for love of the Tetrarch. As for
John the Baptist the camel's hair with which he was clothed must
have cost as pretty a penny as any of the modern kind, and if he
wore a girdle of skins about his loins it was concealed under a
really regal cloak. He was a voice; but not one crying in the
wilderness. He was in fact an operatic tenor comme il faut, who
needed only to be shut up in a subterranean jail with the young
woman who had pursued him up hill and down dale, in and out of
season to make love to her in the most approved fashion of the
Paris Grand Opera.

What shall we think of the morals of this French opera, after we
have seen and heard that compounded by the Englishman Oscar Wilde
and the German Richard Strauss? No wonder that England's Lord
Chamberlain asked nothing more than an elimination of the Biblical
names when he licensed a performance of "Herodiade" at Covent
Garden. There was no loss of dramatic qualitiy in calling Herod,
Moriame, and Herodias, Hesotade, and changing the scene from
Jerusalem to Azoum in Ethiopia; though it must have been a trifle
diverting to hear fair-skinned Ethiopians singing Schma Yisroel,
Adonai Elohenu in a temple which could only be that of Jerusalem.
John the Baptist was only Jean in the original and needed not to be
changed, and Salome is not in the Bible, though Salome, a very
different woman is--a fact which the Lord Chamberlain seems to have
overlooked when he changed the title of the opera from "Herodiade"
to "Salome."

Where does Salome come from, anyway? And where did she get her
chameleonlike nature? Was she an innocent child, as Flaubert
represents her, who could but lisp the name of the prophet when her
mother told her to ask for his head? Had she taken dancing lessons
from one of the women of Cadiz to learn to dance as she must have
danced to excite such lust in Herod? Was she a monster, a worse
than vampire as she is represented by Wilde and Strauss? Was she an
"Israelitish grisette" as Pougin called the heroine of the opera
which it took one Italian (Zanardini) and three Frenchmen (Milliet,
Gremont, and Massenet) to concoct? No wonder that the brain of
Saint-Saens reeled when he went to hear "Herodiade" at its first
performance in Brussels and found that the woman whom he had looked
upon as a type of lasciviousness and monstrous cruelty had become
metamorphosed into a penitent Magdalen. Read the plot of the opera
and wonder!

Salome is a maiden in search of her mother whom John the Baptist
finds in his wanderings and befriends. She clings to him when he
becomes a political as well as a religious power among the Jews,
though he preaches unctuously to her touching the vanity of earthly
love. Herodias demands his death of her husband for that he had
publicly insulted her, but Herod schemes to use his influence over
the Jews to further his plan to become a real monarch instead of a
Roman Tetrarch. But when the pro-consul Vitellius wins the support
of the people and Herod learns that the maiden who has spurned him
is in love with the prophet, he decrees his decapitation. Salome,
baffled in her effort to save her lover, attempts to kill Herodias;
but the wicked woman discloses herself as the maiden's mother and
Salome turns the dagger against her own breast.

This is all of the story one needs to know. It is richly garnished
with incident, made gorgeous with pageantry, and clothed with much
charming music. Melodies which may be echoes of synagogal hymns of
great antiquity resound in the walls of the temple at Jerusalem, in
which respect the opera recalls Goldmark's "Queen of Sheba." Curved
Roman trumpets mix their loud clangors with the instruments of the
modern brass band and compel us to think of "Aida." There are
dances of Egyptians, Babylonians, and Phoenicians, and if the
movements of the women make us deplore the decay of the
choreographic art, the music warms us almost as much as the Spanish
measures in "Le Cid." Eyes and ears are deluged with Oriental color
until at the last there comes a longing for the graciously
insinuating sentimentalities of which the earlier Massenet was a
master. Two of the opera's airs had long been familiar to the
public from performance in the concert-room--Salome's "Il est
doux" and Herod's "Vision fugitive"--and they stand out as the
brightest jewels in the opera's musical crown; but there is much
else which woos the ear delightfully, for Massenet was ever a
gracious if not a profound melodist and a master of construction
and theatrical orchestration. When he strives for massive effects,
however, he sometimes becomes futile, banal where he would be
imposing; but he commands a charm which is insinuating in its
moments of intimacy.

[Footnote: "Herodiade" had its first performance in New York (it
had previously been given in New Orleans by the French Opera
Company) on November 8, 1909. The cast was as follows: Salome--Lina
Cavalieri; Herodias--Gerville-Reache; John--Charles Dalmores;
Herod--Maurice Renaud; Vitellius--Crabbe; Phanuel--M. Vallier; High
Priest--M. Nicolay. The musical director was Henriques de la
Fuente.]




CHAPTER VII

"LAKME"


Lakme is the daughter of Nilakantha, a fanatical Brahmin priest,
who has withdrawn to a ruined temple deep in an Indian forest. In
his retreat the old man nurses his wrath against the British
invader, prays assiduously to Brahma (thus contributing a
fascinating Oriental mood to the opening of the opera), and waits
for the time to come when he shall be able to wreak his revenge on
the despoilers of his country. Lakme sings Oriental duets with her
slave, Mallika:--

    Sous le dome epais ou le blanc jasmin
      A la rose s'assemble,
    Sur la rive en fleurs, riant au matin
      Viens, descendons ensemble--


a dreamy, sense-ensnaring, hypnotic barcarole. The opera opens
well; by this time the composer has carried us deep into the
jungle. The Occident is rude: Gerald, an English officer, breaks
through a bamboo fence and makes love to Lakme, who, though widely
separated from her operatic colleagues from an ethnological point
of view like Elsa and Senta, to expedite the action requites the
passion instanter. After the Englishman is gone the father returns
and, with an Oriental's cunning which does him credit, deduces from
the broken fence that an Englishman has profaned the sacred spot.
This is the business of Act I. In Act II the father, disguised as a
beggar who holds a dagger ever in readiness, and his daughter,
disguised as a street singer, visit a town market in search of the
profaner. The business is not to Lakme's taste, but it is not for
the like of her to neglect the opportunity offered to win applause
with the legend of the pariah's daughter, with its tintinnabulatory
charm:--

    Ou va la jeune Hindoue
      Fille des parias;
    Quand la lune se joue
      Dans les grand mimosas?


It is the "Bell song," which has tinkled so often in our concert-
rooms. Gerald recognizes the singer despite her disguise; and
Nilakantha recognizes him as the despoiler of the hallowed spot in
which he worships and incidentally conceals his daughter. The
bloodthirsty fanatic observes sententiously that Brahma has smiled
and cuts short Gerald's soliloquizing with a dagger thrust. Lakme,
with the help of a male slave, removes him to a hut concealed in
the forest. While he is convalescing the pair sing duets and
exchange vows of undying affection. But the military Briton, who
has invaded the country at large, must needs now invade also this
cosey abode of love. Frederick, a brother officer, discovers Gerald
and informs him that duty calls (Britain always expects every man
to do his duty, no matter what the consequences to him) and he must
march with his regiment. Frederick has happened in just as Lakme is
gone for some sacred water in which she and Gerald were to pledge
eternal love for each other, to each other. But, spurred on by
Frederick and the memory that "England expects, etc.," Gerald finds
the call of the fife and drum more potent than the voice of love.
Lakme, psychologist as well as botanist, understands the struggle
which now takes place in Gerald's soul, and relieves him, of his
dilemma by crushing a poisonous flower (to be exact, the Datura
stramonium) between her teeth, dying, it would seem, to the pious
delight of her father, who "ecstatically" beholds her dwelling with
Brahma.

The story, borrowed by Gondinet and Gille from the little romance
"Le Mariage de Loti," is worthless except to furnish motives for
tropical scenery, Hindu dresses, and Oriental music. Three English
ladies, Ellen, Rose, and Mrs. Bentson, figure in the play, but
without dramatic purpose except to take part in some concerted
music. They are, indeed, so insignificant in all other respects
that when the opera was given by Miss Van Zandt and a French
company in London for the first time in 1885 they were omitted, and
the excision was commended by the critics, who knew that it had
been made. The conversation of the women is all of the veriest
stopgap character. The maidens, Rose and Ellen, are English ladies
visiting in the East; Mrs. Bentson is their chaperon. All that they
have to say is highly unimportant, even when true. "What do you
see, Frederick?" "A garden." "And you, Gerald?" "Big, beautiful
trees." "Anybody about?" "Don't know." "Look again." "That's not
easy; the fence shuts out the view within." "Can't you make a
peephole through the bamboo?" "Girls, girls, be careful." And so on
and so on for quantity. But we must fill three acts, and ensemble
makes its demands; besides, we want pretty blondes of the English
type to put in contrast with the dark-skinned Lakme and her slave.
At the first representation in New York by the American Opera
Company, at the Academy of Music, on March 1, 1886, the three women
were permitted to interfere with what there is of poetical spirit
in the play, and their conversation, like that of the other
principals, was uttered in the recitatives composed by Delibes to
take the place of the spoken dialogue used at the Paris Opera
Comique, where spoken dialogue is traditional. Theodore Thomas
conducted the Academy performance, at which the cast was as
follows: Lakme, Pauline L'Allemand; Nilakantha, Alonzo E. Stoddard;
Gerald, William Candidus; Frederick, William H. Lee; Ellen,
Charlotte Walker; Rose, Helen Dudley Campbell; Mrs. Bentson, May
Fielding; Mallika, Jessie Bartlett Davis; Hadji, William H.
Fessenden.

Few operas have had a more variegated American history than
"Lakme." It was quite new when it was first heard in New York, but
it had already given rise to considerable theatrical gossip, not to
say scandal. The first representation took place at the Opera
Comique in April, 1883, with Miss Marie Van Zandt, an American
girl, the daughter of a singer who had been actively successful in
English opera in New York and London, as creator of the part of the
heroine. The opera won a pretty triumph and so did the singer. At
once there was talk of a New York performance. Mme. Etelka Gerster
studied the titular role with M. Delibes and, as a member of
Colonel Mapleson's company at the Academy of Music, confidently
expected to produce the work there in the season of 1883-1884, the
first season of the rivalry between the Academy and the
Metropolitan Opera House, which had just opened its doors; but
though she went so far as to offer to buy the American performing
rights from Heugel, the publisher, nothing came of it. The reason
was easily guessed by those who knew that there has been, or was
pending, a quarrel between Colonel Mapleson and M. Heugel
concerning the unauthorized use by the impresario of other scores
owned by the publisher.

During the same season, however, Miss Emma Abbott carried a version
(or rather a perversion) of the opera, for which the orchestral
parts had been arranged from the pianoforte score, into the cities
of the West, and brought down a deal of unmerited criticism on the
innocent head of M. Delibes. In the season of 1884-1885 Colonel
Mapleson came back to the Academy with vouchers of various sorts to
back up a promise to give the opera. There was a human voucher in
the person of Miss Emma Nevada, who had also enjoyed the
instruction of the composer and who had trunkfuls and trunkfuls and
trunkfuls of Oriental dresses, though Lakme needs but few. There
were gorgeous uniforms for the British soldiers, the real article,
each scarlet coat and every top boot having a piece of history
attached, and models of the scenery which any doubting Thomas of a
newspaper reporter might inspect if he felt so disposed. When the
redoubtable colonel came it was to be only a matter of a week or so
before the opera would be put on the stage in the finest of styles;
it was still a matter of a week or so when the Academy season came
to an end. When Delibes's exquisite and exotic music reached a
hearing in the American metropolis, it was sung to English words,
and the most emphatic success achieved in performance was the
acrobatic one of Mme. L'Allemand as she rolled down some uncalled-
for pagoda steps in the death scene.

Mme. Adelina Patti was the second Lakme heard in New York. After
the fifth season of German opera at the Metropolitan Opera House
had come to an end in the spring of 1890, Messrs. Abbey and Grau
took the theatre for a short season of Italian opera by a troupe
headed by Mme. Patti. In that season "Lakme" was sung once--on April
2, 1890. Now came an opportunity for the original representative of
the heroine. Abbey and Grau resumed the management of the theatre
in 1891, and in their company was Miss Van Zandt, for whom the
opera was "revived" on February 22. Mr. Abbey had great
expectations, but they were disappointed. For the public there was
metal more attractive than Miss Van Zandt and the Hindu opera in
other members of the company and other operas. It was the year of
Emma Eames's coming and also of Jean de Reszke's (they sang
together in Gounod's "Romeo et Juliette") and "Cavalleria
rusticana" was new. Then Delibes's opera hibernated in New York for
fifteen years, after which the presence in the Metropolitan company
of Mme. Marcella Sembrich led to another "revival." (Operas which
are unperformed for a term of two or three years after having been
once included in the repertory are "revived" in New York.) It was
sung three times in the season of 1906-1907. It also afforded one
of Mr. Hammerstein's many surprises at the Manhattan Opera House.
Five days before the close of his last season, on March 21, 1910,
it was precipitated on the stage ("pitchforked" is the popular and
professional term) to give Mme. Tetrazzini a chance to sing the
bell song. Altogether I know of no more singular history than that
of "Lakme" in New York.



Lakme is a child of the theatrical boards, who inherited traits
from several predecessors, the strongest being those deriving from
Aida and Selika. Like the former, she loves a man whom her father
believes to be the arch enemy of his native land, and, like her,
she is the means of betraying him into the hands of the avenger.
Like the heroine of Meyerbeer's posthumous opera, she has a fatal
acquaintance with tropical botany and uses her knowledge to her own
destruction. Her scientific attainments are on about the same plane
as her amiability, her abnormal sense of filial duty, and her
musical accomplishments. She loves a man whom her father wishes her
to lure to his death by her singing, and she sings entrancingly
enough to bring about the meeting between her lover's back and her
father's knife. That she does not warble herself into the position
of "particeps criminis" in a murder she owes only to the bungling
of the old man. Having done this, however, she turns physician and
nurse and brings the wounded man back to health, thus sacrificing
her love to the duty which her lover thinks he owes to the invaders
of her country and oppressors of her people. After this she makes
the fatal application of her botanical knowledge. Such things come
about when one goes to India for an operatic heroine.

The feature of the libretto which Delibes has used to the best
purpose is its local color. His music is saturated with the
languorous spirit of the East. Half a dozen of the melodies are
lovely inventions, of marked originality in both matter and
treatment, and the first half hour of the opera is apt to take
one's fancy completely captive. The drawback lies in the oppressive
weariness which succeeds the first trance, and is brought on by the
monotonous character of the music. After an hour of "Lakme" one
yearns for a few crashing chords of C major as a person enduring
suffocation longs for a gush of fresh air. The music first grows
monotonous, then wearies. Delibes's lyrical moments show the most
numerous indications of beauty; dramatic life and energy are absent
from the score. In the second act he moves his listeners only once
--with the attempted repetition of the bell song after Lakme has
recognized her lover. The odor of the poppy invites to drowsy
enjoyment in the beginning, and the first act is far and away the
most gratifying in the opera, musically as well as scenically. It
would be so if it contained only Lakme's song "Pourquoi dans les
grands bois," the exquisite barcarole--a veritable treasure trove
for the composer, who used its melody dramatically throughout the
work--and Gerald's air, "Fantaisie aux divins mensonges." Real
depth will be looked for in vain in this opera; superficial
loveliness is apparent on at least half its pages.




CHAPTER VIII

"PAGLIACCl"


For a quarter of a century "Cavalleria rusticana" and "Pagliacci"
have been the Castor and Pollux of the operatic theatres of Europe
and America. Together they have joined the hunt of venturesome
impresarios for that Calydonian boar, success; together they have
lighted the way through seasons of tempestuous stress and storm. Of
recent years at the Metropolitan Opera House in New York efforts
have been made to divorce them and to find associates for one or
the other, since neither is sufficient in time for an evening's
entertainment; but they refuse to be put asunder as steadfastly as
did the twin brothers of Helen and Clytemnestra. There has been no
operatic Zeus powerful enough to separate and alternate their
existences even for a day; and though blase critics will continue
to rail at the "double bill" as they have done for two decades or
more, the two fierce little dramas will "sit shining on the sails"
of many a managerial ship and bring it safe to haven for many a
year to come.

Twins the operas are in spirit; twins in their capacity as supreme
representatives of verismo; twins in the fitness of their
association; but twins they are not in respect of parentage or age.
"Cavalleria rusticana" is two years older than "Pagliacci" and as
truly its progenitor as Weber's operas were the progenitors of
Wagner's. They are the offspring of the same artistic movement, and
it was the phenomenal

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

success of Mascagni's opera which was the spur that drove
Leoncavallo to write his. When "Cavalleria rusticana" appeared on
the scene, two generations of opera-goers had passed away without
experiencing anything like the sensation caused by this opera. They
had witnessed the production, indeed, of great masterpieces, which
it would be almost sacrilegious to mention in the same breath with
Mascagni's turbulent and torrential tragedy, but these works were
the productions of mature masters, from whom things monumental and
lasting were expected as a matter of course; men like Wagner and
Verdi. The generations had also seen the coming of "Carmen" and
gradually opened their minds to an appreciation of its meaning and
beauty, while the youthful genius who had created it sank almost
unnoticed into his grave; but they had not seen the advent of a
work which almost in a day set the world on fire and raised an
unknown musician from penury and obscurity to affluence and fame.
In the face of such an experience it was scarcely to be wondered at
that judgment was flung to the winds and that the most volatile of
musical nations and the staidest alike hailed the young composer as
the successor of Verdi, the regenerator of operatic Italy, and the
pioneer of a new school which should revitalize opera and make
unnecessary the hopeless task of trying to work along the lines
laid down by Wagner.

And this opera was the outcome of a competition based on the
frankest kind of commercialism--one of those "occasionals" from
which we have been taught to believe we ought never to expect
anything of ideal and lasting merit. "Pagliacci" was, in a way, a
fruit of the same competition. Three years before "Cavalleria
rusticana" had started the universal conflagration Ruggiero
Leoncavallo, who at sixteen years of age had won his diploma at the
Naples Conservatory and received the degree of Doctor of Letters
from the University of Bologna at twenty, had read his dramatic
poem "I Medici" to the publisher Ricordi and been commissioned to
set it to music. For this work he was to receive 2400 francs. He
completed the composition within a year, but there was no contract
that the opera should be performed, and this hoped-for consummation
did not follow. Then came Mascagni's triumph, and Leoncavallo, who
had been obliged meanwhile to return to the routine work of an
operatic repetiteur, lost patience. Satisfied that Ricordi would
never do anything more for him, and become desperate, he shut
himself in his room to attempt "one more work"--as he said in an
autobiographical sketch which appeared in "La Reforme," a journal
published in Alexandria. In five months he had written the book and
music of "Pagliacci," which was accepted for publication and
production by Sonzogno, Ricordi's business rival, after a single
reading of the poem. Maurel, whose friendship Leoncavallo had made
while coaching opera singers in Paris, used his influence in favor
of the opera, offered to create the part of Tonio, and did so at
the first performance of the opera at the Teatro dal Verme, Milan,
on May 17, 1892.

Leoncavallo's opera turns on a tragical ending to a comedy which is
incorporated in the play. The comedy is a familiar one among the
strolling players who perform at village fairs in Italy, in which
Columbina, Pagliaccio, and Arlecchino (respectively the Columbine,
Clown, and Harlequin of our pantomime) take part. Pagliaccio is
husband to Colombina and Arlecchino is her lover, who hoodwinks
Pagliaccio. There is a fourth character, Taddeo, a servant, who
makes foolish love to Columbina and, mingling imbecile stupidity
with maliciousness, delights in the domestic discord which he helps
to foment. The first act of the opera may be looked upon as an
induction to the conventional comedy which comes to an
unconventional and tragic end through the fact that the Clown
(Canio) is in real life the husband of Columbine (Nedda) and is
murderously jealous of her; wherefore, forgetting himself in a mad
rage, he kills her and her lover in the midst of the mimic scene.
The lover, however, is not the Harlequin of the comedy, but one of
the spectators whom Canio had vainly sought to identify, but who is
unconsciously betrayed by his mistress in her death agony. The
Taddeo of the comedy is the clown of the company, who in real life
entertains a passion for Nedda, which is repulsed, whereupon he
also carries his part into actuality and betrays Nedda's secret to
Canio. It is in the ingenious interweaving of these threads--the
weft of reality with the warp of simulation--that the chief
dramatic value of Leoncavallo's opera lies.

Actual murder by a man while apparently playing a part in a drama
is older as a dramatic motif than "Pagliacci," and Leoncavallo's
employment of it gave rise to an interesting controversy and a
still more interesting revelation in the early days of the opera.
Old theatre-goers in England and America remember the device as it
was employed in Dennery's "Paillaisse," known on the English stage
aa "Belphegor, the Mountebank." In 1874 Paul Ferrier produced a
play entitled "Tabarin," in which Coquelin appeared at the Theatre
Francais. Thirteen years later Catulle Mendes brought out another
play called "La Femme de Tabarin," for which Chabrier wrote the
incidental music. The critics were prompt in charging Mendes with
having plagiarized Ferrier, and the former defended himself on the
ground that the incident which he had employed, of actual murder in
a dramatic performance, was historical and had often been used.
This, however, did not prevent him from bringing an accusation of
theft against Leoncavallo when "Pagliacci" was announced for
production in French at Brussels and of beginning legal proceedings
against the composer and his publisher on that score. The
controversy which followed showed very plainly that Mendes did not
have a leg to stand upon either in law or equity, and he withdrew
his suit and made a handsome amende in a letter to the editor of
"Le Figaro." Before this was done, however, Signor Leoncavallo
wrote a letter to his publisher, which not only established that
the incident in question was based upon fact but directed attention
to a dramatic use of the motif in a Spanish play written thirty-
five years before the occurrence which was in the mind of
Leoncavallo. The letter was as follows:--

Lugano, Sept. 3, 1894.

Dear Signor Sonzogno.

I have read Catulle Mendes's two letters. M. Mendes goes pretty far
in declaring a priori that "Pagliacci" is an imitation of his
"Femme de Tabarin." I had not known this book, and only know it now
through the accounts given in the daily papers. You will remember
that at the time of the first performance of "Pagliacci" at Milan
in 1892 several critics accused me of having taken the subject of
my opera from the "Drama Nuevo" of the well known Spanish writer,
Estebanez. What would M. Mendes say if he were accused of having
taken the plot of "La Femme de Tabarin" from the "Drama Nuevo,"
which dates back to 1830 or 1840? As a fact, a husband, a comedian,
kills in the last scene the lover of his wife before her eyes while
he only appears to play his part in the piece.

It is absolutely true that I knew at that time no more of the
"Drama Nuevo" than I know now of "La Femme de Tabarin." I saw the
first mentioned work in Rome represented by Novelli six months
after "Pagliacci's" first production in Milan. In my childhood,
while my father was judge at Montalto, in Calabria (the scene of
the opera's plot), a jealous player killed his wife after the
performance. This event made a deep and lasting impression on my
childish mind, the more since my father was the judge at the
criminal's trial; and later, when I took up dramatic work, I used
this episode for a drama. I left the frame of the piece as I saw
it, and it can be seen now at the Festival of Madonna della Serra,
at Montalto. The clowns arrive a week or ten days before the
festival, which takes place on August 15, to put up their tents and
booths in the open space which reaches from the church toward the
fields. I have not even invented the coming of the peasants from
Santo Benedetto, a neighboring village, during the chorale.

What I write now I have mentioned so often in Germany and other
parts that several opera houses, notably that of Berlin, had
printed on their bills "Scene of the true event." After all this,
M. Mendes insisted on his claim, which means that he does not
believe my words. Had I used M. Mendes's ideas I would not have
hesitated to open correspondence with him before the first
representation, as I have done now with a well known writer who has
a subject that I wish to use for a future work. "Pagliacci" is my
own, entirely my own. If in this opera, a scene reminds one of M.
Mendes's book, it only proves that we both had the same idea which
Estebanez had before us. On my honor and conscience I assure you
that I have read but two of M. Mendes's books in my life--"Zo Hur"
and "La Premiere Maitresse." When I read at Marienbad a little
while ago the newspaper notices on the production of "La Femme de
Tabarin" I even wrote to you, dear Signor Sonzogno, thinking this
was an imitation of "Pagliacci." This assertion will suffice,
coming from an honorable man, to prove my loyalty. If not, then I
will place my undoubted rights under the protection of the law, and
furnish incontestable proof of what I have stated here. I have the
honor, etc., etc.

At various times and in various manners, by letters and in
newspaper interviews, Leoncavallo reiterated the statement that the
incident which he had witnessed as a boy in his father's courtroom
had suggested his drama. The chief actor in the incident, he said,
was still living. After conviction he was asked if he felt
penitent. The rough voice which rang through the room years before
still echoed in Leoncavallo's ears: "I repent me of nothing! On the
contrary, if I had it to do over again I'd do it again!" (Non mi
pento del delitto! Tutt altro. Se dovessi ricominciare,
ricomincerei!) He was sentenced to imprisonment and after the
expiration of his term took service in a little Calabrian town with
Baroness Sproniere. If Mendes had prosecuted his action, "poor
Alessandro" was ready to appear as a witness and tell the story
which Leoncavallo had dramatized.

I have never seen "La Femme de Tabarin" and must rely on Mr. Philip
Hale, fecund fountain of informal information, for an outline of
the play which "Pagliacci" called back into public notice:
Francisquine, the wife of Tabarin, irons her petticoats in the
players' booth. A musketeer saunters along, stops and makes love to
her. She listens greedily. Tabarin enters just after she has made
an appointment with the man. Tabarin is drunk--drunker than usual.
He adores his wife; he falls at her feet; he entreats her; he
threatens her. Meanwhile the crowd gathers to see the "parade."
Tabarin mounts the platform and tells openly of his jealousy. He
calls his wife; she does not answer. He opens the curtain behind
him; then he sees her in the arms of the musketeer. Tabarin
snatches up a sword, stabs his wife in the breast and comes back to
the stage with starting eyes and hoarse voice. The crowd marvels at
the passion of his play. Francisquine, bloody, drags herself along
the boards. She chokes; she cannot speak. Tabarin, mad with
despair, gives her the sword, begs her to kill him. She seizes the
sword, raises herself, hiccoughs, gasps out the word "Canaille,"
and dies before she can strike.

Paul Ferrier and Emanuel Pessard produced a grand opera in two acts
entitled "Tabarin" in Paris in 1885; Alboiz and Andre a comic opera
with the same title, music by Georges Bousquet, in 1852. Gilles and
Furpilles brought out an operetta called "Tabarin Duelliste," with
music by Leon Pillaut, in 1866. The works seem to have had only the
name of the hero in common. Their stories bear no likeness to those
of "La Femme de Tabarin" or "Pagliacci." The Spanish play, "Drama
Nuevo," by Estebanez, was adapted for performance in English by Mr.
W. D. Howells under the title "Yorick's Love." The translation was
made for Mr. Lawrence Barrett and was never published in book form.
If it had the denouement suggested in Leoncavallo's letter to
Sonzogno, the fact has escaped the memory of Mr. Howells, who, in
answer to a letter of inquiry which I sent him, wrote: "So far as I
can remember there was no likeness between 'Yorick's Love' and
'Pagliacci.' But when I made my version I had not seen or heard
'Pagliacci.'"

The title of Leoncavallo's opera is "Pagliacci," not "I Pagliacci"
as it frequently appears in books and newspapers. When the opera
was brought out in the vernacular, Mr. Frederick E. Weatherly, who
made the English adaptation, called the play and the character
assumed by Canio in the comedy "Punchinello." This evoked an
interesting comment from Mr. Hale: "'Pagliacci' is the plural of
Pagliaccio, which does not mean and never did mean Punchinello.
What is a Pagliaccio? A type long known to the Italians, and
familiar to the French as Paillasse. The Pagliaccio visited Paris
first in 1570. He was clothed in white and wore big buttons. Later,
he wore a suit of bedtick, with white and blue checks, the coarse
mattress cloth of the period. Hence his name. The word that meant
straw was afterward used for mattress which was stuffed with straw
and then for the buffoon, who wore the mattress cloth suit. In
France the Paillasse, as I have said, was the same as Pagliaccio.
Sometimes he wore a red checked suit, but the genuine one was known
by the colors, white and blue. He wore blue stockings, short
breeches puffing out a la blouse, a belted blouse and a black,
close-fitting cap. This buffoon was seen at shows of strolling
mountebanks. He stood outside the booth and by his jests and antics
and grimaces strove to attract the attention of the people, and he
told them of the wonders performed by acrobats within, of the
freaks exhibited. Many of his jests are preserved. They are often
in dialogue with the proprietor and are generally of vile
indecency. The lowest of the strollers, he was abused by them. The
Italian Pagliaccio is a species of clown, and Punchinello was never
a mere buffoon. The Punch of the puppet-show is a bastard
descendant of the latter, but the original type is still seen in
Naples, where he wears a white costume and a black mask. The
original type was not necessarily humpbacked. Punchinello is a
shrewd fellow, intellectual, yet in touch with the people, cynical;
not hesitating at murder if he can make by it; at the same time a
local satirist, a dealer in gags and quips. Pagliacci is perhaps
best translated by 'clowns'; but the latter word must not be taken
in its restricted circus sense. These strolling clowns are
pantomimists, singers, comedians."

At the first performance of "Pagliacci" in Milan the cast was as
follows: Canio, Geraud; Tonio, Maurel; Silvio, Ancona; Peppe,
Daddi; Nedda, Mme. Stehle. The first performance in America was by
the Hinrichs Grand Opera Company, at the Grand Opera House, New
York, on June 15, 1893; Selma Kronold was the Nedda, Montegriffo
the Canio, and Campanari the Tonio. The opera was incorporated in
the Metropolitan repertory in the season of 1893-1894.



Rinuccini's "Dafne," which was written 300 years ago and more,
begins with a prologue which was spoken in the character of the
poet Ovid. Leoncavallo's "Pagliacci" also begins with a prologue,
but it is spoken by one of the people of the play; whether in his
character as Tonio of the tragedy or Pagliaccio of the comedy there
is no telling. He speaks the sentiments of the one and wears the
motley of the other. Text and music, however, are ingeniously
contrived to serve as an index to the purposes of the poet and the
method and material of the composer. In his speech the prologue
tells us that the author of the play is fond of the ancient custom
of such an introduction, but not of the old purpose. He does not
employ it for the purpose of proclaiming that the tears and
passions of the actors are but simulated and false. No! He wishes
to let us know that his play is drawn from life as it is--that it
is true. It welled up within him when memories of the past sang in
his heart and was written down to show us that actors are human
beings like unto ourselves.

An unnecessary preachment, and if listened to with a critical
disposition rather an impertinence, as calculated to rob us of the
pleasure of illusion which it is the province of the drama to give.
Closely analyzed, Tonio's speech is very much of a piece with the
prologue which Bully Bottom wanted for the play of "Pyramus" in
Shakespeare's comedy. We are asked to see a play. In this play
there is another play. In this other play one of the actors plays
at cross-purposes with the author--forgets his lines and himself
altogether and becomes in reality the man that he seems to be in
the first play. The prologue deliberately aims to deprive us of the
thrill of surprise at the unexpected denouement, simply that he may
tell us what we already know as well as he, that an actor is a
human being.

Plainly then, from a didactic point of view, this prologue is a
gratuitous impertinence. Not so its music. Structurally, it is
little more than a loose-jointed pot-pourri; but it serves the
purpose of a thematic catalogue to the chief melodic incidents of
the play which is to follow. In this it bears a faint resemblance
to the introduction to Berlioz's "Romeo and Juliet" symphony. It
begins with an energetic figure,

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

which is immediately followed by an upward scale-passage with a
saucy flourish at the end--not unlike the crack of a whiplash:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

It helps admirably to picture the bustling activity of the festa
into which we are soon to be precipitated. The bits of melody which
are now introduced might all be labelled in the Wolzogen-Wagner
manner with reference to the play's peoples and their passions if
it were worth while to do so, or if their beauty and eloquence were
not sufficient unto themselves. First we have the phrase in which
Canio will tell us how a clown's heart must seem merry and make
laughter though it be breaking:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

Next the phrase from the love music of Nedda and Silvio:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

The bustling music returns, develops great energy, then pauses,
hesitates, and makes way for Tonio, who, putting his head through
the curtain, politely asks permission of the audience, steps
forward and delivers his homily, which is alternately declamatory
and broadly melodious. One of his melodies later becomes the theme
of the between-acts music, which separates the supposedly real life
of the strolling players from the comedy which they present to the
mimic audience:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

At last Tonio calls upon his fellow mountebanks to begin their
play. The curtain rises. We are in the midst of a rural celebration
of the Feast of the Assumption on the outskirts of a village in
Calabria. A perambulant theatre has been set up among the trees and
the strolling actors are arriving, accompanied by a crowd of
villagers, who shout greetings to Clown, Columbine, and Harlequin.
Nedda arrives in a cart drawn by a donkey led by Beppe. Canio in
character invites the crowd to come to the show at 7 o'clock
(ventitre ore). There they shall be regaled with a sight of the
domestic troubles of Pagliaccio and see the fat mischief-maker
tremble. Tonio wants to help Nedda out of the cart, but Canio
interferes and lifts her down himself; whereupon the women and boys
twit Tonio. Canio and Beppe wet their whistles at the tavern, but
Tonio remains behind on the plea that he must curry the donkey. The
hospitable villager playfully suggests that it is Tonio's purpose
to make love to Nedda. Canio, half in earnest, half in jest, points
out the difference between real life and the stage. In the play, if
he catches a lover with his wife, he flies into a mock passion,
preaches a sermon, and takes a drubbing from the swain to the
amusement of the audience. But there would be a different ending to
the story were Nedda actually to deceive him. Let Tonio beware!
Does he doubt Nedda's fidelity? Not at all. He loves her and seals
his assurance with a kiss. Then off to the tavern.

Hark to the bagpipes! Huzza, here come the zampognari! Drone pipes
droning and chaunters skirling--as well as they can skirl in
Italian!

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

Now we have people and pipers on the stage and there's a bell in
the steeple ringing for vespers. Therefore a chorus. Not that we
have anything to say that concerns the story in any way. "Din,
don!" That would suffice, but if you must have more: "Let's to
church. Din, don. All's right with love and the sunset. Din, don!
But mamma has her eye on the young folk and their inclination for
kissing. Din, don!" Bells and pipes are echoed by the singers.

Her husband is gone to the tavern for refreshment and Nedda is left
alone. There is a little trouble in her mind caused by the
fierceness of Canio's voice and looks. Does he suspect? But why
yield to such fancies and fears? How beautiful the mid-August sun
is! Her hopes and longings find expression in the "Ballatella"--a
waltz tune with twitter of birds and rustle of leaves for
accompaniment. Pretty birds, where are you going? What is it you
say? Mother knew your song and used once to tell it to her babe.
How your wings flash through the ether! Heedless of cloud and
tempest, on, on, past the stars, and still on! Her wishes take
flight with the feathered songsters, but Tonio brings her rudely to
earth. He pleads for a return of the love which he says he bears
her, but she bids him postpone his protestations till he can make
them in the play. He grows desperately urgent and attempts to rape
a kiss. She cuts him across the face with a donkey whip, and he
goes away blaspheming and swearing vengeance.

Then Silvio comes--Silvio, the villager, who loves her and who has
her heart. She fears he will be discovered, but he bids her be at
peace; he had left Canio drinking at the tavern. She tells him of
the scene with Tonio and warns him, but he laughs at her fears.
Then he pleads with her. She does not love her husband; she is
weary of the wandering life which she is forced to lead; if her
love is true let her fly with him to happiness. No. 'Tis folly,
madness; her heart is his, but he must not tempt her to its
destruction. Tonio slinks in and plays eavesdropper. He hears the
mutual protestations of the lovers, hears Nedda yield to Silvio's
wild pleadings, sees them locked in each other's arms, and hurries
off to fetch Canio. Canio comes, but not in time to see the man who
had climbed over the wall, yet in time to hear Nedda's word of
parting: A stanotte--e per sempre tua saro--"To-night, and
forever, I am yours!" He throws Nedda aside and gives chase after
the fugitive, but is baffled. He demands to be told the name of her
lover. Nedda refuses to answer. He rushes upon her with dagger
drawn, but Beppe intercepts and disarms him. There is haste now;
the villagers are already gathering for the play. Tonio insinuates
his wicked advice: Let us dissemble; the gallant may be caught at
the play. The others go out to prepare for their labors. Canio
staggers toward the theatre. He must act the merry fool, though his
heart be torn! Why not? What is he? A man? No; a clown! On with the
motley! The public must be amused. What though Harlequin steals his
Columbine? Laugh, Pagliaccio, though thy heart break!

The between-acts music is retrospective; it comments on the tragic
emotions, the pathos foretold in the prologue. Act II brings the
comedy which is to have a realistic and bloody ending. The
villagers gather and struggle for places in front of the booth.
Among them is Silvio, to whom Nedda speaks a word of warning as she
passes him while collecting the admission fees. He reminds her of
the assignation; she will be there. The comedy begins to the music
of a graceful minuet: ?

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

Columbine is waiting for Harlequin. Taddeo is at the market buying
the supper for the mimic lovers. Harlequin sings his serenade under
the window: "O, Colombina, il tenero fido Arlecchin"--a pretty
measure! Taddeo enters and pours out his admiration for Colombina
in an exaggerated cadenza as he offers her his basket of purchases.
The audience shows enjoyment of the sport. Taddeo makes love to
Colombina and Harlequin, entering by the window, lifts him up by
the ears from the floor where he is kneeling and kicks him out of
the room. What fun! The mimic lovers sit at table and discuss the
supper and their love. Taddeo enters in mock alarm to tell of the
coming of Pagliaccio. Harlequin decamps, but leaves a philtre in
the hands of Columbine to be poured into her husband's wine. At the
window Columbine calls after him: A stanotte--e per sempre io saro
tua! At this moment Canio enters in the character of Pagliaccio. He
hears again the words which Nedda had called after the fleeing
Silvio, and for a moment is startled out of his character. But he
collects himself and begins to play his part. "A man has been
here!" "You've been drinking!" The dialogue of the comedy
continues, but ever and anon with difficulty on the part of
Pagliaccio, who begins to put a sinister inflection into his words.
Taddeo is dragged from the cupboard in which he had taken hiding.
He, too, puts color of verity into his lines, especially when he
prates about the purity of Columbine. Canio loses control of
himself more and more. "Pagliaccio no more, but a man--a man
seeking vengeance. The name of your lover!" The audience is moved
by his intensity. Silvio betrays anxiety. Canio rages on. "The
name, the name!" The mimic audience shouts, "Bravo!" Nedda: if he
doubts her she will go. "No, by God! You'll remain and tell me the
name of your lover!" With a great effort Nedda forces herself to
remain in character. The music, whose tripping dance measures have
given way to sinister mutterings in keeping with Canio's mad
outbursts, as the mimic play ever and anon threatens to leave its
grooves and plunge into the tragic vortex of reality, changes to a
gavotte:--

[figure: a musical excerpt]

Columbine explains: she had no idea her husband could put on so
tragical a mask. It is only harmless Harlequin who has been her
companion. "The name! The name!! THE NAME!!!" Nedda sees
catastrophe approaching and throws her character to the winds. She
shrieks out a defiant "No!" and attempts to escape from the mimic
stage. Silvio starts up with dagger drawn. The spectators rise in
confusion and cry "Stop him!" Canio seizes Nedda and plunges his
knife into her: "Take that! And that! With thy dying gasps thou'lt
tell me!" Woful intuition! Dying, Nedda calls: "Help, Silvio!"
Silvio rushes forward and receives Canio's knife in his heart.
"Gesumaria!" shriek the women. Men throw themselves upon Canio. He
stands for a moment in a stupor, drops his knife and speaks the
words: "The comedy is ended." "Ridi Pagliaccio!" shrieks the
orchestra as the curtain falls.

"Plaudite, amici," said Beethoven on his death bed, "la commedia
finita est!" And there is a tradition that these, too, were the
last words of the arch-jester Rabelais. "When 'Pagliacci' was first
sung here (in Boston), by the Tavary company," says Mr. Philip
Hale, "Tonio pointed to the dead bodies and uttered the sentence in
a mocking way. And there is a report that such was Leoncavallo's
original intention. As the Tonio began the piece in explanation so
he should end it. But the tenor (de Lucia) insisted that he should
speak the line. I do not believe the story. (1) As Maurel was the
original Tonio and the tenor was comparatively unknown, it is
doubtful whether Maurel, of all men, would have allowed of the loss
of a fat line. (2) As Canio is chief of the company it is eminently
proper that he should make the announcement to the crowd. (3) The
ghastly irony is accentuated by the speech when it comes from
Canio's mouth."




CHAPTER IX

"CAVALLERIA RUSTICANA"


Having neither the patience nor the inclination to paraphrase a
comment on Mascagni's "Cavalleria rusticana" which I wrote years
ago when the opera was comparatively new, and as it appears to me
to contain a just estimate and criticism of the work and the school
of which it and "Pagliacci" remain the foremost exemplars, I quote
from my book, "Chapters of Opera" [Footnote: "Chapters of Opera,"
by H. E. Krehbiel, p.223] "Seventeen years ago 'Cavalleria
rusticana' had no perspective. Now, though but a small portion of
its progeny has been brought to our notice, we nevertheless look at
it through a vista which looks like a valley of moral and physical
death through which there flows a sluggish stream thick with filth
and red with blood. Strangely enough, in spite of the consequences
which have followed it, the fierce little drama retains its old
potency. It still speaks with a voice which sounds like the voice
of truth. Its music still makes the nerves tingle, and carries our
feelings unresistingly on its turbulent current. But the stage-
picture is less sanguinary than it looked in the beginning. It
seems to have receded a millennium in time. It has the terrible
fierceness of an Attic tragedy, but it also has the decorum which
the Attic tragedy never violated. There is no slaughter in the
presence of the audience, despite the humbleness of its personages.
It does not keep us perpetually in sight of the shambles. It is,
indeed, an exposition of chivalry; rustic, but chivalry
nevertheless. It was thus Clytemnestra slew her husband, and
Orestes his mother. Note the contrast which the duel between Alfio
and Turiddu presents with the double murder to the piquant
accompaniment of comedy in 'Pagliacci,' the opera which followed so
hard upon its heels. Since then piquancy has been the cry; the
piquant contemplation of adultery, seduction, and murder amid the
reek and stench of the Italian barnyard. Think of Cilea's 'Tilda,'
Giordano's 'Mala Vita,' Spinelli's 'A Basso Porto,' and Tasca's 'A
Santa Lucia'!

"The stories chosen for operatic treatment by the champions of
verismo are all alike. It is their filth and blood which fructifies
the music, which rasps the nerves even as the plays revolt the
moral stomach. I repeat: Looking back over the time during which
this so-called veritism has held its orgies, 'Cavalleria rusticana'
seems almost classic. Its music is highly spiced and tastes 'hot i'
th' mouth,' but its eloquence is, after all, in its eager,
pulsating, passionate melody--like the music which Verdi wrote
more than half a century ago for the last act of 'Il Trovatore.' If
neither Mascagni himself nor his imitators have succeeded in
equalling it since, it is because they have thought too much of the
external devices of abrupt and uncouth change of modes and
tonalities, of exotic scales and garish orchestration, and too
little of the fundamental element of melody which once was the be-
all and end-all of Italian music. Another fountain of gushing
melody must be opened before 'Cavalleria rusticana' finds a
successor in all things worthy of the succession. Ingenious
artifice, reflection, and technical cleverness will not suffice
even with the blood and mud of the slums as a fertilizer."

How Mascagni came to write his opera he has himself told us in a
bright sketch of the early part of his life-history which was
printed in the "Fanfulla della Domenica" of Rome shortly after he
became famous. Recounting the story of his struggle for existence
after entering upon his career, he wrote:--

In 1888 only a few scenes (of "Ratcliff") remained to be composed;
but I let them lie and have not touched them since. The thought of
"Cavalleria rusticana" had been in my head for several years. I
wanted to introduce myself with, a work of small dimensions. I
appealed to several librettists, but none was willing to undertake
the work without a guarantee of recompense. Then came notice of the
Sonzogno competition and I eagerly seized the opportunity to better
my condition. But my salary of 100 lire, to which nothing was
added, except the fees from a few pianoforte lessons in Cerignola
and two lessons in the Philharmonic Society of Canosa (a little
town a few miles from Cerignola), did not permit the luxury of a
libretto. At the solicitation of some friends Targioni, in Leghorn,
decided to write a "Cavalleria rusticana" for me. My mind was long
occupied with the finale. The words: Hanno ammazzato compare
Turiddu! (They have killed Neighbor Turiddu!) were forever ringing
in my ears. I needed a few mighty orchestral chords to give
characteristic form to the musical phrase and achieve an impressive
close. How it happened I don't know, but one morning, as I was
trudging along the road to give my lessons at Canosa, the idea came
to me like a stroke of lightning, and I had found my chords. They
were those seventh chords, which I conscientiously set down in my
manuscript.

Thus I began my opera at the end. When I received the first chorus
of my libretto by post (I composed the Siciliano in the prelude
later) I said in great good humor to my wife:

"To-day we must make a large expenditure."

"What for?"

"An alarm clock."

"Why?"

"To wake me up before dawn so that I may begin to write on
'Cavalleria rusticana.'"

The expenditure caused a dubious change in the monthly budget, but
it was willingly allowed. We went out together, and after a good
deal of bargaining spent nine lire. I am sure that I can find the
clock, all safe and sound, in Cerignola. I wound it up the evening
we bought it, but it was destined to be of no service to me, for in
that night a son, the first of a row of them, was born to me. In
spite of this I carried out my determination, and in the morning
began to write the first chorus of "Cavalleria." I came to Rome in
February, 1890, in order to permit the jury to hear my opera; they
decided that it was worthy of performance. Returning to Cerignola
in a state of the greatest excitement, I noticed that I did not
have a penny in my pocket for the return trip to Rome when my opera
was to be rehearsed. Signor Sonzogno helped me out of my
embarrassment with a few hundred francs.

Those beautiful days of fear and hope, of discouragement and
confidence, are as vividly before my eyes as if they were now. I
see again the Constanzi Theatre, half filled; I see how, after the
last excited measures of the orchestra, they all raise their arms
and gesticulate, as if they were threatening me; and in my soul
there awakens an echo of that cry of approval which almost
prostrated me. The effect made upon me was so powerful that at the
second representation I had to request them to turn down the
footlights in case I should be called out; for the blinding light
seemed a hell to me, like a fiery abyss that threatened to engulf
me.

It is a rude little tale which Giovanni Verga wrote and which
supplied the librettists, G. Targioni-Tozzetti and G. Menasci,
with the plot of Mascagni's opera. Sententious as the opera seems,
it is yet puffed out, padded, and bedizened with unessential
ornament compared with the story. This has the simplicity and
directness of a folk-tale or folk-song, and much of its
characteristic color and strength were lost in fitting it out for
music. The play, which Signora Duse presented to us with a power
which no operatic singer can ever hope to match, was more to the
purpose, quicker and stronger in movement, fiercer in its onrush of
passion, and more pathetic in its silences than the opera with its
music, though the note of pathos sounded by Signor Mascagni is the
most admirable element of the score. With half a dozen homely
touches Verga conjures up the life of a Sicilian village and
strikes out his characters in bold outline. Turiddu Macca, son of
Nunzia, is a bersagliere returned from service. He struts about the
village streets in his uniform, smoking a pipe carved with an image
of the king on horseback, which he lights with a match fired by a
scratch on the seat of his trousers, "lifting his leg as if for a
kick." Lola, daughter of Massaro Angelo, was his sweetheart when he
was conscripted, but meanwhile she has promised to marry Alfio, a
teamster from Licodia, who has four Sortino mules in his stable.
Now Turiddu could do nothing better than sing spiteful songs under
her window.

Lola married the teamster, and on Sundays she would sit in the yard
with her hands posed on her hips to show off the thick gold rings
which her husband had given her. Opposite Alfio's house lived
Massaro Cola, who was as rich as a hog, as they said, and who had
an only daughter named Santa. Turiddu, to spite Lola, paid his
addresses to Santa and whispered sweet words into her ear.

"Why don't you go and say these nice things to Lola?" asked Santa
one day.

"Lola is a fine lady now; she has married a crown prince. But you
are worth a thousand Lolas; she isn't worthy of wearing your old
shoes. I could just eat you up with my eyes, Santa"--thus Turiddu.

 "You may eat me with your eyes and welcome, for then there will be
no leaving of crumbs."

"If I were rich I would like to have a wife just like you."

"I shall never marry a crown prince, but I shall have a dowry as
well as Lola when the good Lord sends me a lover."

The tassel on his cap had tickled the girl's fancy. Her father
disapproved of the young soldier, and turned him from his door; but
Santa opened her window to him until the village gossips got busy
with her name and his. Lola listened to the talk of the lovers from
behind a vase of flowers. One day she called after Turiddu: "Ah,
Turiddu! Old friends are no longer noticed, eh?"

"He is a happy man who has the chance of seeing you, Lola."

"You know where I live," answered Lola. And now Turiddu visited
Lola so often that Santa shut her window in his face and the
villagers began to smile knowingly when he passed by. Alfio was
making a round of the fairs with his mules. "Next Sunday I must go
to confession," said Lola one day, "for last night I dreamt that I
saw black grapes."

"Never mind the dream," pleaded Turiddu.

"But Easter is coming, and my husband will want to know why I have
not confessed."

Santa was before the confessional waiting her turn when Lola was
receiving absolution. "I wouldn't send you to Rome for absolution,"
she said. Alfio came home with his mules, and money and a rich
holiday dress for his wife.

"You do well to bring presents to her," said Santa to him, "for
when you are away your wife adorns your head for you."

"Holy Devil!" screamed Alfio. "Be sure of what you are saying;, or
I'll not leave you an eye to cry with!"

"I am not in the habit of crying. I haven't wept even when I have
seen Turiddu going into your wife's house at night."

"Enough!" said Alfio. "I thank you very much."

The cat having come back home, Turiddu kept off the streets by day,
but in the evenings consoled himself with his friends at the
tavern. They were enjoying a dish of sausages there on Easter eve.
When Alfio came in Turiddu understood what he wanted by the way he
fixed his eyes on him. "You know what I want to speak to you
about," said Alfio when Turiddu asked him if he had any commands to
give him. He offered Alfio a glass of wine, but it was refused with
a wave of the hand.

"Here I am," said Turiddu. Alfio put his arms around his neck.
"We'll talk this thing over if you will meet me to-morrow morning."

"You may look for me on the highway at sunrise, and we will go on
together."

They exchanged the kiss of challenge, and Turiddu, as an earnest
that he would be on hand, bit Alfio's ear. His companions left
their sausages uneaten and went home with Turiddu. There his mother
was sitting up for him.

"Mamma," Turiddu said to her, "do you remember that when I went
away to be a soldier you thought I would never come back? Kiss me
as you did then, mamma, for to-morrow I am going away again."

Before daybreak he took his knife from the place in the haymow
where he had hidden it when he went soldiering, and went out to
meet Alfio.

"Holy Mother of Jesus!" grumbled Lola when her husband prepared to
go out; "where are you going in such a hurry?"

"I am going far away," answered Alfio, "and it will be better for
you if I never come back!"

The two men met on the highway and for a while walked on in
silence. Turiddu kept his cap pulled down over his face. "Neighbor
Alfio," he said after a space, "as true as I live I know that I
have wronged you, and I would let myself be killed if I had not
seen my old mother when she got up on the pretext of looking after
the hens. And now, as true as I live, I will kill you like a dog so
that my dear old mother may not have cause to weep."

"Good!" answered Alfio; "we will both strike hard!" And he took off
his coat.

Both were good with the knife. Turiddu received the first blow in
his arm, and when he returned it struck for Alfio's heart.

"Ah, Turiddu! You really do intend to kill me?"

"Yes, I told you so. Since I saw her in the henyard I have my old
mother always in my eyes."

"Keep those eyes wide open," shouted Alfio, "for I am going to
return you good measure!"

Alfio crouched almost to the ground, keeping his left hand on the
wound, which pained him. Suddenly he seized a handful of dust and
threw it into Turiddu's eyes.

"Ah!" howled Turiddu, blinded by the dust, "I'm a dead man!" He
attempted to save himself by leaping backward, but Alfio struck him
a second blow, this time in the belly, and a third in the throat.

"That makes three--the last for the head you have adorned for me!"

Turiddu staggered back into the bushes and fell. He tried to say,
"Ah, my dear mother!" but the blood gurgled up in his throat and he
could not.



Music lends itself incalculably better to the celebration of a mood
accomplished or achieved by action, physical or psychological, than
to an expression of the action itself. It is in the nature of the
lyric drama that this should be so, and there need be no wonder
that wherever Verga offered an opportunity for set lyricism it was
embraced by Mascagni and his librettists. Verga tells us that
Turiddu, having lost Lola, comforted himself by singing spiteful
songs under her window. This suggested the Siciliano, which, an
afterthought, Mascagni put into his prelude as a serenade, not in
disparagement, but in praise of Lola. It was at Easter that Alfio
returned to discover the infidelity of his wife, and hence we have
an Easter hymn, one of the musical high lights of the work, though
of no dramatic value. Verga aims to awaken at least a tittle of
extenuation and a spark of sympathy for Turiddu by showing us his
filial love in conflict with his willingness to make reparation to
Alfio; Mascagni and his librettists do more by showing us the
figure of the young soldier blending a request for a farewell kiss
from his mother with a prayer for protection for the woman he has
wronged. In its delineation of the tender emotions, indeed, the
opera is more generous and kindly than the story. Santuzza does not
betray her lover in cold blood as does Santa, but in the depth of
her humiliation and at the climax of her jealous fury created by
Turiddu's rejection of her when he follows Lola into church.
Moreover, her love opens the gates to remorse the moment she
realizes what the consequence of her act is to be. The opera
sacrifices some of the virility of Turiddu's character as sketched
by Verga, but by its classic treatment of the scene of the killing
it saves us from the contemplation of Alfio's dastardly trick which
turns a duel into a cowardly assassination.

The prelude to the opera set the form which Leoncavallo followed,
slavishly followed, in "Pagliacci."

The orchestral proclamation of the moving passions of the play is
made by the use of fragments of melody which in the vocal score
mark climaxes in the dialogue. The first high point in the prelude
is reached in the strain to which Santuzza begs for the love of
Turiddu even after she has disclosed to him her knowledge of his
infidelity:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

 the second is the broad melody in which she pleads with him to
return to her arms:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

Between these expositions falls the Siciliano, which interrupts the
instrumental flood just as Lola's careless song, the Stornello,
interrupts the passionate rush of Santuzza's protestations,
prayers, and lamentations in the scene between her and her
faithless lover:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt setting the words "O Lola, blanca
come flor di spino, quando t'affaci ti s'affaccio il sole"]

These sharp contrasts, heightened by the device of surprise, form
one of the marked characteristics of Mascagni's score and one of
the most effective. We meet it also in the instrumentation--the
harp accompaniment to the serenade, the pauses which give piquancy
to Lola's ditty, the unison violins, harp arpeggios, and sustained
organ chords of the intermezzo.

When the curtain rises it discloses the open square of a Sicilian
village, flanked by a church and the inn of Lucia, Turiddu's
mother. It is Easter morning and villagers and peasants are
gathering for the Paschal mass. Church bells ring and the orchestra
breaks into the eager melody which a little later we hear combined
with the voices which are hymning the pleasant sights and sounds of
nature:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt setting the words "tempo e si
mormori"]

A charming conception is the regular beat and flux and reflux of
the women's voices as they sing

[figure: a musical score excerpt setting the words "Gliaranci
olezzano sui verdi margini cantando le allo do le tra i mirti in
flor . . ."]

Delightful and refreshing is the bustling strain of the men. The
singers depart with soft exclamations of rapture called out by the
contemplation of nature and thoughts of the Virgin Mother and Child
in their hearts. Comes Santuzza, sore distressed, to Mamma Lucia,
to inquire as to the whereabouts of her son Turiddu. Lucia thinks
him at Francofonte; but Santuzza knows that he spent the night in
the village.

In pity for the maiden's distress, Lucia asks her to enter her
home, but Santuzza may not--she is excommunicate. Alfio enters with
boisterous jollity, singing of his jovial carefree life as a
teamster and his love of home and a faithful wife. It is a paltry
measure, endurable only for its offering of contrast, and we will
not tarry with it, though the villagers echo it merrily. Alfio,
too, has seen Turiddu, and Lucia is about to express her surprise
when Santuzza checks her. The hour of devotion is come, and the
choir in the church intones the "Regina coeli," while the people
without fall on their knees and sing the Resurrection Hymn. After
the first outburst, to which the organ appends a brief postlude,
Santuzza leads in the canticle, "Innegiamo il Signor non dmorte":

    Let us sing of our Lord ris'n victorious!
    Let us sing of our Lord ever glorious:--


[figure: a musical score excerpt]

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

The instrumental basses supply a foundation of Bachian granite, the
chorus within the church interpolates shouts of "Alleluia!" and the
song swells until the gates of sound fly wide open and we forget
the theatre in a fervor of religious devotion. Only the critic in
his study ought here to think of the parallel scene which
Leoncavallo sought to create in his opera.

Thus far the little dramatic matter that has been introduced is
wholly expository; yet we are already near the middle of the score.
All the stage folk enter the church save Santuzza and Lucia, and to
the mother of her betrayer the maiden tells the story of her
wrongs. The romance which she sings is marked by the copious use of
one of the distinguishing devices of the veritist composers--the
melodic triplet, an efficient help for the pushing, pulsating
declamation with which the dramatic dialogue of Mascagni,
Leoncavallo, and their fellows is carried on. Lucia can do no more
for the unfortunate than commend her to the care of the Virgin. She
enters the church and Turiddu comes. He lies as to where he has
been. Santuzza is quick with accusation and reproach, but at the
first sign of his anger and a hint of the vengeance which Alfio
will take she abases herself. Let him beat and insult her, she will
love and pardon though her heart break. She is in the extremity of
agony and anguish when Lola is heard trolling a careless song:--

[figure: musical example setting the word "Fior di giaggiolo . .
gli angeli belli stanno a mille in cielo . . ."]

She is about to begin a second stanza when she enters and sees the
pair.    She stops with an exclamation. She says she is seeking
Alfio. Is Turiddu not going to mass? Santuzza, significantly: "It
is Easter and the Lord sees all things! None but the blameless
should go to mass." But Lola will go, and so will Turiddu. Scorning
Santuzza's pleadings and at last hurling her to the ground, he
rushes into the church. She shouts after him a threat of Easter
vengeance and fate sends the agent to her in the very moment. Alfio
comes and Santuzza tells him that Turiddu has cuckolded him and
Lola has robbed her of her lover:--

    Turiddu mi tolse, mi tolse l'onore,
    E vostra moglie lui rapiva a me!


[figure: musical example setting the above words]

The oncoming waves of the drama's pathos have risen to a supreme
height, their crests have broken, and the wind-blown spume drenches
the soul of the listeners; but the composer has not departed from
the first principle of the master of whom, for a time, it was hoped
he might be the legitimate successor. Melody remains the life-blood
of his music as it is that of Verdi's from his first work to his
last;--as it will be so long as music endures.

Terrible is the outbreak of Alfio's rage:--

    Infami lero, ad esse non perdono,
    Vendetta avro pria che tra monti il di.


[figure: musical example setting the above words]

Upon this storm succeeds the calm of the intermezzo--in its day
the best abused and most hackneyed piece of music that the world
knew; yet a triumph of simple, straightforward tune. It echoes the
Easter hymn, and in the midst of the tumult of earthly passion
proclaims celestial peace. Its instrumentation was doubtless
borrowed from Hellmesberger's arrangement of the air "Ombra mai fu"
from "Serse," known the world over as Handel's "Largo"--violins in
unison, harp arpeggios, and organ harmonies. In nothing
artistically distinguished it makes an unexampled appeal to the
multitude. Some years ago a burlesque on "Cavalleria rusticana" was
staged at a theatre in Vienna.

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

It was part of the witty conceit of the author to have the
intermezzo played on a handorgan. Up to this point the audience had
been hilarious in its enjoyment of the burlesque, but with the
first wheezy tones from the grinder the people settled down to
silent attention; and when the end came applause for the music
rolled out wave after wave. A burlesque performance could not rob
that music of its charm. Ite missa est. Mass is over. The merry
music of the first chorus returns. The worshippers are about to
start homeward with pious reflections, when Turiddu detains Lola
and invites his neighbors to a glass of Mamma Lucia's wine. We
could spare the drinking song as easily as Alfio, entering, turns
aside the cup which Turiddu proffers him. Turiddu understands. "I
await your pleasure." Some of the women apprehend mischief and lead
Lola away. The challenge is given and accepted, Sicilian fashion.
Turiddu confesses his wrong-doing to Alfio, but, instead of
proclaiming his purpose to kill his enemy, he asks protection for
Santuzza in case of his death. Then, while the violins tremble and
throb, he calls for his mother like an errant child:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

He has been too free with the winecup, he says, and must leave her.
But first her blessing, as when he went away to be a soldier.
Should he not return, Santa must be her care: "Voi dovrete fare; da
madre a Santa!" It is the cry of a child. "A kiss! Another kiss,
mamma! Farewell!" Lucia calls after him. He is gone, Santuzza comes
in with her phrase of music descriptive of her unhappy love. It
grows to a thunderous crash. Then a hush! A fateful chord! A
whispered roll of the drums! A woman is heard to shriek: "They have
killed Neighbor Turiddu!" A crowd of women rush in excitedly;
Santuzza and Lucia fall in a swoon. "Hanno ammazzato compare
Turiddu!" The tragedy is ended.




CHAPTER X

THE CAREER OF MASCAGNI


It would be foolish to question or attempt to deny the merits of
the type of Italian opera established by Mascagni's lucky
inspiration. The brevity of the realistic little tragedy, the
swiftness of its movement, its adherence to the Italian ideal of
melody first, its ingenious combination of song with an
illuminative orchestral part--these elements in union created a
style which the composers of Italy, France, and Germany were quick
to adopt. "Pagliacci" was the first fruit of the movement and has
been the most enduring; indeed, so far as America and England are
concerned, "Cavalleria rusticana" and "Pagliacci" are the only
products of the school which have obtained a lasting footing. They
were followed by a flood of Italian, French, and German works in
which low life was realistically portrayed, but, though the manner
of composition was as easily copied as the subjects were found in
the slums, none of the imitators of Mascagni and Leoncavallo
achieved even a tithe of their success. The men themselves were too
shrewd and wise to attempt to repeat the experiment which had once
been triumphant.

In one respect the influence of the twin operas was deplorable. I
have attempted to characterize that influence in general terms, but
in order that the lesson may be more plainly presented it seems to
me best to present a few examples in detail. The eagerness with
which writers sought success in moral muck, regardless of all
artistic elements, is strikingly illustrated in an attempt by a
German writer, Edmund von Freihold, [Footnote: I owe this
illustration to Ferdinand Pfobl's book "Die Moderne Oper."] to
provide "Cavalleria rusticana" with a sequel. Von Freihold wrote
the libretto for a "music drama" which he called "Santuzza," the
story of which begins long enough after the close of Verga's story
for both the women concerned in "Gavalleria rusticana" to have
grown children. Santuzza has given birth to a son named Massimo,
and Lola to a daughter, Anita. The youthful pair grow up side by
side in the Sicilian village and fall in love with one another.
They might have married and in a way expiated the sins of their
parents had not Alfio overheard his wife, Lola, confess that
Turiddu, not her husband, is the father of Anita, The lovers are
thus discovered to be half brother and sister. This reminder of his
betrayal by Lola infuriates Alfio anew. He rushes upon his wife to
kill her, but Santuzza, who hates him as the slayer of her lover,
throws herself between and plunges her dagger in Alfio's heart.
Having thus taken revenge for Turiddu's death, Santuzza dies out of
hand, Lola, as an inferior character, falls in a faint, and Massimo
makes an end of the delectable story by going away from there to
parts unknown.

In Cilea's "Tilda" a street singer seeks to avenge her wrongs upon
a faithless lover. She bribes a jailor to connive at the escape of
a robber whom he is leading to capital punishment. This robber she
elects to be the instrument of her vengeance. Right merrily she
lives with him and his companions in the greenwood until the band
captures the renegade lover on his wedding journey. Tilda rushes
upon the bride with drawn dagger, but melts with compassion when
she sees her victim in the attitude of prayer. She sinks to her
knees beside her, only to receive the death-blow from her seducer.
There are piquant contrasts in this picture and Ave Marias and
tarantellas in the music.

Take the story of Giordano's "Mala Vita." Here the hero is a young
dyer whose dissolute habits have brought on tuberculosis of the
lungs. The principal object of his amours is the wife of a friend.
A violent hemorrhage warns him of approaching death. Stricken with
fear he rushes to the nearest statue of the Madonna and registers a
vow; he will marry a wanton, effect her redemption, thereby hoping
to save his own miserable life. The heroine of the opera appears
and she meets his requirements. He marries her and for a while she
seems blest. But the siren, the Lola in the case, winds her toils
about him as the disease stretches him on the floor at her feet.
Piquancy again, achieved now without that poor palliative,
punishment of the evil-doer.

Tasca's "A Santa Lucia" has an appetizing story about an
oysterman's son who deserts a woman by whom he has a child, in
order to marry one to whom he had previously been affianced. The
women meet. There is a dainty brawl, and the fiancee of Cicillo
(he's the oysterman's son) strikes her rival's child to the ground.
The mother tries to stab the fiancee with the operatic Italian
woman's ever-ready dagger, and this act stirs up the embers of
Cicillo's love. He takes the mother of his child back home--to his
father's house, that is. The child must be some four years old by
this time, but the oysterman--dear, unsuspecting old man!--knows
nothing about the relation existing between his son and his
housekeeper. He is thinking of marriage with his common law
daughter-in-law when in comes the old fiancee with a tale for
Cicillo's ears of his mistress's unfaithfulness. "It is not true!"
shrieks the poor woman, but the wretch, her seducer, closes his
ears to her protestations; and she throws herself into the sea,
where the oysters come from. Cicillo rushes after her and bears her
to the shore, where she dies in his arms, gasping in articulo
mortis, "It is not true!"



The romantic interest in Mascagni's life is confined to the period
which preceded his sudden rise to fame. His father was a baker in
Leghorn, and there he was born on December 7,1863. Of humble origin
and occupation himself, the father, nevertheless, had large
ambitions for his son; but not in the line of art. Pietro was to be
shaped intellectually for the law. Like Handel, the boy studied the
pianoforte by stealth in the attic. Grown in years, he began
attending a music-school, when, it is said, his father confined him
to his house; thence his uncle freed him and took over his care
upon himself. Singularly enough, the man who at the height of his
success posed as the most Italian of Italian masters had his
inspiration first stirred by German poetry. Early in his career
Beethoven resolved to set Schiller's "Hymn to Joy"; the purpose
remained in his mind for forty years or so, and finally became a
realization in the finale of the Ninth Symphony. Pietro Mascagni
resolved as a boy to compose music for the same ode; and did it at
once. Then he set to work upon a two-act opera, "Il Filanda." His
uncle died, and a Count Florestan (here is another Beethovenian
echo!) sent him to the Conservatory at Milan, where, like nearly
all of his native contemporaries, he imbibed knowledge (and musical
ideas) from Ponchielli.

After two years or so of academic study he yielded to a gypsy
desire and set out on his wanderings, but not until he had chosen
as a companion Maffei's translation of Heine's "Ratcliff"--a gloomy
romance which seems to have caught the fancy of many composers.
There followed five years of as checkered a life as ever musician
led. Over and over again he was engaged as conductor of an
itinerant or stationary operetta and opera company, only to have
the enterprise fail and leave him stranded. For six weeks in Naples
his daily ration was a plate of macaroni. But he worked at his
opera steadily, although, as he once remarked, his dreams of fame
were frequently swallowed up in the growls of his stomach, which
caused him more trouble than many a millionaire suffers from too
little appetite or too much gout. Finally, convinced that he could
do better as a teacher of the pianoforte, he ran away from an
engagement which paid him two dollars a day, and, sending off the
manuscript of "Ratcliff" in a portmanteau, settled down in
Cerignola. There he became director of a school for orchestral
players, though he had first to learn to play the instruments; he
also taught pianoforte and thoroughbass, and eked out a troublous
existence until his success in competition for the prize offered by
Sonzogno, the Milanese publisher, made him famous in a day and
started him on the road to wealth.

It was but natural that, after "Cavalleria rusticana" had
virulently affected the whole world with what the enemies of Signor
Mascagni called "Mascagnitis," his next opera should be looked
forward to with feverish anxiety. There was but a year to wait, for
"L'Amico Fritz" was brought forward in Rome on the last day of
October, 1891. Within ten weeks its title found a place on the
programme of one of Mr. Walter Damrosch's Sunday night concerts in
New York; but the music was a disappointment. Five numbers were
sung by Mme. Tavary and Signor Campanini, and Mr, Damrosch, not
having the orchestral parts, played the accompaniments upon a
pianoforte. As usual, Mr. Gustav Hinrichs was to the fore with a
performance in Philadelphia (on June 8, 1892), the principal
singers being Mme. Koert-Kronold, Clara Poole, M. Guille, and
Signor Del Puente. On January 31, 1893, the Philadelphia singers,
aided by the New York Symphony Society, gave a performance of the
opera, under the auspices of the Young Men's Hebrew Association,
for the benefit of its charities, at the Carnegie Music Hall, New
York. Mr. Walter Damrosch was to have conducted, but was detained
in Washington by the funeral of Mr. Blaine, and Mr. Hinrichs took
his place. Another year elapsed, and then, on January 10, 1894, the
opera reached the Metropolitan Opera House. In spite of the fact
that Madame Calve sang the part of Suzel, only two performances
were given to the work.

The failure of this opera did not dampen the industry of Mascagni
nor the zeal of his enterprising publishers. For his next opera the
composer went again to the French authors, Erckmann-Chatrian, who
had supplied him with the story of "L'Amico Fritz." This time he
chose "Les deux Freres," which they had themselves turned into a
drama with the title of "Rantzau." Mascagni's librettist retained
the title. The opera came out in Florence in 1892. The tremendous
personal popularity of the composer, who was now as much a favorite
in Vienna and Berlin as he was in the town of his birth which had
struck a medal in his honor, or the town of his residence which had
created him an honorary citizen, could not save the work.

Now he turned to the opera which he had laid aside to take up his
"Cavalleria," and in 1895 "Guglielmo Ratcliff," based upon the
gloomy Scotch story told by Heine, was brought forward at La Scala,
in Milan. It was in a sense the child of his penury and suffering,
but he had taken it up inspired by tremendous enthusiasm for the
subject, and inasmuch as most of its music had been written before
success had turned his head, or desire for notoriety had begun to
itch him, there was reason to hope to find in it some of the hot
blood which surges through the score of "Cavalleria." As a matter
of fact, critics who have seen the score or heard the work have
pointed out that portions of "I Rantzau" and "Cavalleria" are as
alike as two peas. It would not be a violent assumption that the
composer in his eagerness to get his score before the Sonzogno jury
had plucked his early work of its best feathers and found it
difficult to restore plumage of equal brilliancy when he attempted
to make restitution. In the same year, 1895, his next opera,
"Silvano," made a fiasco in Milan. A year later there appeared
"Zanetto," which seems like an effort to contract the frame of the
lyric drama still further than is done in "Cavalleria." It is a
bozzetto, a sketch, based on Coppee's duologue "Le Passant," a
scene between a strumpet who is weary of the world and a young
minstrel. Its orchestration is unique--there are but strings and a
harp. It was brought out at Pesaro, where, in 1895, Mascagni had
been appointed director of the Liceo Musicale Rossini.

As director of the music-school in Rossini's native town Mascagni's
days were full of trouble from the outset. He was opposed, said his
friends, in reformatory efforts by some of the professors and
pupils, whose enmity grew so virulent that in 1897 they spread the
story that he had killed himself. He was deposed from his position
by the administration, but reinstated by the Minister of Fine Arts.
The criticism followed him for years that he had neglected his
duties to travel about Europe, giving concerts and conducting his
operas for the greater glory of himself and the profit of his
publisher. At the time of the suicide story it was also said that
he was in financial straits; to which his friends replied that he
received a salary of 60 lire ($12) a day as director, 1000 lire
($200) a month from Sonzogno, and lived in a princely dwelling.

After "Zanetto" came "Iris," to which, as the one opera besides
"Cavalleria rusticana" which has remained in the American
repertory, I shall devote the next chapter in this book. "Iris" was
followed by "Le Maschere," which was brought out on January 17,
1901, simultaneously in six cities--Rome, Milan, Venice, Genoa,
Turin, and Naples. It made an immediate failure in all of these
places except Rome, where it endured but a short time. Mascagni's
next operatic work was a lyric drama, entitled "Vistilia," the
libretto of which, based upon an historical novel by Racco de
Zerbi, was written by Menasci and Targioni-Tozzetti, who
collaborated on the book of "Cavalleria rusticana." The action goes
back to the time of Tiberius and deals with the loves of Vistilia
and Helius. Then came another failure in the shape of "Amica,"
which lived out its life in Monte Carlo, where it was produced in
March, 1905.

In the winter of 1902-1903 Signor Mascagni was in the United States
for the purpose of conducting performances of some of his operas
and giving concerts. The company of singers and instrumentalists
which his American agents had assembled for his purpose was, with a
few exceptions, composed of the usual operatic flotsam and jetsam
which can be picked up at any time in New York. The enterprise
began in failure and ended in scandal. There had been no adequate
preparation for the operas announced, and one of them was not
attempted.

This was "Ratcliff." "Cavalleria rusticana," "Zanetto," and "Iris"
were poorly performed at the Metropolitan Opera House in October,
and an attempt at Sunday night concerts was made. Signor Mascagni's
countrymen labored hard to create enthusiasm for his cause, but the
general public remained indifferent. Having failed miserably in New
York, Mascagni, heavily burdened with debt, went to Boston. There
he was arrested for breach of contract. He retaliated with a suit
for damages against his American managers. The usual amount of
crimination and recrimination followed, but eventually the
difficulties were compounded and Mascagni went back to his home a
sadly disillusionized man. [Footnote: The story of this visit is
told in greater detail in my "Chapters of Opera," as is also the
story of the rivalry among American managers to be first in the
field with "Cavalleria rusticana."]

"Zanetto" was produced along with "Cavalleria rusticana" at the
Metropolitan Opera House on October 8, 1902, and "Iris" on October
16. Signor Mascagni conducted and the parts were distributed as
follows among the singers of the company: Iris, Marie Farneti;
Osaka, Pietro Schiavazzi; Kyoto, Virgilio Bollati; Il Cieco,
Francesco Navarrini; Una Guecha, Dora de Filippe; Un Mercianola,
Pasquale Blasio; Un Cencianola, Bernardino Landino. The opera was
not heard of again until the season of 1907-1908, when, just before
the end of the administration of Heinrich Conried, it was
incorporated into the repertory of the Metropolitan Opera House
apparently for the purpose of giving Mme. Emma Eames an opportunity
to vie with Miss Geraldine Farrar in Japanese opera.




CHAPTER XI

"IRIS"


"Light is the language of the eternal ones--hear it!" proclaims
the librettist of "Iris" in that portion of his book which is
neither said nor sung nor played. And it is the sun that sings with
divers voices after the curtain has risen on a nocturnal scene,
aiid the orchestra has sought to depict the departure of the night,
the break of day, the revivification of the flowers and the
sunrise. As Byron sang of him, so Phoebus Apollo celebrates himself
as "the god of life and poetry and light," but does not stop there.
He is also Infinite Beauty, Cause, Reason, Poetry, and Love. The
music begins with an all but inaudible descending passage in the
basses, answered by sweet concordant harmonies. A calm song tells
of the first streaks of light; woodwind and harp add their voices;
a mellifluous hymn chants the stirring flowers, and leads into a
rhythmically, more incisive, but still sustained, orchestral song,
which bears upon its surface the choral proclamation of the sun: "I
am! I am life! I am Beauty infinite!" The flux and reflux of the
instrumental surge grows in intensity, the music begins to glow
with color and pulsate with eager life, and reaches a mighty
sonority, gorged with the crash of a multitude of tamtams, cymbals,
drums, and bells, at the climacteric reiteration of "Calore! Luce!
Amor!" The piece is thrillingly effective, but as little operatic
as the tintinnabulatory chant of the cherubim in the prologue of
Boito's "Mefistofele."

And now allegory makes room for the drama. To the door of her
cottage, embowered on the banks of a quiet stream, comes Iris. The
peak of Fujiyama glows in the sunlight. Iris is fair and youthful
and innocent. A dream has disturbed her. "Gorgons and Hydras and
Chimaeras dire" had filled her garden and threatened her doll,
which she had put to sleep under a rose-bush. But the sun's rays
burst forth and the monsters flee. She lifts her doll and moves its
arms in mimic salutation to the sun. Osaka, a wealthy rake, and
Kyoto, a pander, play spy on her actions, gloat on her loveliness
and plot to steal her and carry her to the Yoshiwara. To this end
they go to bring on a puppet show, that its diversion may enable
them to steal her away without discovery. Women come down to the
banks of the river and sing pretty metaphors as they wash their
basketloads of muslins. Gradually the music of samisens, gongs, and
drums approaches. Osaka and Kyoto have disguised themselves as
travelling players, gathered together some geishas and musicians,
and now set up a marionette theatre. Iris comforts her blind
father, the only object of her love, besides her doll, and promises
to remain at his side. The puppet play tells the story of a maiden
who suffers abuse from a cruel father, who threatens to sell her to
a merchant. Iris is much affected by the sorrows of the puppet. The
voice of Jor, the son of the sun, is heard--it is Osaka, singing
without. The melody is the melody of Turridu's Siciliano, but the
words are a promise of a blissful, kissful death and thereafter
life everlasting. The puppet dies and with Jor dances off into
Nirvana. Now three geishas, representing Beauty, Death, and the
Vampire, begin a dance. Kyoto distracts the attention of the
spectators while the dancers flaunt their skirts higher and wider
until their folds conceal Iris, and Osaka's hirelings seize her and
bear her off toward the city. Kyoto places a letter and money at
the cottage door for the blind father. Through a pedler and the
woman he learns that his daughter is gone to be an inmate of the
Yoshiwara. He implores the people who had been jeering him to lead
him thither, that he may spit in her face and curse her.

Iris is asleep upon a bed in the "Green House" of the district,
which needs no description. A song, accompanied by the twanging of
a samisen and the clanging of tamtams, is sung by three geishas.
Kyoto brings in Osaka to admire her beauty, and sets a high price
upon tt. Osaka sends for jewels. Iris awakes and speculates in
philosophical vein touching the question of her existence. She
cannot be dead, for death brings knowledge and paradise joy; but
she weeps. Osaka appears. He praises her rapturously--her form, her
hair, her eyes, her mouth, her smile. Iris thinks him veritably
Jor, but he says his name is "Pleasure." The maiden recoils in
terror. A priest had taught her in an allegory that Pleasure and
Death were one! Osaka loads her with jewels, fondles her, draws her
to his breast, kisses her passionately. Iris weeps. She knows
nothing of passion, and longs only for her father, her cottage, and
her garden. Osaka wearies of his guest, but Kyoto plans to play
still further upon his lust. He clothes her in richer robes, but
more transparent, places her upon a balcony, and, withdrawing a
curtain, exhibits her beauty to the multitude in the street. Amazed
cries greet the revelation. Osaka returns and pleads for her love.

"Iris!" It is the cry of the blind man hunting the child whom he
thinks has sold herself into disgraceful slavery. The crowd falls
back before him, while Iris rushes forward to the edge of the
veranda and cries out to him, that he may know her presence. He
gathers a handful of mud from the street and hurls it in the
direction of her voice. "There! In your face! In your forehead! In
your mouth! In your eyes! Fango!" Under the imprecations of her
father the mind of Iris gives way. She rushes along a corridor and
hurls herself out of a window.

The third act is reached, and drama merges again into allegory. In
the wan light of the moon rag-pickers, men and women, are dragging
their hooks through the slimy muck that flows through the open
sewer beneath the fatal window. They sing mockingly to the moon. A
flash of light from Fujiyama awakens a glimmer in the filth. Again.
They rush forward and pull forth the body of Iris and begin to
strip it of its adornments. She moves and they fly in superstitious
fear. She recovers consciousness, and voices from invisible
singers, tell her of the selfish inspirations of Osaka, Kyoto, and
her blind father; Osaka's desire baffled by fate--such is life!
Kyoto's slavery to pleasure and a hangman's reward;--such is life!
The blind man's dependence on his child for creature comforts;--
such is life! Iris bemoans her fate as death comes gently to her.
The sky grows rosy and the light brings momentary life. She
stretches out her arms to the sun and acclaims the growing orb. As
once upon Ida--

    Glad earth perceives and from her bosom pours
    Unbidden herbs and voluntary flow'rs!

A field of blossoms spreads around her, into which she sinks, while
the sun, again many-voiced and articulate, chants his glory as in
the beginning,

The story is perhaps prettier in the telling than in the
performance. What there is in its symbolism and its poetical
suggestion that is ingratiating is more effective in the fancy than
in the experience. There are fewer clogs, fewer stagnant pools,
fewer eddies which whirl to no purpose. In the modern school, with
its distemper music put on in splotches, there must be more merit
and action. Psychological delineation in music which stimulates
action, or makes one forget the want of outward movement, demands a
different order of genius than that which Signor Mascagni
possesses. Mere talent for artful device will not suffice. There
are many effective bits of expressive writing in the score of
"Iris," but most of them are fugitive and aim at coloring a word, a
phrase, or at best a temporary situation. There is little flow of
natural, fervent melody. What the composer accomplished with tune,
characteristic but fluent, eloquent yet sustained, in "Cavalleria
rusticana," he tries to achieve in "Iris" with violent, disjointed,
shifting of keys and splashes of instrumental color. In this he is
seldom successful, for he is not a master of orchestral writing--
that technical facility which nearly all the young musicians have
in the same degree that all pianists have finger technic. His
orchestral stream is muddy; his effects generally crass and empty
of euphony. He throws the din of outlandish instruments of
percussion, a battery of gongs, big and little, drums, and cymbals
into his score without achieving local color. Once only does he
utilize it so as to catch the ears and stir the fancy of his
listeners--in the beginning of the second act, where there is a
murmur of real Japanese melody. As a rule, however, Signor Mascagni
seems to have been careless in the matter of local color, properly
so, perhaps, for, strictly speaking, local color in the lyric drama
is for comedy with its petty limitations, not for tragedy with its
appeal to large and universal passions. Yet it is in the lighter
scenes, the scenes of comedy, like the marionette show, the scenes
of mild pathos, like the monologues of Iris, and the scenes of mere
accessory decoration, like that of the laundresses, the mousmes in
the first act, with its purling figure borrowed from "Les
Huguenots" and its unnecessarily uncanny col legno effect conveyed
from "L'Africaine" that it is most effective.




CHAPTER XII

"MADAMA BUTTERFLY"


This is the book of the generation of "Madama Butterfly": An
adventure in Japan begat Pierre Loti's "Madame Chrysantheme";
"Madame Chrysantheme" begat John Luther Long's "Madame Butterfly,"
a story; "Madame Butterfly," the story, begat "Madame Butterfly," a
play by David Belasco; "Madame Butterfly," the play, begat "Madama
Butterfly," the opera by Giacomo Puccini. The heroine of the roving
French romanticist is therefore seen in her third incarnation in
the heroine of the opera book which L. Illica and G. Giacosa made
for Puccini. But in operatic essence she is still older, for, as
Dr. Korngold, a Viennese critic, pointed out, Selica is her
grandmother and Lakme her cousin.

Even this does not exhaust her family history; there is something
like a bar sinister in her escutcheon. Mr. Belasco's play was not
so much begotten, conceived, or born of admiration for Mr. Long's
book as it was of despair wrought by the failure of another play
written by Mr. Belasco. This play was a farce entitled "Naughty
Anthony," created by Mr. Belasco in a moment of aesthetic
aberration for production at the Herald Square Theatre, in New
York, in the spring of 1900. Mr. Belasco doesn't think so now, but
at the time he had a notion that the public would find something
humorous and attractive in the spectacle of a popular actress's leg
swathed in several layers of stocking. So he made a show of Blanche
Bates. The public refused to be amused at the farcical study in
comparative anatomy, and when Mr. Belasco's friends began to fault
him for having pandered to a low taste, and he felt the smart of
failure in addition, he grew heartily ashamed of himself. His
affairs, moreover, began to take on a desperate aspect; the season
threatened to be a ruinous failure, and he had no play ready to
substitute for "Naughty Anthony." Some time before a friend had
sent him Mr. Long's book, but he had carelessly tossed it aside. In
his straits it came under his eyes again, and this time he saw a
play in it--a play and a promise of financial salvation. It was
late at night when he read the story, but he had come to a resolve
by morning and in his mind's eye had already seen his actors in
Japanese dress. The drama lay in the book snugly enough; it was
only necessary to dig it out and materialize it to the vision. That
occupation is one in which Mr. Belasco is at home. The dialogue
went to his actors a few pages at a time, and the pictures rose
rapidly in his mind. Something different from a stockinged leg now!

Glimpses of Nippon--its mountains, waters, bridges, flowers,
gardens, geishas; as a foil to their grace and color the prosaic
figures of a naval officer and an American Consul. All things
tinged with the bright light of day, the glories of sunset or the
super-glories of sunrise. We must saturate the fancy of the
audience with the atmosphere of Japan, mused Mr. Belasco.
Therefore, Japanese scenes, my painter! Electrician, your plot
shall be worked out as carefully as the dialogue and action of the
play's people. "First drop discovered; house-lights down; white
foots with blue full work change of color at back of drop; white
lens on top of mountain; open light with white, straw, amber, and
red on lower part of drop; when full on lower footlights to blue,"
and so on. Mr. Belasco's emotions, we know, find eloquent
expression in stage lights. But the ear must be carried off to the
land of enchantment as well as the eye. "Come, William Furst,
recall your experiences on the Western coast. For my first curtain
I want a quaint, soft Japanese melody, pp--you know how!"

And so "Madame Butterfly," the play, was made. In two weeks all was
ready, and a day after the first performance at the Herald Square
Theatre, on March 5, 1900, the city began to hum with eager comment
on the dramatic intensity of the scene of a Japanese woman's vigil,
of the enthralling eloquence of a motionless, voiceless figure,
looking steadily through a hole torn through a paper partition,
with a sleeping child and a nodding maid at her feet, while a mimic
night wore on, the lanterns on the floor flickered out one by one
and the soft violins crooned a melody to the arpeggios of a harp.

The season at the Herald Square Theatre was saved. Some time later,
when Mr. Belasco accompanied Mr. Charles Frohman to London to put
on "Zaza" at the Garrick Theatre, he took "Madame Butterfly" with
him and staged it at the Duke of York's Theatre, hard by. On the
first night of "Madame Butterfly" Mr. Frohman was at the latter
playhouse, Mr. Belasco at the former. The fall of the curtain on
the little Japanese play was followed by a scene of enthusiasm
which endured so long that Mr. Frohman had time to summon his
colleague to take a curtain call. At a stroke the pathetic play had
made its fortune in London, and, as it turned out, paved the way
for a new and larger triumph for Mr. Long's story. The musical
critics of the London newspapers came to the house and saw operatic
possibilities in the drama. So did Mr. Francis Nielson, at the time
Covent Garden's stage manager, who sent word of the discovery to
Signor Puccini. The composer came from Milan, and realized on the
spot that the successor of "Tosca" had been found. Signori Illica
and Giacosa, librettists in ordinary to Ricordi & Co., took the
work of making the opera book in hand. Signor Illica's fancy had
roamed in the Land of Flowers before; he had written the libretto
for Mascagni's "Iris." The ephemeral life of Cho-Cho-San was over
in a few months, but by that time "Madama Butterfly," glorified by
music, had lifted her wings for a new flight in Milan.

It is an old story that many operas which are recognized as
masterpieces later, fail to find appreciation or approval when they
are first produced. "Madama Butterfly" made a fiasco when brought
forward at La Scala on February 17, 1904.

[Footnote: At this premiere Campanini was the conductor and the
cast was as follows: Butterfly, Storchio; Suzuki, Giaconia;
Pinkerton, Zenatello; Sharpless, De Luca; Goro, Pini-Corsi; Bonzo,
Venturini; Yakuside, Wulmann. At the first performance in London,
on July 10, 1905, at Covent Garden, the cast was: Butterfly,
Destinn; Suzuki, Lejeune; Pinkerton, Caruso; Sharpless, Scotti;
Goro, Dufriche; Bonzo, Cotreuil; Yakuside, Rossi. Conductor,
Campanini. After the revision it was produced at Brescia on May 28,
1904, with Zenatello, of the original cast, Krusceniski as
Butterfly, and Bellati as Sharpless. The first American
performances were in the English version, made by Mrs. B. H. Elkin,
by the Savage Opera Company, which came to the Garden Theatre, New
York, after a trial season in Washington, on November 12, 1906. It
had a run of nearly three months before it reached the Metropolitan
Opera House, on February 11, 1907. Mr. Walter Rothwell conducted
the English performance, in which there were several changes of
casts, the original Butterfly being Elza Szamozy (a Hungarian
singer); Suzuki, Harriet Behne; Pinkerton, Joseph F. Sheehan, and
Sharpless, Winifred Goff. Arturo Vigna conducted the first Italian
performance at the Metropolitan, with Geraldine Farrar as
Butterfly, Louise Homer as Suzuki, Caruso as Pinkerton, Scotti as
Sharpless, and Albert Reiss as Goro.]

So complete was the fiasco that in his anxiety to withdraw the work
Signer Puccini is said to have offered to reimburse the management
of the theatre for the expenditures entailed by the production.
Failures of this kind are frequently inexplicable, but it is
possible that the unconventional character of the story and the
insensibility of the Italians to national musical color other than
their own, had a great deal to do with it in this case. Whatever
the cause, the popular attitude toward the opera was displayed in
the manner peculiar to Italy, the discontented majority whistling,
shrilling on house keys, grunting, roaring, bellowing, and laughing
in the good old-fashioned manner which might be set down as
possessed of some virtuous merit if reserved for obviously stupid
creations.

"The Pall Mall Gazette" reported that at the time the composer told
a friend that on this fateful first night he was shut up in a small
room behind the scenes, where he could hear nothing of what was
going on on the stage or in the audience-room. On a similar
occasion, nearly a century before, when "The Barber of Seville"
scored an equally monumental failure, Rossini, in the conductor's
chair, faced the mob, shrugged his shoulders, and clapped his hands
to show his contempt for his judges, then went home and composedly
to bed. Puccini, though he could not see the discomfiture of his
opera, was not permitted to remain in ignorance of it. His son and
his friends brought him the news. His collaborator, Giacosa, rushed
into the room with dishevelled hair and staring eyes, crying: "I
have suffered the passion of death!" while Signorina Storchio burst
into such a flood of tears and sobs that it was feared she would be
ill. Puccini was cut to the heart, but he did not lose faith in the
work. He had composed it in love and knew its potentialities, His
faith found justification when he produced it in Brescia three
months later and saw it start out at once on a triumphal tour of
the European theatres. His work of revision was not a large or
comprehensive one. He divided the second act into two acts, made
some condensations to relieve the long strain, wrote a few measures
of introduction for the final scene, but refused otherwise to
change the music. His fine sense of the dramatic had told him
correctly when he planned the work that there ought not to be a
physical interruption of the pathetic vigil out of which Blanche
Bates in New York and Evelyn Millard in London had made so powerful
a scene, but he yielded to the compulsion of practical
considerations, trying to save respect for his better judgment by
refusing to call the final scene an act, though he permitted the
fall of the curtain; but nothing can make good the loss entailed by
the interruption. The mood of the play is admirably preserved in
the music of the intermezzo, but the mood of the listeners is
hopelessly dissipated with the fall of the curtain. When the scene
of the vigil is again disclosed, the charm and the pathos have
vanished, never to return. It is true that a rigid application of
the law of unities would seem to forbid that a vigil of an entire
night from eve till morning be compressed into a few minutes; but
poetic license also has rights, and they could have been pleaded
with convincing eloquence by music, with its marvellous capacity
for publishing the conflicting emotions of the waiting wife.



His ship having been ordered to the Asiatic station, Benjamin
Franklin Pinkerton, Lieutenant in the United States Navy, follows a
custom (not at all unusual among naval officers, if Pierre Loti is
to be believed) and for the summer sojourn in Japan leases a
Japanese wife. (The word "wife" is a euphemism for housekeeper,
companion, play-fellow, mistress, what not.) This is done in a
manner involving little ceremony, as is known to travellers and
others familiar with the social customs of Nippon, through a
nakodo, a marriage broker or matrimonial agent. M. Loti called his
man Kangourou; Mr. Long gave his the name of Goro. That, however,
and the character of the simple proceeding before a registrar is
immaterial. M. Loti, who assures us that his book is merely some
pages from a veritable diary, entertains us with some details
preliminary to his launch into a singular kind of domestic
existence, which are interesting as bearing on the morals of the
opera and as indicative of the fact that he is a closer observer of
Oriental life than his American confrere. He lets us see how
merchantable "wives" are chosen, permits M. Kangourou to exhibit
his wares and expatiate on their merits. There is the daughter of a
wealthy China merchant, a young woman of great accomplishments who
can write "commercially" and has won a prize in a poetic contest
with a sonnet. She is, consequently, very dear--100 yen, say $100--
but that is of no consequence; what matters is that she has a
disfiguring scar on her cheek. She will not do. Then there is Mlle.
Jasmin, a pretty girl of fifteen years, who can be had for $18 or
$20 a month (contract cancellable at the end of any month for non-
payment), a few dresses of fashionable cut and a pleasant house to
live in. Mlle. Jasmin comes to be inspected with one old lady, two
old ladies, three old ladies (mamma and aunts), and a dozen friends
and neighbors, big and little. Loti's moral stomach revolts at the
thought of buying for his uses a child who looks like a doll, and
is shocked at the public parade which has been made of her as a
commodity. He has not yet been initiated into some of the
extraordinary customs of Japan, nor yet into some of the
distinctions attendant upon those customs. He learns of one of the
latter when he suggests to the broker that he might marry a
charming geisha who had taken his fancy at a tea house. The manner
in which the suggestion was received convinced him that he might as
well have purposed to marry the devil himself as a professional
dancer and singer. Among the train of Mlle. Jasmin's friends is one
less young than Mlle. Jasmin, say about eighteen, and already more
of a woman; and when Loti says, "Why not her?" M. Kangourou trots
her out for inspection and, discreetly sending Loti away, concludes
the arrangement between night-fall and 10 o'clock, when he comes
with the announcement: "All is arranged, sir; her parents will give
her up for $20 a month--the same price as Mlle. Jasmin."

So Mlle. Chrysantheme became the wife of Pierre Loti during his
stay at Nagasaki, and then dutifully went home to her mother
without breaking her heart at all. But she was not a geisha, only a
mousme--"one of the prettiest words in the Nipponese language,"
comments M. Loti, "it seems almost as if there must be a little
moue in the very sound, as if a pretty, taking little pout, such as
they put on, and also a little pert physiognomy, were described by
it."

Lieutenant Pinkerton, equally ignorant with Lieutenant Loti but
uninstructed evidently, marries a geisha whose father had made the
happy dispatch at the request of the Son of Heaven after making a
blunder in his military command. She is Cio-Cio-San, also Madama
Butterfly, and she comes to her wedding with a bevy of geishas or
mousmes (I do not know which) and a retinue of relations. All enjoy
the hospitality of the American officer while picking him to
pieces, but turn from their kinswoman when they learn from an
uncle, who is a Buddhist priest and comes late to the wedding like
the wicked fairy in the stories, that she has attended the Mission
school and changed her religion. Wherefore the bonze curses her:
"Hou, hou! Cio-Cio-San, hou, hou!"

Sharpless, United States Consul at Nagasaki, had not approved of
Pinkerton's adventure, fearing that it might bring unhappiness to
the little woman; but Pinkerton had laughed at his scruples and
emptied his glass to the marriage with an American wife which he
hoped to make some day. Neither Loti nor Long troubles us with the
details of so prosaic a thing as the marriage ceremony; but Puccini
and his librettists make much of it, for it provides the only
opportunity for a chorus and the musician had found delightfully
mellifluous Japanese gongs to add a pretty touch of local color to
the music. Cio-Cio-San has been "outcasted" and Pinkerton comforts
her and they make love in the starlight (after Butterfly has
changed her habiliments) like any pair of lovers in Italy. "Dolce
notte! Quante stelle! Vieni, vieni!" for quantity.

This is the first act of the opera, and it is all expository to
Belasco's "Tragedy of Japan," which plays in one act, with the
pathetic vigil separating the two days which form its period of
action. When that, like the second act of the opera, opens,
Pinkerton has been gone from Nagasaki and his "wife" three years,
and a baby boy of whom he has never heard, but who has his eyes and
hair has come to bear Butterfly company in the little house on the
hill. The money left by the male butterfly when he flitted is all
but exhausted. Madama Butterfly appears to be lamentably ignorant
of the customs of her country, for she believes herself to be a
wife in the American sense and is fearfully wroth with Suzuki, her
maid, when she hints that she never knew a foreign husband to come
back to a Japanese wife. But Pinkerton when he sailed away had said
that he would be back "when the robins nest again," and that
suffices Cio-Cio-San. But when Sharpless comes with a letter to
break the news that his friend is coming back with an American
wife, he loses courage to perform his mission at the contemplation
of the little woman's faith in the truant. Does he know when the
robins nest in America? In Japan they had nested three times since
Pinkerton went away. The consul quails at that and damns his friend
as a scoundrel. Now Goro, who knows Butterfly's pecuniary plight,
brings Yamadori to her. Yamadori is a wealthy Japanese citizen of
New York in the book and play and a prince in the opera, but in all
he is smitten with Butterfly's beauty and wants to add her name to
the list of wives he has conveniently married and as conveniently
divorced on his visits to his native land. Butterfly insists that
she is an American and cannot be divorced Japanese fashion, and is
amazed when Sharpless hints that Pinkerton might have forgotten her
and she would better accept Yamadori's hand.

First she orders him out of the house, but, repenting her of her
rudeness, brings in the child to show him something that no one is
likely to forget. She asks the consul to write to his friend and
tell him that he has a son, so fine a son, indeed, that she
indulges in a day dream of the Mikado stopping at the head of his
troops to admire him and make him a prince of the realm. Sharpless
goes away with his mission unfulfilled and Suzuki comes in dragging
Goro with her, for that he had been spreading scandalous tales
about the treatment which children born like this child receive in
America. Butterfly is tempted to kill the wretch, but at the last
is content to spurn him with her foot.

At this moment a cannon shot is heard. A man-of-war is entering the
harbor. Quick, the glasses! "Steady my hand, Suzuki, that I may
read the name." It is the Abraham Lincoln, Pinkerton's ship! Now
the cherry tree must give up its every blossom, every bush or vine
its violets and jessamines to garnish the room for his welcome! The
garden is stripped bare, vases are filled, the floor is strewn with
petals. Perfumes exhale from the voices of the women and the song
of the orchestra. Here local color loses its right; the music is
all Occidental. Butterfly is dressed again in her wedding gown of
white and her pale cheeks are touched up with carmine. The paper
partitions are drawn against the night. Butterfly punctures the
shoji with three holes--one high up for herself to look through,
standing; one lower for the maid to look through, sitting; one near
the floor for the baby. And so Butterfly stands in an all-night
vigil. The lanterns flicker and go out. Maid and babe sink down in
sleep. The gray dawn creeps over the waters of the harbor. Human
voices, transformed into instruments, hum a barcarolle. (We heard
it when Sharpless tried to read the letter.) A Japanese tune rises
like a sailors' chanty from the band. Mariners chant their "Yo ho!"
Day is come. Suzuki awakes and begs her mistress to seek rest.
Butterfly puts the baby to bed, singing a lullaby. Sharpless and
Pinkerton come and learn of the vigil from Suzuki, who sees the
form of a lady in the garden and hears that it is the American wife
of Pinkerton. Pinkerton pours out his remorse melodiously. He will
be haunted forever by the picture of his once happy home and Cio-
Cio-San's reproachful eyes. He leaves money for Butterfly in the
consul's hands and runs away like a coward. Kate, the American
wife, and Suzuki meet in the garden. The maid is asked to tell her
mistress the meaning of the visit, but before she can do so
Butterfly sees them. Her questions bring out half the truth; her
intuition tells her the rest. Kate (an awful blot she is on the
dramatic picture) begs forgiveness and asks for the baby boy that
her husband may rear him. Butterfly says he shall have him in half
an hour if he will come to fetch him. She goes to the shrine of
Buddha and takes from it a veil and a dagger, reading the words
engraved on its blade: "To die with honor when one can no longer
live with honor." It is the weapon which the Mikado had sent to her
father. She points the weapon at her throat, but at the moment
Suzuki pushes the baby into the room. Butterfly addresses it
passionately; then, telling it to play, seats it upon a stool, puts
an American flag into its hands, a bandage around its eyes. Again
she takes dagger and veil and goes behind a screen. The dagger is
heard to fall. Butterfly totters out from behind the screen with a
veil wound round her neck. She staggers to the child and falls,
dying, at its feet. Pinkerton rushes in with a cry of horror and
falls on his knees, while Sharpless gently takes up the child.



I have no desire to comment disparagingly upon the denouement of
the book of Mr. Long or the play of Mr. Belasco which Puccini and
his librettists followed; but in view of the origin of the play a
bit of comparative criticism seems to be imperative. Loti's "Madame
Chrysantheme" was turned into an opera by Andre Messager. What the
opera was like I do not know. It came, it went, and left no sign;
yet it would seem to be easy to guess at the reason for its quick
evanishment. If it followed the French story, as no doubt it did,
it was too faithful to the actualities of Japanese life to awaken a
throb of emotion in the Occidental heart. Without such a throb a
drama is naught--a sounding brass and tinkling cymbal. The charm of
Loti's book lies in its marvellously beautiful portrayal of a
country, a people, and a characteristic incident in the social life
of that people. Its interest as a story, outside of the charm of
its telling, is like that excited by inspection of an exotic curio.
In his dedication of the book the author begged Mme. la Duchesse de
Richelieu not to look for any meaning in it, but to receive it in
the same spirit in which she would receive "some quaint bit of
pottery, some grotesque carved ivory idol, or some preposterous
trifle brought back from the fatherland of all preposterousness."
It is a record of a bit of the wandering life of a poet who makes
himself a part of every scene into which fortune throws him. He has
spent a summer with a Japanese mousme, whom he had married Japanese
fashion, and when he has divorced her, also in Japanese fashion,
with regard for all the conventions, and sailed away from her
forever, he is more troubled by thoughts of possible contamination
to his own nature than because of any consequences to the woman.
Before the final farewell he had felt a touch of pity for the "poor
little gypsy," but when he mounted the stairs to her room for the
last time he heard her singing, and mingled with her voice was a
strange metallic sound, dzinn, dzinn! as of coins ringing on the
floor. Is she amusing herself with quoits, or the jeu du crapaud,
or pitch and toss? He creeps in, and there, dressed for the
departure to her mother's, sitting on the floor is Chrysantheme;
and spread out around her all the fine silver dollars he had given
her according to agreement the night before. "With the competent
dexterity of an old money changer she fingers them, turns them
over, throws them on the floor, and armed with a little mallet ad
hoc, rings them vigorously against her ear, singing the while I
know not what little pensive, birdlike song, which I dare say she
improvises as she goes along. Well, after all, it is even more
completely Japanese than I could possibly have imagined it--this
last scene of my married life! I feel inclined to laugh." And he
commends the little gypsy's worldly wisdom, offers to make good any
counterfeit piece which she may find, and refuses to permit her to
see him go aboard of his ship. She does, nevertheless, along with
the Japanese wives of four of his fellow officers, who peep at
their flitting husbands through the curtains of their sampans. But
when he is far out on the great Yellow Sea he throws the faded
lotus flowers which she had given him through the porthole of his
cabin, making his best excuses for "giving to them, natives of
Japan, a grave so solemn and so vast"; and he utters a prayer: "O
Ama-Terace-Omi-Kami, wash me clean from this little marriage of
mine in the waters of the river of Kamo!"

The story has no soul, and to give his story, which borrowed its
motive from Loti's, a soul, Mr. Long had to do violence to the
verities of Japanese life. Yet might not even a geisha feel a
genuine passion?



The use of folk-tunes in opera is older than "Madama Butterfly,"
but Puccini's score stands alone in the extent of the use and the
consistency with which Japanese melody has been made the foundation
of the music. When Signor Illica, one of the librettists, followed
Sar Peladan and d'Annunzio into Nippon seeking flowers for "Iris,"
he took Mascagni with him--metaphorically, of course. But Mascagni
was a timid gleaner. Puccini plucked with a bolder hand, as indeed
he might, for he is an incomparably greater adept in the art of
making musical nosegays. In fact, I know of only one score that is
comparable with that of "Madama Butterfly" in respect of its use of
national musical color, and that is "Boris Godounoff." Moussorgsky,
however, had more, richer, and a greater variety of material to
work with than Puccini. Japanese music is arid and angular, and yet
so great is Puccini's skill in combining creative imagination and
reflection that he knew how to make it blossom like a rose. Pity
that he could not wholly overcome its rhythmical monotony. Japanese
melody runs almost uninterruptedly through his instrumental score,
giving way at intervals to the Italian style of lyricism when the
characters and passions become universal rather than local types.
Structurally, his score rests on the Wagnerian method, in that the
vocal part floats on an uninterrupted instrumental current. In the
orchestral part the tunes which he borrowed from the popular music
of Japan are continuously recurrent, and fragments of them are used
as the connecting links of the whole fabric. He uses also a few
typical themes (Leitmotive) of his own invention, and to them it
might be possible, by ingenious study of their relation to text and
situation, to attach significances in the manner of the Wagnerian
handbooks; but I do not think that such processes occupied the
composer's mind to any considerable extent, and the themes are not
appreciably characteristic. His most persistent use of a connecting
link, arbitrarily chosen, is found in the case of the first motive
of the theme, which he treats fugally in the introduction, and
which appears thereafter to the end of the chapter (a, in the list
of themes printed herewith). What might be called personal themes
are the opening notes of "The Star-Spangled Banner" for Pinkerton
and the melody (d) which comes in with Yamadori, in which the
Japanese tune used by Sir Arthur Sullivan in "The Mikado" is
echoed. The former fares badly throughout the score (for which no
blame need attach to Signor Puccini), but the latter is used with
capital effect, though not always in connection with the character.

If Signor Puccini had needed the suggestion that Japanese music was
necessary for a Japanese play (which of course he did not), he
might have received it when he saw Mr. Belasco's play in London.
For the incidental music in that play Mr. William Furst provided
Japanese tunes, or tunes made over the very convenient Japanese
last. Through Mr. Belasco's courtesy I am able to present here a
relic of this original "Butterfly" music. The first melody (a) was
the theme of the curtain-music; (b) that accompanying Cho-Cho-San,
when discovered at the beginning spraying flowers, presenting an
offering at the shrine and burning incense in the house at the foot
of Higashi hill; (c) the Yamadori music; (d) the music accompanying
the first production of the sword; (e) the music of the vigil.
There were also two Occidental pieces--the melody of a little song
which Pinkerton had taught Cho-Cho-San, "I Call Her the Belle of
Japan," and "Rock-a-bye, Baby."

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

Themes from Puccini's "Butterfly" music By permission of Ricordi &
Co.

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

Meiodies from Mr. Furst's "Butterfly" music By permission of Mr.
David Belasco




CHAPTER XIII

"DER ROSENKAVALIER"


In the beginning there was "Guntram," of which we in America heard
only fragmentary echoes in our concert-rooms. Then came
"Feuersnot," which reached us in the same way, but between which
and the subject which is to occupy me in this chapter there is a
kinship through a single instrumental number, the meaning of which
no commentator has dared more than hint at. It is the music which
accompanies the episode, politely termed a "love scene," which
occurs at the climax of the earlier opera, but is supposed to take
place before the opening of the curtain in the later. Perhaps I
shall recur to them again--if I have the courage.

These were the operas of Richard Strauss which no manager deemed it
necessary or advisable to produce in New York. Now came "Salome."
Popular neurasthenia was growing. Oscar Wilde thought France might
accept a glorification of necrophilism and wrote his delectable
book in French. France would have none of it, but when it was done
into German, and Richard Strauss accentuated its sexual perversity
by his hysterical music, lo! Berlin accepted it with avidity. The
theatres of the Prussian capital were keeping pace with the
pathological spirit of the day, and were far ahead of those of
Paris, where, it had long been the habit to think, moral obliquity
made its residence. If Berlin, then why not New York? So thought
Mr. Conned, saturated with German theatricalism, and seeing no
likely difference in the appeal of a "Parsifal" which he had
successfully produced, and a "Salome," he prepared to put the works
of Wagner and Strauss on the same footing at the Metropolitan Opera
House. An influence which has not yet been clearly defined, but
which did not spring from the director of the opera nor the
gentlemen who were his financial backers, silenced the maunderings
of the lust-crazed Herod and paralyzed the contortions of the
lascivious dancer to whom he was willing to give one-half his
kingdom. [Footnote: For the story of "Salome" in New York, see my
"Chapters of Opera" (Henry Holt & Co., New York), p. 343 et seq.]

Now Mr. Hammerstein came to continue the artistic education which
the owners of the Metropolitan Opera House had so strangely and
unaccountably checked. Salome lived out her mad life in a short
time, dying, not by the command of Herod, but crushed under the
shield of popular opinion. The operation, though effective, was not
as swift as it might have been had operatic conditions been
different than they are in New York, and before it was accomplished
a newer phase of Strauss's pathological art had offered itself as a
nervous, excitation. It was "Elektra," and under the guise of an
ancient religious ideal, awful but pathetic, the people were asked
to find artistic delight in the contemplation of a woman's maniacal
thirst for a mother's blood. It is not necessary to recall the
history of the opera at the Manhattan Opera House to show that the
artistic sanity of New York was proof against the new poison.

Hugo von Hoffmannsthal had aided Strauss in this brew and
collaborated with him in the next, which, it was hoped, probably
because of the difference in its concoction and ingredients, would
make his rein even more taut than it had ever been on theatrical
managers and their public. From the Greek classics he turned to the
comedy of the Beaumarchais period. Putting their heads together,
the two wrote "Der Rosenkavalier." It was perhaps shrewd on their
part that they avoided all allusion to the opera buffa of the
period and called their work a "comedy for music." It enabled them,
in the presence of the ignorant, to assume a virtue which they did
not possess; but it is questionable if that circumstance will help
them any. It is only the curious critic nowadays who takes the
trouble to look at the definition, or epithet, on a title page. It
is the work which puts the hallmark on itself; not the whim of the
composer. It would have been wise, very wise indeed, had
Hoffmannsthal avoided everything which might call up a comparison
between himself and Beaumarchais. It was simply fatal to Strauss
that he tried to avoid all comparison between his treatment of an
eighteenth century comedy and Mozart's. One of his devices was to
make use of the system of musical symbols which are irrevocably
associated with Wagner's method of composition. Mozart knew nothing
of this system, but he had a better one in his Beaumarchaisian
comedy, which "Der Rosenkavalier" recalls; it was that of thematic
expression for each new turn in the dramatic situation--a system
which is carried out so brilliantly in "Le Nozze di Figaro" that
there is nothing, even in "Die Meistersinger," which can hold a
candle to it. Another was to build up the vocal part of his comedy
on orchestral waltzes. Evidently it was his notion that at the time
of Maria Theresa (in whose early reign the opera is supposed to
take place) the Viennese world was given over to the dance. It was
so given over a generation later, so completely, indeed, that at
the meetings in the ridotto, for which Mozart, Haydn, Gyrowetz,
Beethoven, and others wrote music, retiring rooms had to be
provided for ladies who were as unprepared for possible accidents
as was one of those described by Pepys as figuring in a court ball
in his time; but to put scarcely anything but waltz tunes under the
dialogue of "Der Rosenkavalier" is an anachronism which is just as
disturbing to the judicious as the fact that Herr Strauss, though
he starts his half-dozen or more of waltzes most insinuatingly,
never lets them run the natural course which Lanner and the
Viennese Strauss, who suggested their tunes, would have made them
do. Always, the path which sets out so prettily becomes a byway
beset with dissonant thorns and thistles and clogged with rocks.

All of this is by way of saying that "Der Rosenkavalier" reached
New York on December 9, 1913, after having endured two years or so
in Europe, under the management of Mr. Gatti-Casazza, and was
treated with the distinction which Mr. Conried gave "Parsifal" and
had planned for "Salome." It was set apart for a performance
outside the subscription, special prices were demanded, and the
novelty dressed as sumptuously and prepared with as lavish an
expenditure of money and care as if it were a work of the very
highest importance. Is it that? The question is not answered by the
fact that its music was composed by Richard Strauss, even though
one be willing to admit that Strauss is the greatest living master
of technique in musical composition, the one concerning whose
doings the greatest curiosity is felt and certainly the one whose
doings are the best advertised. "Der Rosenkavalier," in spite of
all these things, must stand on its merits--as a comedy with music.
The author of its book has invited a comparison which has already
been suggested by making it a comedy of intrigue merely and placing
its time of action in Vienna and the middle of the eighteenth
century. He has gone further; he has invoked the spirit of
Beaumarchais to animate his people and his incidents. The one thing
which he could not do, or did not do, was to supply the satirical
scourge which justified the Figaro comedies of his great French
prototype and which, while it made their acceptance tardy, because
of royal and courtly opposition, made their popular triumph the
more emphatic. "Le Nozze di Figaro" gave us more than one figure
and more than one scene in the representation, and "Le Nozze di
Figaro" is to those who understand its text one of the most
questionable operas on the current list. But there is a moral
purpose underlying the comedy which to some extent justifies its
frank salaciousness. It is to prevent the Count from exercising an
ancient seigniorial right over the heroine which he had voluntarily
resigned, that all the characters in the play unite in the intrigue
which makes up the comedy. Moreover, there are glimpses over and
over again of honest and virtuous love between the characters and
beautiful expressions of it in the music which makes the play
delightful, despite its salaciousness. Even Cherubino who seems to
have come to life again in Octavian, is a lovable youth if for no
othe reason than that he represents youth in its amorousness toward
all womankind, with thought of special mischief toward none.

"Der Rosenkavalier" is a comedy of lubricity merely, with what
little satirical scourge it has applied only to an old roue who is
no more deserving of it than most of the other people in the play.
So much of its story as will bear telling can be told very briefly.
It begins, assuming its instrumental introduction (played with the
scene discreetly hidden) to be a part of it, with a young nobleman
locked in the embraces of the middle-aged wife of a field marshal,
who is conveniently absent on a hunting expedition. The music is of
a passionate order, and the composer, seeking a little the odor of
virtue, but with an oracular wink in his eye, says in a descriptive
note that it is to be played in the spirit of parody
(parodistisch). Unfortunately the audience cannot see the printed
direction, and there is no parody in music except extravagance and
ineptitude in the utterance of simple things (like the faulty notes
of the horns in Mozart's joke on the village musicians, the cadenza
for violin solo in the same musical joke, or the twangling of
Beckmesser's lute); so the introduction is an honest musical
description of things which the composer is not willing to confess,
and least of all the stage manager, for when the curtain opens
there is not presented even the picture called for by the German
libretto. Nevertheless, morn is dawning, birds are twittering, and
the young lover, kneeling before his mistress on a divan, is
bemoaning the fact that day is come and that he cannot publish his
happiness to the world. The tete-a-tete is interrupted by a rude
boor of a nobleman, who come to consult his cousin (the princess)
about a messenger to send with the conventional offering of a
silver rose to the daughter of a vulgar plebeian just elevated to
the nobility because of his wealth. The conversation between the
two touches on little more than old amours, and after the lady has
held her levee designed to introduce a variety of comedy effects in
music as well as action, the princess recommends her lover for the
office of rosebearer. Meanwhile the lover has donned the garments
of a waiting maid and been overwhelmed with the wicked attentions
of the roue, Lerchenau. When the lovers are again alone there is a
confession of renunciation on the part of the princess, based on
the philosophical reflection that, after all, her Octavian being so
young would bring about the inevitable parting sooner or later.

In the second act what the princess in her prescient abnegation had
foreseen takes place. Her lover carries the rose to the young woman
whom the roue had picked out for his bride and promptly falls in
love with her. She with equal promptness, following the example of
Wagner's heroines, bowls herself at his head. The noble vulgarian
complicates matters by insisting that he receive a dowry instead of
paying one. The young hot-blood adds to the difficulties by pinking
him in the arm with his sword, but restores order at the last by
sending him a letter of assignation in his first act guise of a
maid servant of the princess.

This assignation is the background of the third act, which is farce
of the wildest and most vulgar order. Much of it is too silly for
description. Always, however, there is allusion to the purpose of
the meeting on the part of Lerchenau, whose plans are spoiled by
apparitions in all parts of the room, the entrance of the police,
his presumptive bride and her father, a woman who claims him as her
husband, four children who raise bedlam (and memories of the
contentious Jews in "Salome"); by shouting "Papa! papa!" until his
mind is in a whirl and he rushes out in despair. The princess
leaves the new-found lovers alone.

They hymn their happiness in Mozartian strains (the melody copied
from the second part of the music with which Papageno sets the
blackamoors to dancing in "Die Zauberflote"), the orchestra talks
of the matronly renunciation of the princess, enthusiastic
Straussians of a musical parallel with the quintet from Wagner's
"Meistersinger," and the opera comes to an end after three and one-
half hours of more or less unintelligible dialogue poised on waltz
melodies.

I have said unintelligible dialogue. For this unintelligibility
there are two reasons-the chief one musical, the other literary.
Though Strauss treats his voices with more consideration in "Der
Rosenkavalier" than in his tragedies, he still so overburdens them
that the words are distinguishable only at intervals. Only too
frequently he crushes them with orchestral voices, which in
themselves are not overwhelming--the voices of his horns, for
instance, for which he shows a particular partiality. His style of
declamation is melodic, though it is only at the end of the opera
that he rises to real vocal melody; but it seems to be put over an
orchestral part, and not the orchestral part put under it. There is
no moment in which he can say, as Wagner truthfully and admiringly
said of the wonderful orchestral music of the third act of "Tristan
und Isolde," that all this swelling instrumental song existed only
for the sake of what the dying Tristan was saying upon his couch.
All of Strauss's waltzes seem to exist for their own sake, which
makes the disappointment greater that they are not carried through
in the spirit in which they are begun; that is, the spirit of the
naive Viennese dance tune.

A second reason for the too frequent unintelligibility of the text
is its archaic character. Its idioms are eighteenth century as well
as Viennese, and its persistent use of the third person even among
individuals of quality, though it gives a tang to the libretto when
read in the study, is not welcome when heard with difficulty.
Besides this, there is use of dialect--vulgar when assumed by
Octavian, mixed when called for by such characters as Valzacchi and
his partner in scandal mongery, Annina. To be compelled to forego a
knowledge of half of what such a master of diction as Mr. Reiss was
saying was a new sensation to his admirers who understand German.
Yet the fault was as little his as it was Mr. Goritz's that so much
of what he said went for nothing; it was all his misfortune,
including the fact that much of the music is not adapted to his
voice.

The music offers a pleasanter topic than the action and dialogue.
It is a relief to those listeners who go to the opera oppressed
with memories of "Salome" and "Elektra." It is not only that their
ears are not so often assaulted by rude sounds, they are frequently
moved by phrases of great and genuine beauty. Unfortunately the
Straussian system of composition demands that beauty be looked for
in fragments. Continuity of melodic flow is impossible to Strauss--
a confession of his inability either to continue Wagner's method,
to improve on it, or invent anything new in its place. The best
that has been done in the Wagnerian line belongs to Humperdinck.

[Footnote: "Der Rosenkavalier" had its first American production at
the Metropolitan Opera House, New York, on December 9, 1913, the
cast being as follows:--

Feldmarschallin Furstin Werdenberg............ Frieda Hempel
Baron Ochs auf Lerchenau...................... Otto Goritz
Octavian, genannt Quinquin.................... Margarete Ober
Herr von Faninal.............................. Hermann Weil
Sophie, seine Tochter......................... Anna Case
Jungfer Marianne Leitmetzerin................. Rita Fornia
Valzacchi, ein Intrigant...................... Albert Reiss
Annina, seine Begleiterin..................... Marie Mattfeld
Ein Polizeikommissar.......................... Carl Schlegel
Haushofmeister der Feldmarschalh'n............ Pietro Audisio
Haushofmeister bei Faninal.................... Lambert Murphy
Ein Notar..................................... Basil Ruysdael
Ein Wirt...................................... Julius Bayer
Ein Sanger.................................... Carl Jorn
Drei adelige Waisen........................... Louise Cox
                                               Rosina Van Dyck
                                               Sophie Braslau
Eine Modistin................................. Jeanne Maubourg
Ein Lakai..................................... Ludwig Burgstaller
Ein kleiner Neger............................. Ruth Weinstein

Conductor--Alfred Hertz]




CHAPTER XIV

"Konigskinder"


Once upon a time a witch cast a spell upon a king's daughter and
held her in servitude as a gooseherd. A prince found her in the
forest and loved her. She loved him in return, and would gladly
have gone away from her sordid surroundings with him, though she
had spurned the crown which he had offered her in exchange for her
wreath of flowers; but when she escaped from her jailer she found
that she could not break the charm which held her imprisoned in the
forest. Then the prince left the crown lying at her feet and
continued his wanderings. Scarcely had he gone when there came to
the hut of the witch a broommaker and a woodchopper, guided by a
wandering minstrel. They were ambassadors from the city of
Hellabrunn, which had been so long without a king that its boorish
burghers themselves felt the need of a ruler in spite of their
boorishness. To the wise woman the ambassadors put the questions:
Who shall be this ruler and by what sign shall they recognize him?
The witch tells them that their sovereign shall be the first person
who enters their gates after the bells have rung the noon hour on
the morrow, which is the day of the Hella festival. Then the
minstrel catches sight of the lovely goose-girl, and through the
prophetic gift possessed by poets he recognizes in her a rightly
born princess for his people. By the power of his art he is enabled
to put aside the threatening spells of the witch and compel the hag
to deliver the maiden into his care. He persuades her to break the
enchantment which had held her bound hitherto and defy the wicked
power.

Meanwhile, however, grievous misfortunes have befallen the prince,
her lover. He has gone to Hellabrunn, and desiring to learn to
serve in order that he might better know how to rule, he had taken
service as a swineherd. The daughter of the innkeeper becomes
enamoured of the shapely body of the prince, whose proud spirit she
cannot understand, and who has repulsed her advances. His thoughts
go back to the goosegirl whose wreath, with its fresh fragrance,
reminds him of his duty. He attempts to teach the burghers their
own worth, but the wench whose love he had repulsed accuses him of
theffy and he is about to be led off to prison when the bells peal
forth the festal hour.

Joyfully the watchmen throw open the strong town gates and the
multitude and gathered councillors fall back to receive their king.
But through the doors enters the gooseherd, proudly wearing her
crown and followed by her flock and the minstrel The lovers fall
into each other's arms, but only the poet and a little child
recognize them as of royal blood. The boorish citizens, who had
fancied that their king would appear in regal splendor, drive the
youth and maiden out with contumely, burn the witch and cripple the
minstrel by breaking one of his legs on the wheel. Seeking his
home, the prince and his love lose their way in the forest during a
snowstorm and die of a poisoned loaf made by the witch, for which
the prince had bartered his broken crown, under the same tree which
had sheltered them on their first meeting; but the children of
Hellabrunn, who had come out in search of them, guided by a bird,
find their bodies buried under the snow and give them royal acclaim
and burial. And the prescient minstrel hymns their virtues.

This is the story of Engelbert Humperdinck's opera "Konigskinder,"
which had its first performance on any stage at the Metropolitan
Opera House, New York, on December 28,1910, with the following
cast:

Der Konigssohn......................Herman Jadlowker
Die Gansemagd.......................Geraldine Farrar
Der Spielmann........................... Otto Goritz
Die Hexe................................Louise Homer
Der Holzhacker.......................... Adamo Didur
Der Besenbinder........................ Albert Reiss
Zwei Kinder..............Edna Walter and Lotte Engel
Der Ratsalteste....................... Marcel Reiner
Der Wirt..........................Antonio Pini-Corsi
Die Wirtstochter................... Florence Wickham
Der Schneider.......................... Julius Bayer
Die Stallmagd.........................Marie Mattfeld
Zwei Torwachter..... Ernst Maran and William Hinshaw

Conductor: Alfred Hertz


To some in the audience the drama was new only in the new operatic
dress with which Humperdinck had clothed it largely at the instance
of the Metropolitan management. It had been known as a spoken play
for twelve years and three of its musical numbers--the overture and
two pieces of between-acts music--had been in local concert-lists
for the same length of time. The play had been presented with
incidental music for many of the scenes as well as the overture and
entr'actes in 1898 in an extremely interesting production at the
Irving Place Theatre, then under the direction of Heinrich Conried,
in which Agnes Sorma and Rudolf Christians had carried the
principal parts. It came back four years later in an English
version at the Herald Square Theatre, but neither in the German nor
the English performance was it vouchsafed us to realize what had
been the purpose of the author of the play and the composer of the
music.

The author, who calls herself Ernst Rosmer, is a woman, daughter of
Heinrich Forges, for many years a factotum at the Bayreuth
festivals. It was her father's devotion to Wagner which gave her
the name of Elsa. She married a lawyer and litterateur in Munich
named Bernstein, and has written a number of plays besides
"Konigskinder," which she published in 1895, and afterward asked
Herr Humperdinck (not yet a royal Prussian professor, but a simple
musician, who had made essays in criticisms and tried to make a
composer out of Siegfried Wagner) to provide with incidental music.
Mr. Humperdinck took his task seriously. The play, with some
incidental music, was two years old before Mr. Humperdinck had his
overture ready. He had tried a new experiment, which proved a
failure. The second and third acts had their preludes, and the
songs of the minstrel had their melodies and accompaniments, and
all the principal scenes had been provided with illustrative music
in the Wagnerian manner, with this difference, that the dialogue
had been "pointed," as a church musician would say--that is, the
rhythm was indicated with exactness, and even the variations of
pitch, though it was understood that the purpose was not to achieve
song, but an intensified utterance, halfway between speech and
song. This was melodrama, as Herr Humperdinck conceived it and as
it had no doubt existed for ages--ever since the primitive Greek
drama, in fact. It is easy to understand how Herr Humperdinck came
to believe in the possibility of an art-form which, though
accepted, for temporary effect, by Beethoven and Cherubini, and
used for ballads with greater or less success by Schumann, had been
harshly rejected by his great model and master, Wagner. Humperdinck
lives in Germany, where in nearly every theatre there is more or
less of an amalgamation of the spoken drama and the opera--where
choristers play small parts and actors, though not professional
singers, sing when not too much is required of them. And yet Herr
Humperdinck found out that he had asked too much of his actors with
his "pointed" and at times intoned declamation, and "Konigskinder"
did not have to come to America to learn that the compromise was a
failure. No doubt Herr Humperdinck thought of turning so beautiful
a play into an opera then, but it seems to have required the
stimulus which finally came from New York to persuade him to carry
out the operatic idea, which is more than suggested in the score as
it lies before me in its original shape, into a thorough lyric
drama. The set pieces which had lived in the interim in the
concert-room were transferred into the opera-score with trifling
alterations and condensations and so were the set songs. As for the
rest it needed only that note-heads be supplied to some of the
portions of the dialogue which Humperdinck had designed for melodic
declamation to have those portions ready for the opera. Here an
example:--

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

A German opera can generally stand severer criticism than one in
another language, because there is a more strict application of
principles in Germany when it comes to writing a lyric drama than
in any other country. So in the present instance there is no need
to conceal the fact that there are outbreaks of eroticism and
offences against the German language which are none the less
flagrant and censurable because they are, to some extent, concealed
under the thin veneer of the allegory and symbolism which every
reader must have recognized as running through the play. This is,
in a manner, Wagnerian, as so much of the music is Wagnerian--
especially that of the second act, which because it calls up scenes
from the "Meistersinger" must also necessarily call up music from
the same comedy. But there is little cause here for quarrel with
Professor Humperdinck. He has applied the poetical principle of
Wagner to the fairy tale which is so closely related to the myth,
and he has with equal consistency applied Wagner's constructive
methods musically and dramatically. It is to his great honor that,
of all of Wagner's successors, he has been the only one to do so
successfully.

The story of "Konigskinder," though it belongs to the class of
fairy tales of which "Hansel und Gretel" is so striking and
beautiful an example, is not to be found as the author presents it
in the literature of German Marchen. Mme. Bernstein has drawn its
elements from many sources and blended them with the utmost
freedom. To avoid a misunderstanding Germans will insist that the
title be used without the article, for "Die Konigskinder" or "Zwei
Konigskinder" both suggest the simple German form of the old tale
of Hero and Leander, with which story, of course, it has nothing
whatever to do. But if literary criticism forbids association
between Humperdinck's two operas, musical criticism compels it.
Many of the characters in the operas are close relations,
dramatically as well as musically--the royal children themselves,
the witches, of course, and the broom-makers. The rest of the
characters have been taken from Wagner's "Meistersinger" picture
book; the citizens of Hellabrunn are Nuremberg's burghers, the
city's' councillors, the old master singers. The musical idiom is
Humperdinck's, though its method of employment is Wagner's. But
here lies its charm: Though the composer hews to a theoretical
line, he does it freely, naturally, easily, and always with the
principle of musical beauty as well as that of dramatic
truthfulness and propriety in view. His people's voices float on a
symphonic stream, but the voices of the instruments, while they
sing on in endless melody, use the idiom which nature gave them.
There is admirable characterization in the orchestral music, but it
is music for all that; it never descends to mere noise, designed to
keep up an irritation of the nerves.




CHAPTER XV

"BORIS GODOUNOFF"


From whatever point of view it may be considered Mossourgsky's
opera "Boris Godounoff" is an extraordinary work. It was brought to
the notice of the people of the United States by a first
performance at the Metropolitan Opera House, in New York, on March
19, 1913, but intelligence concerning its character had come to
observers of musical doings abroad by reports touching performances
in Paris and London. It is possible, even likely, that at all the
performances of the work outside of Russia those who listened to it
with the least amount of intellectual sophistication derived the
greatest pleasure from it, though to them its artistic deficiencies
must also have been most obvious. Against these deficiencies,
however, it presented itself, first of all, as a historical play
shot through and through with a large theme, which, since it
belongs to tragedy, is universal and unhampered by time or place or
people. To them it had something of the sweep, dignity, and
solemnity and also something of the dramatic incongruity and lack
of cohesion of a Shakespearian drama as contradistinguished from
the coherence of purpose and manner of a modern drama.

To them also it had much strangeness of style, a style which was
not easily reconciled to anything with which the modern stage had
made them familiar. They saw and heard the chorus enter into the
action, not for the purpose of spectacular pageantry, nor as
hymners of the achievements of the principal actors in the story,
but as participants. They heard unwonted accents from these actors
and saw them behave in conduct which from moment to moment appeared
strangely contradictory. There were mutterings of popular
discontent, which, under threats, gave way to jubilant acclamation
in the first great scenes in the beginning of the opera. There were
alternate mockeries and adulations in the next scene in which the
people figured; and running through other scenes from invisible
singers came ecclesiastical chants, against which were projected,
not operatic song in the old conception, but long passages of
heightened speech, half declamatory, half musical. A multitude
cringed before upraised knouts and fell on its knees before the
approach of a man whose agents swung the knotted cords; anon they
acclaimed the man who sought to usurp a throne and overwhelmed with
ridicule a village imbecile, who was yet supposed because of his
mental weakness to be possessed of miraculous prescience, and
therefore to have a prevision of what was to follow the usurpation.
They saw the incidents of the drama moving past their eyes within a
framework of barbaric splendor typical of a wonderful political
past, an amazing political present, and possibly prophetic of a
still more amazing political future.

These happily ingenuous spectators saw an historical personage
racked by conscience, nerve-torn by spectres, obsessed by
superstitions, strong in position achieved, yet pathetically sweet
and moving in his exhibition of paternal love, and going to
destruction through remorse for crime committed. They were troubled
by no curious questionings as to the accuracy of the historical
representation. The Boris Godounoff before them was a remorse-
stricken regicide, whose good works, if he did any, had to be
summed up for their imagination in the fact that he loved his son.
In all this, and also in some of its music, the new opera was of
the opera operatic. But to the unhappily disingenuous (or perhaps
it would be better to say, to the instructed) there was much more
in the new opera; and it was this more which so often gave judgment
pause, even while it stimulated interest and irritated curiosity.
It was a pity that a recent extraordinary outburst of enthusiasm
about a composer and an opera should have had the effect of
distorting their vision and disturbing their judgment.

There was a reason to be suspicious touching this enthusiasm,
because of its origin. It came from France and not from the home
land of the author of the play or the composer of the music.
Moreover, it was largely based upon an element which has as little
genuineness in France as a basis of judgment (and which must
therefore be set down largely as an affectation) as in America.
Loud hallelujahs have been raised in praise of Moussorgsky because,
discarding conventional law, he vitalized the music of the lyric
poem and also the dramatic line, by making it the emotional
flowering of the spoken word. When it became necessary for the
precious inner brotherhood of Frenchmen who hold burning incense
sticks under each others' noses to acclaim "Pelleas et Melisande"
as a new and beautiful thing in dramatic music, it was announced
that Moussorgsky was like Debussy in that he had demonstrated in
his songs and his operas that vocal melody should and could be
written in accordance with the rhythm and accents of the words. We
had supposed that we had learned that lesson not only from Gluck
and Wagner, but from every true musical dramatist that ever lived!
And when the Frenchmen (and their feeble echoers in England and
America) began to cry out that the world make obeisance to
Moussorgsky on that score, there was no wonder that those whose
eagerness to enjoy led them to absorb too much information should
ask how this marvellous psychical assonance between word and tone
was to be conveyed to their unfortunate sense and feeling after the
original Russian word had been transmogrified into French or
English. In New York the opera, which we know to be saturated in
some respects with Muscovitism, or Slavicism, and which we have
every reason to believe is also so saturated in its musico-verbal
essence, was sung in Italian. With the change some of the character
that ought to make it dear to the Russian heart must have
evaporated. It is even likely that vigorous English would have been
a better vehicle than the "soft, bastard Latin" for the forceful
utterances of the operatic people.

It is a pity that a suspicion of disingenuousness and affectation
should force itself upon one's thoughts in connection with the
French enthusiasm over Moussorgsky; but it cannot be avoided. So
far as Moussorgsky reflects anything in his art, it is realism or
naturalism, and the latter element is not dominant in French music
now, and is not likely to be so long as the present tendency toward
sublimated subjectivism prevails. Debussy acclaimed Moussorgsky
enthusiastically a dozen years ago, but for all that Moussorgsky
and Debussy are antipodes in art--they represent extremes.

It is much more likely that outside of its purely literary aspect
(a large aspect in every respect in. France) the Moussorgsky cult
of the last few years was a mere outgrowth of the political
affiliation between France and Russia; as such it may be looked
upon in the same light as the sudden appreciation of Berlioz which
was a product of the Chauvinism which followed the Franco-Prussian
War. It is easy even for young people of the day in which I write
to remember when a Wagner opera at the Academie Nationale raised a
riot, and when the dances at the Moulin Rouge and such places could
not begin until the band had played the Russian national hymn.

Were it not for considerations of this sort it would be surprising
to contemplate the fact that Moussorgsky has been more written and
talked about in France than he was in his native Russia, and that
even his friend Rimsky-Korsakoff, to whose revision of the score
"Boris Godounoff" owes its continued existence, has been subjected
to much rude criticism because of his work, though we can only
think of it as taken up in a spirit of affection and admiration. He
and the Russians, with scarcely an exception, say that his labors
were in the line of purification and rectification; but the modern
extremists will have it that by remedying its crudities of
harmonization and instrumentation he weakened it--that what he
thought its artistic blemishes were its virtues. Of that we are in
no position to speak, nor ought any one be rash enough to make the
proclamation until the original score is published, and then only a
Russian or a musician familiar with the Russian tongue and its
genius. The production of the opera outside of Russia and in a
foreign language ought to furnish an occasion to demand a stay of
the artistic cant which is all too common just now in every
country.

We are told that "Boris Godounoff" is the first real Russian opera
that America has ever heard. In a sense that may be true. The
present generation has heard little operatic music by Russian
composers. Rubinstein's "Nero" was not Russian music in any
respect. "Pique Dame," by Tschaikowsky, also performed at the
Metropolitan Opera House, had little in it that could be recognized
as characteristically Russian. "Eugene Onegin" we know only from
concert performances, and its Muscovitism was a negligible
quantity. The excerpts from other Russian operas have been few and
they demonstrated nothing, though in an intermezzo from
Tschaikowsky's "Mazeppa," descriptive of the battle of Poltava,
which has been heard here, we met with the strong choral tune which
gives great animation to the most stirring scene in "Boris"--the
acclamation of the Czar by the populace in the first act. Of this
something more presently. There were American representations,
however, of a Russian opera which in its day was more popular than
"Boris" has ever been; but that was so long ago that all memories
of it have died, and even the records are difficult to reach. Some
fifty years ago a Russian company came to these shores and
performed Verstoffsky's "Askold's Tomb," an opera which was
republished as late as 1897 and which within the first twenty-five
years of its existence had 400 performances in Moscow and 200 in
St. Petersburg. Some venturesome critics have hailed Verstoffsky as
even more distinctively a predecessor of Moussorgsky than Glinka;
but the clamor of those who are preaching loudly that art must not
exist for art's sake, and that the ugly is justified by the beauty
of ugliness, has silenced the voices of these critical historians.

This may thus far have seemed a long and discursive disquisition on
the significance of the new opera; but the questions to which the
production of "Boris Godounoff" give rise are many and grave,
especially in the present state of our operatic activities. They
have a strong bearing on the problem of nationalism in opera, of
which those in charge of our operatic affairs appear to take a
careless view. Aside from all aesthetic questions, "Boris
Godounoff" bears heavily on that problem. It is a work crude and
fragmentary in structure, but it is tremendously puissant in its
preachment of nationalism; and it is strong there not so much
because of its story and the splendid barbarism of its external
integument as because of its nationalism, which is proclaimed in
the use of Russian folk-song. All previous experiments in this line
become insignificant in comparison with it, and it is questionable
if any other body of folk-song offers such an opportunity to the
operatic composer as does the Russian. The hero of the opera is in
dramatic stature (or at least in emotional content) a Macbeth or a
Richard III; his utterances are frequently poignant and heart
searching in the extreme; his dramatic portrayal by M. Chaliapine
in Europe and Mr. Didur in America is so gripping as to call up
memories of some of the great English tragedians of the past. But
we cannot speak of the psychology of the musical setting of his
words because we have been warned that it roots deeply in the
accents and inflections of a language with which we are unfamiliar
and which was not used in the performance. But the music of the
choral masses, the songs sung in the intimacy of the Czar Boris's
household, the chants of the monks, needed not to be strange to any
student of folk-song, nor could their puissance be lost upon the
musically unlettered. In the old Kolyada Song "Slava" [Footnote:
Lovers of chamber music know this melody from its use in the
allegretto in Beethoven's E minor Quartet dedicated to Count
Rasoumowski, where it appears thus:--] with which Boris is greeted
by the populace, as well as in the wild shoutings of the Polish
vagrom men and women in the scene before the last, it is impossible
not to hear an out-pouring of that spirit of which Tolstoi wrote:
"In it is yearning without end, without hope; also power
invincible, the fateful stamp of destiny, iron preordination, one
of the fundamental principles of our nationality with which it is
possible to explain much that in Russian life seems
incomprehensible."

No other people have such a treasure of folk-song to draw on as
that thus characterized, and it is not likely that any other people
will develop a national school of opera on the lines which lie open
to the Russian composer, and which the Russian composer has been
encouraged to exploit by his government for the last twenty years
or more.

It is possible that some critics, actuated by political rather than
artistic considerations, will find reasons

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

for the present condition of Moussorgsky's score in the attitude of
the Russian government. It is said that court intrigues had much to
do with the many changes which the score had to undergo before it
became entirely acceptable to the powers that be in the Czar's
empire. Possibly. But every change which has come under the notice
of this reviewer has been to its betterment and made for its
practical presentation. It is said that the popular scenes were
curtailed because they represented the voice of the democracy. But
there is still so much choral work in the opera that the judgment
of the operatic audiences of to-day is likely to pronounce against
it measurably on that account. For, splendid as the choral element
in the work is, a chorus is not looked upon with admiration as a
dramatic element by the ordinary opera lover. There was a lack of
the feminine element in the opera, and to remedy this Moussorgsky
had to introduce the Polish bride of the False Dmitri and give the
pair a love scene, and incidentally a polonaise; but the love scene
is uninteresting until its concluding measures, and these are too
Meyerbeerian to call for comment beyond the fact that Meyerbeer,
the much contemned, would have done better. As for the polonaise,
Tschaikowsky has written a more brilliant one for his "Eugene
Onegin."

The various scores of the opera which have been printed show that
Moussorgsky, with all his genius, was at sea even when it came to
applying the principles of the Young Russian School, of which he is
set down as a strong prop, to dramatic composition. With all his
additions, emendations, and rearrangements, his opera still falls
much short of being a dramatic unit. It is a more loosely connected
series of scenes, from the drama of Boris Godounoff and the false
Dmitri, than Boito's "Mefistofele" is of Goethe's "Faust." Had he
had his own way the opera would have ended with the scene in which
Dmitri proceeds to Moscow amid the huzzas of a horde of Polish
vagabonds, and we should have had neither a Boris nor a Dmitri
opera, despite the splendid opportunities offered by both
characters. It was made a Boris opera by bringing it to an end with
the death of Boris and leaving everything except the scenes in
which the Czar declines the imperial crown, then accepts it, and
finally dies of a tortured conscience, to serve simply as
intermezzi, in which for the moment the tide of tragedy is turned
aside. This and the glimpse into the paternal heart of the Czar is
the only and beautiful purpose of the domestic scene, in which the
lighter and more cheerful element of Russian folk-song is
introduced.

At the first American performance of "Boris Godounoff" the cast was
as follows:--

Boris.....................................Adamo Didur
Theodore....................................Anna Case
Xenia..................................Lenora Sparkes
The Nurse...............................Maria Duchene
Marina...................................Louise Homer
Schouisky.................................Angelo Bada
Tchelkaloff......................Vincenzo Reschiglian
Pimenn...................................Leon Rothier
Dmitri......................Paul Althouse (his debut)
Varlaam....................... ....Andrea de Segurola
Missail............................... Pietro Audisio
The Innkeeper........................ Jeanne Maubourg
The Simpleton............................Albert Reiss
A Police Officer.........................Giulio Rossi
A Court Officer..................... Leopoldo Mariani
Lovitzky...............................V. Reschiglian
Tcerniakowsky, Two Jesuits............ Louis Kreidler

Conductor: Arturo Toscanini




CHAPTER XVI

"MADAME SANS-GENE" AND OTHER OPERAS BY GIORDANO


The opera-goers of New York enjoyed a novel experience when
Giordano's "Madame Sans-Gene" had its first performance on any
stage in their presence at the Metropolitan Opera House on January
25, 1915. It was the first time that a royal and imperial personage
who may be said to live freshly and vividly in the minds of the
people of this generation as well as in their imaginations appeared
before them to sing his thoughts and feelings in operatic fashion.
At first blush it seemed as if a singing Bonaparte was better
calculated to stir their risibilities than their interest or
sympathies; and this may, indeed, have been the case; but at any
rate they had an opportunity to make the acquaintance of Napoleon
before he rose to imperial estate. But, in all seriousness, it is
easier to imagine the figure which William II of Germany would cut
on the operatic stage than the "grand, gloomy, and peculiar"
Corsican. The royal people with whom the operatic public is
familiar as a rule are sufficiently surrounded by the mists of
antiquity and obscurity that the contemplation of them arouse
little thought of the incongruity which their appearance as
operatic heroes ought to create. Henry the Fowler in "Lohengrin,"
Mark in "Tristan und Isolde," the unnumbered Pharaoh in "Aida,"
Herod in "Salome" and "Herodiade," and the few other kings, if
there are any more with whom the present generation of opera-goers
have a personal acquaintance, so to speak, are more or less merely
poetical creations whom we seldom if ever think of in connection
with veritable history. Even Boris Godounoff is to us more a
picture out of a book, like the Macbeth whom he so strongly
resembles from a theatrical point of view, than the monarch who had
a large part in the making of the Russian people. The Roman
censorship prevented us long ago from making the acquaintance of
the Gustavus of Sweden whom Ankerstrom stabbed to death at a masked
ball, by transmogrifying him into the absurdly impossible figure of
a Governor of Boston; and the Claudius of Ambroise Thomas's opera
is as much a ghost as Hamlet's father, while Debussy's blind King
is as much an abstraction as is Melisande herself.

Operatic dukes we know in plenty, though most of them have come out
of the pages of romance and are more or less acceptable according
to the vocal ability of their representatives. When Caruso sings
"La donna e mobile" we care little for the profligacy of Verdi's
Duke of Mantua and do not inquire whether or not such an individual
ever lived. Moussorgsky's Czar Boris ought to interest us more,
however. The great bell-tower in the Kremlin which he built, and
the great bell--a shattered monument of one of his futile
ambitions--have been seen by thousands of travellers who never took
the trouble to learn that the tyrant who had the bell cast laid a
serfdom upon the Russian people which endured down to our day.
Boris, by the way, picturesque and dramatic figure that he is as
presented to us in history, never got upon the operatic stage until
Moussorgsky took him in hand. Two hundred years ago a great German
musician, Mattheson, as much scholar as composer if not more, set
him to music, but the opera was never performed. Peter the Great,
who came a century after Boris, lived a life more calculated to
invite the attention of opera writers, but even he escaped the
clutches of dramatic composers except Lortzing, who took advantage
of the romantic episode of Peter's service as ship carpenter in
Holland to make him the hero of one of the most sparkling of German
comic operas. Lortzing had a successor in the Irishman T. S. Cooke,
but his opera found its way into the limbo of forgotten things more
than a generation ago, while Lortzing's still lives on the stage of
Germany. Peter deserved to be celebrated in music, for it was in
his reign that polyphonic music, albeit of the Italian order, was
introduced into the Russian church and modern instrumental music
effected an entrance into his empire. But I doubt if Peter was
sincerely musical; in his youth he heard only music of the rudest
kind. He was partial to the bagpipes and, like Nero, played upon
that instrument.

To come back to Bonaparte and music. "Madame Sans-Gene" is an
operatic version of the drama which Sardou developed out of a
little one-act play dealing with a partly fictitious, partly
historical story in which Napoleon, his marshal Lefebvre, and a
laundress were the principal figures. Whether or not the great
Corsican could be justified as a character in a lyric drama was a
mooted question when Giordano conceived the idea of making an opera
out of the play. It is said that Verdi remarked something to the
effect that the question depended upon what he would be called upon
to sing, and how he would be expected to sing it. The problem was
really not a very large or difficult one, for all great people are
turned into marionettes when transformed into operatic heroes.

In the palmy days of bel canto no one would have raised the
question at all, for then the greatest characters in history moved
about the stage in stately robes and sang conventional arias in the
conventional manner. The change from old-fashioned opera to
regenerated lyric drama might have simplified the problem for
Giordano, even if his librettist had not already done so by
reducing Napoleon to his lowest terms from a dramatic as well as
historical point of view. The heroes of eighteenth-century opera
were generally feeble-minded lovers and nothing more; Giordano's
Napoleon is only a jealous husband who helps out in the denouement
of a play which is concerned chiefly with other people.

In turning Sardou's dramatic personages into operatic puppets a
great deal of bloodletting was necessary and a great deal of the
characteristic charm of the comedy was lost, especially in the
cases of Madame Sans-Gene herself and Napoleon's sister; but enough
was left to make a practicable opera. There were the pictures of
all the plebeians who became great folk later concerned in the
historical incidents which lifted them up. There were also the
contrasted pictures which resulted from the great transformation,
and it was also the ingratiating incident of the devotion of
Lefebvre to the stout-hearted, honest little woman of the people
who had to try to be a duchess. All this was fair operatic
material, though music has a strange capacity for refining stage
characters as well as for making them colorless. Giordano could not
do himself justice as a composer without refining the expression of
Caterina Huebscher, and so his Duchess of Dantzic talks a musical
language at least which Sardou's washerwoman could not talk and
remain within the dramatic verities. Therefore we have "Madame
Sans-Gene" with a difference, but not one that gave any more
offence than operatic treatment of other fine plays have accustomed
us to.

To dispose of the artistic merits of the opera as briefly as
possible, it may be said that in more ways than one Giordano has in
this work harked back to "Andrea Chenier," the first of his operas
which had a hearing in America. The parallel extends to some of the
political elements of the book as well as its musical investiture
with its echoes of the popular airs of the period of the French
Revolution. The style of writing is also there, though applied,
possibly, with more mature and refined skill. I cannot say with as
much ingenuousness and freshness of invention, however. Its spirit
in the first act, and largely in the second, is that of the opera
bouffe, but there are many pages of "Madame Sans-Gene" which I
would gladly exchange for any one of the melodies of Lecocq, let us
say in "La Fille de Mme. Angot." Like all good French music which
uses and imitates them, it is full of crisp rhythms largely
developed from the old dances which, originally innocent, were
degraded to base uses by the sans-culottes; and so there is an
abundance of life and energy in the score though little of the
distinction, elegance, and grace that have always been
characteristic of French music, whether high-born or low. The best
melody in the modern Italian vein flows in the second act when the
genuine affection and fidelity of Caterina find expression and
where a light touch is combined with considerable warmth of feeling
and a delightful daintiness of orchestral color. Much of this is
out of harmony with the fundamental character of Sardou's woman,
but music cannot deny its nature. Only a Moussorgsky could make a
drunken monk talk truthfully in music.

If Giordano's opera failed to make a profound impression on the New
York public, it was not because that public had not had opportunity
to learn the quality of his music. His "Andrea Chenier" had been
produced at the Academy of Music as long before as November 13,
1896. With it the redoubtable Colonel Mapleson went down to his
destruction in America. It was one of the many strange incidents in
the career of Mr. Oscar Hammerstein as I have related them in my
book entitled "Chapters of Opera" [Footnote: New York, Henry Holt &
Co.] that it should have been brought back by him twelve years
later for a single performance at the Manhattan Opera House. In the
season of 1916-1917 it was incorporated in the repertory of the
Boston-National Opera Company and carried to the principal cities
of the country. On December 16, 1906, Mr. Heinrich Conried thought
that the peculiar charms of Madame Cavalieri, combined with the
popularity of Signor Caruso, might give habitation to Giordano's
setting of an opera book made out of Sardou's "Fedora"; but it
endured for only four performances in the season of 1906-1907 and
three in the next, in which Conried's career came to an end. In
reviving "Andrea Chenier" Mr. Hammerstein may have had visions of
future triumphs for its composer, for a few weeks before (on
February 5, 1908) he had brought forward the same composer's
"Siberia," which gave some promise of life, though it died with the
season that saw its birth.

The critical mind seems disposed to look with kindness upon new
works in proportion as they fall back in the corridors of memory;
and so I am inclined to think that of the four operas by Giordano
which I have heard "Andrea Chenier" gives greatest promise of a
long life. The attempt to put music to "Fedora" seemed to me
utterly futile. Only those moments were musical in the accepted
sense of the word when the action of the drama ceased, as in the
case of the intermezzo, or when the old principles of operatic
construction waked into life again as in the confession of the
hero-lover. Here, moreover, there comes into the score an element
of novelty, for the confession is extorted from Lorris while a
virtuoso is entertaining a drawing-roomful of people with a set
pianoforte solo. As for the rest of the opera, it seems sadly
deficient in melody beautiful either in itself or as an expression
of passion. "Andrea Chenier" has more to commend it. To start with,
there is a good play back of it, though the verities of history
were not permitted to hamper the imagination of Signor Illica, the
author of the book. The hero of the opera is the patriotic poet who
fell under the guillotine in 1794 at the age of thirty-two. The
place which Saint-Beuve gave him in French letters is that of the
greatest writer of classic verse after Racine and Boileau. The
operatic story is all fiction, more so, indeed, than that of
"Madame Sans-Gene." As a matter of fact, the veritable Chenier was
thrown into prison on the accusation of having sheltered a
political criminal, and was beheaded together with twenty-three
others on a charge of having engaged in a conspiracy while in
prison. In the opera he does not die for political reasons, though
they are alleged as a pretext, but because he has crossed the love-
path of a leader of the revolution.

When Giordano composed "Siberia," he followed the example of
Mascagni and Puccini (if he did not set the example for them) by
seeking local color and melodic material in the folk-songs of the
country in which his scene was laid. Puccini went to Japan for
musical ideas and devices to trick out his "Madama Butterfly" as
Mascagni had done in "Iris." Giordano, illustrating a story of
political oppression in "Siberia," called in the aid of Russian
melodies. His exiles sing the heavy-hearted measures of the
bargemen of the Volga, "Ay ouchnem," the forceful charm of which
few Russian composers have been able to resist. He introduced also
strains of Easter music from the Greek church, the popular song
known among the Germans as "Schone Minka" and the "Glory" song
(Slava) which Moussorgsky had forged into a choral thunderbolt in
his "Boris Godounoff." It is a stranger coincidence that the
"Slava" melody should have cropped up in the operas of Giordano and
Moussorgsky than that the same revolutionary airs should pepper the
pages of "Madame Sans-Gene" and "Andrea Chenier." These operas are
allied in subject and period and the same style of composition is
followed in both.

Chenier goes to his death in the opera to the tune of the
"Marseillaise" and the men march past the windows of Caterina
Huebscher's laundry singing the refrain of Roget de Lisle's hymn.
But Giordano does not make extensive use of the tune in "Madame
Sans-Gene." It appears literally at the place mentioned and surges
up with fine effect in a speech in which the Duchess of Dantzic
overwhelms the proud sisters of Napoleon; but that is practically
all. The case is different with two other revolutionary airs. The
first crash of the orchestra launches us into "La Carmagnole,"
whose melody provides the thematic orchestral substratum for nearly
the entire first scene. It is an innocent enough tune, differing
little from hundreds of French vaudeville melodies of its period,
but Giordano injects vitriol into its veins by his harmonies and
orchestration. With all its innocence this was the tune which came
from the raucous throats of politically crazed men and women while
noble heads tumbled into the bloody sawdust, while the spoils of
the churches were carried into the National Convention in 1793, and
to which "several members, quitting their curule chairs, took the
hands of girls flaunting in priests' vestures" and danced a wild
rout, as did other mad wretches when a dancer was worshipped as the
Goddess of Reason in the Cathedral of Notre Dame.

Caterina's account of the rude familiarity with which she is
treated by the soldiery (I must assume a knowledge of Sardou's play
which the opera follows) is set to a melody of a Russian folk-song
cast in the treatment of which Russian influences may also be felt;
but with the first shouts of the mob attacking the Tuileries in the
distance the characteristic rhythmical motif of the "Ca ira" is
heard muttering in the basses. Again a harmless tune which in its
time was perverted to a horrible use; a lively little contradance
which graced many a cotillion in its early days, but which was
roared and howled by the mob as it carried the beauteous head of
the Lamballe through the streets of Paris on a pike and thrust it
almost into the face of Marie Antoinette.

Of such material and a pretty little dance ("La Fricassee") is the
music of the first act, punctuated by cannon shots, made. It is all
rhythmically stirring, it flows spiritedly, energetically along
with the current of the play, never retarding it for a moment, but,
unhappily, never sweetening it with a grain of pretty sentiment or
adorning it with a really graceful contour. There is some
graciousness in the court scene, some archness and humor in the
scene in which the Duchess of Dantzic submits to the adornment of
her person, some dramatically strong declamation in the speeches of
Napoleon, some simulation of passion in the love passages of
Lefebvre and of Neipperg; but as a rule the melodic flood never
reaches high tide.




CHAPTER XVII

TWO OPERAS BY WOLF-FERRARI


When the operas of Ermanno Wolf-Ferrari came to America (his
beautiful setting of the "Vita Nuova" was already quite widely
known at the time), it was thought singular and somewhat
significant that though the operas had all been composed to Italian
texts they should have their first Italian performances in this
country. This was the case with "Le Donne Curiose," heard at the
Metropolitan Opera House, New York, on January 3, 1912; of "Il
Segreto di Susanna," which the Chicago-Philadelphia Opera Company
brought to New York after giving it a hearing in its home cities,
in February, 1912; of "I Giojelli della Madonna" first produced in
Berlin in December, 1911, and in Chicago a few weeks later. A
fourth opera, "L'Amore Medico," had its first representation at the
Metropolitan Opera House, New York, on March 25, 1914.

The circumstance to which I have alluded as worthy of comment was
due, I fancy, more to the business methods of modern publishers
than to a want of appreciation of the operas in Italy, though

[figure: a musical score excerpt]

A page of the Score of the German "Donne Curiose" Signor Wolf-
Ferrari sought to meet the taste of his countrymen (assuming that
the son of a German father and a Venetian mother is to be set down
as an Italian) when he betrayed the true bent of his genius and
sought to join the ranks of the Italian veritists in his "Giojelli
della Madonna." However, that is not the question I am desirous to
discuss just now when the first impressions of "Le Donne Curiose"
come flocking back to my memory. The book is a paraphrase of
Goldoni's comedy of the same name, made (and very deftly made) for
the composer by Count Luigi Sugana. It turns on the curiosity of a
group of women concerning the doings of their husbands and
sweethearts at a club from which they are excluded. The action is
merely a series of incidents in which the women (the wives by
rifling the pockets of their husbands, the maidens by wheedling,
cajoling, and playing upon the feelings of their sweethearts)
obtain the keys of the club-room, and effect an entrance only to
find that instead of gambling, harboring mistresses, seeking the
philosopher's stone, or digging for treasure, as is variously
suspected, the men are enjoying an innocent supper. In their
eagerness to see all that is going on, the women betray their
presence. Then there follow scoldings, contrition, forgiveness, a
graceful minuet, and the merriment runs out in a wild furlana.

Book and score of the opera hark back a century or more in their
methods of expression. The incidents of the old comedy are as
loosely strung together as those of "Le Nozze di Figaro," and the
parallel is carried further by the similarity between the
instrumental apparatus of Mozart and Wolf-Ferrari and the
dependence of both on melody, rather than orchestral or harmonic
device, as the life-blood of the music upon which the comedy
floats. It is Mozart's orchestra that the modern composer uses
("the only proper orchestra for comedy," as Berlioz said),
eschewing even those "epical instruments," the trombones. It would
not do to push the parallel too far, though a keen listener might
feel tempted also to see a point of semblance in the Teutonism
which tinctures the Italian music of both men; a Teutonism which
adds an ingredient more to the taste of other peoples than that of
the people whose language is employed. But while the Italianism of
Mozart was wholly the product of the art-spirit of his time, the
Teutonism of Wolf-Ferrari is a heritage from his German father and
its Italianism partakes somewhat of the nature of a reversion to
old ideals from which even his mother's countrymen have departed.
There is an almost amusing illustration of this in the paraphrase
of Goldoni's comedy which the composer took as a libretto. The
Leporello of Da Ponte and Mozart has his prototype in the
Arlecchino of the classic Italian comedy, but he has had to submit
to so great a metamorphosis as to make him scarcely recognizable.
But in the modern "Donne Curiose" we have not only the old figure
down to his conventional dress and antics, but also his companions
Pantaloon and Columbine. All this, however, may be better enjoyed
by those who observe them in the representation than those who will
only read about them, no matter how deftly the analysis may be
made.

It is Mozart's media and Mozart's style which Wolf-Ferrari adopts,
but there are traces also of the idioms of others who have been
universal musicians rather than specifically Italian. Like
Nicolai's "O susse Anna!" (Shakespeare's "Oh, Sweet Anne Page"),
Wolf-Ferrari's Florindo breathes out his languishing "Ah, Rosaura!"
And in the lively chatter of the women there is frequently more
than a suggestion of the lively gossip of Verdi's merry wives in
his incomparable "Falstaff." Wolf-Ferrari is neither a Mozart nor a
Verdi, not even a Nicolai, as a melodist, but he is worthy of being
bracketed with them, because as frankly as they he has spoken the
musical language which to him seemed a proper investiture of his
comedy, and like them has made that language characteristic of the
comedy's personages and illustrative of its incidents. He has been
brave enough not to fear being called a reactionary, knowing that
there is always progress in the successful pursuit of beauty.

The advocates of opera sung in the language native to the hearers
may find an eloquent argument in "Le Donne Curiose," much of whose
humor lies in the text and is lost to those who cannot understand
it despite the obviousness of its farcical action. On the other
hand, a feeling of gratitude must have been felt by many others
that they were not compelled to hear the awkward commonplaces of
the English translation of the libretto. The German version, in
which the opera had its first hearing in Munich six years before,
is in a vastly different case--neither uncouth nor halting, even
though it lacks the characteristic fluency essential to Italian
opera buffa; yet no more than did the speech of most of the singers
at the Metropolitan performance. The ripple and rattle of the
Italian parlando seem to be possible only to Italian tongues.

The Mozartian type of music is illustrated not only in the
character of many of its melodies, but also in the use of motivi in
what may be called the dramatic portions--the fleet flood upon
which the dialogue dances with a light buoyancy that is
delightfully refreshing. These motivi are not used in the Wagnerian
manner, but as every change of situation or emotion is
characterized in Mozart's marvellous ensembles by the introduction
of a new musical idea, so they are in his modern disciple's. All of
them are finely characteristic, none more so than the comical
cackle so often heard from the oboe in the scenes wherein the women
gossip about the imaginary doings of the men--an intentional echo,
it would almost seem, of the theme out of which Rameau made his
dainty harpsichord piece known as "La Poule." The motto of the
club,

"Bandie xe le done," is frequently proclaimed with more or less
pomposity; Florindo's "Ah, Rosaura," with its dramatic descent,
lends sentimental feeling to the love music, and the sprightly
rhythm which accompanies the pranks of Colombina keeps much of the
music bubbling with merriment. In the beginning of the third act,
not only the instrumental introduction, but much of the delightful
music which follows, is permeated with atmosphere and local color
derived from a familiar Venetian barcarolle ("La biondina in
gondoleta"), but the musical loveliness reaches its climax in the
sentimental scenes--a quartet, a solo by Rosaura, and a duet, in
which there breathes the sympathetic spirit of Smetana as well as
Mozart.

[Footnote: The cast at the first performance at the Metropolitan
Opera House was as follows:--

Ottavio.................................Adamo Dfdur
Beatrice........................... Jeanne Maubourg
Rosaura............................Geraldine Farrar
Florindo......................... Hermann Jadlowker
Pantalone....................... Antonio Pini-Corso
Lelio............................... Antonio Scotti
Leandro................................ Angelo Bada
Colombina...............................Bella Alten
Eleonora................................Rita Fornia
Arlechino....................... Andrea de Segurola
Asdrubale........................... Pietro Audisio
Almoro.............................. Lambert Murphy
Alviso.......................... Charles Hargreaves
Lunardo....................... Vincenzo Reschiglian
Momolo............................... Paolo Ananian
Menego................................ Giulio Rossi
Un Servitore....................... Stefen Buckreus
Conductor--Arturo Toscanini.]

In "Le Donne Curiose," the gondoliers sing their barcarolle and
compel even the cynic of the drama to break out into an
enthusiastic exclamation: "Oh, beautiful Venice!" The world has
heard more of the natural beauties of Naples than of the artificial
ones of Venice, but when Naples is made the scene of a drama of any
kind it seems that its attractions for librettist and composer lie
in the vulgarity and vice, libertinism and lust, the wickedness and
wantonness, of a portion of its people rather than in the
loveliness of character which such a place might or ought to
inspire.

Perhaps it was not altogether surprising that when Wolf-Ferrari
turned from Venice and "Le Donne Curiose" to "I Giojelli della
Madonna" with Naples as a theatre for his drama he should not only
change the style of his music, but also revert to the kind of tale
which his predecessors in the field seem to have thought
appropriate to the place which we have been told all of us should
see once and die out of sheer ecstasy over its beauty. But why are
only the slums of Naples deemed appropriate for dramatic treatment?

How many stories of Neapolitan life have been told in operas since
Auber wrote his "La Muette di Portici" I do not know; doubtless
many whose existence ended with the stagione for which they were
composed. But it is a singular fact bearing on the present
discussion that when the young "veritists" of Italy broke loose
after the success of Mascagni's "Cavalleria rusticana" there came
almost a universal desire to rush to the Neapolitan shambles for
subjects. New York has been spared all of these operas which I have
described in an earlier chapter of this book, except the delectable
"A Basso Porto" which Mr. Savage's company gave to us in English
sixteen years ago; but never since.

Whether or not Wolf-Ferrari got the subject of "I Giojelli della
Madonna" from the sources drawn on by his predecessors, I do not
know. I believe that, like Leoncavallo, he has said that the story
of his opera has a basis of fact. Be this as it may, it is certain
that the composer called on two versifiers to help him out in
making the book of the opera and that the story in its essence is
not far removed from that of the French opera "Aphrodite," by Baron
Erlanger. In that opera there is a rape of the adornments of a
statue of Venus; in Wolf-Ferrari's work of the jewels enriching an
effigy of the Virgin Mary. The story is not as filthy as the other
plots rehearsed elsewhere, but in it there is the same striving
after sharp ("piquant," some will say) contrasts, the blending of
things sacred and profane, the mixture of ecclesiastical music and
dances, and--what is most significant--the generous use of the
style of melody which came in with Ponchielli and his pupils. In "I
Giojelli della Madonna" a young woman discards the love of an
honest-hearted man to throw herself, out of sheer wantonness, into
the arms of a blackguard dandy. To win her heart through her love
of personal adornment the man of faithful mind (the suggestion
having come from his rival) does the desperate deed of stealing for
her the jewels of the Madonna. It is to be assumed that she rewards
him for the sacrilegious act, but without turning away from the
blackguard, to whom she grants a stolen interview during the time
when her true love is committing the crime. But even the vulgar and
wicked companions of the dandy, who is a leader among the
Camorristi, turn from her with horror when they discover the stolen
jewels around her neck, and she gives herself to death in the sea.
Then the poor lover, placing the jewels on the altar, invokes
forgiveness, and, seeing it in a ray of light which illumines them,
thrusts a dagger into his heart and dies at the feet of the effigy
of the goddess whom he had profaned.

The story would not take long in the telling were it not tricked
out with a multitude of incidents designed to illustrate the
popular life of Naples during a festival. Such things are old,
familiar, and unnecessary elements, in many cases not even
understood by the audience. But with them Signor Wolf-Ferrari
manages to introduce most successfully the atmosphere which he
preserves even throughout his tragical moments--the atmosphere of
Neapolitan life and feeling. The score is saturated with Neapolitan
folk-song. I say Neapolitan rather than Italian, because the mixed
population of Naples has introduced the elements which it would be
rash to define as always Italian, or even Latin. While doing this
the composer surrendered himself unreservedly and frankly to other
influences. That is one of the things which make him admirable in
the estimation of latter-day critics. In "Le Donne Curiose" he is
most lovingly frank in his companionship with Mozart. In "II
Segreto" there is a combination of all the styles that prevailed
from Mozart to Donizetti. In "I Giojelli" no attempt seems to have
been made by him to avoid comparison with the composer who has made
the most successful attempt at giving musical expression to a drama
which fifty years ago the most farsighted of critics would have set
down as too rapid of movement to admit of adequate musical
expression? Mascagni and his "Cavalleria rusticana," of course. But
I am tempted to say that the most marvellous faculty of Wolf-
Ferrari is to do all these things without sacrifice of his
individuality. He has gone further. In "La Vita Nuova" there is
again an entirely different man. Nothing in his operas seems half
so daring as everything in this cantata. How he could produce a
feeling of mediaevalism in the setting of Dante's sonnets and yet
make use of the most modern means of harmonization and
orchestration is still a mystery to this reviewer. Yet, having done
it long ago, he takes up the modern style of Italian melody and
blends it with the old church song, so that while you are made to
think one moment of Mascagni, you are set back a couple of
centuries by the cadences and harmonies of the hymns which find
their way into the merrymakings of the festa. But everything
appeals to the ear? nothing offends it, and for that, whatever our
philosophical notions, we ought to be grateful to the
melodiousness, the euphony, and the rich orchestration of the new
opera. [The performances of "I Giojelli della Madonna" by the
Chicago-Philadelphia Opera Company, as it was called in Chicago,
the Philadelphia-Chicago Opera Company, as it was called in
Philadelphia, were conducted by Cleofonte Campanini and the
principal parts were in the hands of Carolina White, Louisa Barat,
Amadeo Bassi, and Mario Sammarco.]









This eBook was produced by Tony Adam.




THE MERRY DEVILL OF EDMONTON


(DRAMATIS PERSONAE.)

Sir Arthur Clare.
Sir Richard Mounchensey.
Sir Ralph Jerningham.
Henry Clare.
Raymond Mounchensey.
Frank Jerningham.
Sir John [a Priest].
Banks [the Miller of Waltham].
Smug [the Smith of Edmonton].
Bilbo.
[Blague the] Host.
Brian.
[Raph, Brian's man.]
[Friar Hildersham.]
[Benedick.]
[Chamberlaine.]
[Coreb, a Spirit.]
Fabel [the Merry Devil].
Lady Clare.
Millisent.
Abbess.
Sexton.
Nuns and Attendants.


The Prologue.

Your silence and attention, worthy friends,
That your free spirits may with more pleasing sense
Relish the life of this our active scene:
To which intent, to calm this murmuring breath,
We ring this round with our invoking spells;
If that your listning ears be yet prepard
To entertain the subject of our play,
Lend us your patience.
Tis Peter Fabell, a renowned Scholler,
Whose fame hath still been hitherto forgot
By all the writers of this latter age.
In Middle-sex his birth and his abode,
Not full seven mile from this great famous City,
That, for his fame in sleights and magicke won,
Was calde the merry Friend of Emonton.
If any here make doubt of such a name,
In Edmonton yet fresh unto this day,
Fixt in the wall of that old antient Church,
His monument remayneth to be seen;
His memory yet in the mouths of men,
That whilst he lived he could deceive the Devill.
Imagine now that whilst he is retirde
From Cambridge back unto his native home,
Suppose the silent, sable visagde night
Casts her black curtain over all the World;
And whilst he sleeps within his silent bed,
Toiled with the studies of the passed day,
The very time and hour wherein that spirit
That many years attended his command,
And often times twixt Cambridge and that town
Had in a minute borne him through the air,
By composition twixt the fiend and him,
Comes now to claim the Scholler for his due.

[Draw the Curtains.]

Behold him here, laid on his restless couch,
His fatal chime prepared at his head,
His chamber guarded with these sable slights,
And by him stands that Necromanticke chair,
In which he makes his direfull invocations,
And binds the fiends that shall obey his will.
Sit with a pleased eye, until you know
The Commicke end of our sad Tragique show.

[Exit.]


INDUCTION.


[The Chime goes, in which time Fabell is oft seen to stare
about him, and hold up his hands.]

FABELL.
What means the tolling of this fatal chime?
O, what a trembling horror strikes my heart!
My stiffned hair stands upright on my head,
As do the bristles of a porcupine.

[Enter Coreb, a Spirit.]

COREB.
Fabell, awake, or I will bear thee hence
Headlong to hell.

FABELL.
Ha, ha,
Why dost thou wake me?  Coreb, is it thou?

COREB.
Tis I.

FABELL.
I know thee well:  I hear the watchful dogs
With hollow howling tell of thy approach;
The lights burn dim, affrighted with thy presence;
And this distemperd and tempestuous night
Tells me the air is troubled with some Devill.

COREB.
Come, art thou ready?

FABELL.
Whither? or to what?

COREB.
Why, Scholler, this the hour my date expires;
I must depart, and come to claim my due.

FABELL.
Hah, what is thy due?

COREB.
Fabell, thy self.

FABELL.
O, let not darkness hear thee speak that word,
Lest that with force it hurry hence amain,
And leave the world to look upon my woe:
Yet overwhelm me with this globe of earth,
And let a little sparrow with her bill
Take but so much as she can bear away,
That, every day thus losing of my load,
I may again in time yet hope to rise.

COREB.
Didst thou not write thy name in thine own blood,
And drewst the formall deed twixt thee and me,
And is it not recorded now in hell?

FABELL.
Why comst thou in this stern and horrid shape,
Not in familiar sort, as thou wast wont?

COREB.
Because the date of thy command is out,
And I am master of thy skill and thee.

FABELL.
Coreb, thou angry and impatient spirit,
I have earnest business for a private friend;
Reserve me, spirit, until some further time.

COREB.
I will not for the mines of all the earth.

FABELL.
Then let me rise, and ere I leave the world,
Dispatch some business that I have to do;
And in mean time repose thee in that chair.

COREB.
Fabell, I will.

[Sit down.]

FABELL.
O, that this soul, that cost so great a price
As the dear precious blood of her redeemer,
Inspired with knowledge, should by that alone
Which makes a man so mean unto the powers,
Even lead him down into the depth of hell,
When men in their own pride strive to know more
Then man should know!
For this alone God cast the Angels down.
The infinity of Arts is like a sea,
Into which, when man will take in hand to sail
Further then reason, which should be his pilot,
Hath skill to guide him, losing once his compass,
He falleth to such deep and dangerous whirl-pools
As he doth lose the very sight of heaven:
The more he strives to come to quiet harbor,
The further still he finds himself from land.
Man, striving still to find the depth of evil,
Seeking to be a God, becomes a Devil.

COREB.
Come, Fabell, hast thou done?

FABELL.
Yes, yes; come hither.

COREB.
Fabell, I cannot.

FABELL.
Cannot?--What ails your hollownes?

COREB.
Good Fabell, help me.

FABELL.
Alas, where lies your grief? Some Aqua-vitae!
The Devil's very sick, I fear he'll die,
For he looks very ill.

COREB.
Darst thou deride the minister of darkness?
In Lucifer's dread name Coreb conjures thee
To set him free.

FABELL.
I will not for the mines of all the earth,
Unless thou give me liberty to see
Seven years more, before thou seize on me.

COREB.
Fabell, I give it thee.

FABELL.
Swear, damned fiend.

COREB.
Unbind me, and by hell I will not touch thee,
Till seven years from this hour be full expired.

FABELL.
Enough, come out.

COREB.
A vengeance take thy art!
Live and convert all piety to evil:
Never did man thus over-reach the Devil.
No time on earth like Phaetontique flames
Can have perpetual being.  I'll return
To my infernall mansion; but be sure,
Thy seven years done, no trick shall make me tarry,
But, Coreb, thou to hell shalt Fabell carry.

[Exit.]

FABELL.
Then thus betwixt us two this variance ends,
Thou to thy fellow Fiends, I to my friends.

[Exit.]


ACT I.

SCENE I.  The George Inn, Waltham.


[Enter Sir Arthur Clare, Dorcas, his Lady, Milliscent, his
daughter, young Harry Clare; the men booted, the gentlewomen
in cloaks and safeguards.  Blague, the merry host of the
George, comes in with them.]

HOST.
Welcome, good knight, to the George at Waltham, my free-hold,
my tenements, goods and chattels.  Madam, here's a room is
the very Homer and Iliad of a lodging, it hath none of the
four elements in it; I built it out of the Center, and I
drink ne'er the less sack.  Welcome, my little waste of
maiden-heads!  What?  I serve the good Duke of Norfolk.

CLARE.
God a mercy, my good host Blague:
Thou hast a good seat here.

HOST.
Tis correspondent or so:  there's not a Tartarian nor a
Carrier shall breath upon your geldings; they have villainous
rank feet, the rogues, and they shall not sweat in my linen.
Knights and Lords too have been drunk in my house, I thank
the destinies.

HARRY.
Pre' thee, good sinful Innkeeper, will that corruption,
thine Ostler, look well to my gelding.  Hay, a pox a these
rushes!

HOST.
You Saint Dennis, your gelding shall walk without doors, and
cool his feet for his masters sake.  By the body of S. George,
I have an excellent intellect to go steal some venison: now,
when wast thou in the forest?

HARRY.
Away, you stale mess of white-broth!  Come hither, sister,
let me help you.

CLARE.
Mine Host, is not Sir Richard Mounchensey come yet, according
to our appointment, when we last dined here?

HOST.
The knight's not yet apparent.--Marry, here's a forerunner
that summons a parle, and saith, he'll be here top and top-
gallant presently.

CLARE.
Tis well, good mine host; go down, and see breakfast be
provided.

HOST.
Knight, thy breath hath the force of a woman, it takes me
down; I am for the baser element of the kitchen: I retire
like a valiant soldier, face point blank to the foe-man, or,
like a Courtier, that must not shew the Prince his posteriors;
vanish to know my canuasadoes, and my interrogatories, for I
serve the good Duke of Norfolk.

[Exit.]

CLARE.
How doth my Lady? are you not weary, Madam?
Come hither, I must talk in private with you;
My daughter Milliscent must not over-hear.

MILLISCENT.
Aye, whispring; pray God it tend my good!
Strange fear assails my heart, usurps my blood.

CLARE.
You know our meeting with the knight Mounchensey
Is to assure our daughter to his heir.

DORCAS.
Tis, without question.

CLARE.
Two tedious winters have past o'er, since first
These couple lov'd each other, and in passion
Glued first their naked hands with youthful moisture--
Just so long, on my knowledge.

DORCAS.
And what of this?

CLARE.
This morning should my daughter lose her name,
And to Mounchenseys house convey our arms,
Quartered within his scutcheon; th' affiance, made
Twist him and her, this morning should be sealed.

DORCAS.
I know it should.

CLARE.
But there are crosses, wife; here's one in Waltham,
Another at the Abbey, and the third
At Cheston; and tis ominous to pass
Any of these without a pater-noster.
Crosses of love still thwart this marriage,
Whilst that we two, like spirits, walk in night
About those stony and hard hearted plots.

MILLISCENT.
O God, what means my father?

CLARE.
For look you, wife, the riotous old knight
Hath o'rerun his annual revenue
In keeping jolly Christmas all the year:
The nostrils of his chimney are still stuft
With smoke, more chargeable then Cane-tobacco;
His hawks devour his fattest dogs, whilst simple,
His leanest curs eat him hounds carrion.
Besides, I heard of late, his younger brother,
A Turkey merchant, hath sure suck'de the knight
By means of some great losses on the sea,
That, you conceive me, before God all is naught,
His seat is weak: thus, each thing rightly scanned,
You'll se a flight, wife, shortly of his land.

MILLISCENT.
Treason to my hearts truest sovereign:
How soon is love smothered in foggy gain!

DORCAS.
But how shall we prevent this dangerous match?

CLARE.
I have a plot, a trick, and this is it-
Under this colour I'll break off the match:
I'll tell the knight that now my mind is changd
For marrying of my daughter, for I intend
To send her unto Cheston Nunry.

MILLISCENT.
O me accurst!

CLARE.
There to become a most religious Nun.

MILLISCENT.
I'll first be buried quick.

CLARE.
To spend her beauty in most private prayers.

MILLISCENT.
I'll sooner be a sinner in forsaking
Mother and father.

CLARE.
How dost like my plot?

DORCAS.
Exceeding well; but is it your intent
She shall continue there?

CLARE.
Continue there?  Ha, ha, that were a jest!
You know a virgin may continue there
A twelve month and a day only on trial.
There shall my daughter sojourn some three months,
And in mean time I'll compass a fair match
Twixt youthful Jerningham, the lusty heir
Of Sir Raph Jerningham, dwelling in the forest-
I think they'll both come hither with Mounchensey.

DORCAS.
Your care argues the love you bear our child;
I will subscribe to any thing you'll have me.

[Exeunt.]

MILLISCENT.
You will subscribe it! good, good, tis well;
Love hath two chairs of state, heaven and hell.
My dear Mounchensey, thou my death shalt rue,
Ere to my heart Milliscent prove untrue.

[Exit.]


SCENE II.  The same.

[Enter Blague.]


HOST.
Ostlers, you knaves and commanders, take the horses of the
knights and competitors: your honourable hulks have put into
harborough, they'll take in fresh water here, and I have
provided clean chamber-pots.  Via, they come!

[Enter Sir Richard Mounchesney, Sir Raph Jerningham, young
Frank Jerningham, Raymond Mounchesney, Peter Fabell, and
Bilbo.]

HOST.
The destinies be most neat Chamberlains to these swaggering
puritans, knights of the subsidy.

SIR MOUNCHESNEY.
God a mercy, good mine host.

SIR JERNINGHAM.
Thanks, good host Blague.

HOST.
Room for my case of pistolles, that have Greek and Latin
bullets in them; let me cling to your flanks, my nimble
Giberalters, and blow wind in your calves to make them swell
bigger.  Ha, I'll caper in mine own fee-simple; away with
puntillioes and Orthography!  I serve the good Duke of
Norfolk.  Bilbo, Titere tu, patulae recubans sub tegmine fagi.

BILBO.
Truly, mine host, Bilbo, though he be somewhat out of fashion,
will be your only blade still.  I have a villanous sharp
stomach to slice a breakfast.

HOST.
Thou shalt have it without any more discontinuance, releases,
or atturnement.  What! we know our terms of hunting and the
sea-card.

BILBO.
And do you serve the good duke of Norfolk still?

HOST.
Still, and still, and still, my souldier of S. Quintins:
come, follow me; I have Charles waine below in a but of sack,
t'will glister like your Crab-fish.

BILBO.
You have fine Scholler-like terms; your Coopers Dixionary is
your only book to study in a celler, a man shall find very
strange words in it.  Come, my host, let's serve the good
duke of Norfolk.

HOST.
And still, and still, and still, my boy, I'll serve the good
duke of Norfolk.

[Exeunt Host and Bilbo.]

[Enter Sir Arthur Clare, Harry Clare, and Milliscent.]

JERNINGHAM.
Good Sir Arthur Clare!

CLARE.
What Gentleman is that?  I know him not.

MOUNCHESNEY.
Tis Master Fabell, Sir, a Cambridge scholler,
My son's dear friend.

CLARE.
Sir, I intreat you know me.

FABELL.
Command me, sir; I am affected to you
For your Mounchensey's sake.

CLARE.
Alas, for him,
I not respect whether he sink or swim:
A word in private, Sir Raph Jerningham.

RAYMOND.
Me thinks your father looketh strangely on me:
Say, love, why are you sad?

MILLISCENT.
I am not, sweet;
Passion is strong, when woe with woe doth meet.

CLARE.
Shall's in to breakfast? after we'll conclude
The cause of this our coming:  in and feed,
And let that usher a more serious deed.

MILLISCENT.
Whilst you desire his grief, my heart shall bleed.

YOUNG JERNINGHAM.
Raymond Mounchesney, come, be frolick, friend,
This is the day thou hast expected long.

RAYMOND.
Pray God, dear Jerningham, it prove so happy.

JERNINGHAM.
There's nought can alter it.  Be merry, lad!

FABELL.
There's nought shall alter it.  Be lively, Raymond!
Stand any opposition gainst thy hope,
Art shall confront it with her largest scope.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE III.  The same.

[Peter Fabell, solus.]


FABELL.
Good old Mounchensey, is thy hap so ill,
That for thy bounty and thy royall parts
Thy kind alliance should be held in scorn,
And after all these promises by Clare
Refuse to give his daughter to thy son,
Only because thy Revenues cannot reach
To make her dowage of so rich a jointure
As can the heir of wealthy Jerningham?
And therefore is the false fox now in hand
To strike a match betwixt her and th' other;
And the old gray-beards now are close together,
Plotting it in the garden.  Is't even so?
Raymond Mounchensey, boy, have thou and I
Thus long at Cambridge read the liberall Arts,
The Metaphysickes, Magicke, and those parts
Of the most secret deep philosophy?
Have I so many melancholy nights
Watch'd on the top of Peter-house highest Tower?
And come we back unto our native home,
For want of skill to lose the wench thou lov'st?
We'll first hang Envill in such rings of mist
As never rose from any dampish fen:
I'll make the brind sea to rise at Ware,
And drown the marshes unto Stratford bridge;
I'll drive the Deer from Waltham in their walks,
And scatter them like sheep in every field.
We may perhaps be crost, but, if we be,
He shall cross the devil, that but crosses me.

[Enter Raymond and young Jerningham and young Clare.]

But here comes Raymond, disconsolate and sad,
And here's the gallant that must have the wench.

JERNINGHAM.
I pri'thee, Raymond, leave these solemn dumps:
Revive thy spirits, thou that before hast been
More watchful then the day-proclaiming cock,
As sportive as a Kid, as frank and merry
As mirth herself.
If ought in me may thy content procure,
It is thine own, thou mayst thy self assure.

RAYMOND.
Ha, Jerningham, if any but thy self
Had spoke that word, it would have come as cold
As the bleak Northern winds upon the face
Of winter.
From thee they have some power upon my blood;
Yet being from thee, had but that hollow sound
Come from the lips of any living man,
It might have won the credit of mine ear;
From thee it cannot.

JERNINGHAM.
If I understand thee, I am a villain:
What, dost thou speak in parables to thy friends?

CLARE.
Come, boy, and make me this same groning love,
Troubled with stitches and the cough a'th lungs,
That wept his eyes out when he was a child,
And ever since hath shot at hudman-blind,
Make him leap, caper, jerk, and laugh, and sing,
And play me horse-tricks;
Make Cupid wanton as his mother's dove:
But in this sort, boy, I would have thee love.

FABELL.
Why, how now, mad-cap? What, my lusty Franke,
So near a wife, and will not tell a friend?
But you will to this geere in hugger-mugger;
Art thou turned miser, Rascall, in thy loves?

JERNINGHAM.
Who, I? z'blood, what should all you see in me, that I should
look like a married man, ha?  Am I bald? are my legs too
little for my hose?  If I feel any thing in my forehead, I
am a villain: do I wear a night-cap? Do I bend in the hams?
What dost thou see in me, that I should be towards marriage, ha?

CLARE.
What, thou married? let me look upon thee, Rogue; who has given
out this of thee? how camst thou into this ill name? What company
hast thou been in, Rascall?

FABELL.
You are the man, sir, must have Millescent:
The match is making in the garden now;
Her jointure is agreed on, and th' old men,
Your fathers, mean to lanch their busy bags;
But in mean time to thrust Mountchensey off,
For colour of this new intended match,
Fair Millescent to Cheston must be sent,
To take the approbation for a Nun.
Ne'er look upon me, lad, the match is done.

JERNINGHAM.
Raymond Mountchensey, now I touch thy grief
With the true feeling of a zealous friend.
And as for fair and beauteous Millescent,
With my vain breath I will not seek to slubber
Her angel like perfections; but thou know'st
That Essex hath the Saint that I adore.
Where ere did we meet thee and wanton springs,
That like a wag thou hast not laught at me,
And with regardless jesting mockt my love?
How many a sad and weary summer night
My sighs have drunk the dew from off the earth,
And I have taught the Niting-gale to wake,
And from the meadows spring the early Lark
An hour before she should have list to sing:
I have loaded the poor minutes with my moans,
That I have made the heavy slow passed hours
To hang like heavy clogs upon the day.
But, dear Mountchensey, had not my affection
Seased on the beauty of another dame,
Before I would wrong the chase, and overgive love
Of one so worthy and so true a friend,
I will abjure both beauty and her sight,
And will in love become a counterfeit.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Dear Jerningham, thou hast begot my life,
And from the mouth of hell, where now I sate,
I feel my spirit rebound against the stars:
Thou hast conquerd me, dear friend, in my free soul;
Their time nor death can by their power controul.

FABELL.
Franke Jerningham, thou art a gallant boy;
And were he not my pupil, I would say
He were as fine a mettled gentleman,
Of as free spirit, and of as fine a temper
As is in England; and he is a man
That very richly may deserve thy love.
But, noble Clare, this while of our discourse,
What may Mounchensey's honour to thy self
Exact upon the measure of thy grace?

CLARE.
Raymond Mounchensey, I would have thee know,
He does not breath this air,
Whose love I cherish, and whose soul I love
More than Mounchensey's:
Nor ever in my life did see the man
Whom, for his wit and many vertuous parts,
I think more worthy of my sister's love.
But since the matter grows unto this pass,
I must not seem to cross my Father's will;
But when thou list to visit her by night,
My horses sadled, and the stable door
Stands ready for thee; use them at thy pleasure.
In honest marriage wed her frankly, boy,
And if thou getst her, lad, God give thee joy!

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Then, care, away! let fates my fall pretend,
Backt with the favours of so true a friend!

FABELL.
Let us alone, to bussell for the set;
For age and craft with wit and Art have met.
I'll make my spirits to dance such nightly jigs
Along the way twixt this and Totnam cross,
The Carriers jades shall cast their heavy packs,
And the strong hedges scarse shall keep them in:
The Milk-maids Cuts shall turn the wenches off,
And lay the Dossers tumbling in the dust:
The frank and merry London prentises,
That come for cream and lusty country cheer,
Shall lose their way; and, scrambling in the ditches,
All night shall whoop and hollow, cry and call,
Yet none to other find the way at all.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Pursue the project, scholler: what we can do
To help indeavour, join our lives thereto!

[Exeunt.]


ACT II.

SCENE I.  Waltham:  The house of Banks.

[Enter Banks, Sir John and Smug.]


BANKS.
Take me with you, good Sir John!  A plague on thee, Smug,
and thou touchest liquor, thou art founderd straight.
What, are your brains always water-mills? must they ever run
round?

SMUG.
Banks, your ale is a Philistine fox; z'hart, there's fire
i'th tail on't; you are a rogue to charge us with Mugs i'th
rereward.  A plague of this wind; O, it tickles our catastrophe.

SIR JOHN.
Neighbour Banks of Waltham, and Goodman Smug, the honest Smith
of Edmonton, as I dwell betwixt you both at Enfield, I know
the taste of both your ale houses, they are good both, smart
both.  Hem, Grass and hay! we are all mortal; let's live till
we die, and be merry; and there's an end.

BANKS.
Well said, Sir John, you are of the same humor still; and doth
the water run the same way still, boy?

SMUG.
Vulcan was a rogue to him; Sir John, lock, lock, lock fast, Sir
John; so, sir John.  I'll one of these years, when it shall
please the Goddesses and the destinies, be drunk in your
company; that's all now, and God send us health:  shall I swear
I love you?

SIR JOHN.
No oaths, no oaths, good neighbour Smug!  We'll wet our lips
together and hug; Carrouse in private, and elevate the hart,
and the liver and the lights,--and the lights, mark you me,
within us; for hem, Grass and hay! we are all mortall, let's
live till we die, and be Merry, and there's an end.

BANKS.
But to our former motion about stealing some venison; whither
go we?

SIR JOHN.
Into the forest, neighbour Banks, into Brian's walk, the mad
keeper.

SMUG.
Z'blood!  I'll tickle your keeper.

BANKS.
Yfaith, thou art always drunk when we have need of thee.

SMUG.
Need of me? z'hart, you shall have need of me always while
there's iron in an Anvil.

BANKS.
Master Parson, may the Smith go, think you, being in this
taking?

SMUG.
Go?  I'll go in spite of all the belles in Waltham.

SIR JOHN.
The question is, good neighbour Banks--let me see: the Moon
shines to night,--there's not a narrow bridge betwixt this
and the forest,--his brain will be settled ere night; he may
go, he may go, neighbour Banks.  Now we want none but the
company of mine host Blague at the George at Waltham; if he
were here, our Consort were full.  Look where comes my good
host, the Duke of Norfolk's man! and how? and how? a hem,
grass and hay! we are not yet mortall; let's live till we
die, and be merry; and there's an end.

[Enter Host.]

HOST.
Ha, my Castilian dialogues! and art thou in breath still, boy?
Miller, doth the match hold?  Smith, I see by thy eyes thou
hast been reading little Geneva print:  but wend we merrily
to the forest, to steal some of the king's Deer.  I'll meet
you at the time appointed:  away, I have Knights and Colonels
at my house, and must tend the Hungarions.  If we be scard in
the forest, we'll meet in the Church-porch at Enfield; ist
Correspondent?

BANKS.
Tis well; but how, if any of us should be taken?

SMITH.
He shall have ransom, by the Lord.

HOST.
Tush, the knave keepers are my bosonians and my pensioners.
Nine a clock! be valiant, my little Gogmagogs; I'll fence
with all the Justices in Hartford shire.  I'll have a Buck
till I die; I'll slay a Doe while I live; hold your bow
straight and steady.  I serve the good duke of Norfolk.

SMUG.
O rare! who, ho, ho, boy!

SIR JOHN.
Peace, neighbor Smug.  You see this is a Boor, a Boor of the
country, an illiterate Boor, and yet the Citizen of good
fellows: come, let's provide; a hem, Grass and hay! we are
not yet all mortall; we'll live till we die, and be merry,
and there's an end.  Come, Smug1

SMUG.
Good night, Waltham--who, ho, ho, boy!

[Exeunt.]


SCENE II.  The George Inn.

[Enter the Knights and Gentlemen from breakfast again.]


OLD MOUNTCHESNEY.
Nor I for thee, Clare, not of this.
What? hast thou fed me all this while with shalles.
And com'st to tell me now, thou lik'st it not?

CLARE.
I do not hold thy offer competent;
Nor do I like th' assurance of thy Land,
The title is so brangled with thy debts.

OLD MOUNTCHESNEY.
Too good for thee; and, knight, thou knowst it well,
I fawnd not on thee for thy goods, not I;
Twas thine own motion; that thy wife doth know.

LADY.
Husband, it was so; he lies not in that.

CLARE.
Hold thy chat, queane.

OLD MOUNTCHESNEY.
To which I hearkned willingly, and the rather,
Because I was persuaded it proceeded
From love thou bor'st to me and to my boy;
And gav'st him free access unto thy house,
Here he hath not behaved him to thy child,
But as befits a gentleman to do:
Nor is my poor distressed state so low,
That I'll shut up my doors, I warrant thee.

CLARE.
Let it suffice, Mountchensey, I mislike it;
Nor think thy son a match fit for my child.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
I tell thee, Clare, his blood is good and clear
As the best drop that panteth in thy veins:
But for this maid, thy fair and vertuous child,
She is no more disparaged by thy baseness
Then the most orient and the pretious jewell,
Which still retains his lustre and his beauty,
Although a slave were owner of the same.

CLARE.
She is the last is left me to bestow,
And her I mean to dedicate to God.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
You do, sir?

CLARE.
Sir, sir, I do, she is mine own.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
And pity she is so!
Damnation dog thee and thy wretched pelf!

[Aside.]

CLARE.
Not thou, Mountchensey, shalt bestow my child.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Neither shouldst thou bestow her where thou mean'st.

CLARE.
What wilt thou do?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
No matter, let that be;
I will do that, perhaps, shall anger thee:
Thou hast wrongd my love, and, by God's blessed Angell,
Thou shalt well know it.

CLARE.
Tut, brave not me.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Brave thee, base Churle! were't not for man-hood sake--
I say no more, but that there be some by
Whose blood is hotter then ours is,
Which being stird might make us both repent
This foolish meeting.  But, Harry Clare,
Although thy father have abused my friendship,
Yet I love thee, I do, my noble boy,
I do, yfaith.

LADY.
Aye, do, do!
Fill the world with talk of us, man, man;
I never lookt for better at your hands.

FABELL.
I hop'd your great experience and your years
Would have proved patience rather to your soul,
Then with this frantique and untamed passion
To whet their skeens; and, but for that
I hope their friendships are too well confirmd,
And their minds temperd with more kindly heat,
Then for their froward parents soars
That they should break forth into publique brawles--
How ere the rough hand of th' untoward world
Hath moulded your proceedings in this matter,
Yet I am sure the first intent was love:
Then since the first spring was so sweet and warm,
Let it die gently; ne'er kill it with a scorn.

RAY.
O thou base world, how leprous is that soul
That is once lim'd in that polluted mud!
Oh, sir Arthur, you have startled his free active spirits
With a too sharp spur for his mind to bear.
Have patience, sir: the remedy to woe
Is to leave what of force we must forgo.

MILLISCENT.
And I must take a twelve months approbation,
That in mean time this sole and private life
At the years end may fashion me a wife:
But, sweet Mounchensey, ere this year be done,
Thou'st be a frier, if that I be a Nun.
And, father, ere young Jerningham's I'll be,
I will turn mad to spite both him and thee.

CLARE.
Wife, come, to horse, and huswife, make you ready;
For, if I live, I swear by this good light,
I'll see you lodged in Chesson house to night.

[Exeunt.]

MOUNTCHESNEY.
Raymond, away!  Thou seest how matters fall.
Churle, hell consume thee, and thy pelf, and all!

FABELL.
Now, Master Clare, you see how matters fadge;
Your Milliscent must needs be made a Nune.
Well, sir, we are the men must ply this match:
Hold you your peace, and be a looker on,
And send her unto Chesson--where he will,
I'll send me fellows of a handful hie
Into the Cloysters where the Nuns frequent,
Shall make them skip like Does about the Dale,
And with the Lady prioress of the house
To play at leap-frog, naked in their smocks,
Until the merry wenches at their mass
Cry teehee weehee;
And tickling these mad lasses in their flanks,
They'll sprawl, and squeak, and pinch their fellow Nuns.
Be lively, boys, before the wench we lose,
I'll make the Abbas wear the Cannons hose.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE III.  The same.

[Enter Harry Clare, Frank Jerningham, Peter Fabell, and
Milliscent.]


HARRY CLARE.
Spight now hath done her worst; sister, be patient.

JERNINGHAM.
Forewarned poor Raymonds company!  O heaven!
When the composure of weak frailty meet
Upon this mart of durt, O, then weak love
Must in her own unhappiness be silent,
And winck on all deformities.

MILLISCENT.
Tis well:
Where's Raymond, brother? where's my dear Mounchensey?
Would we might weep together and then part;
Our sighing parle would much ease my heart.

FABELL.
Sweet beauty, fold your sorrows in the thought
Of future reconcilement: let your tears
Shew you a woman; but be no farther spent
Then from the eyes; for, sweet, experience says
That love is firm that's flattered with delays.

MILLISCENT.
Alas, sir, think you I shall ere be his?

FABELL.
As sure as parting smiles on future bliss.
Yond comes my friend: see, he hath doted
So long upon your beauty, that your want
Will with a pale retirement waste his blood;
For in true love Musicke doth sweetly dwell:
Severed, these less worlds bear within them hell.

[Enter Mounchensey.]

MOUNCHENSEY.
Harry and Francke, you are enjoined to wain
Your friendship from me; we must part: the breath
Of all advised corruption--pardon me!
Faith, I must say so;--you may think I love you;
I breath not, rougher spight do sever us;
We'll meet by stealth, sweet friend,--by stealth, you twain;
Kisses are sweetest got with struggling pain.

JERNINGHAM.
Our friendship dies not, Raymond.

MOUNCHENSEY.
Pardon me:
I am busied; I have lost my faculties,
And buried them in Milliscent's clear eyes.

MILLISCENT.
Alas, sweet Love, what shall become of me?
I must to Chesson to the Nunry,
I shall ne'er see thee more.

MOUNCHENSEY.
How, sweet?
I'll be thy votary, we'll often meet:
This kiss divides us, and breathes soft adieu,--
This be a double charm to keep both true.

FABELL.
Have done: your fathers may chance spy your parting.
Refuse not you by any means, good sweetness,
To go unto the Nunnery; far from hence
Must we beget your love's sweet happiness.
You shall not stay there long; your harder bed
Shall be more soft when Nun and maid are dead.

[Enter Bilbo.]

MOUNCHENSEY.
Now, sirra, what's the matter?

BILBO.
Marry, you must to horse presently; that villainous old
gouty churl, Sir Arthur Clare, longs till he be at the Nunry.

HARRY CLARE.
How, sir?

BILBO.
O, I cry you mercy, he is your father, sir, indeed; but I am
sure that there's less affinity betwixt your two natures then
there is between a broker and a cutpurse.

MOUNCHENSEY.
Bring my gelding, sirra.

BILBO.
Well, nothing grieves me, but for the poor wench; she must
now cry vale to Lobster pies, hartichokes, and all such meats
of mortality; poor gentlewoman, the sign must not be in virgo
any longer with her, and that me grieves full well.

	Poor Milliscent
	Must pray and repent:
O fatal wonder!
She'll now be no fatter,
Love must not come at her
Yet she shall be kept under.

[Exit.]

JERNINGHAM.
Farewell, dear Raymond.

HARRY CLARE.
Friend, adieu.

MILLISCENT.
Dear sweet,
No joy enjoys my heart till we next meet.

[Exeunt.]

FABELL.
Well, Raymond, now the tide of discontent
Beats in thy face; but, er't be long, the wind
Shall turn the flood.  We must to Waltham abbey,
And as fair Milliscent in Cheston lives,
A most unwilling Nun, so thou shalt there
Become a beardless Novice; to what end,
Let time and future accidents declare:
Taste thou my sleights, thy love I'll only share.

MOUNCHENSEY.
Turn friar?  Come, my good Counsellor, let's go,
Yet that disguise will hardly shroud my woe.

[Exeunt.]


ACT III.

SCENE I.  Cheston Priory.

[Enter the Prioress of Cheston, with a Nun or two, Sir Arthur
Clare, Sir Raph Jerningham, Henry and Francke, the Lady, and
Bilbo, with Millisent.]


LADY CLARE.
Madam,
The love unto this holy sisterhood,
And our confirmd opinion of your zeal
Hath truly won us to bestow our Child
Rather on this then any neighbouring Cell.

PRIORESS.
	Jesus daughter, Mary's child,
	Holy matron, woman mild,
	For thee a mass shall still be said,
	Every sister drop a bead;
	And those again succeeding them
	For you shall sing a Requiem.

FRANK.
The wench is gone, harry; she is no more a woman of this
world: mark her well, she looks like a Nun already.  What
thinkst on her?

HARRY.
By my faith, her face comes handsomely to 't.  But peace,
let's hear the rest.

SIR ARTHUR.
Madam, for a twelvemonths approbation,
We mean to make this trial of our child.
Your care and our dear blessing in mean time
We pray may prosper this intended work.

PRIORESS.
	May your happy soul be blithe,
	That so truly pay your tithe:
	He who many children gave,
	Tis fit that he one child should have.
	Then, fair virgin, hear my spell,
	For I must your duty tell.

MILLISCENT.
--Good men and true, stand together, and hear your charge.

PRIORESS.
	First, a mornings take your book,
	The glass wherein your self must look;
Your young thoughts, so proud and jolly,
Must be turnd to motions holy;
For your busk, attires, and toys
Have your thoughts on heavenly joys;
And for all your follies past
You must do penance, pray, and fast.

BILBO.
--Let her take heed of fasting; and if ever she hurt her self
with praying, I'll ne'er trust beast.

MILLISCENT.
--This goes hard, berladye!

PRIORESS.
	You shall ring the sacring bell,
	Keep your hours, and tell your knell,
	Rise at midnight at your matins,
	Read your Psalter, sing your latins,
	And when your blood shall kindle pleasure,
	Scourge your self in plenteous measure.

MILLISCENT.
--Worse and worse, by Saint Mary.

FRANK.
--Sirra Hal, how does she hold her countenance?  Well, go thy
ways, if ever thou prove a Nun, I'll build an Abbey.

HARRY.
--She may be a Nun; but if ever she prove an Anchoress, I'll
dig her grave with my nails.

FRANK.
--To her again, mother!

HARRY.
--Hold thine own, wench!

PRIORESS.
	You must read the mornings mass,
	You must creep unto the Cross,
	Put cold ashes on your head,
	Have a hair cloth for your bed.

BILBO.
--She had rather have a man in her bed.

PRIORESS.
	Bid your beads, and tell your needs,
	Your holy Avies, and you Creeds;
	Holy maid, this must be done,
	If you mean to live a Nun.

MILLISCENT.
--The holy maid will be no Nun.

SIR ARTHUR.
Madam, we have some business of import,
And must be gone.
Wilt please you take my wife into your closet,
Who further will acquaint you with my mind;
And so, good madam, for this time adieu.

[Exeunt women.]

SIR RALPH.
Well now, Francke Jerningham, how sayest thou?
To be brief,--
What wilt thou say for all this, if we two,
Her father and my self, can bring about,
That we convert this Nun to be a wife,
And thou the husband to this pretty Nun?
How, then, my lad? ha, Francke, it may be done.

HARRY.
--Aye, now it works.

FRANCKE.
O God, sir, you amaze me at your words;
Think with your self, sir, what a thing it were
To cause a recluse to remove her vow:
A maimed, contrite, and repentant soul,
Ever mortified with fasting and with prayer,
Whose thoughts, even as her eyes, are fixd on heaven,
To draw a virgin, thus devour'd with zeal,
Back to the world:  O impious deed!
Nor by the Canon Law can it be done
Without a dispensation from the Church:
Besides, she is so prone unto this life,
As she'll even shriek to hear a husband named.

BILBO.
Aye, a poor innocent she!  Well, here's no knavery; he flouts
the old fools to their teeth.

SIR RAPH.
Boy, I am glad to hear
Thou mak'st such scruple of that conscience;
And in a man so young as in your self,
I promise you tis very seldom seen.
But Franke, this is a trick, a mere devise,
A sleight plotted betwixt her father and my self,
To thrust Mounchensey's nose besides the cushion;
That, being thus behard of all access,
Time yet may work him from her thoughts,
And give thee ample scope to thy desires.

BILBO.
--A plague on you both for a couple of Jews!

HENRY.
--How now, Franke, what say you to that?

FRANCKE.
--Let me alone, I warrant thee.--
Sir, assured that this motion doth proceed
From your most kind and fatherly affection,
I do dispose my liking to your pleasure:
But for it is a matter of such moment
As holy marriage, I must crave thus much,
To have some conference iwth my ghostly father,
Friar Hildersham, here by, at Waltham Abbey,
To be absolude of things that it is fit
None only but my confessor should know.

SIR RAPH.
With all my heart: he is a reverend man;
And to morrorw morning we will meet all at the Abbey,
Where by th' opinion of that reverend man
We will proceed; I like it passing well.
Till then we part, boy; aye, think of it; farewell!
A parent's care no mortal tongue can tell.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE II.  Before the Priory Gate.

[Enter Sir Arthur Clare, and Raymond Mounchensey, like a
Friar.]


SIR ARTHUR.
Holy young Novice, I have told you now
My full intent, and do refer the rest
To your professed secrecy and care:
And see,
Our serious speech hath stolen upon the way,
That we are come unto the Abbey gate.
Because I know Mountchensey is a fox,
That craftily doth overlook my doings,
I'll not be seen, not I.  Tush, I have done:
I had a daughter, but she's now a Nun.
Farewell, dear son, farewell.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Fare you well!--Aye, you have done!
Your daughter, sir, shall not be long a Nun.
O my rare Tutor! never mortal brain
Plotted out such a mass of policy;
And my dear bosom is so great with laughter,
Begot by his simplicity and error,
My soul is fallen in labour with her joy.
O my true friends, Franke Jerningham and Clare,
Did you now know but how this jest takes fire--
That good sir Arthur, thinking me a novice,
Hath even poured himself into my bosom,
O, you would vent your spleens with tickling mirth!
But, Raymond, peace, and have an eye about,
For fear perhaps some of the Nuns look out.
	Peace and charity within,
	Never touch't with deadly sin;
	I cast my holy water pure
	On this wall and on this door,
	That from evil shall defend,
	And keep you from the ugly fiend:
Evil spirit, by night nor day,
	Shall approach or come this way;
Elf nor Fairy, by this grace,
Day nor night shall haunt this place.
Holy maidens!

[Knock.]

[Answer within.]  Who's that which knocks? ha, who's there?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Gentle Nun, here is a Friar.

[Enter Nun.]

NUN.
A Friar without, now Christ us save!
Holy man, what wouldst thou have?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Holy maid, I hither come
From Friar and father Hildersome,
By the favour and the grace
Of the Prioress of this place,
Amongst you all to visit one
That's come for approbation;
Before she was as now you are,
The daughter of Sir Arthur Clare,
But since she now became a Nune,
Call'd Milliscnet of Edmunton.

NUN.
Holy man, repose you there;
This news I'll to our Abbess bear,
To tell her what a man is sent,
And your message and intent.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Benedicite.

NUN.
Benedicite.

[Exit.]

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Do, my good plump wench; if all fall right,
I'll make your sister-hood one less by night.
Now happy fortune speed this merry drift,
I like a wench comes roundly to her shrift.

[Enter Lady, Milliscent.]

LADY.
Have Friars recourse then to the house of Nuns?

MILLISCENT.
Madam, it is the order of this place,
When any virgin comes for approbation,--
Lest that for fear or such sinister practise
She should be forced to undergo this veil,
Which should proceed from conscience and devotion,--
A visitor is sent from Waltham house,
To take the true confession of the maid.

LADY.
Is that the order?  I commend it well:
You to your shrift, I'll back unto the cell.

[Exit.]

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Life of my soul! bright Angel!

MILLISCENT.
What means the Friar?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
O Milliscent, tis I.

MILLISCENT.
My heart misgives me; I should know that voice.
You? who are you?  The holy virgin bless me!
Tell me your name: you shall, ere you confess me.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Mountchensey, thy true friend.

MILLISCENT.
My Raymond, my dear heart!
Sweet life, give leave to my distracted soul,
To wake a little from this swoon of joy.
By what means camst thou to assume this shape?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
By means of Peter Fabell, my kind Tutor,
Who in the habit of Friar Hildersham,
Franke Jerningham's old friend and confessor,
Helped me to act the part of priestly novice,
Plotted by Franke, by Fabell and my self,
And so delivered to Sir Arthur Clare,
Who brought me here unto the Abbey gate,
To be his Nun-made daughter's visitor.

MILLISCENT.
You are all sweet traitors to my poor old father.
O my dear life!  I was a dream't to night
That, as I was a praying in mine Psalter,
There came a spirit unto me as I kneeled,
And by his strong persuasions tempted me
To leave this Nunry; and me thought
He came in the most glorious Angel shape,
That mortal eye did ever look upon.
Ha, thou art sure that spirit, for there's no form
Is in mine eye so glorious as thine own.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
O thou Idolatress, that dost this worship
To him whose likeness is but praise of thee!
Thou bright unsetting star, which through this veil,
For very envy, mak'st the Sun look pale!

MILLISCENT.
Well, visitor, lest that perhaps my mother
Should think the Friar too strickt in his decrees,
I this confess to my sweet ghostly father:
If chast pure love be sin, I must confess,
I have offended three years now with thee.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
But do you yet repent you of the same?

MILLISCENT.
Yfaith, I cannot.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Nor will I absolve thee
Of that sweet sin, though it be venial;
Yet have the penance of a thousand kisses,
And I enjoin you to this pilgrimage:
That in the evening you bestow your self
Here in the walk near to the willow ground,
Where I'll be ready both with men and horse
To wait your coming, and convey you hence
Unto a lodge I have in Enfield chase.
No more reply, if that you yield consent--
I see more eyes upon our stay are bent.

MILLISCENT.
Sweet life, farewell!  Tis done:  let that suffice;
What my tongue fails, I send thee by mine eyes.

[Exit]

[Enter Fabell, Clare, and Jerningham.]

JERNINGHAM.
Now, Visitor, how does this new made Nun?

CLARE.
Come, come, how does she, noble Capouchin?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
She may be poor in spirit, but for the flesh,
Tis fat and plump, boys.  Ah, rogues, there is
A company of girls would turn you all Friars.

FABELL.
But how, Mountchensey? how, lad, for the wench?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Sound, lads, yfaith; I thank my holy habit,
I have confest her, and the Lady Prioress
Hath given me ghostly counsel with her blessing.
And how say ye, boys,
If I be chose the weekly visitor?

CLARE.
Z'blood, she'll have nere a Nun unbagd to sing mass then.

JERNINGHAM.
The Abbot of Waltham will have as many Children to put to
nurse as he has calves in the Marsh.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Well, to be brief, the Nun will soon at night turn tippit;
if I can but devise to quit her cleanly of the Nunry, she
is mine own.

FABELL.
But, Sirra Raymond,
What news of Peter Fabell at the house?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Tush, he's the only man;
A Necromancer and a Conjurer
That works for young Mountchensey altogether;
And if it be not for Friar Benedick,
That he can cross him by his learned skill,
The Wench is gone;
Fabell will fetch her out by very magick.

FABELL.
Stands the wind there, boy? keep them in that key.
The wench is ours before to-morrow day.
Well, Hal and Frank, as ye are gentlemen,
Stick to us close this once!  You know your fathers
Have men and horse lie ready still at Chesson,
To watch the coast be clear, to scout about,
And have an eye unto Mountchensey's walks:
Therefore you two may hover thereabouts,
And no man will uspect you for the matter;
Be ready but to take her at our hands,
Leave us to scamble for her getting out.

JERNINGHAM.
Z'blood, if all Herford-shire were at our heels,
We'll carry her away in spite of them.

CLARE.
But whither, Raymond?

MOUNTCHENSEY.
To Brian's upper lodge in Enfield Chase;
He is mine honest Friend and a tall keeper;
I'll send my man unto him presently
T' acquaint him with your coming and intent.

FABELL.
Be brief and secret.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Soon at night remember
You bring your horses to the willow ground.

JERNINGHAM.
Tis done; no more!

CLARE.
We will not fail the hour.
My life and fortune now lies in your power.

FABELL.
About our business!  Raymond, let's away!
Think of your hour; it draws well of the day.

[Exit.]


ACT IV.

SCENE I.  Enfield Chase.

[Enter Blague, Smug, and Sir John.]


BLAGUE.
Come, ye Hungarian pilchers, we are once more come under the
zona torrida of the forest.  Let's be resolute, let's fly to
and again; and if the devil come, we'll put him to his
Interrogatories, and not budge a foot.  What? s'foot, I'll
put fire into you, ye shall all three serve the good Duke of
Norfolk.

SMUG.
Mine host, my bully, my pretious consull, my noble Holofernes,
I have been drunk i' thy house twenty times and ten, all's for
that: I was last night in the third heavens, my brain was
poor, it had yest in 't; but now I am a man of action; is
't not so, lad?

BANKS.
Why, now thou hast two of the liberall sciences about thee,
wit and reason, thou maist serve the Duke of Europe.

SMUG.
I will serve the Duke of Christendom, and do him more credit
in his celler then all the plate in his buttery; is 't not
so, lad?

SIR JOHN.
Mine host and Smug, stand there; Banks, you and your horse
keep together; but lie close, shew no tricks, for fear of
the keeper.  If we be scared, we'll meet in the Church-porch
at Enfield.

SMUG.
Content, sir John.

BANKS.
Smug, dost not thou remember the tree thou felst out of last
Night?

SMUG.
Tush, and 't had been as high as the Abbey, I should nere
have hurt my self; I have fallen into the river, coming home
from Waltham, and scapt drowning.

SIR JOHN.
Come, sever, fear no sprits! We'll have a Buck presently;
we have watched later then this for a Doe, mine Host.

HOST.
Thou speakst as true as velvet.

SIR JOHN.
Why then, come!  Grass and hay, etc.

[Exeunt.]

[Enter Clare, Jerningham, and Milliscent.]

CLARE.
Franke Jerningham!

JERNINGHAM.
Speak softly, rogue; how now?

CLARE.
S'foot, we shall lose our way, it's so dark; whereabouts
are we?

JERNINGHAM.
Why, man, at Potters gate; the way lies right:  hark! the
clock strikes at Enfield; what's the hour?

CLARE.
Ten, the bell says.

JERNINGHAM.
A lies in's throat, it was but eight when we set out of
Chesson.  Sir John and his Sexton are at ale to night, the
clock runs at random.

CLARE.
Nay, as sure as thou liv'st, the villanous vicar is abroad
in the chase this dark night: the stone Priest steals more
venison then half the country.

JERNINGHAM.
Milliscent, how dost thou?

MILLISCENT.
Sir, very well.
I would to God we were at Brians lodge.

CLARE.
We shall anon; z'ounds, hark!  What means this noise?

JERNINGHAM.
Stay, I hear horsemen.

CLARE.
I hear footmen too.

JERNINGHAM.
Nay, then I have it: we have been discovered,
And we are followed by our fathers men.

MILLISCENT.
Brother and friend, alas, what shall we do?

CLARE.
Sister, speak softly, or we are descried.
They are hard upon us, what so ere they be,
Shadow your self behind this brake of fern,
We'll get into the wood, and let them pass.

[Enter Sir John, Blague, Smug, and Banks, one after another.]

SIR JOHN.
Grass and hay! we are all mortall; the keepers abroad, and
there's an end.

BANKS.
Sir John!

SIR JOHN.
Neighbour Banks, what news?

BANKS.
Z'wounds, Sir John, the keepers are abroad; I was hard by 'am.

SIR JOHN.
Grass and hay! where's mine host Blague?

BLAGUE.
Here, Metrapolitane.  The philistines are upon us, be silent;
let us serve the good Duke of Norfolk.  But where is Smug?

SMUG.
Here; a pox on ye all, dogs; I have kild the greatest Buck
in Brians walk.  Shift for your selves, all the keepers are
up: let's meet in Enfield church porch; away, we are all
taken else.

[Exeunt.]

[Enter Brian, with his man, and his hound.]

BRIAN.
Raph, hearst thou any stirring?

RAPH.
I heard one speak here hard by, in the bottom.  Peace, Maister,
speak low; zownes, if I did not hear a bow go off, and the
Buck bray, I never heard deer in my life.

BRIAN.
When went your fellows out into their walks?

RAPH.
An hour ago.

BRIAN.
S'life, is there stealers abroad, and they cannot hear
Of them: where the devil are my men to night?
Sirra, go up the wind towards Buckleyes lodge.
I'll cast about the bottom with my hound,
And I will meet thee under Cony ocke.

RAPH.
I will, Sir.

BRIAN.
How now? by the mass, my hound stays upon something; hark,
hark, Bowman, hark, hark, there!

MILLISCENT.
Brother, Frank Jerningham, brother Clare!

BRIAN.
Peace; that's a woman's voice!  Stand! who's there?  Stand,
or I'll shoot.

MILLISCENT.
O Lord! hold your hands, I mean no harm, sir.

BRIAN.
Speak, who are you?

MILLISCENT.
I am a maid, sir; who? Master Brian?

BRIAN.
The very same; sure, I should know her voice;
Mistris Milliscent?

MILLISCENT.
Aye, it is I, sir.

BRIAN.
God for his passion! what make you here alone?
I lookd for you at my lodge an hour ago.
What means your company to leave you thus?
Who brought you hither?

MILLISCENT.
My brother, Sir, and Master Jerningham,
Who, hearing folks about us in the Chase,
Feard it had been sir Ralph and my father,
Who had pursude us, thus dispearsed our selves,
Till they were past us.

BRIAN.
But where be they?

MILLISCENT.
They be not far off, here about the grove.

[Enter Clare and Jerningham.]

CLARE.
Be not afraid, man, I heard Brian's tongue,
That's certain.

JERNINGHAM.
Call softly for your sister.

CLARE.
Milliscent!

MILLISCENT.
Aye, brother, here.

BRIAN.
Maister Clare!

CLARE.
I told you it was Brian.

BRIAN.
Who's that?  Maister Jerningham: you are a couple of hot-shots;
does a man commit his wench to you, to put her to grass at
this time of night

JERNINGHAM.
We heard a noise about her in the chase,
And fearing that our fathers had pursued us,
Severd our selves.

CLARE.
Brian, how hapd'st thou on her?

BRIAN.
Seeking for stealers are abroad to night,
My hound stayed on her, and so found her out.

CLARE.
They were these stealers that affrighted us;
I was hard upon them, when they horst their Deer,
And I perceive they took me for a keeper.

BRIAN.
Which way took they?

JERNINGHAM.
Towards Enfield.

BRIAN.
A plague upon 't, that's that damned Priest, and Blague of
the George, he that serves the good Duke of Norfolk.

[A noise within:  Follow, follow, follow.]

CLARE.
Peace, that's my father's voice.

BRIAN.
Z'ownds, you suspected them, and now they are here indeed.

MILLISCENT.
Alas, what shall we do?

BRIAN.
If you go to the lodge, you are surely taken;
Strike down the wood to Enfield presently,
And if Mounchensey come, I'll send him t'yee.
Let me alone to bussle with your father;
I warrant you that I will keep them play
Till you have quit the chase; away, away!

[Exeunt all but Brian.]

Who's there?

[Enter the Knights.]

SIR RAPH.
In the king's name, pursue the Ravisher!

BRIAN.
Stand, or I'll shoot.

SIR ARTHUR.
Who's there?

BRIAN.
I am the keeper that do charge you stand;
You have stolen my Deer.

SIR ARTHUR.
We stolen thy Deer? we do pursue a thief.

BRIAN.
You are arrant thieves, and ye have stolen my Deer.

SIR RAPH.
We are Knights; Sir Arthur Clare, and Sir Raph Jerningham.

BRIAN.
The more your shame, that Knights should be such thieves.

SIR ARTHUR.
Who, and what art thou?

BRIAN.
My name is Brian, keeper of this walk.

SIR ARTHUR.
O Brian, a villain!
Thou hast received my daughter to thy lodge.

BRIAN.
You have stolen the best Deer in my walk to night.  My Deer!

SIR ARTHUR.
My daughter!
Stop not my way!

BRIAN.
What make you in my walk? you have stolen the best Buck in
my walk to night.

SIR ARTHUR.
My daughter!

BRIAN.
My Deer!

SIR RAPH.
Where is Mountchensey?

BRIAN.
Where's my Buck?

SIR ARTHUR.
I will complain me of thee to the King.

BRIAN.
I'll complain unto the King you spoil his game:
Tis strange that men of your account and calling
Will offer it!
I tell you true, Sir Arthur and Sir Raph,
That none but you have only spoild my game.

SIR ARTHUR.
I charge you, stop us not!

BRIAN.
I charge you both ye get out of my ground!
Is this a time for such as you,
Men of your place and of your gravity,
To be abroad a thieving? tis a shame;
And, afore God, if I had shot at you,
I had served you well enough.

[Exeunt.]


SCENE II.  Enfield Churchyard.

[Enter Banks the Miller, wet on his legs.]

BANKS.
S'foot, here's a dark night indeed!  I think I have been
in fifteen ditches between this and the forest.  Soft, here's
Enfield Church:  I am so wet with climing over into an
orchard for to steal some filberts.  Well, here I'll sit in
the Church porch, and wait for the rest of my consort.

[Enter the Sexton.]

SEXTON.
Here's a sky as black as Lucifer.  God bless us! here was
goodman Theophilus buried; he was the best Nutcracker that
ever dwelt in Enfield.  Well, tis 9. a clock, tis time to
ring curfew.  Lord bless us, what a white thing is that in
the Church porch!  O Lord, my legs are too weak for my body,
my hair is too stiff for my night-cap, my heart fails; this
is the ghost of Theophilus.  O Lord, it follows me!  I
cannot say my prayers, and one would give me a thousand
pound.  Good spirit, I have bowled and drunk and followed
the hounds with you a thousand times, though I have not the
spirit now to deal with you.  O Lord!

[Enter Priest.]

PRIEST.
Grass and hey, we are all mortall.  Who's there?

SEXTON.
We are grass and hay indeed; I know you to be Master
Parson by your phrase.

PRIEST.
Sexton!

PRIEST.
I, sir.

PRIEST.
For mortalities sake, What's the matter?

SEXTON.
O Lord, I am a man of another element; Master Theophilus
Ghost is in the Church porch.  There was a hundred Cats,
all fire, dancing here even now, and they are clomb up
to the top of the steeple; I'll not into the belfry for a
world.

PRIEST.
O good Salomon; I have been about a deed of darkness to
night:  O Lord, I saw fifteen spirits in the forest, like
white bulls; if I lie, I am an arrant thief: mortality
haunts us--grass and hay! the devils at our heels, and let's
hence to the parsonage.

[Exeunt.]

[The Miller comes out very softly.]

MILLER.
What noise was that? tis the watch, sure; that villanous
unlucky rogue, Smug, is tain, upon my life; and then all
our villeny comes out; I heard one cry, sure.

[Enter Host Blague.]

HOST.
If I go steal any more venison, I am a Paradox:  s'foot,
I can scarce bear the sin of my flesh in the day, tis so
heavy; if I turn not honest, and serve the good Duke of
Norfolk, as true mareterraneum skinker should do, let me
never look higher then the element of a Constable.

MILLER.
By the Lord, there are some watchmen; I hear them name
Maister Constable; I would to God my Mill were an Eunuch,
and wanted her stones, so I were hence.

HOST.
Who's there?

MILLER.
Tis the Constable, by this light; I'll steal hence, and if
I can meet mine host Blague, I'll tell him how Smug is
tain, and will him to look to himself.

[Exit.]

HOST.
What the devil is that white thing? this same is a Church-
yard, and I have heard that ghosts and villenous goblins
have been seen here.

[Enter Sexton and Priest.]

PRIEST.
Grass and hay!  O, that I could conjure! we saw a spirit
here in the Church-yard; and in the fallow field there's
the devil with a man's body upon his back in a white sheet.

SEXTON.
It may be a woman's body, Sir John.

PRIEST.
If she be a woman, the sheets damn her; Lord bless us, what
a night of mortality is this!

HOST.
Priest!

PRIEST.
Mine host!

HOST.
Did you not see a spirit all in white cross you at the stile?

SEXTON.
O no, mine host; but there sate one in the porch; I have not
breath ynough left to bless me from the Devil.

HOST.
Who's that?

PRIEST.
The Sexton, almost frighted out of his wits.  Did you see
Banks or Smug?

HOST.
No, they are gone to Waltham, sure:  I would fain hence; come,
let's to my house: I'll ne'er serve the duke of Norfolk in
this fashion again whilst I breath.  If the devil be amongst
us, tis time to hoist sail, and cry roomer.  Keep together;
Sexton, thou art secret, what? let's be comfortable one to
Another.

PRIEST.
We are all mortal, mine host.

HOST.
True; and I'll serve God in the night hereafter afore the
Duke of Norfolk.

[Exeunt.]


ACT V.

SCENE I.  An Inn opposite the George, Waltham.


[Enter Sir Arthur Clare and Sir Ralph Jerningham, trussing
their points as new up.]

SIR RAPH.
Good morrow, gentle knight.
A happy day after your short nights rest.

SIR ARTHUR.
Ha, ha, sir Raph, stirring so soon indeed?
Birlady, sir, rest would have done right well;
Our riding late last night has made me drowsy.
Go to, go to, those days are gone with us.

SIR RAPH.
Sir Arthur, Sir Arthur, care go with those days,
Let 'am even go together, let 'am go!
Tis time, yfaith, that we were in our graves,
When Children leave obedience to their parents,
When there's no fear of God, no care, no duty.
Well, well, nay, nay, it shall not do, it shall not;
No, Mountchensey, thou'st hear on't, thou shalt,
Thou shalt, yfaith!
I'll hang thy Son, if there be law in England.
A man's Child ravisht from a Nunry!
This is rare!
Well, well, there's one gone for Friar Hildersam.

SIR ARTHUR.
Nay, gentle Knight, do not vex thus,
It will but hurt your health.
You cannot grieve more then I do, but to what end?  But hark
you, Sir Raph, I was about to say something--it makes no
matter.  But heark you in your ear:  the Friar's a knave;
but God forgive me, a man cannot tell neither; s'foot, I am
so out of patience, I know not what to say.

SIR RAPH.
There's one went for the Friar an hour ago.  Comes he not
yet? s'foot, if I do find knavery unders cowl, I'll tickle
him, I'll firk him.  Here, here, he's here, he's here.  Good
morrow, Friar; good morrow, gentle Friar.

[Enter Hildersham.]

SIR ARHTUR.
Good morrow, father Hildersham, good morrow.

HILDERSHAM.
Good morrow, reverend Knights, unto you both.

SIR ARTHUR.
Father, how now? you hear how matters go;
I am undone, my child is cast away.
You did your best, at least I think the best;
But we are all crost; flatly, all is dasht.

HILDERSHAM.
Alas, good knights, how might the matter be?
Let me understand your grief for Charity.

SIR ARTHUR.
Who does not understand my griefs?  Alas, alas!
And yet ye do not!  Will the Church permit
A nun in approbation of her habit
To be ravished?

HILDERSHAM.
A holy woman, benedicite!
Now God forfend that any should presume
To touch the sister of a holy house.

SIR ARTHUR.
Jesus deliver me!

SIR RAPH.
Why, Millisent, the daughter of this Knight
Is out of Chesson taken the last night.

HILDERSHAM.
Was that fair maiden late become a nun?

SIR RAPH.
Was she, quotha?  Knavery, knavery, knavery; I smell it, I
smell it, yfaith; is the wind in that door? is it even so?
doost thou ask me that now?

HILDERSHAM.
It is the first time that I ere heard of it.

SIR ARTHUR.
That's very strange.

SIR RAPH.
Why, tell me, Friar, tell me; thou art counted a holy man;
do not play the hypocrite with me, nor bear with me.  I cannot
dissemble:  did I ought but by thy own consent? by thy
allowance? nay, further, by thy warrant?

HILDERSHAM.
Why, Reverend knight--

SIR RAPH.
Unreverend Friar--

HILDERSHAM.
Nay, then give me leave, sir, to depart in quiet; I had
hoped you had sent for me to some other end.

SIR ARTHUR.
Nay, stay, good Friar; if any thing hath hapd
About this matter in thy love to u,
That thy strickt order cannot justify,
Admit it be so, we will cover it.
Take no care, man:
Disclaim me yet thy counsell and advise,
The wisest man that is may be o'erreacht.

HILDERSHAM.
Sir Arthur, by my order and my faith,
I know not what you mean.

SIR RAPH.
By your order and your faith?
This is most strange of all:  Why, tell me, Friar,
Are not you Confessor to my Son Francke?

HILDERSHAM.
Yes, that I am.

SIR RAPH.
And did not this good knight here and my self
Confess with you, being his ghostly Father,
To deal with him about th' unbanded marriage
Betwixt him and that fair young Millisent?

HILDERSHAM.
I never heard of any match intended.

SIR ARTHUR.
Did not we break our minds that very time,
That our device of making her a Nun
Was but a colour and a very plot
To put by young Mountchensey?  Ist not true?

HILDERSHAM.
The more I strive to know what you should mean,
The less I understand you.

SIR RAPH.
Did not you tell us still how Peter Fabell
At length would cross us, if we took not heed?

HILDERSHAM.
I have heard of one that is a great magician,
But he's about the University.

SIR RAPH.
Did not you send your novice Benedic
To persuade the girl to leave Mountchensey's love,
To cross that Peter Fabell in his art,
And to that purpose made him visitor?

HILDERSHAM.
I never sent my novice from the house,
Nor have we made our visitation yet.

SIR ARTHUR.
Never sent him?  Nay, did he not go?
And did not I direct him to the house,
And confer with him by the way? and did he not
Tell me what charge he had received from you,
Word by word, as I requested at your hands?

HILDERSHAM.
That you shall know; he came along with me,
And stays without.  Come hither, Benedic!

[Enter Benedic.]

Young Benedic, were you ere sent by me
To Chesson Nunnery for a visitor?

BENEDIC.
Never, sir, truly.

SIR RAPH.
Stranger then all the rest!

SIR ARTHUR.
Did not I direct you to the house?
Confer with you
From Waltham Abbey unto Chesson wall?

BENEDIC.
I never saw you, sir, before this hour.

SIR RAPH.
The devill thou didst not!  Hoe, Chamberlen!

[Enter Chamberlaine.]

CHAMB.
Anon, anon.

SIR RAPH.
Call mine host Blague hither!

CHAMB.
I will send one over to see if he be up; I think he be
scarce stirring yet.

SIR RAPH.
Why, knave, didst thou not tell me an hour ago, mine host
was up?

CHAMB.
Aye, sir, my Master's up.

SIR RAPH.
You knave, is a up, and is a not up?  Dost thou mock me?

CHAMB.
Aye, sir, my M. is up; but I think M. Blague indeed be not
Stirring.

SIR RAPH.
Why, who's thy Master? is not the Master of the house thy
Master?

CHAMB.
Yes, sir; but M. Blague dwells over the way.

SIR ARTHUR.
Is not this the George?  Before God, there's some villany
in this.

CHAMB.
Sfoot, our signs removed; this is strange!

[Exeunt.]


SCENE II.  The George Inn.


[Enter Blague, trussing his points.]

BLAGUE.
Chamberlen, speak up to the new lodgings, bid Nell look well
to the baked meats.

[Enter Sir Arthur and Sir Raph.]

How now, my old Jenerts bauke my house, my castle? lie in
Waltham all night, and not under the Canopy of your host
Blague's house?

SIR ARTHUR.
Mine host, mine host, we lay all night at the George in
Waltham; but whether the George be your fee-simple or no,
tis a doubtful question:  look upon your sign.

HOST.
Body of Saint George, this is mine overthwart neighbour hath
done this to seduce my blind customers.  I'll tickle his
Catastrophe for this; if I do not indite him at next assisses
for Burglary, let me die of the yellows; for I see tis no
boot in these days to serve the good Duke of Norfolk.  The
villanous world is turned manger; one Jade deceives another,
and your Ostler plays his part commonly for the fourth share.
Have we Comedies in hand, you whoreson, villanous male London
Letcher?

SIR ARTHUR.
Mine host, we have had the moylingst night of it that ever
we had in our lives.

HOST.
Ist certain?

SIR RAPH.
We have been in the Forest all night almost.

HOST.
S'foot, how did I miss you? hart, I was a stealing a Buck
there.

SIR ARTHUR.
A plague on you; we were stayed for you.

HOST.
Were you, my noble Romans?  Why, you shall share; the venison
is a footing.  Sine Cerere and Baccho friget Venus; That is,
there's a good breakfast provided for a marriage that's in my
house this morning.

SIR ARTHUR.
A marriage, mine host?

HOST.
A conjunction copulative; a gallant match between your
daughter and M. Raymond Mountchensey, young Juventus.

SIR ARTHUR.
How?

HOST.
Tis firm, tis done.  We'll shew you a president i'th civil
law fort.

SIR RAPH.
How? married?

HOST.
Leave tricks and admiration.  There's a cleanly pair of sheets
in the bed in Orchard chamber, and they shall lie there.  What?
I'll do it; I'll serve the good Duke of Norfolk.

SIR ARTHUR.
Thou shalt repent this, Blague.

SIR RAPH.
If any law in England will make thee smart for this, expect it
with all severity.

HOST.
I renounce your defiance; if you parle so roughly, I'll barracado
my gates against you.  stand fair, bully; Priest, come off from
the rereward!  What can you say now?  Twas done in my house; I
have shelter i'th Court for't.  D'yee see yon bay window?  I
serve the good duke of Norfolk, and tis his lodging.  Storm, I
care not, serving the good Duke of Norfolk:  thou art an actor
in this, and thou shalt carry fire in thy face eternally.

[Enter Smug, Mountchensey, Harry Clare, and Milliscent.]

SMUG.
Fire, s'blood, there's no fire in England like your Trinidado
sack.  Is any man here humorous?  We stole the venison, and
we'll justify it:  say you now!

HOST.
In good sooth, Smug, there's more sack on the fire, Smug.

SMUG.
I do not take any exceptions against your sack; but it you'll
lend me a pick staff, I'll cudgle them all hence, by this hand.

HOST.
I say thou shalt in to the Celler.

SMUG.
S'foot, mine Host, shalls not grapple?  Pray, pray you; I
could fight now for all the world like a Cockatrices ege; shals
not serve the Duke of Norfolk?

[Exit.]

HOST.
In, skipper, in!

SIR ARTHUR.
Sirra, hath young Mountchensey married your sister?

HARRY CLARE.
Tis Certain, Sir; here's the priest that coupled them, the
parties joined, and the honest witness that cried Amen.

MOUNTCHENSEY.
Sir Arthur Clare, my new created Father, I beseech you,
hear me.

SIR ARTHUR.
Sir, Sir, you are a foolish boy; you ahve done that you
cannot answer; I dare be bound to seize her from you; for
she's a profest Nun.

MILLISCENT.
With pardon, sir, that name is quite undone;
This true-love knot cancels both maid and Nun.
When first you told me I should act that part,
How cold and bloody it crept o'er my heart!
To Chesson with a smiling brow I went;
But yet, dear sir, it was to this intent,
That my sweet Raymond might find better means
To steal me thence.  In brief, disguised he came,
Like Novice to old father Hildersham;
His tutor here did act that cunning part,
And in our love hath joined much wit to art.

CLARE.
Is't even so?

MILLISCENT.
With pardon therefore we intreat your smiles;
Love thwarted turns itself to thousand wiles.

CLARE.
Young Master Jerningham, were you an actor
In your own love's abuse?

JERNINGHAM.
My thoughts, good sir,
Did labour seriously unto this end,
To wrong my self, ere I'd abuse my friend.

HOST.
He speaks like a Batchelor of musicke, all in numbers.
Knights, if I had known you would have let this covy of
Patridges sit thus long upon their knees under my sign
post, I would have spread my door with old Coverlids.

SIR ARTHUR.
Well, sir, for this your sign was removed, was it?

HOST.
Faith, we followed the directions of the devill, Master Peter
Fabell; and Smug, Lord bless us, could never stand upright
since.

SIR ARTHUR.
You, sir, twas you was his minister that married them?

SIR JOHN.
Sir, to prove my self an honest man, being that I was last
night in the forrest stealing Venison--now, sir, to have you
stand my friend, if that matter should be called in question,
I married your daughter to this worthy gentleman.

SIR ARTHUR.
I may chance to requite you, and make your neck crack for't.

SIR JOHN.
If you do, I am as resolute as my Neighbour vicar of Waltham
Abbey; a hem, Grass and hay, we are all mortall; let's live
till we be hangd, mine host, and be merry, and there's an end.

[Enter Fabell.]

FABELL.
Now, knights, I enter; now my part begins.
To end this difference, know, at first I knew
What you intended, ere your love took flight
From old Mountchensey; you, sir Arthur Clare,
Were minded to have married this sweet beauty
To young Franke Jerningham; to cross which match,
I used some pretty sleights; but I protest
Such as but sate upon the skirts of Art;
No conjurations, nor such weighty spells
As tie the soul to their performancy.
These for his love, who once was my dear pupil,
Have I effected.  Now, me thinks, tis strange
That you, being old in wisdom, should thus knit
Your forehead on this match, since reason fails;
No law can curb the lovers rash attempt;
Years, in resisting this, are sadly spent.
Smile, then, upon your daughter and kind son,
And let our toil to future ages prove,
The devil of Edmonton did good in Love.

SIR ARTHUR.
Well, tis in vain to cross the providence:
Dear Son, I take thee up into my heart;
Rise, daughter; this is a kind father's part.

HOST.
Why, Sir John, send for Spindles noise presently:  Ha, ert be
night, I'll serve the good Duke of Norfolk.

PRI.
Grass and hay, mine Host, let's live till we die, and be
merry, and there's an end.

SIR ARTHUR.
What, is breakfast ready, mine Host?

HOST.
Tis, my little Hebrew.

SIR ARTHUR.
Sirra, ride strait to Chesson Nunry,
Fetch thence my Lady; the house, I know,
By this time misses their young votary.
Come, knights, let's in!

BILBO.
I will to horse presently, sir.--A plague a my Lady, I shall
miss a good breakfast.  Smug, how chance you cut so plaguely
behind, Smug?

SMUG.
Stand away; I'll founder you else.

BILBO.
Farewell, Smug, thou art in another element.

SMUG.
I will be by and by; I will be Saint George again.

SIR ARTHUR.
Take heed the fellow do not hurt himself.

SIR RAPH.
Did we not last night find two S. Georges here?

FABELL.
Yes, Knights, this martialist was one of them.

CLARE.
Then thus conclude your night of merriment!

[Exeunt Omnes.]


FINIS















Produced by Norman Wolcott





ATLANTIS:  THE ANTEDILUVIAN WORLD.

BY IGNATIUS DONNELLY.

The world has made such comet-like advance
Lately on science, we may almost hope,
Before we die of sheer decay, to learn
Something about our infancy; when lived
That great, original, broad-eyed, sunken race,
Whose knowledge, like the sea-sustaining rocks,
Hath formed the base of this world's fluctuous lore
--FESTUS.

Frontpiece:  The Profile of Atlantis

CONTENTS.

PART I.

THE HISTORY OF ATLANTIS.

I. THE PURPOSE OF THE BOOK

II. PLATO'S HISTORY OF ATLANTIS

III. THE PROBABILITIES OF PLATO'S STORY

IV. WAS SUCH A CATASTROPHE POSSIBLE?

V. THE TESTIMONY OF THE SEA

VI. THE TESTIMONY OF THE FLORA AND FAUNA

PART II.

THE DELUGE.

I. THE DESTRUCTION OF ATLANTIS DESCRIBED IN THE DELUGE LEGENDS

II. THE DELUGE OF THE BIBLE

III. THE DELUGE OF THE CHALDEANS

IV. THE DELUGE LEGENDS OF OTHER NATIONS

V. THE DELUGE LEGENDS OF AMERICA

VI. SOME CONSIDERATION OF THE DELUGE LEGENDS

PART III

THE CIVILIZATION OP THE OLD WORLD AND NEW COMPARED.

I. CIVILIZATION AN INHERITANCE

II. THE IDENTITY OF THE CIVILIZATIONS OF THE OLD WORLD AND THE NEW

III. AMERICAN EVIDENCES OF INTERCOURSE WITH EUROPE OR ATLANTIS

IV. CORROBORATING CIRCUMSTANCES

V. THE QUESTION OF COMPLEXION

VI. GENESIS CONTAINS A HISTORY OF ATLANTIS

VII. THE:  ORIGIN OF OUR ALPHABET

VIII. THE BRONZE AGE IN EUROPE

IX. ARTIFICIAL DEFORMATION OF THE SKULL

PART IV.

THE MYTHOLOGIES OF THE OLD WORLD A RECOLLECTION OF ATLANTIS.

I. TRADITIONS OF ATLANTIS

II. THE KINGS OF ATLANTIS BECOME THE GODS OF THE GREEKS

III. THE GODS OF THE PHOENICIANS ALSO KINGS OF ATLANTIS

IV. THE GOD ODIN, WODEN, OR WOTAN

V. THE PYRAMID, THE CROSS, AND THE GARDEN OF EDEN

VI. GOLD AND SILVER THE SACRED METALS OF ATLANTIS

PART V.

THE COLONIES OF ATLANTIS.

I. THE CENTRAL AMERICAN AND MEXICAN COLONIES

II. THE EGYPTIAN COLONY

III. THE COLONIES OF THE MISSISSIPPI VALLEY

IV. THE IBERIAN COLONIES OF ATLANTIS

V. THE PERUVIAN COLONY

VI. THE AFRICAN COLONIES

VII. THE IRISH COLONIES FROM ATLANTIS

VIII. THE OLDEST SON OF NOAH

IX. THE ANTIQUITY OF SOME OF OUR GREAT INVENTIONS

X. THE ARYAN COLONIES FROM ATLANTIS

XI. ATLANTIS RECONSTRUCTED





PART I. THE HISTORY OF ATLANTIS.










CHAPTER I.

THE PURPOSE OF THE BOOK.





This book is an attempt to demonstrate several distinct and novel
propositions.  These are:

1. That there once existed in the Atlantic Ocean, opposite the mouth
of the Mediterranean Sea, a large island, which was the remnant of
an Atlantic continent, and known to the ancient world as Atlantis.

2. That the description of this island given by Plato is not, as
has been long supposed, fable, but veritable history.

3. That Atlantis was the region where man first rose from a state
of barbarism to civilization.

4. That it became, in the course of ages, a populous and mighty
nation, from whose overflowings the shores of the Gulf of Mexico,
the Mississippi River, the Amazon, the Pacific coast of South
America, the Mediterranean, the west coast of Europe and Africa, the
Baltic, the Black Sea, and the Caspian were populated by civilized
nations.

5. That it was the true Antediluvian world; the Garden of Eden;
the Gardens of the Hesperides; the Elysian Fields; the Gardens of
Alcinous; the Mesomphalos; the Olympos; the Asgard of the traditions
of the ancient nations; representing a universal memory of a great
land, where early mankind dwelt for ages in peace and happiness.

6. That the gods and goddesses of the ancient Greeks, the Phoenicians,
the Hindoos, and the Scandinavians were simply the kings, queens,
and heroes of Atlantis; and the acts attributed to them in mythology
are a confused recollection of real historical events.

7. That the mythology of Egypt and Peru represented the original
religion of Atlantis, which was sun-worship.

8. That the oldest colony formed by the Atlanteans was probably in
Egypt, whose civilization was a reproduction of that of the Atlantic
island.

9. That the implements of the "Bronze Age" of Europe were derived
from Atlantis.  The Atlanteans were also the first manufacturers
of iron.

10. That the Phoenician alphabet, parent of all the European
alphabets, was derived from au Atlantis alphabet, which was also
conveyed from Atlantis to the Mayas of Central America.

11. That Atlantis was the original seat of the Aryan or Indo-European
family of nations, as well as of the Semitic peoples, and possibly
also of the Turanian races.

12. That Atlantis perished in a terrible convulsion of nature, in
which the whole island sunk into the ocean, with nearly all its
inhabitants.

13. That a few persons escaped in ships and on rafts, and, carried
to the nations east and west the tidings of the appalling catastrophe,
which has survived to our own time in the Flood and Deluge legends
of the different nations of the old and new worlds.

If these propositions can be proved, they will solve many problems
which now perplex mankind; they will confirm in many respects the
statements in the opening chapters of Genesis; they will widen the
area of human history; they will explain the remarkable resemblances
which exist between the ancient civilizations found upon the opposite
shores of the Atlantic Ocean, in the old and new worlds; and they
will aid us to rehabilitate the fathers of our civilization, our
blood, and our fundamental ideas--the men who lived, loved, and
labored ages before the Aryans descended upon India, or the Phoenician
had settled in Syria, or the Goth had reached the shores of the
Baltic.

The fact that the story of Atlantis was for thousands of years
regarded as a fable proves nothing.  There is an unbelief which
grows out of ignorance, as well as a scepticism which is born of
intelligence.  The people nearest to the past are not always those
who are best informed concerning the past.

For a thousand years it was believed that the legends of the buried
cities of Pompeii and Herculaneum were myths:  they were spoken of
as "the fabulous cities." For a thousand years the educated world
did not credit the accounts given by Herodotus of the wonders of
the ancient civilizations of the Nile and of Chaldea.  He was called
"the father of liars." Even Plutarch sneered at him.  Now, in the
language of Frederick Schlegel, "the deeper and more comprehensive
the researches of the moderns have been, the more their regard
and esteem for Herodotus has increased." Buckle says, "His minute
information about Egypt and Asia Minor is admitted by all geographers."

There was a time when the expedition sent out by Pharaoh Necho to
circumnavigate Africa was doubted, because the explorers stated that
after they had progressed a certain distance the sun was north of
them; this circumstance, which then aroused suspicion, now proves
to us that the Egyptian navigators had really passed the equator,
and anticipated by 2100 years Vasquez de Gama in his discovery of
the Cape of Good Hope.

If I succeed in demonstrating the truth of the somewhat startling
propositions with which I commenced this chapter, it will only
be by bringing to bear upon the question of Atlantis a thousand
converging lines of light from a multitude of researches made by
scholars in different fields of modern thought.  Further investigations
and discoveries will, I trust, confirm the correctness of the
conclusions at which I have arrived.






CHAPTER II.

PLATO'S HISTORY OF ATLANTIS.





Plato has preserved for us the history of Atlantis.  If our views
are correct, it is one of the most valuable records which have come
down to us from antiquity.

Plato lived 400 years before the birth of Christ.  His ancestor,
Solon, was the great law-giver of Athens 600 years before the
Christian era.  Solon visited Egypt.  Plutarch says, "Solon attempted
in verse a large description, or rather fabulous account of the
Atlantic Island, which he had learned from the wise men of Sais,
and which particularly concerned the Athenians; but by reason
of his age, not want of leisure (as Plato would have it), he was
apprehensive the work would be too much for him, and therefore did
not go through with it.  These verses are a proof that business
was not the hinderance:

"'I grow in learning as I grow in age.'

And again:

"'Wine, wit, and beauty still their charms bestow,
Light all the shades of life, and cheer us as we go.'

"Plato, ambitious to cultivate and adorn the subject of the Atlantic
Island, as a delightful spot in some fair field unoccupied, to which
also be had some claim by reason of his being related to Solon,
laid out magnificent courts and enclosures, and erected a grand
entrance to it, such as no other story, fable, or Poem ever had.
But, as he began it late, he ended his life before the work, so
that the more the reader is delighted with the part that is written,
the more regret he has to find it unfinished."

There can be no question that Solon visited Egypt.  The causes of
his departure from Athens, for a period of ten years, are fully
explained by Plutarch.  He dwelt, be tells us,

"On the Canopian shore, by Nile's deep mouth."

There be conversed upon points of philosophy and history with the
most learned of the Egyptian priests.  He was a man of extraordinary
force and penetration of mind, as his laws and his sayings, which
have been preserved to us, testify.  There is no improbability in
the statement that be commenced in verse a history and description
of Atlantis, which be left unfinished at his death; and it requires
no great stretch of the imagination to believe that this manuscript
reached the bands of his successor and descendant, Plato; a scholar,
thinker, and historian like himself, and, like himself, one of the
profoundest minds of the ancient world. the Egyptian priest had
said to Solon, "You have no antiquity of history, and no history of
antiquity;" and Solon doubtless realized fully the vast importance
of a record which carried human history back, not only thousands
of years before the era of Greek civilization, but many thousands
of years before even the establishment of the kingdom of Egypt; and
be was anxious to preserve for his half-civilized countrymen this
inestimable record of the past.

We know of no better way to commence a book about Atlantis than by
giving in full the record preserved by Plato.  It is as follows:

'Critias'. Then listen, Socrates, to a strange tale, which is, however,
certainly true, as Solon, who was the wisest of the seven sages,
declared.  He was a relative and great friend of my great-grandfather,
Dropidas, as be himself says in several of his poems; and Dropidas
told Critias, my grandfather, who remembered, and told us, that
there were of old great and marvellous actions of the Athenians,
which have passed into oblivion through time and the destruction
of the human race and one in particular, which was the greatest
of them all, the recital of which will be a suitable testimony of
our gratitude to you....

'Socrates'. Very good; and what is. this ancient famous action of
which Critias spoke, not as a mere legend, but as a veritable action
of the Athenian State, which Solon recounted!

'Critias'. I will tell an old-world story which I heard from an
aged man; for Critias was, as be said, at that time nearly ninety
years of age, and I was about ten years of age.  Now the day was that
day of the Apaturia which is called the registration of youth; at
which, according to custom, our parents gave prizes for recitations,
and the poems of several poets were recited by us boys, and many
of us sung the poems of Solon, which were new at the time.  One of
our tribe, either because this was his real opinion, or because he
thought that he would please Critias, said that, in his judgment,
Solon was not only the wisest of men but the noblest of poets.  The
old man, I well remember, brightened up at this, and said, smiling:
"Yes, Amynander, if Solon had only, like other poets, made poetry
the business of his life, and had completed the tale which he brought
with him from Egypt, and had not been compelled, by reason of the
factions and troubles which he found stirring in this country when
he came home, to attend to other matters, in my opinion be would
have been as famous as Homer, or Hesiod, or any poet."

"And what was that poem about, Critias?" said the person who
addressed him.

"About the greatest action which the Athenians ever did, and which
ought to have been most famous, but which, through the lapse of
time and the destruction of the actors, has not come down to us."

"Tell us," said the other, "the whole story, and bow and from whom
Solon heard this veritable tradition."

He replied:  "At the head of the Egyptian Delta, where the river Nile
divides, there is a certain district which is called the district
of Sais, and the great city of the district is also called Sais,
and is the city from which Amasis the king was sprung.  And the
citizens have a deity who is their foundress:  she is called in
the Egyptian tongue Neith, which is asserted by them to be the same
whom the Hellenes called Athene.  Now, the citizens of this city
are great lovers of the Athenians, and say that they are in some
way related to them.  Thither came Solon, who was received by them
with great honor; and be asked the priests, who were most skilful
in such matters, about antiquity, and made the discovery that neither
he nor any other Hellene knew anything worth mentioning about the
times of old.  On one occasion, when he was drawing them on to
speak of antiquity, he began to tell about the most ancient things
in our part of the world--about Phoroneus, who is called 'the
first,' and about Niobe; and, after the Deluge, to tell of the
lives of Deucalion and Pyrrha; and he traced the genealogy of their
descendants, and attempted to reckon bow many years old were the
events of which he was speaking, and to give the dates.  Thereupon,
one of the priests, who was of very great age; said, 'O Solon,
Solon, you Hellenes are but children, and there is never an old man
who is an Hellene.' Solon, bearing this, said, 'What do you mean?'
'I mean to say,' he replied, 'that in mind you are all young;
there is no old opinion handed down among you by ancient tradition,
nor any science which is hoary with age.  And I will tell you the
reason of this:  there have been, and there will be again, many
destructions of mankind arising out of many causes.  There is a
story which even you have preserved, that once upon a time Phathon,
the son of Helios, having yoked the steeds in his father's chariot,
because he was not able to drive them in the path of his father,
burnt up all that was upon the earth, and was himself destroyed
by a thunderbolt.  Now, this has the form of a myth, but really
signifies a declination of the bodies moving around the earth and
in the heavens, and a great conflagration of things upon the earth
recurring at long intervals of time:  when this happens, those who
live upon the mountains and in dry and lofty places are more liable
to destruction than those who dwell by rivers or on the sea-shore;
and from this calamity the Nile, who is our never-failing savior,
saves and delivers us.  When, on the other hand, the gods purge the
earth with a deluge of water, among you herdsmen and shepherds on
the mountains are the survivors, whereas those of you who live in
cities are carried by the rivers into the sea; but in this country
neither at that time nor at any other does the water come from above
on the fields, having always a tendency to come up from below, for
which reason the things preserved here are said to be the oldest.
The fact is, that wherever the extremity of winter frost or of
summer sun does not prevent, the human race is always increasing
at times, and at other times diminishing in numbers.  And whatever
happened either in your country or in ours, or in any other region
of which we are informed--if any action which is noble or great,
or in any other way remarkable has taken place, all that has been
written down of old, and is preserved in our temples; whereas you
and other nations are just being provided with letters and the
other things which States require; and then, at the usual period,
the stream from heaven descends like a pestilence, and leaves only
those of you who are destitute of letters and education; and thus
you have to begin all over again as children, and know nothing of
what happened in ancient times, either among us or among yourselves.
As for those genealogies of yours which you have recounted to us,
Solon, they are no better than the tales of children; for, in the
first place, you remember one deluge only, whereas there were many
of them; and, in the next place, you do not know that there dwelt
in your land the fairest and noblest race of men which ever lived,
of whom you and your whole city are but a seed or remnant.  And
this was unknown to you, because for many generations the survivors
of that destruction died and made no sign.  For there was a time,
Solon, before that great deluge of all, when the city which now is
Athens was first in war, and was preeminent for the excellence of
her laws, and is said to have performed the noblest deeds, and to
have had the fairest constitution of any of which tradition tells,
under the face of heaven.' Solon marvelled at this, and earnestly
requested the priest to inform him exactly and in order about these
former citizens. 'You are welcome to hear about them, Solon,' said
the priest, 'both for your own sake and for that of the city; and,
above all, for the sake of the goddess who is the common patron and
protector and educator of both our cities.  She founded your city
a thousand years before ours, receiving from the Earth and Hephstus
the seed of your race, and then she founded ours, the constitution
of which is set down in our sacred registers as 8000 years old.
As touching the citizens of 9000 years ago, I will briefly inform
you of their laws and of the noblest of their actions; and the
exact particulars of the whole we will hereafter go through at
our leisure. in the sacred registers themselves.  If you compare
these very laws with your own, you will find that many of ours are
the counterpart of yours, as they were in the olden time.  In the
first place, there is the caste of priests, which is separated from
all the others; next there are the artificers, who exercise their
several crafts by themselves, and without admixture of any other;
and also there is the class of shepherds and that of hunters, as
well as that of husbandmen; and you will observe, too, that the
warriors in Egypt are separated from all the other classes, and are
commanded by the law only to engage in war; moreover, the weapons
with which they are equipped are shields and spears, and this the
goddess taught first among you, and then in Asiatic countries, and
we among the Asiatics first adopted.

"'Then, as to wisdom, do you observe what care the law took from
the very first, searching out and comprehending the whole order
of things down to prophecy and medicine (the latter with a view to
health); and out of these divine elements drawing what was needful
for human life, and adding every sort of knowledge which was
connected with them.  All this order and arrangement the goddess
first imparted to you when establishing your city; and she chose
the spot of earth in which you were born, because she saw that the
happy temperament of the seasons in that land would produce the
wisest of men.  Wherefore the goddess, who was a lover both of war
and of wisdom, selected, and first of all settled that spot which
was the most likely to produce men likest herself.  And there you
dwelt, having such laws as these and still better ones, and excelled
all mankind in all virtue, as became the children and disciples
of the gods.  Many great and wonderful deeds are recorded of your
State in our histories; but one of them exceeds all the rest in
greatness and valor; for these histories tell of a mighty power
which was aggressing wantonly against the whole of Europe and Asia,
and to which your city put an end.  This power came forth out of
the Atlantic Ocean, for in those days the Atlantic was navigable;
and there was an island situated in front of the straits which you
call the Columns of Heracles:  the island was larger than Libya and
Asia put together, and was the way to other islands, and from the
islands you might pass through the whole of the opposite continent
which surrounded the true ocean; for this sea which is within the
Straits of Heracles is only a harbor, having a narrow entrance,
but that other is a real sea, and the surrounding land may be most
truly called a continent.  Now, in the island of Atlantis there was
a great and wonderful empire, which had rule over the whole island
and several others, as well as over parts of the continent; and,
besides these, they subjected the parts of Libya within the Columns
of Heracles as far as Egypt, and of Europe as far as Tyrrhenia.
The vast power thus gathered into one, endeavored to subdue at one
blow our country and yours, and the whole of the land which was
within the straits; and then, Solon, your country shone forth,
in the excellence of her virtue and strength, among all mankind;
for she was the first in courage and military skill, and was the
leader of the Hellenes.  And when the rest fell off from her, being
compelled to stand alone, after having undergone the very extremity
of danger, she defeated and triumphed over the invaders, and
preserved from slavery those who were not yet subjected, and freely
liberated all the others who dwelt within the limits of Heracles.
But afterward there occurred violent earthquakes and floods, and
in a single day and night of rain all your warlike men in a body
sunk into the earth, and the island of Atlantis in like manner
disappeared, and was sunk beneath the sea.  And that is the reason
why the sea in those parts is impassable and impenetrable, because
there is such a quantity of shallow mud in the way; and this was
caused by the subsidence of the island.' ("Plato's Dialogues," ii.,
617, Timus.....

"But in addition to the gods whom you have mentioned, I would
specially invoke Mnemosyne; for all the important part of what I
have to tell is dependent on her favor, and if I can recollect and
recite enough of what was said by the priests, and brought hither
by Solon, I doubt not that I shall satisfy the requirements of this
theatre.  To that task, then, I will at once address myself.

"Let me begin by observing, first of all, that nine thousand was
the sum of years which had elapsed since the war which was said to
have taken place between all those who dwelt outside the Pillars
of Heracles and those who dwelt within them:  this war I am now
to describe.  Of the combatants on the one side the city of Athens
was reported to have been the ruler, and to have directed the
contest; the combatants on the other side were led by the kings of
the islands of Atlantis, which, as I was saying, once had an extent
greater than that of Libya and Asia; and, when afterward sunk
by an earthquake, became an impassable barrier of mud to voyagers
sailing from hence to the ocean.  The progress of the history will
unfold the various tribes of barbarians and Hellenes which then
existed, as they successively appear on the scene; but I must begin
by describing, first of all, the Athenians as they were in that
day, and their enemies who fought with them; and I shall have to
tell of the power and form of government of both of them.  Let us
give the precedence to Athens....

Many great deluges have taken place during the nine thousand years,
for that is the number of years which have elapsed since the time
of which I am speaking; and in all the ages and changes of things
there has never been any settlement of the earth flowing down from
the mountains, as in other places, which is worth speaking of; it
has always been carried round in a circle, and disappeared in the
depths below.  The consequence is that, in comparison of what then
was, there are remaining in small islets only the bones of the wasted
body, as they may be called, all the richer and softer parts of
the soil having fallen away, and the mere skeleton of the country
being left....

"And next, if I have not forgotten what I heard when I was a child,
I will impart to you the character and origin of their adversaries;
for friends should not keep their stories to themselves, but have
them in common.  Yet, before proceeding farther in the narrative,
I ought to warn you that you must not be surprised if you should
bear Hellenic names given to foreigners.  I will tell you the
reason of this:  Solon, who was intending to use the tale for his
poem, made an investigation into the meaning of the names, and
found that the early Egyptians, in writing them down, had translated
them into their own language, and be recovered the meaning of the
several names and retranslated them, and copied them out again in
our language.  My great-grandfather, Dropidas, had the original
writing, which is still in my possession, and was carefully studied
by me when I was a child.  Therefore, if you bear names such as are
used in this country, you must not be surprised, for I have told
you the reason of them.

"The tale, which was of great length, began as follows:  I have
before remarked, in speaking of the allotments of the gods, that
they distributed the whole earth into portions differing in extent,
and made themselves temples and sacrifices.  And Poseidon, receiving
for his lot the island of Atlantis, begat children by a mortal woman,
and settled them in a part of the island which I will proceed to
describe.  On the side toward the sea, and in the centre of the
whole island, there was a plain which is said to have been the
fairest of all plains, and very fertile.  Near the plain again,
and also in the centre of the island, at a distance of about fifty
stadia, there was a mountain, not very high on any side.  In this
mountain there dwelt one of the earth-born primeval men of that
country, whose name was Evenor, and he had a wife named Leucippe,
and they had an only daughter, who was named Cleito.  The maiden was
growing up to womanhood when her father and mother died; Poseidon
fell in love with her, and had intercourse with her; and, breaking
the ground, enclosed the hill in which she dwelt all round, making
alternate zones of sea and land, larger and smaller, encircling
one another; there were two of land and three of water, which he
turned as with a lathe out of the centre of the island, equidistant
every way, so that no man could get to the island, for ships and
voyages were not yet heard of.  He himself, as be was a god, found
no difficulty in making special arrangements for the centre island,
bringing two streams of water under the earth, which he caused to
ascend as springs, one of warm water and the other of cold, and
making every variety of food to spring up abundantly in the earth.
He also begat and brought up five pairs of male children, dividing
the island of Atlantis into ten portions:  he gave to the first-born
of the eldest pair his mother's dwelling and the surrounding
allotment, which was the largest and best, and made him king over
the rest; the others he made princes, and gave them rule over many
men and a large territory.  And he named them all:  the eldest,
who was king, he named Atlas, and from him the whole island and
the ocean received the name of Atlantic.  To his twin-brother, who
was born after him, and obtained as his lot the extremity of the
island toward the Pillars of Heracles, as far as the country which
is still called the region of Gades in that part of the world, be
gave the name which in the Hellenic language is Eumelus, in the
language of the country which is named after him, Gadeirus.  Of the
second pair of twins, he called one Ampheres and the other Evmon.
To the third pair of twins he gave the name Mneseus to the elder,
and Autochthon to the one who followed him.  Of the fourth pair
of twins he called the elder Elasippus and the younger Mestor, And
of the fifth pair be gave to the elder the name of Azaes, and to
the younger Diaprepes.  All these and their descendants were the
inhabitants and rulers of divers islands in the open sea; and also,
as has been already said, they held sway in the other direction
over the country within the Pillars as far as Egypt and Tyrrhenia.
Now Atlas had a numerous and honorable family, and his eldest branch
always retained the kingdom, which the eldest son handed on to his
eldest for many generations; and they had such an amount of wealth
as was never before possessed by kings and potentates, and is not
likely ever to be again, and they were furnished with everything
which they could have, both in city and country.  For, because of
the greatness of their empire, many things were brought to them
from foreign countries, and the island itself provided much of what
was required by them for the uses of life.  In the first place,
they dug out of the earth whatever was to be found there, mineral
as well as metal, and that which is now only a name, and was then
something more than a name--orichalcum--was dug out of the earth
in many parts of the island, and, with the exception of gold, was
esteemed the most precious of metals among the men of those days.
There was an abundance of wood for carpenters' work, and sufficient
maintenance for tame and wild animals.  Moreover, there were a
great number of elephants in the island, and there was provision
for animals of every kind, both for those which live in lakes and
marshes and rivers, and also for those which live in mountains and
on plains, and therefore for the animal which is the largest and
most voracious of them.  Also, whatever fragrant things there are
in the earth, whether roots, or herbage, or woods, or distilling
drops of flowers or fruits, grew and thrived in that land; and
again, the cultivated fruit of the earth, both the dry edible fruit
and other species of food, which we call by the general name of
legumes, and the fruits having a hard rind, affording drinks, and
meats, and ointments, and good store of chestnuts and the like,
which may be used to play with, and are fruits which spoil with
keeping--and the pleasant kinds of dessert which console us after
dinner, when we are full and tired of eating--all these that sacred
island lying beneath the sun brought forth fair and wondrous in
infinite abundance.  All these things they received from the earth,
and they employed themselves in constructing their temples, and
palaces, and harbors, and docks; and they arranged the whole country
in the following manner:  First of all they bridged over the zones
of sea which surrounded the ancient metropolis, and made a passage
into and out of they began to build the palace in the royal palace;
and then the habitation of the god and of their ancestors.  This
they continued to ornament in successive generations, every king
surpassing the one who came before him to the utmost of his power,
until they made the building a marvel to behold for size and for
beauty.  And, beginning from the sea, they dug a canal three hundred
feet in width and one hundred feet in depth, and fifty stadia in
length, which they carried through to the outermost zone, making a
passage from the sea up to this, which became a harbor, and leaving
an opening sufficient to enable the largest vessels to find ingress.
Moreover, they divided the zones of land which parted the zones of
sea, constructing bridges of such a width as would leave a passage
for a single trireme to pass out of one into another, and roofed
them over; and there was a way underneath for the ships, for the
banks of the zones were raised considerably above the water.  Now
the largest of the zones into which a passage was cut from the sea
was three stadia in breadth, and the zone of land which came next
of equal breadth; but the next two, as well the zone of water as
of land, were two stadia, and the one which surrounded the central
island was a stadium only in width.  The island in which the palace
was situated had a diameter of five stadia.  This, and the zones
and the bridge, which was the sixth part of a stadium in width,
they surrounded by a stone wall, on either side placing towers,
and gates on the bridges where the sea passed in.  The stone which
was used in the work they quarried from underneath the centre
island and from underneath the zones, on the outer as well as the
inner side.  One kind of stone was white, another black, and a
third red; and, as they quarried, they at the same time hollowed
out docks double within, having roofs formed out of the native
rock.  Some of their buildings were simple, but in others they put
together different stones, which they intermingled for the sake of
ornament, to be a natural source of delight.  The entire circuit
of the wall which went round the outermost one they covered with
a coating of brass, and the circuit of the next wall they coated
with tin, and the third, which encompassed the citadel flashed with
the red light of orichalcum.  The palaces in the interior of the
citadel were constructed in this wise:  In the centre was a holy
temple dedicated to Cleito and Poseidon, which remained inaccessible,
and was surrounded by an enclosure of gold; this was the spot in
which they originally begat the race of the ten princes, and thither
they annually brought the fruits of the earth in their season from
all the ten portions, and performed sacrifices to each of them.
Here, too, was Poiseidon's own temple, of a stadium in length and
half a stadium in width, and of a proportionate height, having
a sort of barbaric splendor.  All the outside of the temple, with
the exception of the pinnacles, they covered with silver, and the
pinnacles with gold.  In the interior of the temple the roof was
of ivory, adorned everywhere with gold and silver and orichalcum;
all the other parts of the walls and pillars and floor they lined
with orichalcum.  In the temple they placed statues of gold:  there
was the god himself standing in a chariot--the charioteer of six
winged horses--and of such a size that be touched the roof of the
building with his bead; around him there were a hundred Nereids
riding on dolphins, for such was thought to be the number of them
in that day.  There were also in the interior of the temple other
images which had been dedicated by private individuals.  And
around the temple on the outside were placed statues of gold of all
the ten kings and of their wives; and there were many other great
offerings, both of kings and of private individuals, coming both
from the city itself and the foreign cities over which they held
sway.  There was an altar, too, which in size and workmanship
corresponded to the rest of the work, and there were palaces in
like manner which answered to the greatness of the kingdom and the
glory of the temple.

"In the next place, they used fountains both of cold and hot springs;
these were very abundant, and both kinds wonderfully adapted to use
by reason of the sweetness and excellence of their waters.  They
constructed buildings about them, and planted suitable trees; also
cisterns, some open to the heaven, other which they roofed over, to
be used in winter as warm baths, there were the king's baths, and
the baths of private persons, which were kept apart; also separate
baths for women, and others again for horses and cattle, and to
them they gave as much adornment as was suitable for them.  The
water which ran off they carried, some to the grove of Poseidon,
where were growing all manner of trees of wonderful height and
beauty, owing to the excellence of the soil; the remainder was
conveyed by aqueducts which passed over the bridges to the outer
circles:  and there were many temples built and dedicated to many
gods; also gardens and places of exercise, some for men, and some
set apart for horses, in both of the two islands formed by the zones;
and in the centre of the larger of the two there was a race-course
of a stadium in width, and in length allowed to extend all round
the island, for horses to race in.  Also there were guard-houses
at intervals for the body-guard, the more trusted of whom had their
duties appointed to them in the lesser zone, which was nearer the
Acropolis; while the most trusted of all had houses given them
within the citadel, and about the persons of the kings.  The docks
were full of triremes and naval stores, and all things were quite
ready for use.  Enough of the plan of the royal palace.  Crossing
the outer harbors, which were three in number, you would come to a
wall which began at the sea and went all round:  this was everywhere
distant fifty stadia from the largest zone and harbor, and enclosed
the whole, meeting at the mouth of the channel toward the sea.  The
entire area was densely crowded with habitations; and the canal
and the largest of the harbors were full of vessels and merchants
coming from all parts, who, from their numbers, kept up a multitudinous
sound of human voices and din of all sorts night and day.  I have
repeated his descriptions of the city and the parts about the
ancient palace nearly as he gave them, and now I must endeavor to
describe the nature and arrangement of the rest of the country.
The whole country was described as being very lofty and precipitous
on the side of the sea, but the country immediately about
and surrounding the city was a level plain, itself surrounded by
mountains which descended toward the sea; it was smooth and even,
but of an oblong shape, extending in one direction three thousand
stadia, and going up the country from the sea through the centre
of the island two thousand stadia; the whole region of the island
lies toward the south, and is sheltered from the north.  The
surrounding mountains he celebrated for their number and size and
beauty, in which they exceeded all that are now to be seen anywhere;
having in them also many wealthy inhabited villages, and rivers and
lakes, and meadows supplying food enough for every animal, wild or
tame, and wood of various sorts, abundant for every kind of work.
I will now describe the plain, which had been cultivated during
many ages by many generations of kings.  It was rectangular, and
for the most part straight and oblong; and what it wanted of the
straight line followed the line of the circular ditch.  The depth
and width and length of this ditch were incredible and gave the
impression that such a work, in addition to so many other works,
could hardly have been wrought by the hand of man.  But I must
say what I have heard.  It was excavated to the depth of a hundred
feet, and its breadth was a stadium everywhere; it was carried
round the whole of the plain, and was ten thousand stadia in length.
It received the streams which came down from the mountains, and
winding round the plain, and touching the city at various points,
was there let off into the sea.  From above, likewise, straight
canals of a hundred feet in width were cut in the plain, and
again let off into the ditch, toward the sea; these canals were at
intervals of a Hundred stadia, and by them they brought, down the
wood from the mountains to the city, and conveyed the fruits of the
earth in ships, cutting transverse passages from one canal into
another, and to the city.  Twice in the year they gathered the
fruits of the earth--in winter having the benefit of the rains,
and in summer introducing the water of the canals.  As to the
population, each of the lots in the plain had an appointed chief
of men who were fit for military service, and the size of the lot
was to be a square of ten stadia each way, and the total number of
all the lots was sixty thousand.

"And of the inhabitants of the mountains and of the rest of the
country there was also a vast multitude having leaders, to whom
they were assigned according to their dwellings and villages.  The
leader was required to furnish for the war the sixth portion of
a war-chariot, so as to make up a total of ten thousand chariots;
also two horses and riders upon them, and a light chariot without
a seat, accompanied by a fighting man on foot carrying a small
shield, and having a charioteer mounted to guide the horses; also,
be was bound to furnish two heavy-armed men, two archers, two
slingers, three stone-shooters, and three javelin men, who were
skirmishers, and four sailors to make up a complement of twelve
hundred ships.  Such was the order of war in the royal city--that
of the other nine governments was different in each of them,
and would be wearisome to narrate.  As to offices and honors, the
following was the arrangement from the first:  Each of the ten
kings, in his own division and in his own city, had the absolute
control of the citizens, and in many cases of the laws, punishing
and slaying whomsoever be would.

"Now the relations of their governments to one another were regulated
by the injunctions of Poseidon as the law had handed them down.
These were inscribed by the first men on a column of orichalcum,
which was situated in the middle of the island, at the temple of
Poseidon, whither the people were gathered together every fifth and
sixth years alternately, thus giving equal honor to the odd and to
the even number.  And when they were gathered together they consulted
about public affairs, and inquired if any one had transgressed in
anything, and passed judgment on him accordingly--and before they
passed judgment they gave their pledges to one another in this wise:
There were bulls who had the range of the temple of Poseidon; and
the ten who were left alone in the temple, after they had offered
prayers to the gods that they might take the sacrifices which were
acceptable to them, hunted the bulls without weapons, but with
staves and nooses; and the bull which they caught they led up to
the column; the victim was then struck on the head by them, and
slain over the sacred inscription, Now on the column, besides the
law, there was inscribed an oath invoking mighty curses on the
disobedient.  When, therefore, after offering sacrifice according
to their customs, they had burnt the limbs of the bull, they mingled
a cup and cast in a clot of blood for each of them; the rest of the
victim they took to the fire, after having made a purification of
the column all round.  Then they drew from the cup in golden vessels,
and, pouring a libation on the fire, they swore t hat they would
judge according to the laws on the column, and would punish any
one who had previously transgressed, and that for the future they
would not, if they could help, transgress any of the inscriptions,
and would not command or obey any ruler who commanded them to act
otherwise than according to the laws of their father Poseidon.
This was the prayer which each of them offered up for himself and
for his family, at the same time drinking, and dedicating the vessel
in the temple of the god; and, after spending some necessary time
at supper, when darkness came on and the fire about the sacrifice
was cool, all of them put on most beautiful azure robes, and, sitting
on the ground at night near the embers of the sacrifices on which
they had sworn, and extinguishing all the fire about the temple,
they received and gave judgement, if any of them had any accusation
to bring against any one; and, when they had given judgment, at
daybreak they wrote down their sentences on a golden tablet, and
deposited them as memorials with their robes.  There were many special
laws which the several kings had inscribed about the temples, but
the most important was the following: That they were not to take up
arms against one another, and they were all to come to the rescue
if any one in any city attempted to over.  throw the royal house.
Like their ancestors, they were to deliberate in common about war
and other matters, giving the supremacy to the family of Atlas;
and the king was not to have the power of life and death over any
of his kinsmen, unless he had the assent of the majority of the
ten kings.

"Such was the vast power which the god settled in the lost island
of Atlantis; and this he afterward directed against our land on
the following pretext, as traditions tell:  For many generations,
as long as the divine nature lasted in them, they were obedient
to the laws, and well-affectioned toward the gods, who were their
kinsmen; for they possessed true and in every way great spirits,
practising gentleness and wisdom in the various chances of life,
and in their intercourse with one another.  They despised everything
but virtue, not caring for their present state of life, arid thinking
lightly on the possession of gold and other property, which seemed
only a burden to them; neither were they intoxicated by luxury;
nor did wealth deprive them of their self-control; but they were
sober, and saw clearly that all these goods are increased by virtuous
friendship with one another, and that by excessive zeal for them,
and honor of them, the good of them is lost, and friendship perishes
with them.

"By such reflections, and by the continuance in them of a divine
nature, all that which we have described waxed and increased in
them; but when this divine portion began to fade away in them, and
became diluted too often, and with too much of the mortal admixture,
and the human nature got the upper-hand, then, they being unable
to bear their fortune, became unseemly, and to him who had an eye
to see, they began to appear base, and had lost the fairest of
their precious gifts; but to those who had no eye to see the true
happiness, they still appeared glorious and blessed at the very time
when they were filled with unrighteous avarice and power.  Zeus,
the god of gods, who rules with law, and is able to see into such
things, perceiving that an honorable race was in a most wretched
state, and wanting to inflict punishment on them, that they might
be chastened and improved, collected all the gods into his most
holy habitation, which, being placed in the centre of the world,
sees all things that partake of generation.  And when he had called
them together he spake as follows:"

[Here Plato's story abruptly ends.]






CHAPTER III.

THE PROBABILITIES OF PLATO'S STORY.





There is nothing improbable in this narrative, so far as it describes
a great, rich, cultured, and educated people.  Almost every part
of Plato's story can be paralleled by descriptions of the people
of Egypt or Peru; in fact, in some respects Plato's account of
Atlantis falls short of Herodotus's description of the grandeur
of Egypt, or Prescott's picture of the wealth and civilization of
Peru.  For instance, Prescott, in his "Conquest of Peru" (vol. i.,
p. 95), says:

"The most renowned of the Peruvian temples, the pride of the
capital and the wonder of the empire, was at Cuzco, where, under
the munificence of successive sovereigns, it had become so enriched
that it received the name of 'Coricancha', or 'the Place of Gold.....
The interior of the temple was literally a mine of gold.  On the
western wall was emblazoned a representation of the Deity, consisting
of a human countenance looking forth from amid innumerable rays of
light, which emanated from it in every direction, in the same manner
as the sun is often personified with us.  The figure was engraved
on a massive plate of gold, of enormous dimensions, thickly powdered
with emeralds and precious stones....  The walls and ceilings
were everywhere incrusted with golden ornaments; every part of the
interior of the temple glowed with burnished plates and studs of
the precious metal; the cornices were of the same material."

There are in Plato's narrative no marvels; no myths; no tales of
gods, gorgons, hobgoblins, or giants.  It is a plain and reasonable
history of a people who built temples, ships, and canals; who lived
by agriculture and commerce:  who in pursuit of trade, reached
out to all the countries around them.  The early history of most
nations begins with gods and demons, while here we have nothing of
the kind; we see an immigrant enter the country, marry one of the
native women, and settle down; in time a great nation grows up
around him.  It reminds one of the information given by the Egyptian
priests to Herodotus. "During the space of eleven thousand three
hundred and fort years they assert," says Herodotus, "that no
divinity has appeared in human shape....  they absolutely denied
the possibility of a human being's descent from a god." If Plato
had sought to draw from his imagination a wonderful and pleasing
story, we should not have had so plain and reasonable a narrative.
He would have given us a history like the legends of Greek mythology,
full of the adventures of gods and goddesses, nymphs, fauns, and
satyrs.

Neither is there any evidence on the face of this history that
Plato sought to convey in it a moral or political lesson, in the
guise of a fable, as did Bacon in the "New Atlantis," and More in
the "Kingdom of Nowhere." There is no ideal republic delineated
here.  It is a straightforward, reasonable history of a people ruled
over by their kings, living and progressing as other nations have
lived and progressed since their day.

Plato says that in Atlantis there was "a great and wonderful
empire," which "aggressed wantonly against the whole of Europe and
Asia," thus testifying to the extent of its dominion.  It not only
subjugated Africa as far as Egypt, and Europe as far as Italy,
but it ruled "as well 'over parts of the continent'," to wit, "the
opposite continent" of America, "which surrounded the true ocean."
Those parts of America over which it ruled were, as we will show
hereafter, Central America, Peru, and the Valley of the Mississippi,
occupied by the "Mound Builders."

Moreover, be tells us that "this vast power was gathered into one;"
that is to say, from Egypt to Peru it was one consolidated empire.
We will see hereafter that the legends of the Hindoos as to Deva
Nahusha distinctly refer to this vast empire, which covered the
whole of the known world.

Another corroboration of the truth of Plato's narrative is found
in the fact that upon the Azores black lava rocks, and rocks red
and white in color, are now found.  He says they built with white,
red, and black stone.  Sir C. Wyville Thomson describes a narrow
neck of land between Fayal and Monte da Guia, called "Monte
Queimada" (the burnt mountain), as follows:  "It is formed partly
of stratified tufa of a dark chocolate color, and partly of lumps
of 'black' lava, porous, and each with a large cavity in the centre,
which must have been ejected as volcanic bombs in a glorious display
of fireworks at some period beyond the records of Acorean history,
but late in the geological annals of the island" ("Voyage of the
Challenger," vol. ii., p. 24). He also describes immense walls of
black volcanic rock in the island.

The plain of Atlantis, Plato tells us, "had been cultivated
during many ages by many generations of kings." If, as we believe,
agriculture, the domestication of the horse, ox, sheep, goat, and
bog, and the discovery or development of wheat, oats, rye, and barley
originated in this region, then this language of Plato in reference
to "the many ages, and the successive generations of kings," accords
with the great periods of time which were necessary to bring man
from a savage to a civilized condition.

In the great ditch surrounding the whole land like a circle, and
into which streams flowed down from the mountains, we probably see
the original of the four rivers of Paradise, and the emblem of the
cross surrounded by a circle, which, as we will show hereafter,
was, from the earliest pre-Christian ages, accepted as the emblem
of the Garden of Eden.

We know that Plato did not invent the name of Poseidon, for the
worship of Poseidon was universal in the earliest ages of Europe;
"Poseidon-worship seems to have been a peculiarity of all the
colonies previous to the time of Sidon" ("Prehistoric Nations," p.
148.) This worship "was carried to Spain, and to Northern Africa,
but most abundantly to Italy, to many of the islands, and to the
regions around the gean Sea; also to Thrace." ('Ibid'., p. 155.)

Poseidon, or Neptune, is represented in Greek mythology as a
sea-god; but he is figured as standing in a war-chariot drawn by
horses.  The association of the horse (a land animal) with a sea-god
is inexplicable, except with the light given by Plato.  Poseidon
was a sea-god because he ruled over a great land in the sea, and
was the national god of a maritime people; be is associated with
horses, because in Atlantis the horse was first domesticated; and,
as Plato shows, the Atlanteans had great race-courses for the
development of speed in horses; and Poseidon is represented as
standing in a war-chariot, because doubtless wheeled vehicles were
first invented by the same people who tamed the horse; and they
transmitted these war-chariots to their descendants from Egypt
to Britain.  We know that horses were the favorite objects chosen
for sacrifice to Poseidon by the nations of antiquity within the
Historical Period; they were killed, and cast into the sea from high
precipices.  The religious horse-feasts of the pagan Scandinavians
were a survival of this Poseidon-worship, which once prevailed along
all the coasts of Europe; they continued until the conversion of
the people to Christianity, and were then suppressed by the Church
with great difficulty.

We find in Plato's narrative the names of some of the Phoenician
deities among the kings of Atlantis.  Where did the Greek, Plato,
get these names if the story is a fable?

Does Plato, in speaking of "the fruits having a hard rind, affording
drinks and meats and ointments," refer to the cocoa nut?

Again:  Plato tells us that Atlantis abounded in both cold and hot
springs.  How did he come to hit upon the hot springs if be was
drawing a picture from his imagination? It is a singular confirmation
of his story that hot springs abound in the Azores, which are the
surviving fragments of Atlantis; and an experience wider than that
possessed by Plato has taught scientific men that hot springs are
a common feature of regions subject to volcanic convulsions.

Plato tells us, "The whole country was very lofty and precipitous
on the side of the sea, but the country immediately about
and surrounding the city was a level plain, itself surrounded by
mountains which descended toward the sea." One has but to look at
the profile of the "Dolphin's Ridge," as revealed by the deep-sea
soundings of the Challenger, given as the frontispiece to this
volume, to see that this is a faithful description of that precipitous
elevation. "The surrounding mountains," which sheltered the plain
from the north, are represented in the present towering peaks of
the Azores.

Plato tells us that the destruction of Atlantis filled the sea
with mud, and interfered with navigation.  For thousands of years
the ancients believed the Atlantic Ocean to be "a muddy, shallow,
dark, and misty sea, 'Mare tenebrosum'." ("Cosmos," vol. ii., p.
151.)

The three-pronged sceptre or trident of Poseidon reappears constantly
in ancient history.  We find it in the hands of Hindoo gods, and
at the base of all the religious beliefs of antiquity.

"Among the numerals the sacred three has ever been considered the
mark of perfection, and was therefore exclusively ascribed to the
Supreme Deity, or to its earthly representative--a king, emperor,
or any sovereign.  For this reason triple emblems of various shapes
are found on the belts, neckties, or any encircling fixture, as can
be seen on the works of ancient art in Yucatan, Guatemala, Chiapas,
Mexico, etc., whenever the object has reference to divine supremacy."
(Dr.  Arthur Schott, "Smith.  Rep.," 1869, p. 391.)

We are reminded of the, "tiara," and the "triple round of sovereignty."

In the same manner the ten kingdoms of Atlantis are perpetuated in
all the ancient traditions.

"In the number given by the Bible for the Antediluvian patriarchs we
have the first instance of a striking agreement with the traditions
of various nations.  Ten are mentioned in the Book of Genesis.
Other nations, to whatever epoch they carry back their ancestors,
whether before or after the Deluge, whether the mythical or historical
character prevail, they are constant to this sacred number ten,
which some have vainly attempted to connect with the speculations
of later religious philosophers on the mystical value of numbers.
In Chaldea, Berosus enumerates ten Antediluvian kings whose fabulous
reign extended to thousands of years.  The legends of the Iranian
race commence with the.  reign of ten Peisdadien (Poseidon?) kings,
'men of the ancient law, who lived on pure Homa (water of life)'
(nectar?), 'and who preserved their sanctity.' In India we meet
with the nine Brahmadikas, who, with Brahma, their founder, make
ten, and who are called the Ten Petris, or Fathers.  The Chinese
count ten emperors, partakers of the divine nature, before the dawn
of historical times.  The Germans believed in the ten ancestors
of Odin, and the Arabs in the ten mythical kings of the Adites."
(Lenormant and Chevallier, "Anc.  Hist. of the East," vol. i., p.
13.)

The story of Plato finds confirmation from other sources.

An extract preserved in Proclus, taken from a work now lost, which
is quoted by Boeckh in his commentary on Plato, mentions islands
in the exterior sea, beyond the Pillars of Hercules, and says it
was known that in one of these islands "the inhabitants preserved
from their ancestors a remembrance of Atlantis, all extremely large
island, which for a long time held dominion over all the islands
of the Atlantic Ocean."

lian, in his "Varia Historia" (book iii., chap. xviii.), tells us
that Theopompus (400 B.C.) related the particulars of an interview
between Midas, King of Phrygia, and Silenus, in which Silenus
reported the existence of a great continent beyond the Atlantic,
"larger than Asia, Europe, and Libya together." He stated that a
race of men called Meropes dwelt there, and had extensive cities.
They were persuaded that their country alone was a continent.  Out of
curiosity some of them crossed the ocean and visited the Hyperboreans.

"The Gauls possessed traditions upon the subject of Atlantis which
were collected by the Roman historian Timagenes, who lived in the
first century before Christ.  He represents that three distinct
people dwelt in Gaul:  1. The indigenous population, which I suppose
to be Mongoloids, who had long dwelt in Europe; 2. The invaders
from a distant island, which I understand to be Atlantis; 3. The
Aryan Gauls." ("Preadamites," p. 380.)

Marcellus, in a work on the Ethiopians, speaks of seven islands lying
in the Atlantic Ocean--probably the Canaries--and the inhabitants
of these islands, he says, preserve the memory of a much greater
island, Atlantis, "which had for a long time exercised dominion
over the smaller ones." (Didot Mller, "Fragmenta Historicorum
Grcorum," vol. iv., p.  443.)

Diodorus Siculus relates that the Phoenicians discovered "a large
island in the Atlantic Ocean, beyond the Pillars of Hercules, several
days' sail from the coast of Africa.  This island abounded in all
manner of riches.  The soil was exceedingly fertile; the scenery was
diversified by rivers, mountains, and forests.  It was the custom
of the inhabitants to retire during the summer to magnificent
country-houses, which stood in the midst of beautiful gardens.  Fish
and game were found in great abundance; the climate was delicious,
and the trees bore fruit at all seasons of the year." Homer,
Plutarch, and other ancient writers mention islands situated in the
Atlantic, "several thousand stadia from the Pillars of Hercules."
Silenus tells Midas that there was another continent besides
Europe, Asia, and Africa--"a country where gold and silver are so
plentiful that they are esteemed no more than we esteem iron." St.
Clement, in his Epistle to the Corinthians, says that there were
other worlds beyond the ocean.

Attention may here be called to the extraordinary number of instances
in which allusion is made in the Old Testament to the "islands of
the sea," especially in Isaiah and Ezekiel.  What had an inland
people, like the Jews, to do with seas and islands? Did these
references grow out of vague traditions linking their race with
"islands in the sea?"

The Orphic Argonaut sings of the division of the ancient Lyktonia
into separate islands.  He says," When the dark-haired Poseidon, in
anger with Father Kronion, struck Lyktonia with the golden trident."

Plato states that the Egyptians told Solon that the destruction of
Atlantis occurred 9000 years before that date, to wit, about 9600
years before the Christian era.  This looks like an extraordinarily
long period of time, but it must be remembered that geologists
claim that the remains of man found in the caves of Europe date
back 500,000 years; and the fossil Calaveras skull was found deep
under the base of Table Mountain, California, the whole mountain
having been formed since the man to whom it belonged lived and
died.

"M. Oppert read an essay at the Brussels Congress to show, from
the astronomical observations of the Egyptians and Assyrians,
that 11,542 years before our era man existed on the earth at such
a stage of civilization as to be able to take note of astronomical
phenomena, and to calculate with considerable accuracy the length
of the year.  The Egyptians, says he, calculated by cycles of 1460
years--zodiacal cycles, as they were called.  Their year consisted
of 365 days, which caused them to lose one day in every four
solar years, and, consequently, they would attain their original
starting-point again only after 1460 years (365 x 4). Therefore,
the zodiacal cycle ending in the year 139 of our era commenced in
the year 1322 B.C. On the other hand, the Assyrian cycle was 1805
years, or 22,325 lunations.  An Assyrian cycle began 712 B.C.  The
Chaldeans state that between the Deluge and their first historic
dynasty there was a period of 39,180 years.  Now, what means, this
number? It stands for 12 Egyptian zodiacal cycles 'plus' 12 Assyrian
lunar cycles.

+--------------------+----------+
| 12 X 1460 = 17,52.... ....
+--------------------+----------+
....  ....   ....  39,180 |
+--------------------+----------+
| 12 X 1805 = 21,66.... ....
+--------------------+----------+

"These two modes of calculating time are in agreement with each
other, and were known simultaneously to one people, the Chaldeans.
Let us now build up the series of both cycles, starting from our
era, and the result will be as follows:

+-----------------+--------------+
| Zodiacal Cycle. | Lunar Cycle. |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 1,46......  | 1,80....   |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 1,82......  | 71.......
+-----------------+--------------+
| ____......  | ____....   |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 2,78......  | 2,51....   |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 4,24......  | 4,32....   |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 5,70......  | 6,12....   |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 7,16......  | 7,93....   |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 8,62......  | 9,73....   |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 110,08....... 11,54....  |
+-----------------+--------------+
| 11,54....   ....  ....   |
+-----------------+--------------+

"At the year 11,542 B.C. the two cycles came together, and
consequently they had on that year their common origin in one and
the same astronomical observation."

That observation was probably made in Atlantis.

The wide divergence of languages which is found to exist among
the Atlanteans at the beginning of the Historical Period implies
a vast lapse of time.  The fact that the nations of the Old World
remembered so little of Atlantis, except the colossal fact of its
sudden and overwhelming destruction, would also seem to remove that
event into a remote past.

Herodotus tells us that he learned from the Egyptians that Hercules
was one of their most ancient deities, and that he was one of the
twelve produced from the eight gods, 17,000 years before the reign
of Amasis.

In short, I fail to see why this story of Plato, told as history,
derived from the Egyptians, a people who, it is known, preserved
most ancient records, and who were able to trace their existence
back to a vast antiquity, should have been contemptuously set aside
as a fable by Greeks, Romans, and the modern world.  It can only
be because our predecessors, with their limited knowledge of the
geological history of the world, did not believe it possible that
any large. part of the earth's surface could have been thus suddenly
swallowed up by the sea.

Let us then first address ourselves to that question.






CHAPTER IV.

WAS SUCH A CATASTROPHE POSSIBLE?





All that is needed to answer this question is to briefly refer to
some of the facts revealed by the study of geology.

In the first place, the earth's surface is a record of successive
risings and fallings of the land.  The accompanying picture represents
a section of the anthracite coal-measures of Pennsylvania.  Each
of the coal deposits here shown, indicated by the black lines,
was created when the land had risen sufficiently above the sea
to maintain vegetation; each of the strata of rock, many of them
hundreds of feet in thickness, was deposited under water.  Here we
have twenty-three different changes of the level of the land during
the formation of 2000 feet of rock and coal; and these changes took
place over vast areas, embracing thousands of square miles.

All the continents which now exist were, it is well understood,
once, under water, and the rocks of which they are composed were
deposited beneath the water; more than this, most of the rocks so
deposited were the detritus or washings of other continents, which
then stood where the oceans now roll, and whose mountains and plains
were ground down by the action of volcanoes and earthquakes, and
frost, ice, wind, and rain, and washed into the sea, to form the
rocks upon which the nations now dwell; so that we have changed
the conditions of land and water:  that which is now continent was
once sea, and that which is now sea was formerly continent.  There
can be no question that the Australian Archipelago is simply the
mountain-tops of a drowned continent, which once reached from India
to South America.  Science has gone so far as to even give it a
name; it is called "Lemuria," and here, it is claimed, the human
race originated.  An examination of the geological formation of
our Atlantic States proves beyond a doubt, from the manner in which
the sedimentary rocks, the sand, gravel, and mud--aggregating a
thickness of 45,000 feet--are deposited, that they came from the
north and east. "They represent the detritus of pre-existing lands,
the washings of rain, rivers, coast-currents, and other agencies
of erosion; and since the areas supplying the waste could scarcely
have been of less extent than the new strata it formed, it is
reasonably inferred that land masses of continental magnitude must
have occupied the region now covered by the North Atlantic before
America began to be, and onward at least through the palozoic
ages of American history.  The proof of this fact is that the great
strata of rocks are thicker the nearer we approach their source
in the east:  the maximum thickness of the palozoic rocks of the
Appalachian formation is 25,000 to 35,000 feet in Pennsylvania and
Virginia, while their minimum thickness in Illinois and Missouri
is from 3000 to 4000 feet; the rougher and grosser-textured rocks
predominate in the east, while the farther west we go the finer the
deposits were of which the rocks are composed; the finer materials
were carried farther west by the water." ("New Amer.  Cyclop.,"
art. 'Coal'.)

DESTRUCTION OF POMPEII

The history of the growth of the European Continent, as recounted
by Professor Geikie, gives an instructive illustration of the
relations of geology to geography.  The earliest European land, he
says, appears to have existed in the north and north-west, comprising
Scandinavia, Finland, and the northwest of the British area, and
to have extended thence through boreal and arctic latitudes into
North America.  Of the height and mass of this primeval land some
idea may be formed by considering the enormous bulk of the material
derived from its disintegration.  In the Silurian formations of
the British Islands alone there is a mass of rock, worn from the
land, which would form a mountain-chain extending from Marseilles
to the North Cape (1800 miles), with a mean breadth of over
thirty-three miles, and an average height of 16,000 feet.

As the great continent which stood where the Atlantic Ocean now is
wore away, the continents of America and Europe were formed; and
there seems to have been from remote times a continuous rising,
still going on, of the new lands, and a sinking of the old ones.
Within five thousand years, or since the age of the "polished
stone," the shores of Sweden, Denmark, and Norway have risen from
200 to 600 feet.

Professor Winchell says ("The Preadamites," p. 437):

We are in the midst of great, changes, and are scarcely conscious of
it.  We have seen worlds in flames, and have felt a cornet strike
the earth.  We have seen the whole coast of South America lifted up
bodily ten or fifteen feet and let down again in an hour.  We have
seen the Andes sink 220 feet in seventy years... Vast transpositions
have taken place in the coast-line of China.  The ancient capital,
located, in all probability, in an accessible position near the
centre of the empire, has now become nearly surrounded by water,
and its site is on the peninsula of Corea....  There was a time
when the rocky barriers of the Thracian Bosphorus gave way and the
Black Sea subsided.  It had covered a vast area in the north and
east.  Now this area became drained, and was known as the ancient
Lectonia:  it is now the prairie region of Russia, and the granary
of Europe."

There is ample geological evidence that at one time the entire area
of Great Britain was 'submerged to the depth of at least seventeen
hundred feet'. Over the face of the submerged land was strewn thick
beds of sand, gravel, and clay, termed by geologists "the Northern
Drift." The British Islands rose again from the sea, bearing these
water-deposits on their bosom.  What is now Sicily once lay deep
beneath the sea:  A subsequently rose 3000 feet above the sea-level.
The Desert of Sahara was once under water, and its now burning
sands are a deposit of the sea.

Geologically speaking, the submergence of Atlantis, within the
historical period, was simply the last of a number of vast changes,
by which the continent which once occupied the greater part of the
Atlantic had gradually sunk under the ocean, while the new lands
were rising on both sides of it.

We come now to the second question, Is it possible that Atlantis
could have been suddenly destroyed by such a convulsion of nature
as is described by Plato? The ancients regarded this part of
his story as a fable.  With the wider knowledge which scientific
research has afforded the modern world, we can affirm that such an
event is not only possible, but that the history of even the last
two centuries has furnished us with striking parallels for it.
We now possess the record of numerous islands lifted above the
waters, and others sunk beneath the waves, accompanied by storms
and earthquakes similar to those which marked the destruction of
Atlantis.

In 1783 Iceland was visited by convulsions more tremendous than
any recorded in the modern annals of that country.  About a month
previous to the eruption on the main-land a submarine volcano burst
forth in the sea, at a distance of thirty miles from the shore.
It ejected so much pumice that the sea was covered with it for a
distance of 150 miles, and ships were considerably impeded in their
course.  A new island was thrown up, consisting of high cliffs,
which was claimed by his Danish Majesty, and named "Nye," or the
New Island; but before a year had elapsed it sunk beneath the sea,
leaving a reef of rocks thirty fathoms under water.

The earthquake of 1783 in Iceland destroyed 9000 people out of
a population of 50,000; twenty villages were consumed by fire or
inundated by water, and a mass of lava thrown out greater than the
entire bulk of Mont Blanc."

On the 8th of October, 1822, a great earthquake occurred on the
island of Java, near the mountain of Galung Gung. "A loud explosion
was heard, the earth shook, and immense columns of hot water and
boiling mud, mixed with burning brimstone, ashes, and lapilli, of
the size of nuts, were projected from the mountain like a water-spout,
with such prodigious violence that large quantities fell beyond the
river Tandoi, which is forty miles distant....  The first eruption
lasted nearly five hours; and on the following days the rain fell
ill torrents, and the rivers, densely charged with mud, deluged
the country far and wide.  At the end of four days (October 12th),
a second eruption occurred, more violent than the first, in which
hot water and mud were again vomited, and great blocks of basalt
were thrown to the distance of seven miles from the volcano.  There
was at the same time a violent earthquake, the face of the mountain
was utterly changed, its summits broken down, and one side, which
had been covered with trees, became an enormous gulf in the form
of a semicircle.  Over 4000 persons were killed and 114 villages
destroyed." (Lyell's "Principles of Geology," p. 430.)

In 1831 a new island was born in the Mediterranean, near the coast
of Sicily.  It was called Graham's Island.  It came up with an
earthquake, and "a water-spout sixty feet high and eight hundred
yards in circumference rising from the sea." In about a month the
island was two hundred feet high and three miles in circumference;
it soon, however, stink beneath the sea.

The Canary Islands were probably a part of the original empire of
Atlantis.  On the 1st of September, 1730, the earth split open near
Year, in the island of Lancerota.  In one night a considerable hill
of ejected matter was thrown up; in a few days another vent opened
and gave out a lava stream which overran several villages.  It
flowed at first rapidly, like water, but became afterward heavy and
slow, like honey.  On the 11th of September more lava flowed out,
covering up a village, and precipitating itself with a horrible
roar into the sea.  Dead fish floated on the waters in indescribable
multitudes, or were thrown dying on the shore; the cattle throughout
the country dropped lifeless to the ground, suffocated by putrid
vapors, which condensed and fell down in drops.  These manifestations
were accompanied by a storm such as the people of the country had
never known before.  These dreadful commotions lasted for 'five
years'. The lavas thrown out covered 'one-third of the whole island
of Lancerota'.

CALABRIAN PEASANTS INGULFED BY CREVASSES (1783).

The Gulf of Santorin, in the Grecian Archipelago, has been for
two thousand years a scene of active volcanic operations.  Pliny
informs us that in the year 186 B.C. the island of "Old Kaimeni,"
or the Sacred Isle, was lifted up from the sea; and in A.D. 19 the
island of "Thia" (the Divine) made its appearance.  In A.D. 1573
another island was created, called "the small sunburnt island."
In 1848 a volcanic convulsion of three months' duration created a
great shoal; an earthquake destroyed many houses in Thera, and the
sulphur and hydrogen issuing from the sea killed 50 persons and
1000 domestic animals.  A recent examination of these islands shows
that the whole mass of Santorin 'has sunk, since its projection
from the sea, over' 1200 'feet'.

The fort and village of Sindree, on the eastern arm of the Indus,
above Luckput, was submerged in 1819 by an earthquake, together
with a tract of country 2000 square miles in extent.

"In 1828 Sir A. Burnes went in a boat to the ruins of Sindree, where
a single remaining tower was seen in the midst of a wide expanse of
sea.  The tops of the ruined walls still rose two or three feet
above the level of the water; and, standing on one of these, he could
behold nothing in the horizon but water, except in one direction,
where a blue streak of land to the north indicated the Ullah Bund.
This scene," says Lyell ("Principles of Geology," p. 462), "presents
to the imagination a lively picture of the revolutions now in
progress on the earth-a waste of waters where a few years before all
was land, and the only land visible consisting of ground uplifted
by a recent earthquake."

We give from Lyell's great work the following curious pictures of
the appearance of the Fort of Sindree before and after the inundation.

FORT OF SINDEE, ON THE EASTERN BRANCH OF THE INDUS, BEFORE IT WAS
SUBMERGED BY THE EARTHQUAKE OF 1819.

In April, 1815, one of the most frightful eruptions recorded
in history occurred in the province of Tomboro, in the island
of Sumbawa, about two hundred miles from the eastern extremity of
Java.  It lasted from April 5th to July of that year; but was most
violent on the 11th and 12th of July.  The sound of the explosions
was heard for nearly one thousand miles. 'Out of a population of'
12,000', in the province of Tombora, only twenty-six individuals
escaped'. "Violent whirlwinds carried up men, horses, and cattle
into the air, tore tip the largest trees by the roots, and covered
the whole sea with floating timber." (Raffles's "History of Java,"
vol. i., p. 28.) 'The ashes darkened the air'; "the floating cinders
to the westward of Sumatra formed, on the 12th of April, a mass two
feet thick and several miles in extent, 'through which ships with
difficulty forced their way'." The darkness in daytime was more
profound than the blackest night. "The town called Tomboro, on the
west side of Sumbawa, was overflowed by the sea, which encroached
upon the shore, 'so that the water remained permanently eighteen
feet deep in places where there was land before'. The area covered
by the convulsion was 1000 English miles in circumference. "'In the
island of Amboyna, in the same month and year, the ground opened,
threw out water and then closed again'." (Raffles's "History of
Java," vol. i., p. 25.)

VIEW OF THE FORT OF SINDREE FROM THE WEST IN MARCH, 1839.

But it is at that point of the European coast nearest to the site
of Atlantis at Lisbon that the most tremendous earthquake of modern
times has occurred.  On the 1st of November, 1775, a sound of
thunder was heard underground, and immediately afterward a violent
shock threw down the greater part of the city. 'In six minutes
60,000 persons perished'. A great concourse of people had collected
for safety upon a new quay, built entirely of marble; but suddenly
it sunk down with all the people on it, and not one of the dead
bodies ever floated to the surface.  A great number of small boats
and vessels anchored near it, and, full of people, were swallowed
up as in a whirlpool.  No fragments of these wrecks ever rose again
to the surface; the water where the quay went down is now 600 feet
deep.  The area covered by this earthquake was very great.  Humboldt
says that a portion of 'the earth's surface, four times as great as
the size of Europe, was simultaneously shaken'. It extended from
the Baltic to the West Indies, and from Canada to Algiers.  At eight
leagues from Morocco the ground opened and swallowed a village of
10,000 inhabitants, and closed again over them.

It is very probable that the centre of the convulsion was in the
bed of the Atlantic, at or near the buried island of Atlantis, and
that it was a successor of the great earth throe which, thousands
of years before, had brought destruction upon that land.

ERUPTION OF VESUVIUS IN 1737.

Ireland also lies near the axis of this great volcanic area,
reaching from the Canaries to Iceland, and it has been many times
in the past the seat of disturbance.  The ancient annals contain
numerous accounts of eruptions, preceded by volcanic action.  In
1490, at the Ox Mountains, Sligo, one occurred by which one hundred
persons and numbers of cattle were destroyed; and a volcanic
eruption in May, 1788, on the hill of Knocklade, Antrim, poured a
stream of lava sixty yards wide for thirty-nine hours, and destroyed
the village of Ballyowen and all the inhabitants, save a man and
his wife and two children. ("Amer.  Cyclop.," art. 'Ireland'.)

While we find Lisbon and Ireland, east of Atlantis, subjected to
these great earthquake shocks, the West India Islands, west of the
same centre, have been repeatedly visited in a similar manner.  In
1692 Jamaica suffered from a violent earthquake.  The earth opened,
and great quantities of water were cast out; many people were
swallowed up in these rents; the earth caught some of them by the
middle and squeezed them to death; the heads of others only appeared
above-ground.  A tract of land near the town of Port Royal, about
a thousand acres in extent, sunk down in less than one minute, and
the sea immediately rolled in.

The Azore Islands are undoubtedly the peaks of the mountains of
Atlantis.  They are even yet the centre of great volcanic activity.
They have suffered severely from eruptions and earthquakes.  In
1808 a volcano rose suddenly in San Jorge to the height of 3500
feet, and burnt for six days, desolating the entire island.  In 1811
a volcano rose from the sea, near San Miguel, creating an island
300 feet high, which was named Sambrina, but which soon sunk beneath
the sea.  Similar volcanic eruptions occurred in the Azores in 1691
and 1720.

Along a great line, a mighty fracture in the surface of the globe,
stretching north and south through the Atlantic, we find a continuous
series of active or extinct volcanoes.  In Iceland we have Oerafa,
Hecla, and Rauda Kamba; another in Pico, in the Azores; the peak
of Teneriffe; Fogo, in one of the Cape de Verde Islands:  while of
extinct volcanoes we have several in Iceland, and two in Madeira;
while Fernando de Noronha, the island of Ascension, St.  Helena,
and Tristan d'Acunha are all of volcanic origin. ("Cosmos," vol.
v., p. 331.)

The following singular passage we quote entire from Lyell's Principles
of Geology," p. 436:

"In the 'Nautical Magazine' for 1835, p. 642, and for 1838, p. 361,
and in the 'Comptes Rendus', April, 1838, accounts are given of a
series of volcanic phenomena, earthquakes, troubled water, floating
scoria, and columns of smoke, which have been observed at intervals
since the middle of the last century, in a space of open sea between
longitudes 20 and 22' W., about half a degree south of the equator.
These facts, says Mr.  Darwin, seem to show that an island or
archipelago is in process of formation in the middle of the Atlantic.
A line joining St.  Helena and Ascension would, if prolonged,
intersect this slowly nascent focus of volcanic action.  Should
land be eventually formed here, it will not be the first that has
been produced by igneous action in this ocean since it was inhabited
by the existing species of testacea.  At Porto Praya, in St.
Jago, one of the Azores, a horizontal, calcareous stratum occurs,
containing shells of recent marine species, covered by a great sheet
of basalt eighty feet thick.  It would be difficult to estimate
too highly the commercial and political importance which a group of
islands might acquire if, in the next two or three thousand years,
they should rise in mid-ocean between St.  Helena and Ascension."

These facts would seem to show that the great fires which destroyed
Atlantis are still smouldering in the depths of the ocean; that the
vast oscillations which carried Plato's continent beneath the sea
may again bring it, with all its buried treasures, to the light;
and that even the wild imagination of Jules Verne, when he described
Captain Nemo, in his diving armor, looking down upon the temples and
towers of the lost island, ht by the fires of submarine volcanoes,
had some groundwork of possibility to build upon.

But who will say, in the presence of all the facts here enumerated,
that the submergence of Atlantis, in some great world-shaking
cataclysm, is either impossible or improbable? As will be shown
hereafter, when we come to discuss the Flood legends, every particular
which has come down to us of the destruction of Atlantis has been
duplicated in some of the accounts just given.

We conclude, therefore:  1. That it is proven beyond question, by
geological evidence, that vast masses of land once existed in the
region where Atlantis is located by Plato, and that therefore such
an island must have existed; 2. That there is nothing improbable
or impossible in the statement that it was destroyed suddenly by
an earthquake "in one dreadful night and day."






CHAPTER. V.

THE TESTIMONY OF THE SEA.





Suppose we were to find in mid-Atlantic, in front of the Mediterranean,
in the neighborhood of the Azores, the remains of an immense island,
sunk beneath the sea--one thousand miles in width, and two or three
thousand miles long--would it not go far to confirm the statement
of Plato that, "beyond the strait where you place the Pillars of
Hercules, there was an island larger than Asia (Minor) and Libya
combined," called Atlantis? And suppose we found that the Azores
were the mountain peaks of this drowned island, and were torn and
rent by tremendous volcanic convulsions; while around them, descending
into the sea, were found great strata of lava; and the whole face
of the sunken land was covered for thousands of miles with volcanic
dbris, would we not be obliged to confess that these facts furnished
strong corroborative proofs of the truth of Plato's statement, that
"in one day and one fatal night there came mighty earthquakes and
inundations which ingulfed that mighty people? Atlantis disappeared
beneath the sea; and then that sea became inaccessible on account
of the quantity of mud which the ingulfed island left in its place."

MAP OF ATLANTIS, WITH ITS ISLANDS AND CONNECTING RIDGES, FROM
DEEP-SEA SOUNDINGS

And all these things recent investigation has proved conclusively.
Deep-sea soundings have been made by ships of different nations;
the United States ship 'Dolphin', the German frigate 'Gazelle', and
the British ships 'Hydra', 'Porcupine', and 'Challenger' have mapped
out the bottom of the Atlantic, and the result is the revelation
of a great elevation, reaching from a point on the coast of the
British Islands southwardly to the coast of South America, at Cape
Orange, thence south-eastwardly to the coast of Africa, and thence
southwardly to Tristan d'Acunha.  I give one map showing the profile
of this elevation in the frontispiece, and another map, showing
the outlines of the submerged land, on page 47. It rises about 9000
feet above the great Atlantic depths around it, and in the Azores,
St.  Paul's Rocks, Ascension, and Tristan d'Acunha it reaches the
surface of the ocean.

Evidence that this elevation was once dry land is found in the fact
that "the inequalities, the mountains and valleys of its surface,
could never have been produced in accordance with any laws for the
deposition of sediment, nor by submarine elevation; but, on the
contrary, must have been carved by agencies 'acting above the water
level'." ('Scientific American', July 28th, 1877.)

Mr.  J. Starke Gardner, the eminent English geologist, is of the
opinion that in the Eocene Period a great extension of land existed
to the west of Cornwall.  Referring to the location of the "Dolphin"
and "Challenger" ridges, he asserts that "a great tract of land
formerly existed where the sea now is, and that Cornwall, the Scilly
and Channel Islands, Ireland and Brittany, are the remains of its
highest summits." ('Popular Science Review', July, 1878.)

Here, then, we have the backbone of the ancient continent which once
occupied the whole of the Atlantic Ocean, and from whose washings
Europe and America were constructed; the deepest parts of the ocean,
3500 fathoms deep, represent those portions which sunk first, to
wit, the plains to the east and west of the central mountain range;
some of the loftiest peaks of this range--the Azores, St.  Paul's,
Ascension, Tristan d'Acunba--are still above the ocean level; while
the great body of Atlantis lies a few hundred fathoms beneath the
sea.  In these "connecting ridges" we see the pathway which once
extended between the New World and the Old, and by means of which
the plants and animals of one continent travelled to the other;
and by the same avenues black men found their way, as we will show
hereafter, from Africa to America, and red men from America to
Africa.

And, as I have shown, the same great law which gradually depressed
the Atlantic continent, and raised the lands east and west of it,
is still at work:  the coast of Greenland, which may be regarded as
the northern extremity of the Atlantic continent, is still sinking
"so rapidly that ancient buildings on low rock-islands are now
submerged, and the Greenlander has learned by experience never to
build near the water's edge," ("North Amer. of Antiq.," p. 504.)
The same subsidence is going on along the shore of South Carolina
and Georgia, while the north of Europe and the Atlantic coast of
South America are rising rapidly.  Along the latter raised beaches,
1180 miles long and from 100 to 1300 feet high, have been traced.

When these connecting ridges extended from America to Europe and
Africa, they shut off the flow of the tropical waters of the ocean
to the north: there was then no "Gulf Stream;" the land-locked
ocean that laved the shores of Northern Europe was then intensely
cold; and the result was the Glacial Period.  When the barriers of
Atlantis sunk sufficiently to permit the natural expansion of the
heated water of the tropics to the north, the ice and snow which
covered Europe gradually disappeared; the Gulf Stream flowed around
Atlantis, and it still retains the circular motion first imparted
to it by the presence of that island.

The officers of the Challenger found the entire ridge of Atlantis
covered with volcanic deposits; these are the subsided mud which,
as Plato tells us, rendered the sea impassable after the destruction
of the island.

It does not follow that, at the time Atlantis was finally ingulfed,
the ridges connecting it with America and Africa rose above the
water-level; these may have gradually subsided into the sea, or
have gone down in cataclysms such as are described in the Central
American books.  The Atlantis of Plato may have been confined to
the "Dolphin Ridge" of our map.

ANCIENT ISLANDS BETWEEN ATLANTIS AND THE MEDITERRANIAN, FROM DEEP-SEA
SOUNDINGS

The United States sloop 'Gettysburg' has also made some remarkable
discoveries in a neighboring field.  I quote from John James Wild
(in 'Nature', March 1st, 1877, p. 377):

"The recently announced discovery by Commander Gorringe, of the
United States sloop 'Gettysburg', of a bank of soundings bearing
N. 85 W., and distant 130 miles from Cape St.  Vincent, during the
last voyage of the vessel across the Atlantic, taken in connection
with previous soundings obtained in the same region of the North
Atlantic, suggests the probable existence of a submarine ridge or
plateau connecting the island of Madeira with the coast of Portugal,
and the probable subaerial connection in prehistoric times of that
island with the south-western extremity of Europe.....  "These
soundings reveal the existence of a channel of an average depth of
from 2000 to 3000 fathoms, extending in a northeasterly direction
from its entrance between Madeira and the Canary Islands toward
Cape St.  Vincent....  Commander Gorringe, when about 150 miles
from the Strait of Gibraltar, found that the soundings decreased
from 2700 fathoms to 1600 fathoms in the distance of a few miles.
The subsequent soundings (five miles apart) gave 900, 500, 400,
and 100 fathoms; and eventually a depth of 32 fathoms was obtained,
in which the vessel anchored.  The bottom was found to consist of
live pink coral, and the position of the bank in lat. 36 29' N.,
long. 11 33' W."

The map on page 51 shows the position of these elevations.  They
must have been originally islands;--stepping-stones, as it were,
between Atlantis and the coast of Europe.

Sir C. Wyville Thomson found that the specimens of the fauna of the
coast of Brazil, brought up in his dredging-machine, are similar to
those of the western coast of Southern Europe.  This is accounted
for by the connecting ridges reaching from Europe to South America.

A member of the 'Challenger' staff, in a lecture delivered in
London, soon after the termination of the expedition, gave it as
his opinion that the great submarine plateau is the remains of "the
lost Atlantis."






CHAPTER VI.

THE TESTIMONY OF THE FLORA AND FAUNA.





Proofs are abundant that there must have been at one time uninterrupted
land communication between Europe and America.  In the words of a
writer upon this subject,

"When the animals and plants of the Old and New World are compared,
one cannot but be struck with their identity; all or nearly all
belong to the same genera, while many, even of the species, are
common to both continents.  This is most important in its bearing
on our theory, as indicating that they radiated from a common centre
'after the Glacial Period'....  The hairy mammoth, woolly-haired
rhinoceros, the Irish elk, the musk-ox, the reindeer, the glutton,
the lemming, etc., more or less accompanied this flora, and their
remains are always found in the post-glacial deposits of Europe
as low down as the South of France.  In the New World beds of the
same age contain similar remains, indicating that they came from
a common centre, and were spread out over both continents alike."
('Westminster Review', January, 1872, p. 19.)

Recent discoveries in the fossil beds of the Bad Lands of Nebraska
prove that the horse originated in America.  Professor Marsh, of
Yale College, has identified the several preceding forms from which
it was developed, rising, in the course of ages, from a creature
not larger than a fox until, by successive steps, it developed into
the true horse.  How did the wild horse pass from America to Europe
and Asia if there was not continuous land communication between
the two continents? He seems to have existed in Europe in a wild
state prior to his domestication by man.

The fossil remains of the camel are found in India, Africa, South
America, and in Kansas.  The existing alpacas and llamas of South
America are but varieties of the camel family.

The cave bear, whose remains are found associated with the hones of
the mammoth and the bones and works of man in the caves of Europe,
was identical with the grizzly bear of our Rocky Mountains.  The
musk-ox, whose relics are found in the same deposits, now roams
the wilds of Arctic America.  The glutton of Northern Europe, in
the Stone Age, is identical with the wolverine of the United States.
According to Rutimeyer, the ancient bison ('Bos priscus') of Europe
was identical with the existing American buffalo. "Every stage
between the ancient cave bison and the European aurochs can be
traced." The Norway elk, now nearly extinct, is identical with the
American moose.  The 'Cervus Americanus' found in Kentucky was as
large as the Irish elk, which it greatly resembled.  The lagomys,
or tailless hare, of the European eaves, is now found in the colder
regions of North America.  The reindeer, which once occupied Europe
as far down as France, was the same as the reindeer of America.
Remains of the cave lion of Europe ('Felix spelo'), a larger
beast than the largest of the existing species, have been found at
Natchez, Mississippi.  The European cave wolf was identical with
the American wolf.

Cattle were domesticated among the people of Switzerland during
the earliest part of the Stone Period (Darwin's "Animals Under
Domestication," vol. i., p. 103), that is to say, before the
Bronze Age and the Age of Iron.  Even at that remote period they
had already, by long-continued selection, been developed out of
wild forms akin to the American buffalo.  M. Gervais ("Hist.  Nat.
des Mammifores," vol. xi., p.  191) concludes that the wild race
from which our domestic sheep was derived is now extinct.  The
remains of domestic sheep are found in the debris of the Swiss
lake-dwellings during the Stone Age.  The domestic horse, ass,
lion, and goat also date back to a like great antiquity.  We have
historical records 7000 years old, and during that time no similar
domestication of a wild animal has been made.  This fact speaks
volumes as to the vast period,, of time during which man must have
lived in a civilized state to effect the domestication of so many
and such useful animals.

And when we turn from the fauna to the flora, we find the same
state of things.

An examination of the fossil beds of Switzerland of the Miocene Age
reveals the remains of more than eight hundred different species
of flower-bearing plants, besides mosses, ferns, etc.  The total
number of fossil plants catalogued from those beds, cryptogamous
as well as phnogamous, is upward of three thousand. 'The majority
of these species have migrated to America'. There were others that
passed into Asia, Africa, and even to Australia.  The American types
are, however, in the largest proportion.  The analogues of the flora
of the Miocene Age of Europe now grow in the forests of Virginia,
North and South Carolina, and Florida; they include such familiar
examples as magnolias, tulip-trees, evergreen oaks, maples, plane-trees,
robinas, sequoias, etc.  It would seem to be impossible that these
trees could have migrated from Switzerland to America unless there
was unbroken land communication between the two continents.

It is a still more remarkable fact that a comparison of the flora
of the Old World and New goes to show that not only was there
communication by land, over which the plants of one continent could
extend to another, but that man must have existed, and have helped
this transmigration, in the case of certain plants that were
incapable of making the journey unaided.

Otto Kuntze, a distinguished German botanist, who has spent many
years in the tropics, announces his conclusion that "In America and
in Asia the principal domesticated tropical plants 'are represented
by the same species'." He instances the 'Manihot utilissima',
whose roots yield a fine flour; the tarro ('Colocasia esculenta'),
the Spanish or red pepper, the tomato, the bamboo, the guava, the
mango-fruit, and especially the banana.  He denies that the American
origin of tobacco, maize, and the cocoa-nut is proved.  He refers
to the 'Paritium tiliaceum', a malvaceous plant, hardly noticed
by Europeans, but very highly prized by the natives of the tropics,
and cultivated everywhere in the East and West Indies; it supplies to
the natives of these regions so far apart their ropes and cordage.
It is always seedless in a cultivated state.  It existed in America
before the arrival of Columbus.

But Professor Kuntze pays especial attention to the banana, or
plantain.  The banana is seedless.  It is found throughout tropical
Asia and Africa.  Professor Kuntze asks, "In what way was this
plant, which cannot stand a voyage through the temperate zone,
carried to America?" And yet it was generally cultivated in America
before 1492. Says Professor Kuntze, "It must be remembered that
the plantain is a tree-like, herbaceous plant, possessing no easily
transportable bulbs, like the potato or the dahlia, nor propagable
by cuttings, like the willow or the poplar.  It has only a perennial
root, which, once planted, needs hardly any care, and yet produces the
most abundant crop of any known tropical plant." He then proceeds
to discuss how it could have passed from Asia to America.  He admits
that the roots must have been transported from one country to the
other by civilized man.  He argues that it could not have crossed
the Pacific from Asia to America, because the Pacific is nearly
thrice or four times as wide as the Atlantic.  The only way he can
account for the plantain reaching America is to suppose that it
was carried there when the North Pole had a tropical climate! Is
there any proof that civilized man existed at the North Pole when
it possessed the climate of Africa?

Is it not more reasonable to suppose that the plantain, or banana,
was cultivated by the people of Atlantis, and carried by their
civilized agricultural colonies to the east and the west? Do
we not find a confirmation of this view in the fact alluded to by
Professor Kuntze in these words:  "A cultivated plant which does not
possess seeds must have been under culture for a very long period--we
have not in Europe a single exclusively seedless, berry-bearing,
cultivated plant--and hence it is perhaps fair to infer that these
plants 'were cultivated as early as the beginning of the middle of
the Diluvial Period'."

Is it possible that a plant of this kind could have been cultivated
for this immense period of time in both Asia and America? Where
are the two nations, agricultural and highly civilized, on those
continents by whom it was so cultivated? What has become of them?
Where are the traces of their civilization? All the civilizations
of Europe, Asia, and Africa radiated from the Mediterranean; the
Hindoo-Aryans advanced from the north-west; they were kindred to
the Persians, who were next-door neighbors to the Arabians (cousins
of the Phoenicians), and who lived along-side of the Egyptians,
who had in turn derived their civilization from the Phoenicians.

It would be a marvel of marvels if 'one' nation, on 'one' continent,
had cultivated the banana for such a vast period of time until
it became seedless; the nation retaining a peaceful, continuous,
agricultural civilization during all that time.  But to suppose that
two nations could have cultivated the same plant, under the same
circumstances, on two different continents, for the same unparalleled
lapse of time, is supposing an impossibility.

We find just such a civilization as was necessary, according to
Plato, and under just such a climate, in Atlantis and nowhere else.
We have found it reaching, by its contiguous islands, within one
hundred and fifty miles of the coast of Europe on the one side,
and almost touching the West India Islands on the other, while, by
its connecting ridges, it bound together Brazil and Africa.

But it may be said these animals and plants may have passed from
Asia to America across the Pacific by the continent of Lemuria; or
there may have been continuous land communication at one time at
Behring's Strait.  True; but an examination of the flora of the
Pacific States shows that very many of the trees and plants common
to Europe and the Atlantic States are not to be seen west of the
Rocky Mountains.  The magnificent magnolias, the tulip-trees, the
plane-trees, etc., which were found existing in the Miocene Age in
Switzerland, and are found at the present day in the United States,
are altogether lacking on the Pacific coast.  The sources of supply
of that region seem to have been far inferior to the sources of
supply of the Atlantic States.  Professor Asa Gray tells us that,
out of sixty-six genera and one hundred and fifty-five species
found in the forests cast of the Rocky Mountains, only thirty-one
genera and seventy-eight species are found west of the mountains.
The Pacific coast possesses no papaw, no linden or basswood, no
locust-trees, no cherry-tree large enough for a timber tree, no
gum-trees, no sorrel-tree, nor kalmia; no persimmon-trees, not a
holly, only one ash that may be called a timber tree, no catalpa
or sassafras, not a single elm or hackberry, not a mulberry, not
a hickory, or a beech, or a true chestnut.  These facts would seem
to indicate that the forest flora of North America entered it from
the east, and that the Pacific States possess only those fragments
of it that were able to struggle over or around the great dividing
mountain-chain.

We thus see that the flora and fauna of America and Europe testify
not only to the existence of Atlantis, but to the fact that in an
earlier age it must have extended from the shores of one continent
to those of the other; and by this bridge of land the plants and
animals of one region passed to the other.

The cultivation of the cotton-plant and the manufacture of its product
was known to both the Old and New World.  Herodotus describes it
(450 B.C.) as the tree of India that bears a fleece more beautiful
than that of the sheep.  Columbus found the natives of the West
Indies using cotton cloth.  It was also found in Mexico and Peru.
It is a significant fact that the cotton-plant has been found
growing wild in many parts of America, but never in the Old World.
This would seem to indicate that the plant was a native of America;
and this is confirmed by the superiority of American cotton, and the
further fact that the plants taken from America to India constantly
degenerate, while those taken from India to America as constantly
improve.

There is a question whether the potato, maize, and tobacco were
not cultivated in China ages before Columbus discovered America.
A recent traveller says, "The interior of China, along the course
of the Yang-tse-Kiang, is a land full of wonders.  In one place
piscicultural nurseries line the banks for nearly fifty miles.  All
sorts of inventions, the cotton-gin included, claimed by Europeans
and Americans, are to be found there forty centuries old.  Plants,
yielding drugs of great value, without number, the familiar tobacco
and potato, maize, white and yellow corn, and other plants 'believed
to be indigenous to America, have been cultivated there from time
immemorial'."

Bonafous ("Histoire Naturelle du Mais," Paris, 1826) attributes a
European or Asiatic origin to maize.  The word maize, (Indian corn)
is derived from 'mahiz' or 'mahis', the name of the plant in the
language of the Island of Hayti.  And yet, strange to may, in the
Lettish and Livonian languages, in the north of Europe, 'mayse'
signifies bread; in Irish, 'maise' is food, and in the Old High German,
'maz' is meat.  May not likewise the Spanish 'maiz' have antedated
the time of Columbus, and borne testimony to early intercommunication
between the people of the Old and New Worlds?

It is to Atlantis we must look for the origin of nearly all our
valuable plants.  Darwin says ("Animals and Plants under Domestication,"
vol. i., p. 374), "It has often been remarked that we do not owe a
single useful plant to Australia, or the Cape of Good Hope--countries
abounding to an unparalleled degree with endemic species--or to New
Zealand, or to America south of the Plata; and, according to some
authors, not to America north of Mexico." In other words, the
domesticated plants are only found within the limits of what I
shall show hereafter was the Empire of Atlantis and its colonies;
for only here was to be found an ancient, long-continuing civilization,
capable of developing from a wild state those plants which were
valuable to man, including all the cereals on which to-day civilized
man depends for subsistence.  M. Alphonse de Candolle tells us that
we owe 33 useful plants to Mexico, Peru, and Chili.  According to
the same high authority, of 157 valuable cultivated plants 85 can
be traced back to their wild state; as to 40, there is doubt as
to their origin; while 32 are utterly unknown in their aboriginal
condition. ("Geograph.  Botan.  Raisonne," 1855, pp. 810-991.)
Certain roses--the imperial lily, the tuberose and the lilac--are
said to have been cultivated from such a vast antiquity that they
are not known in their wild state. (Darwin, "Animals and Plants,"
vol. i., p.  370.) And these facts are the more remarkable because,
as De Candolle has shown, all the plants historically known to
have been first cultivated in Europe still exist there in the wild
state. ('Ibid'.) The inference is strong that the great cereals--wheat,
oats, barley, rye, and maize--must have been first domesticated in
a vast antiquity, or in some continent which has since disappeared,
carrying the original wild plants with it.

CEREALS OF THE AGE OF STONE IN EUROPE

Darwin quotes approvingly the opinion of Mr.  Bentham (Hist.  Notes
Cult.  Plants"), "as the result of all the most reliable evidence
that none of the Ceralia--wheat, rye, barley, and oats--exist or
have existed truly wild in their present state." In the Stone Age
of Europe five varieties of wheat and three of barley were cultivated.
(Darwin, "Animals and Plants," vol. i., p. 382.) He says that
it may be inferred, from the presence in the lake habitations of
Switzerland of a variety of wheat known as the Egyptian wheat, and
from the nature of the weeds that grew among their crops, "that the
lake inhabitants either still kept up commercial intercourse with
some southern people, or had originally proceeded as colonists from
the south." I should argue that they were colonists from the land
where wheat and barley were first domesticated, to wit, Atlantis.
And when the Bronze Age came, we find oats and rye making their
appearance with the weapons of bronze, together with a peculiar kind
of pea.  Darwin concludes ('Ibid'., vol. i., p. 385) that wheat,
barley, rye, and oats were either descended from ten or fifteen
distinct species, "most of which are now unknown or extinct," or
from four or eight species closely resembling our present forms,
or so "widely different as to escape identification;" in which
latter case, he says, "man must have cultivated the cereals at an
'enormously remote period'," and at that time practised "some degree
of selection."

Rawlinson ("Ancient Monarchies," vol. i., p. 578) expresses the
opinion that the ancient Assyrians possessed the pineapple. "The
representation on the monuments is so exact that I can scarce]
doubt the pineapple being intended." (See Layard's "Nineveh and
Babylon," p. 338.) The pineapple ('Bromelia ananassa') is supposed
to be of American origin, and unknown to Europe before the time
of Columbus; and yet, apart from the revelations of the Assyrian
monuments, there has been some dispute upon this point. ("Amer.
Cyclop.," vol. xiii., p. .528.)

ANCIENT IRISH PIPES

It is not even certain that the use of tobacco was not known to
the colonists from Atlantis settled in Ireland in an age long prior
to Sir Walter Raleigh.  Great numbers of pipes have been found in
the raths and tumuli of Ireland, which, there is every reason to
believe, were placed there by men of the Prehistoric Period.  The
illustration on p. 63 represents some of the so-called "Danes'
pipes" now in the collection of the Royal Irish Academy.  The Danes
entered Ireland many centuries before the time of Columbus, and if
the pipes are theirs, they must have used tobacco, or some substitute
for it, at that early period.  It is probable, however, that the
tumuli of Ireland antedate the Danes thousands of years.

ANCIENT INDIAN PIPE, NEW JERSEY

Compare these pipes from the ancient mounds of Ireland with the
accompanying picture of an Indian pipe of the Stone Age of New
Jersey.  ("Smithsonian Rep.," 1875, p. 342.)

Recent Portuguese travellers have found the most remote tribes of
savage negroes in Africa, holding no commercial intercourse with
Europeans, using strangely shaped pipes, in which they smoked a plant
of the country.  Investigations in America lead to the conclusion
that tobacco was first burnt as an incense to the gods, the priest
alone using the pipe; and from this beginning the extraordinary
practice spread to the people, and thence over all the world.  It
may have crossed the Atlantic in a remote age, and have subsequently
disappeared with the failure of retrograding colonists to raise
the tobacco-plant.





PART II. THE DELUGE.











CHAPTER I.

THE DESTRUCTION OF ATLANTIS DESCRIBED IN THE DELUGE LEGENDS.





Having demonstrated, as we think successfully, that there is no
improbability in the statement of Plato that a large island, almost
a continent, existed in the past in the Atlantic Ocean, nay, more,
that it is a geological certainty that it did exist; and having
further shown that it is not improbable but very possible that it
may have sunk beneath the sea in the manner described by Plato,
we come now to the next question, Is the memory of this gigantic
catastrophe preserved among the traditions of mankind? We think
there can be no doubt that an affirmative answer must be given to
this question.

An event, which in a few hours destroyed, amid horrible convulsions,
an entire country, with all its vast population-that Population the
ancestors of the great races of both continents, and they themselves
the custodians of the civilization of their age-could not fail
to impress with terrible force the minds of men, and to project
its gloomy shadow over all human history.  And hence, whether we
turn to the Hebrews, the Aryans, the Phoenicians, the Greeks, the
Cushites, or the inhabitants of America, we find everywhere traditions
of the Deluge; and we shall see that all these traditions point
unmistakably to the destruction of Atlantis.

Franois Lenormant says ('Contemp.  Rev'., Nov., 1879):

"The result authorizes us to affirm the story of the Deluge to be
a universal tradition among all branches of the human race, with
the one exception, however, of the black.  Now, a recollection thus
precise and concordant cannot be a myth voluntarily invented.  No
religious or cosmogonic myth presents this character of universality.
It must arise from the reminiscence of a real and terrible event,
so powerfully impressing the imagination of the first ancestors
of our race as never to have been forgotten by their descendants.
This cataclysm. must have occurred near the first cradle of mankind,
and before the dispersion of the families from which the principal
races were to spring; for it would be at once improbable and
uncritical to admit that, at as many different points of the globe
as we should have to assume in order to explain the wide spread
of these traditions, local phenomena so exactly alike should
have occurred, their memory having assumed an identical form, and
presenting circumstances that need not necessarily have occurred
to the mind in such cases.

"Let us observe, however, that probably the diluvian tradition is
not primitive, but imported in America; that it undoubtedly wears
the aspect of an importation among the rare populations of the yellow
race where it is found; and lastly, that it is doubtful among the
Polynesians of Oceania.  There will still remain three great races
to which it is undoubtedly peculiar, 'who have not borrowed it from
each other', but among whom the tradition is primitive, and goes
back to the most ancient times, and these three races are precisely
the only ones of which the Bible speaks as being 'descended
from Noah'--those of which it gives the ethnic filiation in the
tenth chapter of Genesis.  This observation.  which I hold to be
undeniable, attaches a singularly historic and exact value to the
tradition as recorded by the Sacred Book, even if, on the other
hand, it may lead to giving it a 'more limited geographical and
ethnological significance'....

"But, as the case now stands, we do not hesitate to declare that,
far from being a myth, the Biblical Deluge 'is a real and historical
fact', having, to say the least, left its impress on the ancestors
of three races--Aryan, or Indo-European, Semitic, or Syro-Arabian,
Chamitic, or Cushite--that is to say, on the 'three great civilized
races of the ancient world', those which constitute the higher
humanity--before the ancestors of those races had as yet separated,
and in the part of Asia they together inhabited."

Such profound scholars and sincere Christians as M. Schwoebel
(Paris, 1858), and M. Omalius d'Halloy (Bruxelles, 1866), deny the
universality of the Deluge, and claim that "it extended only to
the principal centre of humanity, to those who remained near its
primitive cradle, without reaching the scattered tribes who had
already spread themselves far away in almost desert regions.  It
is certain that the Bible narrative commences by relating facts
common to the whole human species, confining itself subsequently
to the annals of the race peculiarly chosen by the designs of
Providence." (Lenormant and Chevallier, "Anc.  Hist. of the East,"
p. 44.) This theory is supported by that eminent authority on
anthropology, M. de Quatrefages, as well as by Cuvier; the Rev.  R.
p.  Bellynck, S.J., admits that it has nothing expressly opposed
to orthodoxy.

Plato identifies "the great deluge of all" with the destruction
of Atlantis.  The priest of Sais told Solon that before "the great
deluge of all" Athens possessed a noble race, who performed many
noble deeds, the last and greatest of which was resisting the attempts
of Atlantis to subjugate them; and after this came the destruction
of Atlantis, and the same great convulsion which overwhelmed that
island destroyed a number of the Greeks.  So that the Egyptians,
who possessed the memory of many partial deluges, regarded this as
"the great deluge of all."






CHAPTER II.

THE DELUGE OF THE BIBLE





We give first the Bible history of the Deluge, as found in Genesis
(chap. vi. to chap. viii.):

"And it came to pass, when men began to multiply on the face of
the earth, and daughters were born unto them, that the sons of God
saw the daughters of men that they were fair; and they took them
wives of all which they chose.

"And the Lord said, My Spirit shall not always strive with man, for
that he also is flesh:  yet his days shall be a hundred and twenty
years.

"There were giants in the earth in those days; and also after that,
when the sons of God came in unto the daughters of men, and they
bare children to them, the same became mighty men which were of
old, men of renown.

"And God saw that the wickedness of man was great in the earth, and
that every imagination of the thoughts of his heart was only evil
continually.  And it repented the Lord that he had made man on the
earth, and it grieved him at his heart.  And the Lord said, I will
destroy man whom I have created from the face of the earth; both
man, and beast, and the creeping thing, and the fowls of the air;
for it repenteth me that I have made them.  But Noah found grace
in the eyes of the Lord.

["These are the generations of Noah:  Noah was a just man and
perfect in his generations, and Noah walked with God.  And Noah
begat three sons, Shem, Ham, and Japheth.]

"The earth also was corrupt before God; and the earth was filled
with violence.  And God looked upon the earth, and, behold, it was
corrupt; for all flesh had corrupted his way upon the earth.  And
God said unto Noah, The end of all flesh is come before me; for
the earth is filled with violence through them; and, behold, I will
destroy them with the earth.  Make thee an ark of gopher wood; rooms
shalt thou make in the ark, and shalt pitch it within and without
with pitch.  And this is the fashion which thou shalt make it of:
The length of the ark shall be three hundred cubits, the breadth
of it fifty cubits, and the height of it thirty cubits.  A window
shalt thou make to the ark, and in a cubit shalt thou finish it
above; and the door of the ark shalt thou set in the side thereof;
with lower, second, and third stories shalt thou make it.  And,
behold, I, even I, do bring a flood of waters upon the earth, to
destroy all flesh, wherein is the breath of life, from under heaven;
and everything that is in the earth shall die.  But with thee will
I establish my covenant; and thou shalt come into the ark, thou,
and thy sons, and thy wife, and thy sons' wives with thee.  And
of every living thing of all flesh, two of every sort shalt thou
bring into the ark, to keep them alive with thee; they shall be
male and female.  Of fowls after their kind, and of cattle after
their kind, of every creeping thing of the earth after his kind;
two of every sort shall come unto thee, to keep them alive.  And
take thou unto thee of all food that is eaten, and thou shalt gather
it to thee; and it shall be for food for thee, and for them.

"Thus did Noah; according to all that God commanded him, so did
he.

"And the Lord said unto Noah, Come thou and all thy house into the
ark; for thee have I seen righteous before me in this generation.
Of every clean beast thou shalt take to thee by sevens, the male
and his female: and of beasts that are not clean by two, the male
and his female.  Of fowls also of the air by sevens, the male and
the female; to keep seed alive upon the face of all the earth.  For
yet seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth forty
days and forty nights; and every living substance that I have made
will I destroy from off the face of the earth.

"And Noah did according unto all that the Lord commanded him.  And
Noah was six hundred years old when the flood of waters was upon
the earth.

"And Noah went in, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives
with him, into the ark, because of the waters of the flood.  Of
clean beasts, and of beasts that are not clean, and of fowls, and
of everything that creepeth upon the earth, there went in two and
two unto Noah into the ark, the male and the female, as God had
commanded Noah.

"And it came to pass after seven days, that the waters of the flood
were upon the earth.  In the six hundredth year of Noah's life, in
the second month, the seventeenth day of the month, the same day
were all the fountains of the great deep broken up, and the windows
of heaven were opened.  And the rain was upon the earth forty days
and forty nights.  In the selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and
Ham, and Japheth, the sons of Noah, and Noah's wife, and the three
wives of his sons with them, into the ark; they, and every beast
after his kind, and all the cattle after their kind, and every
creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth after his kind, and
every fowl after his kind, every bird of every sort.  And they
went in unto Noah into the ark, two and two of all flesh, wherein
is the breath of life.  And they that went in, went in male and
female of all flesh, as God had commanded him:  and the Lord shut
him in.

"And the flood was forty days upon the earth; and the waters
increased, and bare up the ark, and it was lifted up above the
earth.  And the waters prevailed, and were increased greatly upon
the earth; and the ark went Upon the face of the waters.  And the
waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the high bills,
that were under the whole heaven, were covered.  Fifteen cubits
upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains were covered.
And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both of fowl, and
of cattle, and of beast, and of every creeping thing that creepeth
upon the earth, and every man:  all in whose nostrils was the breath
of life, of all that was in the dry land, died.  And every living
substance was destroyed which was upon the face of the ground,
both man, and cattle, and the creeping things, and the fowl of
the heaven; and they were destroyed from the earth:  and Noah only
remained alive, and they that were with him in the ark.  And the
waters prevailed upon the earth a hundred and fifty days.

"And God remembered Noah, and every living thing, and all the
cattle that was with him in the ark:  and God made a wind to pass
over the earth, and the waters assuaged.  The fountains also of
the deep and the windows of heaven were stopped, and the rain from
heaven was restrained.  And the waters returned from off the earth
continually:  and after the end of the hundred and fifty days the
waters were abated.  And the ark rested in the seventh mouth, on
the seventeenth day of the month, upon the mountains of Ararat.
And the waters decreased continually until the tenth month:  in
the tenth month, on the first day of the mouth, were the tops of
the mountains seen.

"And it came to pass at the end of forty days, that Noah opened the
window of the ark which he had made:  and be sent forth a raven,
which went forth to and fro, until the waters were dried up from
off the earth.  Also he sent forth a dove from him, to see if the
waters were abated from off the face of the ground.  But the dove
found no rest for the sole of her foot, and she returned unto him
into the ark; for the waters were on the face of the whole earth.
Then he put forth his hand, and took her, and pulled her in unto
him into the ark.  And he stayed yet other seven days; and again
he sent forth the dove out of the ark.  And the dove came in to
him in the evening, and, lo, in her mouth was an olive leaf plucked
off:  so Noah knew that the waters were abated from off the earth.
And he stayed yet other seven days, and sent forth the dove, which
returned not again unto him any more.

"And it came to pass in the six hundredth and first year, in the
first month, the first day of the month, the waters were dried up
from off the earth:  and Noah removed the covering of the ark, and
looked, and, behold, the face of the ground was dry.  And in the
second month, on the seven and twentieth day of the month, was the
earth dried.

"And God spake unto Noah, saying, Go forth of the ark, thou, and
thy wife, and thy sons, and thy sons' wives with thee.  Bring forth
with thee every living thing that is with thee, of all flesh, both
of fowl and of cattle, and of every creeping thing that creepeth
upon the earth; that they may breed abundantly it) the earth, and
be fruitful, and multiply upon the earth.

"And Noah went forth, and his sons, and his wife, and big sons'
wives with him:  every beast, every creeping thing, and every fowl,
and whatsoever creepeth upon the earth, after their kinds, went
forth out of the ark.

"And Noah builded an altar unto the Lord; and took of every clean
beast, and of every clean fowl, and offered burnt offerings on the
altar.  And the Lord smelled a sweet savour; and the Lord said in
his heart, I will not again curse the ground any more for man's
sake; for the imagination of man's heart is evil from his youth:
neither will I again smite any more every thing living, as I have
done.  While the earth remaineth, seedtime and harvest, and cold
and heat, and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease."

Let us briefly consider this record.

It shows, taken in connection with the opening chapters of Genesis:

1. That the land destroyed by water was the country in which the
civilization of the human race originated.  Adam was at first naked
(Gen., chap. iii., 7); then he clothed himself in leaves; then in
the skins of animals (chap. iii., 21):  be was the first that tilled
the earth, having emerged from a more primitive condition in which
be lived upon the fruits of the forest (chap. ii., 16); his son
Abel was the first of those that kept flocks of sheep (chap. iv.,
2); his son Cain was the builder of the first city (chap. iv., 17);
his descendant, Tubal-cain, was the first metallurgist (chap. iv.,
22); Jabal was the first that erected tents and kept cattle (chap.
iv., 20); Jubal was the first that made musical instruments.  We
have here the successive steps by which a savage race advances to
civilization.  We will see hereafter that the Atlanteans passed
through precisely similar stages of development.

2. The Bible agrees with Plato in the statement that these Antediluvians
had reached great populousness and wickedness, and that it was on
account of their wickedness God resolved to destroy them.

3. In both cases the inhabitants of the doomed land were destroyed
in a great catastrophe by the agency of water; they were drowned.

4. The Bible tells us that in an earlier age, before their destruction,
mankind had dwelt in a happy, peaceful, sinless condition in a
Garden of Eden.  Plato tells us the same thing of the earlier ages
of the Atlanteans.

6. In both the Bible history and Plato's story the destruction of
the people was largely caused by the intermarriage of the superior
or divine race, "the sons of God," with an inferior stock, "the
children of men," whereby they were degraded and rendered wicked.

We will see hereafter that the Hebrews and their Flood legend
are closely connected with the Phoenicians, whose connection with
Atlantis is established in many ways.

It is now conceded by scholars that the genealogical table given
in tho Bible (Gen., chap. x.) is not intended to include the true
negro races, or the Chinese, the Japanese, the Finns or Lapps, the
Australians, or the American red men.  It refers altogether to the
Mediterranean races, the Aryans, the Cushites, the Phoenicians,
the Hebrews, and the Egyptians. "The sons of Ham" were not true
negroes, but the dark-brown races. (See Winchell's "Preadamites,"
chap. vii.)

If these races (the Chinese, Australians, Americans, etc.) are
not descended from Noah they could not have been included in the
Deluge.  If neither China, Japan, America, Northern Europe, nor
Australia were depopulated by the Deluge, the Deluge could not have
been universal.  But as it is alleged that it did destroy a country,
and drowned all the people thereof except Noah and his family,
the country so destroyed could not have been Europe, Asia, Africa,
America, or Australia, for there has been no universal destruction
of the people of those regions; or, if there had been, how can we
account for the existence to-day of people on all of those continents
whose descent Genesis does not trace back to Noah, and, in fact,
about whom the writer of Genesis seems to have known nothing?

We are thus driven to one of two alternative conclusions:  either
the Deluge record of the Bible is altogether fabulous, or it relates
to some land other than Europe, Asia, Africa, or Australia, some
land that 'was' destroyed by water.  It is not fabulous; and the
land it refers to is not Europe, Asia, Africa, or Australia--but
Atlantis.  No other land is known to history or tradition that was
overthrown in a great catastrophe by the agency of water; that was
civilized, populous, powerful, and given over to wickedness.

That high and orthodox authority, Franois Lenormant, says ("Ancient
Hist. of the East," vol. i., p. 64), "The descendants of Shem, Ham,
and Japhet, so admirably catalogued by Moses, include one only of
the races of humanity, the white race, whose three chief divisions
he gives us as now recognized by anthropologists.  The other three
races--yellow, black, and red--have no place in the Bible list of
nations sprung from Noah." As, therefore, the Deluge of the Bible
destroyed only the land and people of Noah, it could not have been
universal.  The religious world does not pretend to fix the location
of the Garden of Eden.  The Rev.  George Leo Haydock says, "The
precise situation cannot be ascertained; bow great might be its
extent we do not know;" and we will see hereafter that the unwritten
traditions of the Church pointed to a region in the west, beyond
the ocean which bounds Europe in that direction, as the locality
in which "mankind dwelt before the Deluge."

It will be more and more evident) as we proceed in the consideration.
of the Flood legends of other nations, that the Antediluvian World
was none other than Atlantis,






CHAPTER III.

THE DELUGE OF THE CHALDEANS.





We have two versions of the Chaldean story--unequally developed,
indeed, but exhibiting a remarkable agreement.  The one most
anciently known, and also the shorter, is that which Berosus took
from the sacred books of Babylon, and introduced into the history
that he wrote for the use of the Greeks.  After speaking of the
last nine antediluvian kings, the Chaldean priest continues thus.

"Obarts Elbaratutu being dead, his son Xisuthros (Khasisatra)
reigned eighteen sares (64,800 years). It was under him that the
Great Deluge took place, the history of which is told in the sacred
documents as follows:  Cronos (Ea) appeared to him in his sleep,
and announced that on the fifteenth of the month of Daisios (the
Assyrian month Sivan--a little before the summer solstice) all men
should perish by a flood.  He therefore commanded him to take the
beginning, the middle, and the end of whatever was consigned to
writing, and to bury it in the City of the Sun, at Sippara; then
to build a vessel, and to enter it with his family and dearest
friends; to place in this vessel provisions to eat and drink, and
to cause animals, birds, and quadrupeds to enter it; lastly, to
prepare everything, for navigation.  And when Xisuthros inquired in
what direction he should steer his bark, be was answered, 'toward
the gods,' and enjoined to pray that good might come of it for men.

"Xisuthros obeyed, and constructed a vessel five stadia long and
five broad; he collected all that had been prescribed to him, and
embarked his wife, his children, and his intimate friends.

"The Deluge having come, and soon going down, Xisuthros loosed
some of the birds.  These, finding no food nor place to alight on,
returned to the ship.  A few days later Xisuthros again let them
free, but they returned again to the vessel, their feet fall of
mud.  Finally, loosed the third time, the birds came no more back.
Then Xisuthros understood that the earth was bare.  He made an
opening in the roof of the ship, and saw